The Project Gutenberg eBook of The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn ( Tom Sawyer ' s Com ra de )

This ebook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this ebook or online
at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States,
you will have to check the laws of the country where you are located
before using this eBook.

T it le : The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn ( Tom Sawyer ' s Com ra de )

Au thor : Mark T wain

Illustr at or : E . W . K em ble

R ele ase dat e: May 1 0, 20 1 0 [ eBook # 3 2 3 2 5 ]
Most rec ently up dat ed : N ov em ber 12 , 20 2 1

L angu ag e: English

Cre dit s: Pro du ced by James Ad co ck. Spe cial thanks to The Inter net
Archi ve : American Li br ari es.
Rev ised by Richard T on sing.


*** STAR T OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE ADVENTURES OF HUCKLEBERRY FINN ( TOM SAWY ER ' S CO MR ADE ) ***




[Illustration: P or tra it of the Auth or

S. L . C lemen s ]




THE ADVENTURES

OF

HUCKLEBERRY FINN

( TOM SAWY ER ’S CO MR ADE )


SC EN E : The Mississippi Valley
TI M E : For ty to F if ty Y ears A go

By Mark T wain

I LL U ST RA T ED

NEW EDI TION F RO M NEW P LA T ES


H AR PER & B RO TH ER S P U B LI SHER S

NEW Y ORK AND L ON D ON

—————




Boo ks by MARK T W A IN


ST . J O AN OF AR C
THE IN NO C ENT S AB RO AD
RO U GH ING I T
THE G I L D ED AG E
A TRA M P AB RO AD
F O LL O W ING THE E QU AT OR
P U D D ’ N HE AD WI L S ON
S K E T CH ES NEW AND OL D
THE A M ER I C AN C LA IM AN T
CH RI ST I AN SC I EN C E
A CON N EC TIC UT Y AN K E E AT THE C OU R T OF
K ING AR TH UR
THE ADVENTURES OF HUCKLEBERRY FINN
P ER S ON AL RE C OL LE C TIONS OF J O AN OF AR C
LI F E ON THE M I SSI SSI P P I
THE M AN THAT C OR R U PT ED H AD LE Y B UR G
THE P R INC E AND THE P A U PER
THE $ 3 0,000 BE QU ES T
THE ADVENTURES OF TOM SAWY ER
TOM SAWY ER AB RO AD
W H AT IS M AN ?
THE M Y ST ER I OU S ST RAN G ER
AD A M ’S DI AR Y
A D O G ’S T AL E
A D OU B LE - B AR RE LE D DE T EC TI VE ST OR Y
EDI T OR I AL WI L D O AT S
E V E ’S DI AR Y
IN DE F ENSE OF H AR RI E T S HE LL Y AND
O TH ER ES SA Y S
IS SH A K ES P E AR E DE AD ?
C A PT . ST OR M F I EL D ’S VI SI T TO HE A V EN
A H OR SE ’S T AL E
THE J U M P ING F RO G
THE £ 1 ,00 0,000 B AN K - NO T E
TRA V EL S AT H O M E
TRA V EL S IN H I ST OR Y
MARK T W A IN ’S LE T TER S
MARK T W A IN ’S S P E E CH ES

—————

H AR PER & B RO TH ER S , NEW Y ORK
[ E stab li shed 18 1 7 ]
The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn
—————
Copy right, 188 4. by S am u el L . C lemen s
—————
Copy right. 189 6 and 189 9. by Harper & Bro ther s
—————
Copy right. 1 9 12 , by C lar a G ab ri low it s ch
—————
P rin ted in the United States of America




CON T ENT S


No ti ce
Ex plan at or y
I. I D is cover Moses and the B ul rus her s
II. Our Gang ’s D ar k Oa th
III. We Am bus ca de the A-rabs
IV. The Ha ir -b all Or ac le
V. Pap Star ts in on a New Li fe
VI. Pap S tru gg les with the Dea th Angel
VII. I F ool Pap and G et A way
VIII. I S pare Miss Watson’s Jim
IX. The House of Dea th F lo ats By
X . What Com es of H and lin’ S na ke- skin
X I. They’re After U s!
X II. “B et ter Let B lame We ll Al one ”
X III. H onest Loo t from the “W alter Sco tt ”
X IV. Was Solomon Wi se?
X V. F oo ling Poor Old Jim
X VI. The R att le snake-skin Does Its W or k
X VII. The Grangerfords Take M e In
X VIII. Why Harney Ro de A way for His H at
X IX. The Duke and the Da up h in Come A board
XX . What Royalty Did to Par k ville
XX I. An Arkan saw Di fficul ty
XX II. Why the L y n ching Be e F a iled
XX III. The Or ner iness of K ings
XX IV. The King Tur ns Par son
XX V. All Full of T ears and F la p d ood le
XX VI. I Ste al the K ing ’s P l under
XX VII. De ad Peter has His G old
XX VIII. O ver reaching Don’t Pa y
XX IX. I L ight Out in the St or m
XXX . The G old Sa ves the Thi ev es
XXX I. You C an ’t Pray a Li e
XXX II. I Have a New N ame
XXX III. The P iti ful En ding of Royalty
XXX IV. We C he er U p Jim
XXX V. D ar k, De ep - laid P lan s
XXX VI. T rying to Hel p Jim
XXX VII. Jim G ets His W itch pie
XXX VIII. “Here a Cap tive H ear t B u st ed ”
XXX IX. Tom W r it es N on namous L et ters
XL . A Mi x ed-up and S pl en did R es cu e
XL I. “M ust ’a’ Be en S per it s ”
X LI I. Why They Di dn’t Han g Jim
C ha p ter the La st. Nothing More to W r ite




I LL U ST RA TIONS


—————

P or tra it of the Auth or
Huckleberry Finn
“‘ G imme a C haw ’”
Tom Ad vi ses a W itch Pi e




NO TIC E


P er sons attempting to find a moti ve in this narrative will be
pro secu ted; persons attempting to find a moral in it will be ban ishe d;
persons attempting to find a pl ot in it will be shot.

By Or der of the Auth or,
P er G . G ., Chi ef of Or dn ance.




EX P L AN AT OR Y


In this book a number of diale cts are u sed, to wit : the Missouri ne gr o
diale ct; the extre m est form of the back woods South we stern diale ct; the
ordinary “P i ke Coun ty ” diale ct; and four modi fied vari e ties of this
last. The shad ings have not been done in a ha pha z ard fashion, or by
gu ess wor k; but pain sta king ly, and with the tru st wor thy gu id ance and
support of personal famili ar ity with these several form s of speech.

I make this explanation for the reason that without it many rea ders
would suppose that all these charac ters were trying to talk a like and
not succe ed ing.

The Auth or.




HUCKLEBERRY FINN




CHAPTER I


You don’t know about me without you have read a book by the name of
The Adventures of Tom Sawy er; but that ain’t no matter. That book was
made by Mr. Mark T wa in, and he told the truth, main ly. There was things
which he stret ched, but mainly he told the truth. That is nothing. I
never seen anybody but lied one time or another, without it was Aunt
Polly, or the wid ow, or maybe Mar y. Aunt Poll y— Tom’s Aunt Polly, she
is —and Mary, and the W id ow D ou gl as is all told about in that book,
which is mostly a true book, with some stret ch ers, as I said before.

Now the way that the book win ds up is this: Tom and me found the
money that the robbers hid in the ca ve, and it made us rich. We got
six thousand dollars a pie ce— all gol d. It was an awful sight of money
when it was piled up. Well, Judge Thatcher he took it and put it out
at interest, and it fetched us a dollar a day apiece all the year
round — more than a body could tell what to do with. The W id ow D ou gl as
she took me for her son, and allowed she would si vili ze me; but it was
rough living in the house all the time, consider ing how di sm al regular
and de cent the widow was in all her way s; and so when I couldn’t stand
it no longer I lit out. I got into my old rags and my su gar - hog s head
again, and was free and satisfied. But Tom Sawyer he hunted me up and
said he was going to start a band of robber s, and I might join if I
would go back to the widow and be respect able. So I went back.

The widow she cried over me, and called me a poor lost lam b, and she
called me a lot of other nam es, too, but she never meant no harm by it.
She put me in them new clothes again, and I couldn’t do nothing but
sweat and swe at, and feel all cra mped up. Well, then, the old thing
comm en ced again. The widow rung a bell for supper, and you had to come
to time. When you got to the table you couldn’t go right to eat ing,
but you had to wait for the widow to tuck down her head and grum ble
a little over the vi ct u als, though there warn’t really anything the
matter with them —that is, nothing only everything was cooked by itself.
In a barrel of od ds and en ds it is differ ent; things get mixed up, and
the ju ice kind of swa ps around, and the things go better.

After supper she got out her book and learned me about Moses and the
B ul rus her s, and I was in a sweat to find out all about him; but by and
by she let it out that Moses had been dead a considerable long time; so
then I didn’t care no more about him, because I don’t take no stock in
dead people.

Pretty soon I wanted to smoke, and asked the widow to let me. But she
wouldn’t. She said it was a mean practice and wasn’t cle an, and I must
try to not do it any more. That is just the way with some people. They
get down on a thing when they don’t know nothing about it. Here she
was a- bother ing about Mo ses, which was no kin to her, and no use to
any body, being gone, you see, yet finding a power of fault with me for
doing a thing that had some good in it. And she took snuff, too; of
course that was all right, because she done it herself.

Her sist er, Miss Watson, a tolerable slim old maid, with go gg les
on, had just come to live with her, and took a set at me now with a
spell ing- boo k. She worked me midd ling hard for about an hour, and then
the widow made her e ase up. I couldn’t stood it much longer. Then for
an hour it was deadly dull, and I was fidge ty. Miss Watson would say,
“Don’t put your feet up there, Huckleber ry ”; and “Don’t sc run ch up like
that, Huckleber ry — set up straight ”; and pretty soon she would say,
“Don’t gap and stretch like that, Huckleber ry — why don’t you try to
be ha ve?” Then she told me all about the bad place, and I said I wished
I was there. She got mad then, but I didn’t mean no harm. All I wanted
was to go somewher es; all I wanted was a chang e, I warn’t particul ar.
She said it was wicked to say what I said; said she wouldn’t say it for
the whole worl d; she was going to live so as to go to the good place.
Well, I couldn’t see no advantage in going where she was going, so I
made up my mind I wouldn’t try for it. But I never said so, because it
would only make trouble, and wouldn’t do no good.

Now she had got a start, and she went on and told me all about the good
place. She said all a body would have to do there was to go around all
day long with a har p and sing, forever and ever. So I didn’t think much
of it. But I never said so. I asked her if she reckoned Tom Sawyer
would go there, and she said not by a considerable sight. I was glad
about that, because I wanted him and me to be together.

Miss Watson she kept pe cking at me, and it got tire some and lonesom e.
By and by they fetched the niggers in and had pra y ers, and then
everybody was off to bed. I went up to my room with a piece of candle,
and put it on the table. Then I set down in a chair by the window and
tried to think of something cheer ful, but it warn’t no u se. I felt so
lonesome I most wished I was dead. The stars were shin ing, and the
leaves rust led in the woods ever so mourn ful ; and I heard an ow l, away
off, who - whoo ing about somebody that was dead, and a whi pp ow ill and
a dog crying about somebody that was going to di e; and the wind was
trying to whisp er something to me, and I couldn’t make out what it was,
and so it made the cold shi vers run over me. Then away out in the woods
I heard that kind of a sound that a gho st makes when it wants to tell
about something that’s on its mind and can’t make itself under stood,
and so can’t rest easy in its grave, and has to go about that way
every night griev ing. I got so down hearted and scared I did wish I had
some compan y. Pretty soon a spi der went crawling up my shoulder, and I
fli pped it off and it lit in the cand le; and before I could budge it
was all shri vel ed up. I didn’t need anybody to tell me that that was
an awful bad sign and would fetch me some bad luck, so I was scared
and most shook the clothes off of me. I got up and turned around in my
tracks three times and crossed my breast every time; and then I tied
up a little lock of my hair with a thread to keep witches away. But I
hadn’t no confid ence. You do that when you’ve lost a horse sho e that
you’ve found, instead of na iling it up over the door, but I hadn’t ever
heard anybody say it was any way to keep off bad luck when you’d killed
a spi der.

I set down again, a- shaking all over, and got out my pipe for a smoke ;
for the house was all as still as death now, and so the widow wouldn’t
know. Well, after a long time I heard the clock away off in the town
go boom — boom — boom — twelve lick s; and all still again— still er than
ever. Pretty soon I heard a twi g sna p down in the dark amongst the
tre es— something was a- stir ring. I set still and listened. D ire ctly I
could just bar ely hear a “ me- yow ! me- yow !” down there. That was goo d!
Says I, “ me- yow ! me- yow !” as soft as I could, and then I put out the
light and scra m bled out of the window on to the shed. Then I slipped
down to the ground and crawled in among the trees, and, sure enough,
there was Tom Sawyer waiting for me.




CHAPTER II


We went tipto e ing along a path amongst the trees back toward the end
of the widow’s gard en, stoo ping down so as the branches wouldn’t
scra pe our head s. When we was passing by the kitchen I fell over a
roo t and made a noi se. We sc rou ched down and laid still. Miss Watson’s
big nigger, named Jim, was setting in the kitchen door; we could see
him pretty cle ar, because there was a light behind him. He got up and
stretched his neck out about a minute, listening. Then he says:

“Who da h ?”

He listened some more; then he came tipto e ing down and stood right
between us; we could ’a’ touched him, near ly. Well, likely it was
minutes and minutes that there warn’t a sound, and we all there so
close together. There was a place on my ank le that got to itch ing, but
I dasn’t scratch it; and then my ear begun to itch ; and next my back,
right between my shoulders. Se em ed like I’d die if I couldn’t scrat ch.
Well, I’ve noticed that thing plenty times since. If you are with the
qual ity, or at a funer al, or trying to go to sleep when you ain’t
sleep y— if you are anywher es where it won’t do for you to scrat ch, why
you will itch all over in up ward of a thousand places. Pretty soon Jim
says:

“Say, who is you? Wh ar is you? Do g my cat s ef I didn’ hear sumf ’n .
Well, I know what I’s gwyne to do : I’s gwyne to set down here and
listen tell I hears it ag’ in.”

So he set down on the ground betwixt me and Tom . He leaned his back
up against a tree, and stretched his legs out till one of them most
touched one of mine. My nose begun to it ch. It it ched till the tears
come into my eyes. But I dasn’t scrat ch. Then it begun to itch on
the in side. Next I got to it ching undernea th. I didn’t know how I
was going to set still. This miser ablen ess went on as much as six or
seven minut es; but it seemed a sight longer than that. I was it ching
in eleven different places now. I reckoned I couldn’t stand it more’n
a minute longer, but I set my teeth hard and got ready to try. Just
then Jim begun to breathe heav y; next he begun to snor e—and then I was
pretty soon comfortable again.

Tom he made a sign to me— kind of a little noise with his mou th —and we
went creeping away on our hands and knees. When we was ten foot off
Tom whispered to me, and wanted to tie Jim to the tree for fun . But I
said no; he might wake and make a disturbance, and then they’d find out
I warn’t in. Then Tom said he hadn’t got candles enough, and he would
slip in the kitchen and get some more. I didn’t want him to try. I said
Jim might wake up and come. But Tom wanted to resk it; so we slid in
there and got three candles, and Tom laid five cents on the table for
pa y. Then we got out, and I was in a sweat to get away; but nothing
would do Tom but he must crawl to where Jim was, on his hands and
knees, and play something on him. I wait ed, and it seemed a good while,
everything was so still and lonesom e.

As soon as Tom was back we cut along the path, around the garden fence,
and by and by fetched up on the steep top of the hill the other side
of the house. Tom said he slipped Jim’s hat off of his head and hung
it on a limb right over him, and Jim stirred a little, but he didn’t
wa ke. Af ter ward Jim said the witches be wit ched him and put him in a
tran ce, and rode him all over the stat e, and then set him under the
trees again, and hung his hat on a limb to show who done it. And next
time Jim told it he said they rode him down to New Orlean s; and, after
that, every time he told it he spread it more and more, till by and by
he said they rode him all over the world, and tired him most to death,
and his back was all over saddle- bo il s. Jim was monstrous proud about
it, and he got so he wouldn’t hardly notice the other nigger s. N i gg ers
would come miles to hear Jim tell about it, and he was more looked up
to than any nigger in that country. S tr ange niggers would stand with
their mou ths open and look him all over, same as if he was a wonder .
N i gg ers is always talking about witches in the dark by the kitchen
fire ; but whenever one was talking and letting on to know all about
such things, Jim would happen in and say, “H m ! What you know ’bout
wit ch es?” and that nigger was cor ked up and had to take a back se at.
Jim always kept that fi ve- cen ter piece round his neck with a string,
and said it was a char m the devil give to him with his own hands, and
told him he could c ure anybody with it and fetch witches whenever he
wanted to just by saying something to it; but he never told what it was
he said to it. N i gg ers would come from all around there and give Jim
anything they had, just for a sight of that fi ve- cen ter pie ce; but they
wouldn’t touch it, because the devil had had his hands on it. Jim was
most ru ined for a servan t, because he got stuck up on account of having
seen the devil and been rode by wit ches.

Well, when Tom and me got to the edge of the hill top we looked away
down into the village and could see three or four lights twink ling,
where there was sick folks, may be; and the stars over us was spark ling
ever so fin e; and down by the village was the river, a whole mile
broad, and awful still and gran d. We went down the hill and found Joe
Harper and Ben Rogers, and two or three more of the boys, hid in the
old tany ard. So we un hitched a skiff and pulled down the river two mile
and a half, to the big scar on the hill side, and went ashore.

We went to a clump of bush es, and Tom made everybody swear to keep the
secret, and then showed them a hole in the hi ll, right in the thick est
part of the bush es. Then we lit the candles, and crawled in on our
hands and knees. We went about two hundred yards, and then the cave
opened up. Tom poked about amongst the passa g es, and pretty soon du cked
under a wall where you wouldn’t ’a’ noticed that there was a hole. We
went along a narrow place and got into a kind of room, all damp and
sweat y and cold, and there we stopped. Tom says:

“Now, we’ll start this band of robbers and call it Tom Sawy er’s Gang .
Everybody that wants to join has got to take an oa th, and write his
name in bloo d.”

Everybody was will ing. So Tom got out a sheet of paper that he had
wrote the oa th on, and read it. It swore every boy to stick to the
band, and never tell any of the secre ts; and if anybody done anything
to any boy in the band, whi ch ever boy was ordered to kill that person
and his family must do it, and he mustn’t eat and he mustn’t sleep
till he had killed them and hacked a cross in their brea st s, which was
the sign of the ban d. And nobody that didn’t belong to the band could
use that mar k, and if he did he must be su ed; and if he done it again
he must be killed. And if anybody that belonged to the band told the
secre ts, he must have his throat cu t, and then have his car c ass bur nt
up and the ashes scattered all around, and his name blot ted off the
list with blood and never mentioned again by the gang, but have a cur se
put on it and be forgot forever.

Everybody said it was a real beautiful oa th, and asked Tom if he got
it out of his own head. He said some of it, but the rest was out of
pir at e- books and robber - books, and every gang that was high- t oned had
it.

Some thought it would be good to kill the families of boys that told
the secre ts. Tom said it was a good idea, so he took a pencil and wrote
it in. Then Ben Rog ers says:

“H ere’s Huck Finn, he hain’t got no fami ly; what you going to do ’bout
him?”

“Well, hain’t he got a father?” says Tom Sawy er.

“Yes, he’s got a father, but you can’t never find him these days. He
used to lay drunk with the hogs in the tany ard, but he hain’t been seen
in these parts for a year or more.”

They talked it over, and they was going to ru le me out, because they
said every boy must have a family or somebody to ki ll, or else it
wouldn’t be fair and square for the others. Well, nobody could think of
anything to do — everybody was stum ped, and set still. I was most ready
to cr y; but all at once I thought of a way, and so I offered them Miss
Watson — they could kill her. Everybody said:

“Oh, she ’ll do. That’s all right. Huck can come in.”

Then they all stuck a pin in their fingers to get blood to sign with,
and I made my mark on the paper.

“N ow,” says Ben Rogers, “ what’s the line of business of this Gang ?”

“N othing only robbery and murder ,” Tom said.

“But who are we going to rob ?— houses, or cat t le, or —”

“St uff ! steal ing cat tle and such things ain’t robber y; it’s burgl ar y,”
says Tom Sawy er. “We ain’t burgl ars. That ain’t no sort of style. We
are high way men. We stop stag es and carri ages on the road, with mas ks
on, and kill the people and take their wat ches and money.”

“M ust we always kill the peop le ?”

“Oh, certain ly. It’s best. Some authorities think differ ent, but mostly
it’s considered best to kill them — except some that you bring to the
cave here, and keep them till they’re ran some d.”

“R an some d? What’s that?”

“I don’t know. But that’s what they do. I’ve seen it in book s; and so
of course that’s what we’ve got to do.”

“But how can we do it if we don’t know what it is?”

“Why, blame it all, we’ve got to do it. Don’t I tell you it’s in the
book s? Do you want to go to doing different from what’s in the books,
and get things all mu ddled up ?”

“Oh, that’s all very fine to say, Tom Sawyer, but how in the nation
are these fellows going to be ran som ed if we don’t know how to do it to
them ?— that’s the thing I want to get at. Now, what do you reckon it
is?”

“Well, I don’t know. But per ’a ps if we keep them till they’re ran some d,
it means that we keep them till they’re dead .”

“Now, that’s something like. That ’ll answ er. Why couldn’t you said
that befor e? We’ll keep them till they’re ran som ed to death ; and a
bother some lot they’ll be, too— eating up everything, and always trying
to get loo se.”

“How you talk, Ben Rog ers. How can they get loose when there’s a guard
over them, ready to shoo t them down if they move a pe g ?”

“A guard ! Well, that is good. So somebody’s got to set up all night
and never get any sleep, just so as to watch them. I think that’s
foolish ness. Why can’t a body take a club and ran som them as soon as
they get here?”

“Because it ain’t in the books so —that’s why. Now, Ben Rogers, do you
want to do things regul ar, or don’t you?— that’s the idea. Don’t you
reckon that the people that made the books knows what’s the correct
thing to do? Do you reckon you can learn ’em any thing ? Not by a good
de al. No, sir, we’ll just go on and ran som them in the regular way.”

“All right. I don’t min d; but I say it’s a fool way, any how. Say, do we
kill the women, too?”

“Well, Ben Rogers, if I was as ignorant as you I wouldn’t let on. K ill
the wom en ? No; nobody ever saw anything in the books like that. You
fetch them to the ca ve, and you’re always as pol ite as pie to them; and
by and by they fall in love with you, and never want to go home any
more.”

“Well, if that’s the way I’m agre ed, but I don’t take no stock in it.
Mi ghty soon we’ll have the cave so cl uttered up with women, and fellows
waiting to be ran some d, that there won’t be no place for the robber s.
But go ahead, I ain’t got nothing to say .”

L itt le Tom my Bar n es was asleep now, and when they waked him up he was
scared, and cried, and said he wanted to go home to his ma , and didn’t
want to be a rob ber any more.

So they all made fun of him, and called him cr y- bab y, and that made him
mad, and he said he would go straight and tell all the secre ts. But Tom
give him five cents to keep quiet, and said we would all go home and
meet next week, and rob somebody and kill some people.

Ben Rog ers said he couldn’t get out much, only Sun days, and so he
wanted to begin next Sunda y; but all the boys said it would be wicked
to do it on Sun day, and that settled the thing. They agreed to get
together and fix a day as soon as they could, and then we elec ted Tom
Sawyer first captain and Joe Harper second captain of the Gang , and so
started home.

I clumb up the shed and crept into my window just before day was
break ing. My new clothes was all gre ased up and cla ye y, and I was
dog- ti red.




CHAPTER III


Well, I got a good go ing- over in the morning from old Miss Watson on
account of my cloth es; but the widow she didn’t sc old, but only cleaned
off the gre ase and cla y, and looked so sorry that I thought I would
be have awhile if I could. Then Miss Watson she took me in the clo set
and pra yed, but nothing come of it. She told me to pray every day,
and whatever I asked for I would get it. But it warn’t so. I tried
it. Once I got a fish- line, but no hoo ks. It warn’t any good to me
without hoo ks. I tried for the hoo ks three or four times, but somehow
I couldn’t make it work. By and by, one day, I asked Miss Watson to
try for me, but she said I was a foo l. She never told me why, and I
couldn’t make it out no way.

I set down one time back in the woods, and had a long think about it.
I says to myself, if a body can get anything they pray for, why don’t
De ac on W inn get back the money he lost on por k ? Why can’t the widow get
back her silver snuff - box that was sto le ? Why can’t Miss Watson fat up?
No, says I to myself, there ain’t nothing in it. I went and told the
widow about it, and she said the thing a body could get by pra ying for
it was “ spir itu al gi f ts.” This was too many for me, but she told me
what she mean t —I must help other people, and do everything I could for
other people, and look out for them all the time, and never think about
myself. This was including Miss Watson, as I took it. I went out in the
woods and turned it over in my mind a long time, but I couldn’t see no
advantage about it— except for the other peop le; so at last I reckoned
I wouldn’t worry about it any more, but just let it go. Sometimes the
widow would take me one side and talk about Providence in a way to make
a body’s mouth water; but maybe next day Miss Watson would take hold
and knock it all down again. I judged I could see that there was two
Provi den ces, and a poor chap would stand considerable show with the
widow’s Provi d ence, but if Miss Watson’s got him there warn’t no help
for him any more. I thought it all out, and reckoned I would belong
to the widow’s if he wanted me, though I couldn’t make out how he was
a-going to be any better off then than what he was before, seeing I was
so ignor ant, and so kind of low-down and orner y.

Pap he hadn’t been seen for more than a year, and that was comfortable
for me; I didn’t want to see him no more. He used to always wha le me
when he was so ber and could get his hands on me; though I used to take
to the woods most of the time when he was around. Well, about this time
he was found in the river drownded, about twelve mile above town, so
people said. They judged it was him, anyway; said this drownded man
was just his si ze, and was ra gg ed, and had uncommon long hair, which
was all like pap ; but they couldn’t make nothing out of the face,
because it had been in the water so long it warn’t much like a face at
all. They said he was floating on his back in the water. They took him
and buried him on the bank. But I warn’t comfortable long, because I
happened to think of something. I knowed mighty well that a drownded
man don’t float on his back, but on his face. So I know ed, then, that
this warn’t pap, but a woman dressed up in a man’s clothes. So I was
un comfortable again. I judged the old man would turn up again by and
by, though I wished he wouldn’t.

We played rob ber now and then about a mon th, and then I re sig ned. All
the boys did. We hadn’t robbed nobody, hadn’t killed any people, but
only just pre ten ded. We used to hop out of the woods and go char ging
down on ho g- d river s and women in car ts taking garden stuff to marke t,
but we never hi ved any of them. Tom Sawyer called the hogs “ ing o t s,”
and he called the tur ni ps and stuff “ j ul er y,” and we would go to the
cave and powwow over what we had done, and how many people we had
killed and mar ked. But I couldn’t see no prof it in it. One time Tom
sent a boy to run about town with a blazing stick, which he called a
slo g an ( which was the sign for the G ang to get together ), and then
he said he had got secret news by his spi es that next day a whole
par ce l of Span ish mer chan ts and rich A-rabs was going to camp in Ca ve
Ho llow with two hundred elephan ts, and six hundred ca mel s, and over
a thousand “ sum ter ” mu les, all loaded down with di ’ mon ds, and they
didn’t have only a guard of four hundred soldi ers, and so we would lay
in am bus ca de, as he called it, and kill the lot and scoop the things.
He said we must slick up our s words and guns, and get ready. He never
could go after even a tur ni p- cart but he must have the s words and guns
all sc oured up for it, though they was only la th and b room sti cks, and
you might sc our at them till you ro t ted, and then they warn’t worth a
mou th ful of ashes more than what they was before. I didn’t believe we
could lick such a crowd of Span i ards and A-rab s, but I wanted to see
the ca me ls and elephan ts, so I was on hand next day, Satur day, in the
am bus ca de; and when we got the word we rushed out of the woods and down
the hi ll. But there warn’t no Span i ards and A-rab s, and there warn’t
no ca me ls nor no elephan ts. It warn’t anything but a Sunday-school
pic ni c, and only a pri mer cl ass at that. We busted it up, and chased
the children up the holl ow ; but we never got anything but some
d ough nuts and jam , though Ben Rog ers got a rag do ll, and Joe Harper
got a hy m n -book and a trac t; and then the te a cher charged in, and made
us drop everything and cut . I didn’t see no di ’ mon ds, and I told Tom
Sawyer so. He said there was load s of them there, anyway; and he said
there was A-rabs there, too, and elephan ts and things. I said, why
couldn’t we see them, then? He said if I warn’t so ignor ant, but had
read a book called D on Qu i x o te, I would know without as king. He said
it was all done by en chan t ment. He said there was hundreds of soldi ers
there, and elephan ts and treas ure, and so on, but we had en emi es which
he called magici ans, and they had turned the whole thing into an inf ant
Sunday- school, just out of spit e. I said, all right; then the thing for
us to do was to go for the magici ans. Tom Sawyer said I was a numsk u ll.

“Why,” said he, “a magici an could call up a lot of gen i es, and they
would ha sh you up like nothing before you could say Jack Robin son. They
are as tall as a tree and as big around as a church.”

“Well,” I says, “ s’pose we got some gen ies to help us — can’t we lick
the other crowd then?”

“How you going to get them?”

“I don’t know. How do they get them?”

“Why, they ru b an old tin lamp or an iron ring, and then the gen ies
come tearing in, with the thunder and lightning a- ripping around and
the smoke a- ro ll ing, and everything they’re told to do they up and do
it. They don’t think nothing of pulling a sho t- tow er up by the roo ts,
and bel ting a Sunday-school super inten dent over the head with it— or any
other man .”

“Who makes them tear around so?”

“Why, whoever rub s the lamp or the ring. They belong to whoever rub s
the lamp or the ring, and they’ve got to do whatever he says. If he
tells them to build a palace forty miles long out of di ’ mon ds, and fill
it full of che w ing- g um, or whatever you wan t, and fetch an em per or ’s
daughter from Chin a for you to mar ry, they’ve got to do it—and they’ve
got to do it before sun-up next morning, too. And more : they’ve got to
walt z that palace around over the country wherever you want it, you
understand .”

“Well,” says I, “I think they are a pack of fla the ad s for not keeping
the palace themselves ’stead of fooling them away like that. And what’s
more— if I was one of them I would see a man in Jer ich o before I would
drop my business and come to him for the rubbing of an old tin la mp .”

“How you talk, Huck Finn. Why, you’d have to come when he rubbed it,
whether you wanted to or not.”

“What! and I as high as a tree and as big as a chur ch ? All right, then;
I would come; but I lay I’d make that man climb the highest tree
there was in the countr y.”

“Shucks, it ain’t no use to talk to you, Huck Finn. You don’t seem to
know anything, somehow — perfect sa p head.”

I thought all this over for two or three days, and then I reckoned I
would see if there was anything in it. I got an old tin lamp and an
iron ring, and went out in the woods and rubbed and rubbed till I sweat
like an Inj un, calcul ating to build a palace and sell it; but it warn’t
no use, none of the gen ies come. So then I judged that all that stuff
was only just one of Tom Sawy er’s li es. I reckoned he believed in the
A-rabs and the elephan ts, but as for me I think different. It had all
the marks of a Sunday- schoo l.




CHAPTER IV


Well, three or four months run along, and it was well into the win ter
now. I had been to school most all the time and could spell and read
and write just a little, and could say the mu l tip lic ation table up to
six times seven is thirty- five, and I don’t reckon I could ever get any
further than that if I was to live forever. I don’t take no stock in
ma them ati c s, anyway.

At first I ha ted the school, but by and by I got so I could stand
it. When ever I got uncommon tired I played hoo key, and the hiding I
got next day done me good and che ered me up. So the longer I went to
school the easier it got to be. I was getting sort of used to the
widow’s ways, too, and they warn’t so ras p y on me. Li ving in a house
and sleeping in a bed pulled on me pretty tight mo st ly, but before the
cold weather I used to slide out and sleep in the woods sometimes, and
so that was a rest to me. I liked the old ways be st, but I was getting
so I liked the new ones, too, a little bit. The widow said I was coming
along slow but sure, and doing very satisfactor y. She said she warn’t
ashamed of me.

One morning I happened to turn over the sal t- cellar at breakfast.
I reached for some of it as quick as I could to throw over my left
shoulder and keep off the bad luck, but Miss Watson was in ahead of
me, and crossed me off. She says, “Take your hands away, Huckleber ry;
what a m ess you are always ma king !” The widow put in a good word for
me, but that warn’t going to keep off the bad luck, I knowed that well
enough. I started out, after breakfast, feeling wor ried and sha ky, and
wondering where it was going to fall on me, and what it was going to
be. There is ways to keep off some kinds of bad luck, but this wasn’t
one of them kind ; so I never tried to do anything, but just poked along
low - spir ited and on the watch - out.

I went down to the front garden and clumb over the stile where you go
through the high board f ence. There was an in ch of new snow on the
ground, and I seen somebody’s track s. They had come up from the quar ry
and stood around the stile awhile, and then went on around the garden
f ence. It was funny they hadn’t come in, after standing around so. I
couldn’t make it out. It was very curi ous, somehow. I was going to
follow around, but I stooped down to look at the tracks first. I didn’t
notice anything at first, but next I did. There was a cross in the left
boot- he el made with big na ils, to keep off the devil .

I was up in a second and shin ning down the hi ll. I looked over my
shoulder every now and then, but I didn’t see nobody. I was at Judge
Thatch er’s as quick as I could get there. He said:

“Why, my boy, you are all out of brea th. Did you come for your
interest ?”

“No, sir,” I says; “is there some for me?”

“Oh, yes, a half- ye arly is in last night — over a hundred and fifty
dollars. Quite a fortune for you. You had better let me inv est it along
with your six thous and, because if you take it you’ll spend it.”

“No, sir,” I says, “I don’t want to spend it. I don’t want it at
all — nor the six thous and, nuther. I want you to take it; I want to give
it to you —the six thousand and all.”

He looked surprised. He couldn’t seem to make it out. He says:

“Why, what can you mean, my bo y?”

I says, “Don’t you ask me no questions about it, plea se. You ’ll take
it— won’t you?”

He says:

“Well, I’m puzz led. Is something the matter?”

“P lease take it,” says I, “and don’t ask me noth ing— then I won’t have
to tell no li es.”

He studied awhile, and then he says:

“O ho - o! I think I see. You want to sell all your property to me— not
give it. That’s the correct idea .”

Then he wrote something on a paper and read it over, and says:

“Ther e; you see it says ‘ for a consider ation .’ That means I have bought
it of you and paid you for it. Here’s a dollar for you. Now you sign
it.”

So I signed it, and left.

Miss Watson’s nigger, Jim, had a hair-ball as big as your fi st, which
had been took out of the fourth stoma ch of an o x, and he used to do
magi c with it. He said there was a spirit inside of it, and it knowed
everything. So I went to him that night and told him pap was here
again, for I found his tracks in the s now. What I wanted to know
was, what he was going to do, and was he going to sta y? Jim got out
his hair-ball and said something over it, and then he held it up and
dropped it on the floor. It fell pretty solid, and only rolled about
an in ch. Jim tried it again, and then another time, and it acted just
the same. Jim got down on his knees, and put his ear against it and
listened. But it warn’t no use; he said it wouldn’t talk. He said
sometimes it wouldn’t talk without money. I told him I had an old
slick counter fe it quarter that warn’t no good because the brass showed
through the silver a little, and it wouldn’t pass no how, even if the
brass didn’t show, because it was so slick it felt greas y, and so that
would tell on it every time. ( I reckoned I wouldn’t say nothing about
the dollar I got from the jud ge . ) I said it was pretty bad money, but
maybe the hair-ball would take it, because maybe it wouldn’t know the
difference. Jim smelt it and bit it and rubbed it, and said he would
manage so the hair-ball would think it was good. He said he would spl it
open a ra w I ri sh po ta to and stick the quarter in between and keep it
there all night, and next morning you couldn’t see no br as s, and it
wouldn’t feel greasy no more, and so anybody in town would take it in
a minute, let alone a hair-b all. Well, I knowed a po ta to would do that
before, but I had forgot it.

Jim put the quarter under the hair - ba ll, and got down and listened
again. This time he said the hair-ball was all right. He said it
would tell my whole fortune if I wanted it to. I says, go on. So the
hair-ball talked to Jim, and Jim told it to me. He says:

“Y o’ ole father doan’ know y it what he’s a-gwyne to do. Sometimes he
spec he’ll go ’ way, en den ag’in he spec he’ll sta y. De be s’ way is to
re s’ easy en let de ole man take his own way. Dey’s two ang el s ho ver in’
roun’ ’bout him. One uv ’em is white en shin y, en t’other one is bl ac k.
De white one g its him to go right a little while, den de black one sai l
in en bust it all up. A body can’t tell y it which one gwyne to fetch
him at de las ’. But you is all right. You gwyne to have consid able
trouble in yo’ life, en consid able jo y. Sometimes you gwyne to git
hurt, en sometimes you gwyne to git sick ; but every time you’s gwyne
to git well ag’in. Dey’s two g als fl yin’ ’bout you in yo’ life. One
uv ’em ’s light en t’other one is dark. One is rich en t’other is po ’.
You ’s gwyne to marry de po’ one f ust en de rich one by en by. You wants
to keep ’ way fu m de water as much as you k in, en don’t run no res k,
’kase it’s down in de bills dat you’s gwyne to git hun g .”

When I lit my candle and went up to my room that night there sat
pap — his own self !




CHAPTER V


I had shut the door to. Then I turned around, and there he was. I used
to be scared of him all the time, he tan ned me so much. I reckoned I
was scared now, too; but in a minute I see I was mista ken —that is,
after the first jol t, as you may say, when my breath sort of hit ched,
he being so un expec ted; but right away after I see I warn’t scared of
him worth both ring about.

He was most fif ty, and he looked it. His hair was long and tangled
and greas y, and hung down, and you could see his eyes shining through
like he was behind vin es. It was all black, no gra y; so was his long,
mix ed-up whisk ers. There warn’t no col or in his face, where his face
show ed; it was white ; not like another man’s white, but a white to make
a body sick, a white to make a body’s fle sh craw l —a tre e- to ad white, a
fish- be lly whi te. As for his cloth es —just rags, that was all. He had
one ank le resting on t’other kne e; the boot on that foot was bust ed,
and two of his to es stuck through, and he worked them now and then. His
hat was laying on the floor — an old black slouch with the top ca ved in,
like a li d.

I stood a- looking at him; he set there a- looking at me, with his chair
tilted back a little. I set the candle down. I noticed the window was
up; so he had clumb in by the shed. He kept a- looking me all over. By
and by he says:

“ Star ch y cloth es— ver y. You think you’re a good deal of a bi g- bu g,
don’t you?”

“Maybe I am , maybe I ain ’t,” I says.

“Don’t you give me none o’ your lip ,” says he. “You ’ve put on
considerable many fri lls since I been away. I’ll take you down a pe g
before I get done with you. You’re edu cat ed, too, they say — can read and
writ e. You think you’re better ’n your father, now, don’t you, because
he can ’t ? I’ll take it out of you. Who told you you might medd le with
such hi fal ut ’n foolish ness, he y?— who told you you coul d?”

“The wid ow. She told me.”

“The wid ow, he y ? —and who told the widow she could put in her shov el
about a thing that ain’t none of her business ?”

“No body never told her.”

“Well, I’ll learn her how to medd le. And looky here— you drop that
school, you hear? I’ll learn people to bring up a boy to put on air s
over his own father and let on to be better ’n what he is. You lemme
catch you fooling around that school again, you hear? Your mother
couldn’t read, and she couldn’t writ e, nu ther, before she di ed. N one
of the family couldn’t before they di ed. I can ’t; and here you’re
a- swe lling yourself up like this. I ain’t the man to stand it— you hear?
Say, lemme hear you rea d.”

I took up a book and begun something about General W ash ington and the
war s. When I’d read about a half a minute, he fetched the book a wha ck
with his hand and knocked it across the house. He says:

“It’s so. You can do it. I had my doubts when you told me. Now looky
here; you stop that putting on fri ll s. I won’t have it. I’ll lay for
you, my smar t y; and if I catch you about that school I’ll t an you good.
Fir st you know you’ll get reli gi on, too. I never see such a son .”

He took up a little blue and yaller picture of some c ows and a boy, and
says:

“What’s this?”

“It’s something they give me for learning my les sons good.”

He tore it up, and says:

“I’ll give you something better —I’ll give you a cow hide .”

He set there a- mumbling and a- gr owling a minute, and then he says:

“A in’t you a sweet - sc ented d and y, though ? A bed; and bed cloth es; and
a look ’n ’ - glas s; and a piece of car pet on the floor —and your own father
got to sleep with the hogs in the tany ard. I never see such a son. I
bet I’ll take some o’ these fri lls out o’ you before I’m done with you.
Why, there ain’t no end to your air s— they say you’re rich. H ey ?— how ’s
that?”

“They li e— that’s how .”

“Looky here— mind how you talk to me; I’m a-standing about all I can
stand now —so don’t gimme no sa ss. I’ve been in town two days, and
I hain’t heard nothing but about you bein’ rich. I heard about it
away down the river, too. That’s why I come. You git me that money
to-morrow —I want it.”

“I hain’t got no money.”

“It’s a lie. Judge Thatch er’s got it. You git it. I want it.”

“I hain’t got no money, I tell you. You ask Judge Thatch er; he’ll tell
you the sa me.”

“All right. I’ll ask him; and I’ll make him pun g le, too, or I’ll know
the reason why. Say, how much you got in your pocket ? I want it.”

“I hain’t got only a doll ar, and I want that to —”

“It don’t make no difference what you want it for —you just she ll it
out.”

He took it and bit it to see if it was good, and then he said he was
going down- town to get some whisk y; said he hadn’t had a dr ink all day.
When he had got out on the shed he put his head in again, and cussed
me for putting on fri lls and trying to be better than him; and when I
reckoned he was gone he come back and put his head in again, and told
me to mind about that school, because he was going to lay for me and
lick me if I didn’t drop that.

Next day he was drunk, and he went to Judge Thatch er’s and bull y ra gged
him, and tried to make him give up the mone y; but he couldn ’t, and then
he swore he’d make the law force him.

The judge and the widow went to law to get the court to take me away
from him and let one of them be my gu ar di an ; but it was a new judge
that had just come, and he didn’t know the old man; so he said cour ts
mustn’t interfere and separate families if they could help it; said
he’d druther not take a child away from its father. So Judge Thatcher
and the widow had to quit on the business.

That pleased the old man till he couldn’t re st. He said he’d cow hide
me till I was black and blue if I didn’t raise some money for him.
I borrowed three dollars from Judge Thatch er, and pap took it and
got drunk, and went a- blowing around and cussing and whooping and
carrying on; and he kept it up all over town, with a tin pan, till most
mid night; then they jailed him, and next day they had him before cour t,
and jailed him again for a week. But he said he was satisfi ed; said
he was bo ss of his son, and he’d make it warm for him.

When he got out the new judge said he was a-going to make a man of him.
So he took him to his own house, and dressed him up clean and ni ce,
and had him to breakfast and dinner and supper with the family, and
was just old pie to him, so to spea k. And after supper he talked to
him about temper ance and such things till the old man cried, and said
he’d been a fool, and fooled away his life; but now he was a-going to
turn over a new leaf and be a man nobody wouldn’t be ashamed of, and he
hoped the judge would help him and not look down on him. The judge said
he could hug him for them word s; so he cried, and his wife she cried
again; pap said he’d been a man that had always been mis understood
before, and the judge said he believed it. The old man said that what a
man wanted that was down was sympa th y, and the judge said it was so; so
they cried again. And when it was bed time the old man rose up and held
out his hand, and says:

“Look at it, gentlemen and ladies all; take a- hold of it; shake it.
There’s a hand that was the hand of a hog ; but it ain’t so no more;
it’s the hand of a man that’s started in on a new life, and ’ll die
before he’ll go back. You mark them word s— don’t forget I said them.
It’s a clean hand now; shake it— don’t be afe ard.”

So they shook it, one after the other, all around, and cried. The
jud ge ’s wife she kissed it. Then the old man he signed a ple dge — made
his mark. The judge said it was the ho liest time on recor d, or
something like that. Then they tucked the old man into a beautiful
room, which was the spare room, and in the night some time he got
powerful thir sty and clumb out on to the por ch- roof and slid down a
stan chi on and tra ded his new coat for a jug of forty- ro d, and clumb
back again and had a good old time; and toward daylight he crawled out
again, drunk as a fi dd l er, and rolled off the por ch and broke his left
arm in two places, and was most fro ze to death when somebody found him
after sun- up. And when they come to look at that spare room they had to
take s ound ings before they could na vig ate it.

The judge he felt kind of sor e. He said he reckoned a body could re form
the old man with a shot gun, maybe, but he didn’t know no other way.




CHAPTER VI


Well, pretty soon the old man was up and around again, and then he
went for Judge Thatcher in the cour ts to make him give up that money,
and he went for me, too, for not stopping schoo l. He catched me a
couple of times and thr ashed me, but I went to school just the same,
and dodged him or ou tru n him most of the time. I didn’t want to go to
school much before, but I reckoned I’d go now to spite pa p. That law
trial was a slow busines s— appeared like they warn’t ever going to get
started on it; so every now and then I’d borrow two or three dollars
off of the judge for him, to keep from getting a cow hi d ing. Every time
he got money he got drun k; and every time he got drunk he raised C ain
around town; and every time he raised C ain he got j ai led. He was just
suit ed— this kind of thing was right in his line.

He got to hanging around the widow’s too much, and so she told him at
last that if he didn’t quit using around there she would make trouble
for him. Well, wasn’t he ma d? He said he would show who was Huck
Fin n’s bo ss. So he watched out for me one day in the sp ring, and
catched me, and took me up the river about three mile in a skiff, and
crossed over to the Illinois shore where it was woo dy and there warn’t
no houses but an old log hut in a place where the timber was so thick
you couldn’t find it if you didn’t know where it was.

He kept me with him all the time, and I never got a chance to run off.
We lived in that old cabin, and he always locked the door and put the
key under his head nights. He had a gun which he had sto le, I reckon,
and we fished and hun ted, and that was what we lived on. Every little
while he locked me in and went down to the store, three miles, to the
fer ry, and tra ded fish and game for whisk y, and fetched it home and got
drunk and had a good time, and li cked me. The widow she found out where
I was by and by, and she sent a man over to try to get hold of me; but
pap drove him off with the gun, and it warn’t long after that till I
was used to being where I was, and liked it— all but the cow hide par t.

It was kind of lazy and jo lly, laying off comfortable all day, smoking
and fish ing, and no books nor stud y. Two months or more run along,
and my clothes got to be all rags and dir t, and I didn’t see how I’d
ever got to like it so well at the widow ’s, where you had to wash , and
eat on a pl ate, and comb up, and go to bed and get up regul ar, and be
forever bother ing over a book, and have old Miss Watson pe cking at you
all the time. I didn’t want to go back no more. I had stopped cussing,
because the widow didn’t like it; but now I took to it again because
pap hadn’t no objec tions. It was pretty good times up in the woods
there, take it all around.

But by and by pap got too handy with his hick ’ ry, and I couldn’t stand
it. I was all over wel ts. He got to going away so much, too, and
locking me in. Once he locked me in and was gone three days. It was
dreadful lonesom e. I judged he had got drownded, and I wasn’t ever
going to get out any more. I was scared. I made up my mind I would
fix up some way to leave there. I had tried to get out of that cabin
many a time, but I couldn’t find no way. There warn’t a window to it
big enough for a dog to get through. I couldn’t get up the chim bl y; it
was too narr ow. The door was thick, solid oa k slab s. Pap was pretty
careful not to leave a knife or anything in the cabin when he was away;
I reckon I had hunted the place over as much as a hundred times; well,
I was most all the time at it, because it was about the only way to put
in the time. But this time I found something at la st; I found an old
rusty wood- saw without any hand le; it was laid in between a raf ter and
the cla p bo ards of the roof . I gre ased it up and went to work. There
was an old horse - blanket nailed against the logs at the far end of
the cabin behind the table, to keep the wind from blowing through the
ch inks and putting the candle out. I got under the table and raised
the blanke t, and went to work to saw a se ction of the big bottom log
out — big enough to let me through. Well, it was a good long job, but I
was getting toward the end of it when I heard pap’s gun in the woods.
I got rid of the signs of my work, and dropped the blanket and hid my
saw, and pretty soon pap come in.

Pap warn’t in a good hu mor —so he was his natural self. He said he was
down- town, and everything was going wrong . His lawyer said he reckoned
he would w in his law suit and get the money if they ever got started
on the tri al; but then there was ways to put it off a long time, and
Judge Thatcher knowed how to do it. And he said people allowed there’d
be another trial to get me away from him and give me to the widow for
my gu ar di an, and they guessed it would w in this time. This shook me up
considerable, because I didn’t want to go back to the widow’s any more
and be so cra mped up and si vili z ed, as they called it. Then the old
man got to cussing, and cussed everything and everybody he could think
of, and then cussed them all over again to make sure he hadn’t skipped
any, and after that he poli shed off with a kind of a general cus s all
round, including a considerable par ce l of people which he didn’t know
the names of, and so called them what ’s- hi s- name when he got to them,
and went right along with his cus sing.

He said he would like to see the widow get me. He said he would watch
out, and if they tried to come any such game on him he knowed of a
place six or seven mile off to st ow me in, where they might hunt till
they dropped and they couldn’t find me. That made me pretty uneasy
again, but only for a minute; I reckoned I wouldn’t stay on hand till
he got that chance.

The old man made me go to the skiff and fetch the things he had go t.
There was a fifty- pound sack of cor n me al, and a side of bac on,
am mun ition, and a four- gall on jug of whisk y, and an old book and two
news papers for wa dd ing, besides some t ow. I to ted up a lo ad, and went
back and set down on the bow of the skiff to re st. I thought it all
over, and I reckoned I would walk off with the gun and some lin es, and
take to the woods when I run away. I guessed I wouldn’t stay in one
place, but just tra mp right across the country, mostly night- times, and
hunt and fish to keep alive, and so get so far away that the old man
nor the widow couldn’t ever find me any more. I judged I would saw out
and leave that night if pap got drunk enough, and I reckoned he would.
I got so full of it I didn’t notice how long I was staying till the old
man hollered and asked me whether I was asleep or drown ded.

I got the things all up to the cabin, and then it was about dark. While
I was coo king supper the old man took a swi g or two and got sort of
warmed up, and went to ripping again. He had been drunk over in town,
and laid in the g utter all night, and he was a sight to look at. A body
would ’a’ thought he was A dam —he was just all mu d. When ever his li qu or
begun to work he most always went for the gov ment. This time he says:

“C all this a gov ment ! why, just look at it and see what it’s like.
Here’s the law a-standing ready to take a man’s son away from him —a
man’s own son, which he has had all the trouble and all the anxiety
and all the expense of ra is ing. Yes, just as that man has got that
son raised at last, and ready to go to work and begin to do su thin ’
for him and give him a rest, the law up and goes for him. And they
call that gov ment ! That ain’t all, nuther. The law backs that old
Judge Thatcher up and hel ps him to keep me out o’ my proper ty. Here’s
what the law do es : The law takes a man worth six thousand dollars and
up ’ ard s, and jam s him into an old trap of a cabin like this, and lets
him go round in clothes that ain’t fitten for a ho g. They call that
gov ment ! A man can’t get his rights in a gov ment like this. Sometimes
I’ve a mighty notion to just leave the country for good and all. Yes,
and I told ’em so; I told old Thatcher so to his face. Lo ts of ’em
heard me, and can tell what I said. Says I, for two cents I’d leave the
blamed country and never come a-near it ag’in. The m ’s the very words. I
says, look at my hat —if you call it a hat —but the lid rai ses up and the
rest of it goes down till it’s below my chin, and then it ain’t right ly
a hat at all, but more like my head was shoved up through a j int o’
st ov e- pip e. Look at it, says I— such a hat for me to we ar —one of the
weal thi est men in this town if I could git my right s.

“Oh, yes, this is a wonderful govment, wonder ful. Why, looky here.
There was a free nigger there from Ohi o —a mu lat ter, most as white as
a white man. He had the whi test shirt on you ever see, too, and the
shin i est hat ; and there ain’t a man in that town that’s got as fine
clothes as what he ha d; and he had a gold watch and chain, and a
sil ver -headed can e— the aw fu lest old gra y- headed n ab ob in the stat e. And
what do you think ? They said he was a p ’ fess or in a coll e ge, and could
talk all kinds of langu ag es, and knowed everything. And that ain’t the
wu st. They said he could vote when he was at home. Well, that let
me out. Thinks I, what is the country a- coming to ? It was ’ le ction
day, and I was just about to go and vote myself if I warn’t too drunk
to get there; but when they told me there was a state in this country
where they’d let that nigger vo te, I drawed out. I says I’ll never vote
ag’in. The m ’s the very words I said; they all heard me; and the country
may rot for all me— I’ll never vote ag’in as long as I li ve. And to see
the cool way of that nigger — why, he wouldn’t ’a’ give me the road if
I hadn’t shoved him out o’ the way. I says to the people, why ain’t
this nigger put up at auction and sol d ?— that’s what I want to know. And
what do you reckon they said ? Why, they said he couldn’t be sold till
he’d been in the state six mon ths, and he hadn’t been there that long
yet. There, now —that’s a spec im en. They call that a gov ment that can’t
sell a free nigger till he’s been in the state six months. Here’s a
gov ment that calls itself a govment, and lets on to be a govment, and
thinks it is a govment, and ye t’s got to set sto ck- still for six whole
months before it can take a- hold of a pr ow ling, thiev ing, infer n al,
white- shir ted free nigger, and—”

Pap was a-going on so he never noticed where his old lim ber legs was
taking him to, so he went head over heels over the tu b of sa lt por k
and bar ked both shin s, and the rest of his speech was all the ho tt est
kind of langu ag e— mostly hove at the nigger and the govment, though he
give the tu b some, too, all along, here and there. He hop ped around the
cabin considerable, first on one leg and then on the other, holding
first one shin and then the other one, and at last he let out with his
left foot all of a sudden and fetched the tu b a rattling ki ck. But it
warn’t good judg ment, because that was the boot that had a couple of
his to es lea king out of the front end of it; so now he raised a howl
that fairly made a body’s hair rai se, and down he went in the dir t, and
rolled there, and held his to es; and the cussing he done then laid over
anything he had ever done previ ous. He said so his own self afterwards.
He had heard old S ow ber ry H ag an in his best days, and he said it laid
over him, too; but I reckon that was sort of piling it on, may be.

After supper pap took the ju g, and said he had enough whisky there for
two drun ks and one deliri um tre men s. That was always his word. I judged
he would be blind drunk in about an hour, and then I would steal the
key, or saw myself out, one or t’ other. He drank and dr an k, and tum bled
down on his blankets by and by; but luck didn’t run my way. He didn’t
go sound asleep, but was uneasy. He groan ed and moan ed and thr ashed
around this way and that for a long time. At last I got so sleepy I
couldn’t keep my eyes open all I could do, and so before I knowed what
I was about I was sound asleep, and the candle bur n ing.

I don’t know how long I was asleep, but all of a sudden there was an
awful scream and I was up. There was pap looking wild, and ski pping
around every which way and yelling about sna k es. He said they was
crawling up his leg s; and then he would give a jump and screa m, and say
one had bit him on the chee k —but I couldn’t see no sna k es. He started
and run round and round the cabin, holl ering “Take him off ! take him
off ! he’s bit ing me on the ne ck !” I never see a man look so wild in the
eyes. Pretty soon he was all fagged out, and fell down pan t ing; then he
rolled over and over wonderful fast, ki cking things every which way,
and striking and grab bing at the air with his hands, and screaming and
saying there was devil s a- hold of him. He wore out by and by, and laid
still awhile, moan ing. Then he laid still er, and didn’t make a sound. I
could hear the ow ls and the w ol ves away off in the woods, and it seemed
terrible still. He was laying over by the corner. By and by he raised
up part way and listened, with his head to one side. He says, very low :

“T ra mp —tramp —tramp ; that’s the dead ; tramp —tramp —tramp ; they’re coming
after me; but I won’t go. Oh, they’re her e! don’t touch me— don ’t! hands
off — they’re col d; let go. Oh, let a poor devil al one !”

Then he went down on all four s and crawled off, begging them to let him
alone, and he rolled himself up in his blanket and wall owed in under
the old p ine table, still a- begg ing; and then he went to crying. I
could hear him through the blanke t.

By and by he rolled out and jumped up on his feet looking wild, and he
see me and went for me. He chased me round and round the place with a
clasp -kni fe, calling me the Angel of Dea th, and saying he would kill
me, and then I couldn’t come for him no more. I begg ed, and told him
I was only Huck; but he laughed such a scre e ch y laugh , and ro ared
and cus sed, and kept on chasing me up. Once when I turned short and
dodged under his arm he made a grab and got me by the jacket between my
shoulders, and I thought I was gone; but I slid out of the jacket quick
as light ning, and saved myself. Pretty soon he was all tired out, and
dropped down with his back against the door, and said he would rest a
minute and then kill me. He put his knife under him, and said he would
sleep and get str ong, and then he would see who was who .

So he do zed off pretty so on. By and by I got the old spl it- bottom chair
and clumb up as easy as I could, not to make any noi se, and got down
the gun. I slipped the ram ro d down it to make sure it was loa ded, and
then I laid it across the tur ni p- barre l, pointing towards pap, and set
down behind it to wait for him to st ir. And how slow and still the time
did dra g along.




CHAPTER VII


“G it up! What you ’ b out?”

I opened my eyes and looked around, trying to make out where I was. It
was after sun- up, and I had been sound asleep. Pap was standing over me
looking sour —and sick, too. He says:

“What you do in’ with this gun ?”

I judged he didn’t know nothing about what he had been do ing, so I says:

“S ome body tried to get in, so I was laying for him.”

“Why didn’t you roust me out?”

“Well, I tried to, but I couldn ’t; I couldn’t budge you.”

“Well, all right. Don’t stand there pal aver ing all day, but out with
you and see if there’s a fish on the lines for breakfast. I’ll be along
in a minute .”

He unlocked the door, and I cleared out up the river - bank. I noticed
some pieces of limbs and such things floating down, and a spr ink ling
of bar k; so I knowed the river had begun to ri se. I reckoned I would
have great times now if I was over at the town. The Jun e rise used to
be always luck for me; because as soon as that rise begins here comes
cor d wood floating down, and pieces of log raft s— sometimes a dozen logs
together ; so all you have to do is to catch them and sell them to the
wood yards and the saw mi ll.

I went along up the bank with one eye out for pap and t’other one out
for what the rise might fetch along. Well, all at once here comes
a cano e; just a beaut y, too, about thir teen or fourteen foot long,
riding high like a du ck. I shot head - first off of the bank like a fro g,
clothes and all on, and struck out for the cano e. I just expected
there’d be somebody laying down in it, because people often done that
to fool folks, and when a chap had pulled a skiff out most to it
they’d raise up and laugh at him. But it warn’t so this time. It was a
drif t- canoe sure enough, and I clumb in and paddled her ashore. Thinks
I, the old man will be glad when he sees this — she’s worth ten dollars.
But when I got to shore pap wasn’t in sight yet, and as I was running
her into a little cre ek like a gu lly, all hung over with vines and
willows, I struck another idea : I judged I’d hide her good, and then,
’stead of taking to the woods when I run off, I’d go down the river
about fifty mile and camp in one place for good, and not have such a
rough time tramp ing on foot.

It was pretty close to the shan ty, and I thought I heard the old man
coming all the time; but I got her hi d; and then I out and looked
around a bunch of willows, and there was the old man down the path a
piece just drawing a be ad on a bird with his gun. So he hadn’t seen
anything.

When he got along I was hard at it taking up a “ tro t ” line. He ab used
me a little for being so slow ; but I told him I fell in the river, and
that was what made me so long. I knowed he would see I was we t, and
then he would be asking questi ons. We got five cat fish off the lines
and went home.

While we laid off after breakfast to sleep up, both of us being about
wore out, I got to thinking that if I could fix up some way to keep pap
and the widow from trying to follow me, it would be a certain er thing
than tru sting to luck to get far enough off before they missed me; you
see, all kinds of things might happ en. Well, I didn’t see no way for a
while, but by and by pap raised up a minute to dr ink another barrel of
water, and he says:

“ Another time a man comes a- pr owling round here you roust me out, you
hear? That man warn’t here for no good. I’d a shot him. Next time you
roust me out, you hear?”

Then he dropped down and went to sleep again; what he had been saying
give me the very idea I wan ted. I says to myself, I can fix it now so
nobody won’t think of following me.

About twelve o’clock we turned out and went along up the bank. The
river was coming up pretty fast, and lots of driftw ood going by on the
ri se. By and by along comes part of a log raf t— nine logs fast together.
We went out with the skiff and t owed it ashore. Then we had dinner.
Anybody but pap would ’a’ waited and seen the day through, so as to
catch more stuff ; but that warn’t pap’s style. N ine logs was enough
for one time; he must shove right over to town and se ll. So he locked
me in and took the skiff, and started off tow ing the raft about half
past thre e. I judged he wouldn’t come back that night. I waited till I
reckoned he had got a good star t; then I out with my saw, and went to
work on that log again. Be fore he was t’other side of the river I was
out of the ho le; him and his raft was just a spe ck on the water away
off yon der.

[Illustration: HUCKLEBERRY FINN ]

I took the sack of cor n meal and took it to where the canoe was hi d,
and shoved the vines and branches a part and put it in; then I done the
same with the side of bac on; then the whisky- ju g. I took all the coffee
and su gar there was, and all the am mun iti on; I took the wa dd ing; I took
the buck et and g our d; took a di pper and a tin c up, and my old saw and
two blanke ts, and the sk ill et and the coffe e- po t. I took fish- lines and
matches and other thing s— everything that was worth a c ent. I cleaned
out the place. I wanted an a x, but there wasn’t any, only the one out
at the wood pile, and I knowed why I was going to leave that. I fetched
out the gun, and now I was done.

I had wore the ground a good deal crawling out of the hole and dragging
out so many things. So I fixed that as good as I could from the outside
by sc at tering dust on the place, which covered up the smoo th ness and
the saw du st. Then I fixed the piece of log back into its place, and put
two rocks under it and one against it to hold it there, for it was bent
up at that place and didn’t quite touch ground. If you stood four or
five foot away and didn’t know it was sa wed, you wouldn’t never notice
it; and besides, this was the back of the cabin, and it warn’t likely
anybody would go fooling around there.

It was all grass clear to the canoe, so I hadn’t left a track. I
followed around to see. I stood on the bank and looked out over the
river. All safe. So I took the gun and went up a piece into the
woods, and was hunting around for some birds when I see a wild pi g ;
hogs soon went wild in them bott om s after they had got away from the
pra i ri e- farm s. I shot this fellow and took him into camp .

I took the ax and smashed in the door. I beat it and hacked it
considerable a- doing it. I fetched the pi g in, and took him back nearly
to the table and hacked into his throat with the a x, and laid him down
on the ground to ble ed; I say ground because it was ground — hard
pac ked, and no board s. Well, next I took an old sack and put a lot of
big rocks in it— all I could dra g —and I started it from the pi g, and
dragged it to the door and through the woods down to the river and
dum ped it in, and down it sun k, out of sight. You could easy see that
something had been dragged over the ground. I did wish Tom Sawyer was
there; I knowed he would take an interest in this kind of business, and
throw in the fancy tou ches. Nobody could spread himself like Tom Sawyer
in such a thing as that.

Well, last I pulled out some of my hair, and bloo ded the ax good, and
stuck it on the back side, and sl ung the ax in the corner. Then I took
up the pi g and held him to my breast with my jacket ( so he couldn’t
dri p ) till I got a good piece below the house and then dum ped him into
the river. Now I thought of something else. So I went and got the bag
of meal and my old saw out of the canoe, and fetched them to the house.
I took the bag to where it used to stan d, and ri pped a hole in the
bottom of it with the saw, for there warn’t no kni ves and for ks on the
plac e— pap done everything with his clasp -kni fe about the coo king. Then
I carried the sack about a hundred yards across the grass and through
the will ows east of the house, to a sha llow la ke that was five mile
wide and full of rus hes —and du cks too, you might say, in the seas on.
There was a sl ough or a cre ek leading out of it on the other side that
went miles away, I don’t know wher e, but it didn’t go to the river.
The meal si fted out and made a little track all the way to the la ke. I
dropped pap’s whe t stone there too, so as to look like it had been done
by accid ent. Then I tied up the rip in the me al - sack with a string, so
it wouldn’t lea k no more, and took it and my saw to the canoe again.

It was about dark now; so I dropped the canoe down the river under some
will ows that hung over the bank, and waited for the moon to ri se. I
made fast to a will ow ; then I took a bite to eat, and by and by laid
down in the canoe to smoke a pipe and lay out a plan . I says to myself,
they’ll follow the track of that sa ck ful of rocks to the shore and then
dra g the river for me. And they’ll follow that meal track to the la ke
and go br ow sing down the cre ek that leads out of it to find the robbers
that killed me and took the things. They won’t ever hunt the river
for anything but my dead car cas s. They ’ll soon get tired of that, and
won’t bother no more about me. All right; I can stop anywhere I want
to. Jackson’s I sl and is good enough for me; I know that island pretty
well, and nobody ever comes there. And then I can paddle over to town
nights, and sl ink around and pick up things I wan t. Jackson’s I sl and ’s
the place.

I was pretty tired, and the first thing I knowed I was asleep. When I
woke up I didn’t know where I was for a minute. I set up and looked
around, a little scared. Then I remem ber ed. The river looked miles and
miles acro ss. The moon was so bright I could ’a’ counted the drif t- logs
that went a- slipping along, black and still, hundreds of yards out from
shore. Ever y thing was dead quiet, and it looked late, and smelt late.
You know what I mean —I don’t know the words to put it in.

I took a good gap and a stret ch, and was just going to un hitch and
start when I heard a sound away over the water. I listened. Pretty soon
I made it out. It was that dull kind of a regular sound that comes from
oars working in row lo cks when it’s a still night. I peeped out through
the willow bran ches, and there it wa s—a skiff, away across the water.
I couldn’t tell how many was in it. It kept a-com ing, and when it was
abreast of me I see there warn’t but one man in it. Thinks I, maybe
it’s pap, though I warn’t expecting him. He dropped below me with the
curr ent, and by and by he came a- swinging up shore in the easy water,
and he went by so close I could ’a’ reached out the gun and touched
him. Well, it was pap, sure enough —and so ber, too, by the way he laid
his o ars.

I didn’t lose no time. The next minute I was a- spinning down- stream
soft, but quick, in the shade of the bank. I made two mile and a half,
and then struck out a quarter of a mile or more toward the middle of
the river, because pretty soon I would be passing the fer ry- landing,
and people might see me and ha il me. I got out amongst the driftw oo d,
and then laid down in the bottom of the canoe and let her flo at. I
laid there, and had a good rest and a smoke out of my pipe, looking
away into the sk y; not a cloud in it. The sky looks ever so deep when
you lay down on your back in the moon shin e; I never knowed it before.
And how far a body can hear on the water such night s! I heard people
talking at the fer ry- land ing. I heard what they said, too— every word
of it. One man said it was getting towards the long days and the short
nights now. T ’ other one said this warn’t one of the short ones, he
reck one d —and then they laughed, and he said it over again, and they
laughed again; then they waked up another fellow and told him, and
laughed, but he didn’t laugh ; he ri pped out something bris k, and said
let him alone. The first fellow said he ’lowed to tell it to his old
woman — she would think it was pretty good; but he said that warn’t
nothing to some things he had said in his time. I heard one man say
it was nearly three o’clock, and he hoped daylight wouldn’t wait more
than about a week longer. After that the talk got further and further
away, and I couldn’t make out the words any more; but I could hear the
mum ble, and now and then a laugh , too, but it seemed a long ways off.

I was away below the fer ry now. I rose up, and there was Jackson’s
Is land, about two mile and a half down-stream, heav y- tim bered and
standing up out of the middle of the river, big and dark and solid,
like a steamboat without any light s. There warn’t any signs of the bar
at the head —it was all under water now.

It didn’t take me long to get there. I shot past the head at a ripping
rate, the current was so swif t, and then I got into the dead water and
landed on the side towards the Illinois shore. I run the canoe into a
deep dent in the bank that I knowed ab out; I had to part the willow
branches to get in; and when I made fast nobody could ’a’ seen the
canoe from the outside.

I went up and set down on a log at the head of the island, and looked
out on the big river and the black driftw ood and away over to the
town, three mile away, where there was three or four lights twink ling.
A monstrous big lumber- raft was about a mile up- stream, coming along
down, with a lantern in the middle of it. I watched it come creeping
down, and when it was most abreast of where I stood I heard a man say,
“S ter n o ars, there ! hea ve her head to stab board !” I heard that just as
plain as if the man was by my side.

There was a little gray in the sky now; so I stepped into the woods,
and laid down for a na p before breakfast.




CHAPTER VIII


The sun was up so high when I waked that I judged it was after eight
o’clock. I laid there in the grass and the cool shade thinking about
things, and feeling rested and ruther comfortable and satisfied. I
could see the sun out at one or two ho les, but mostly it was big trees
all about, and glo om y in there amongst them. There was f reck led places
on the ground where the light si fted down through the lea ves, and the
f reck led places swa pped about a little, showing there was a little
bree ze up there. A couple of squir re ls set on a limb and jab bered at me
very friend ly.

I was powerful lazy and comfort able — didn’t want to get up and cook
breakfast. Well, I was doz ing off again when I thinks I hears a deep
sound of “ boom !” away up the river. I rou ses up, and re sts on my elb ow
and listen s; pretty soon I hears it again. I hop ped up, and went and
looked out at a hole in the lea ves, and I see a bunch of smoke laying
on the water a long ways up — about abreast the fer ry. And there was the
ferryboat full of people floating along down. I knowed what was the
matter now. “ Bo om !” I see the white smoke squir t out of the ferry bo at’s
side. You see, they was fir ing can n on over the water, trying to make my
car c ass come to the top .

I was pretty hungry, but it warn’t going to do for me to start a fire,
because they might see the smo ke. So I set there and watched the
can non - smoke and listened to the boom . The river was a mile wide there,
and it always looks pretty on a summer morn ing— so I was having a good
enough time seeing them hunt for my remain ders if I only had a bite to
e at. Well, then I happened to think how they always put quick silver in
loa ves of bread and float them off, because they always go right to
the drownded car c ass and stop there. So, says I, I’ll keep a look out,
and if any of them ’s floating around after me I’ll give them a show.
I changed to the Illinois edge of the island to see what luck I could
have, and I warn’t disappoin ted. A big double loa f come along, and I
most got it with a long stick, but my foot slipped and she floated out
fur ther. Of course I was where the current set in the clo sest to the
shor e— I knowed enough for that. But by and by along comes another one,
and this time I w on. I took out the plug and shook out the little d ab
of quick sil ver, and set my teeth in. It was “ ba ker’s brea d ” —what the
qu ality eat ; none of your low-down corn-p one.

I got a good place amongst the lea ves, and set there on a log, mun ching
the bread and watching the ferry boat, and very well satisfied. And then
something struck me. I says, now I reckon the widow or the parson or
somebody pra yed that this bread would find me, and here it has gone
and done it. So there ain’t no doubt but there is something in that
thing —that is, there’s something in it when a body like the widow or
the parson pra ys, but it don’t work for me, and I reckon it don’t work
for only just the right kind.

I lit a pipe and had a good long smoke, and went on watch ing. The
ferryboat was floating with the curr ent, and I allowed I’d have a
chance to see who was aboard when she come along, because she would
come in clo se, where the bread did. When she’d got pretty well along
down towards me, I put out my pipe and went to where I fished out the
brea d, and laid down behind a log on the bank in a little open place.
Where the log for ked I could pe ep through.

By and by she come along, and she drifted in so close that they could
’a’ run out a plan k and walked ashore. Most everybody was on the boat.
P ap , and Judge Thatch er, and B essi e Thatch er, and Joe Har per, and Tom
Sawyer, and his old Aunt Polly, and Sid and Mary, and plenty more.
Everybody was talking about the murder, but the captain broke in and
says:

“Look shar p, now; the current se ts in the clo sest here, and maybe he’s
washed ashore and got tangled amongst the brush at the water ’s ed ge. I
hope so, any way.”

I didn’t hope so. They all crowded up and leaned over the rail s, nearly
in my face, and kept still, watching with all their mi ght. I could
see them first- rate, but they couldn’t see me. Then the captain sung
out: “St and away !” and the can n on let off such a bl ast right before
me that it made me deef with the noise and pretty near blind with the
smoke, and I judged I was gone. If they’d ’a’ had some bull ets in, I
reckon they’d ’a’ got the corpse they was after. Well, I see I warn’t
hurt, thanks to goodn ess. The boat floated on and went out of sight
around the shoulder of the island. I could hear the booming now and
then, further and further off, and by and by, after an hour, I didn’t
hear it no more. The island was three mile long. I judged they had got
to the foot, and was giving it up. But they didn’t yet a while. They
turned around the foot of the island and started up the channel on the
Missouri side, under steam , and booming once in a while as they went. I
crossed over to that side and watched them. When they got abreast the
head of the island they quit shooting and dropped over to the Missouri
shore and went home to the town.

I knowed I was all right now. Nobody else would come a- hunting after
me. I got my traps out of the canoe and made me a nice camp in the
thick woods. I made a kind of a tent out of my blankets to put my
things under so the rain couldn’t get at them. I catched a cat fish
and ha ggled him open with my saw, and towards sun down I started my
camp-fire and had sup per. Then I set out a line to catch some fish for
breakfast.

When it was dark I set by my camp-fire smo king, and feeling pretty well
satisfi ed; but by and by it got sort of lonesom e, and so I went and set
on the bank and listened to the current swa shing along, and counted the
stars and drif t- logs and rafts that come down, and then went to bed;
there ain’t no better way to put in time when you are lonesom e; you
can’t stay so, you soon get over it.

And so for three days and nights. No differ ence —just the same thing.
But the next day I went ex pl or ing around down through the island. I
was bo ss of it; it all belonged to me, so to say, and I wanted to know
all about it; but mainly I wanted to put in the time. I found plenty
stra w ber ri es, ri pe and pri me; and green summer gra p es, and green
ra z ber ri es; and the green black ber ries was just beginning to show. They
would all come handy by and by, I jud ge d.

Well, I went fooling along in the deep woods till I judged I warn’t
far from the foot of the island. I had my gun along, but I hadn’t shot
nothing; it was for prote cti on; thought I would kill some game nigh
home. About this time I mighty near stepped on a good- si zed sna ke, and
it went sliding off through the grass and flow ers, and I after it,
trying to get a shot at it. I cli pped along, and all of a sudden I
b ounded right on to the ashes of a camp-fire that was still smo king.

My heart jumped up amongst my lun g s. I never waited for to look
further, but un cocked my gun and went snea king back on my tipto es as
fast as ever I could. Every now and then I stopped a second amongst the
thick leaves and listened, but my breath come so hard I couldn’t hear
nothing else. I sl un k along another piece further, then listened again;
and so on, and so on. If I see a stum p, I took it for a man; if I tro d
on a stick and broke it, it made me feel like a person had cut one of
my brea ths in two and I only got half, and the short half, too.

When I got to camp I warn’t feeling very br ash, there warn’t much s and
in my craw ; but I says, this ain’t no time to be fooling around. So I
got all my traps into my canoe again so as to have them out of sight,
and I put out the fire and scattered the ashes around to look like an
old la st- year ’s camp , and then clumb a tre e.

I reckon I was up in the tree two hour s; but I didn’t see nothing, I
didn’t hear nothing —I only thought I heard and seen as much as a
thousand things. Well, I couldn’t stay up there for ever ; so at last
I got down, but I kept in the thick woods and on the look out all the
time. All I could get to eat was ber ries and what was left over from
breakfast.

By the time it was night I was pretty hungr y. So when it was good and
dark I slid out from shore before moon rise and paddled over to the
Illinois bank — about a quarter of a mi le. I went out in the woods and
cooked a supper, and I had about made up my mind I would stay there
all night when I hear a plun ke ty- plun k, plun ke ty- plun k, and says
to myself, horses coming; and next I hear people’s voic es. I got
everything into the canoe as quick as I could, and then went creeping
through the woods to see what I could find out. I hadn’t got far when I
hear a man say:

“We better camp here if we can find a good place; the horses is about
beat out. Le t’s look around.”

I didn’t wait, but shoved out and paddled away easy. I tied up in the
old place, and reckoned I would sleep in the cano e.

I didn’t sleep much. I couldn ’t, some how, for thinking. And every time
I waked up I thought somebody had me by the ne ck. So the sleep didn’t
do me no good. By and by I says to myself, I can’t live this way; I’m
a-going to find out who it is that’s here on the island with me; I’ll
find it out or bust. Well, I felt better right off.

So I took my paddle and slid out from shore just a step or two, and
then let the canoe drop along down amongst the shad ows. The moon was
shin ing, and outside of the shad ows it made it most as light as day.
I poked along well on to an hour, everything still as rocks and sound
asleep. Well, by this time I was most down to the foot of the island.
A little ri p ply, cool bree ze begun to blow, and that was as good as
saying the night was about done. I give her a turn with the paddle and
brung her nose to shor e; then I got my gun and slipped out and into the
edge of the woods. I sat down there on a log, and looked out through
the lea ves. I see the moon go off watch, and the darkness begin to
blanket the river. But in a little while I see a pale streak over the
tre e- top s, and knowed the day was com ing. So I took my gun and slipped
off towards where I had run across that camp- fire, stopping every
minute or two to list en. But I hadn’t no luck somehow ; I couldn’t seem
to find the place. But by and by, sure enough, I catched a glimpse
of fire away through the tre es. I went for it, cau ti ous and slow. By
and by I was close enough to have a look, and there laid a man on the
ground. It most give me the fan to ds. He had a blanket around his head,
and his head was nearly in the fire. I set there behind a clump of
bushes in about six foot of him, and kept my eyes on him ste ad y. It was
getting gray daylight now. Pretty soon he ga pped and stretched himself
and hove off the blanke t, and it was Miss Watson’s Jim ! I bet I was
glad to see him. I says:

“Hello, Jim!” and skipped out.

He b oun ced up and stared at me wil d. Then he drops down on his knees,
and put s his hands together and says:

“Do an’ hurt me— don ’t! I hain’t ever done no harm to a gho s’. I al wuz
liked dead people, en done all I could for ’em. You go en git in de
river ag’in, whah you b’ long s, en doan’ do nuffn to O le Jim, ’at ’uz
al wuz yo’ fr en ’.”

Well, I warn’t long making him understand I warn’t dead. I was ever so
glad to see Jim. I warn’t lonesome now. I told him I warn’t afraid of
him telling the people where I was. I talked along, but he only set
there and looked at me; never said nothing. Then I says:

“It’s good day light. Le’s get breakfast. Ma ke up your camp-fire good.”

“What’s de use er ma kin’ up de camp-fire to cook stra w bri es en sich
truck ? But you got a gun, hain’t you? Den we kin git sumf n better den
stra w bri es.”

“S tra w ber ries and such truck ,” I says. “Is that what you live on?”

“I couldn’ git nuffn el se,” he says.

“Why, how long you been on the island, Jim?”

“I come heah de night arter you’s kill ed.”

“What, all that time?”

“Yes - indeed y.”

“And ain’t you had nothing but that kind of rub bage to eat ?”

“No, sah — nuffn else.”

“Well, you must be most star ved, ain’t you?”

“I reck’n I could eat a ho ss. I think I could. How long you ben on de
islan ’ ?”

“S in ce the night I got kill ed.”

“No! W ’ y, what has you lived on ? But you got a gun. Oh, yes, you got a
gun. D at’s good. Now you kill sumf n en I’ll make up de fire .”

So we went over to where the canoe was, and while he built a fire in
a gras sy open place amongst the trees, I fetched meal and bac on and
coffee, and coffe e- p ot and fr y ing- pan, and su gar and tin cup s, and the
nigger was set back considerable, because he reckoned it was all done
with wit ch c raft. I catched a good big cat fish , too, and Jim cleaned him
with his kni fe, and fri ed him.

When breakfast was ready we lo lled on the grass and eat it smoking ho t.
Jim laid it in with all his might, for he was most about star ved. Then
when we had got pretty well stu f fe d, we laid off and laz i ed.

By and by Jim says:

“But looky here, Huck, who wuz it dat ’uz killed in dat shan ty ef it
warn’t you?”

Then I told him the whole thing, and he said it was smar t. He said Tom
Sawyer couldn’t get up no better plan than what I had. Then I says:

“How do you come to be here, Jim, and how ’d you get here?”

He looked pretty uneas y, and didn’t say nothing for a minute. Then he
says:

“Maybe I better not tell.”

“Why, Jim?”

“Well, dey’s reason s. But you wouldn’ tell on me ef I ’uz to tell you,
would you, Huck?”

“B lamed if I would, Jim.”

“Well, I b’lieve you, Huck. I —I run off.”

“ Jim!”

“But mind, you said you wouldn’ tell —you know you said you wouldn’
tell, Huck .”

“Well, I did. I said I wouldn ’t, and I’ll stick to it. H onest injun,
I will. People would call me a low-down Ab ol iti oni st and des pi se me for
keeping mum —but that don’t make no difference. I ain’t a-going to tell,
and I ain’t a-going back there, anyway s. So, now, le’s know all about
it.”

“Well, you see, it ’uz dis way. O le mis sus — dat’s Miss Watson — she pe cks
on me all de time, en tre ats me pooty rough , but she awluz said she
wouldn’ sell me down to Orleans. But I noticed dey wuz a nigger tra der
roun’ de place consid able lat ely, en I begin to git one as y. Well, one
night I cre e ps to de do’ pooty late, en de do’ warn’t quite she t, en I
hear old mis su s tell de widder she gwyne to sell me down to Orleans,
but she didn’ want to, but she could git eight hund’d dollars for me,
en it ’uz sich a big stack o’ money she couldn’ resi s’. De widder she
try to git her to say she wouldn’t do it, but I never waited to hear de
re s’. I lit out mighty quick, I tell you.

“I tuck out en shin down de hi ll, en ’ spec to steal a ski ft ’long de
sho’ som ’ ers ’ bo ve de town, but dey wuz people a- stirring y it, so I hid
in de ole tum ble down coo per sh op on de bank to wait for everybody to go
’ way. Well, I wuz dah all night. Dey wuz somebody roun’ all de time.
’ L ong ’bout six in de ma w nin’ ski fts begin to go by, en ’bout eight er
nine every ski ft dat went ’long wuz talk in’ ’bout how yo’ pap come over
to de town en say you’s killed. D ese las ’ ski fts wuz full o’ ladies en
genl men a-goin’ over for to see de place. Sometimes dey’d pull up at de
sho’ en take a re s’ b’fo’ dey started acro st, so by de talk I got to
know all ’bout de kill in’. I ’uz powerful sorry you’s killed, Huck, but
I ain’t no mo’ now.

“I laid dah under de sha vin ’s all day. I ’uz hungry, but I warn’t
afe ard ; bekase I knowed ole mis su s en de widder wuz goin’ to start to
de camp-meet ’n’ right arter break fas ’ en be gone all day, en dey knows
I goes off wid de cat tle ’bout daylight, so dey wouldn’ ’ spec to see
me roun’ de place, en so dey wouldn’ miss me tell arter dark in de
even in’. De yuther servants wouldn’ miss me, kase dey’d shin out en
take holi day soon as de ole folks ’uz out’n de way.

“Well, when it come dark I tuck out up de river road, en went ’bout two
mile er more to whah dey warn’t no house s. I’d made up my mine ’bout
what I’s a-gwyne to do. You see, ef I kep’ on tr yin’ to git away af oo t,
de dogs ’ ud track me; ef I stole a ski ft to cross over, dey’d miss dat
ski f t, you see, en dey’d know ’bout whah I’d lan ’ on de yuther side, en
whah to pick up my track. So I says, a raf f is what I’s ar ter ; it doan’
make no track.

“I see a light a-com in’ roun’ de p ’ int by me by, so I wa de ’ in en shov e ’
a log ahead o’ me en swum more’n half-way acro st de river, en got in
’m ongst de driftw oo d, en kep’ my head down low, en kinder swum agin de
current tell de raf f come along. Den I swum to de stern uv it en tuck
a-hol t. It clouded up en ’uz pooty dark for a little while. So I clumb
up en laid down on de plan ks. De men ’uz all ’ way yonder in de middle,
whah de lantern wu z . De river wuz a- ri sin ’, en dey wuz a good curr ent;
so I reck ’n ’d ’at by fo’ in de ma w nin’ I’d be twenty-five mile down de
river, en den I’d slip in jis b’fo’ daylight en swim as ho ’, en take to
de woods on de Illinois side.

“But I didn’ have no luck. When we ’uz mos’ down to de head er de
islan ’ a man begin to come af t wid de lantern. I see it warn’t no use
fer to wait, so I slid overboard en struck out fer de islan ’. Well, I
had a notion I could lan ’ mos’ anywher s, but I couldn ’t — bank too blu ff .
I ’uz mos’ to de foot er de islan ’ b’fo’ I f oun’ a good place. I went
into de woods en j ed ged I wouldn’ fool wid ra ffs no mo ’, long as dey
move de lantern roun’ so. I had my pipe en a plug er dog- leg en some
matches in my ca p, en dey warn’t we t, so I ’uz all right.”

“And so you ain’t had no meat nor bread to eat all this time? Why
didn’t you get mud- tur k le s?”

“How you gwyne to git ’m ? You can’t slip up on um en grab um ; en how ’s
a body gwyne to hit um wid a rock ? How could a body do it in de night ?
En I warn’t gwyne to show my se f on de bank in de day time.”

“Well, that’s so. You ’ve had to keep in the woods all the time, of
course. Did you hear ’em shooting the can non ?”

“Oh, yes. I knowed dey was arter you. I see um go by hea h — watched um
tho o de bush es.”

Some young birds come along, flying a yard or two at a time and
light ing. Jim said it was a sign it was going to ra in. He said it was a
sign when young chick ens flew that way, and so he reckoned it was the
same way when young birds done it. I was going to catch some of them,
but Jim wouldn’t let me. He said it was death. He said his father laid
mighty sick once, and some of them catched a bird, and his old gr ann y
said his father would di e, and he did.

And Jim said you mustn’t count the things you are going to cook for
dinner, because that would bring bad luck. The same if you shook the
t able cloth after sun down. And he said if a man owned a bee hive and that
man died, the be es must be told about it before sun-up next morning,
or else the be es would all wea ken down and quit work and di e. Jim said
be es wouldn’t sting idio ts; but I didn’t believe that, because I had
tried them lots of times myself, and they wouldn’t sting me.

I had heard about some of these things before, but not all of them. Jim
knowed all kinds of sign s. He said he knowed most everything. I said it
looked to me like all the signs was about bad luck, and so I asked him
if there warn’t any good- luck sign s. He says:

“M i ghty fe w — an’ dey ain’t no use to a body. What you want to know
when good luck ’s a-com in’ for? W ant to keep it off?” And he said: “E f
you’s got hairy arms en a hairy b reas ’, it’s a sign dat you’s a-gwyne
to be rich. Well, dey’s some use in a sign like d at, ’kase it’s so fur
a head. You see, maybe you’s got to be po’ a long time fu st, en so you
might git disc ou rage ’ en kill y o’ se f ’f you didn’ know by de sign dat
you gwyne to be rich by me b y.”

“Have you got hairy arms and a hairy breast, Jim?”

“What’s de use to ax dat questi on ? Don’t you see I ha s?”

“Well, are you ri ch?”

“No, but I ben rich wun st, and gwyne to be rich ag’in. W un st I had
fo teen dollars, but I tuck to spe cal at ’n ’, en got busted out.”

“What did you spe cul ate in, Jim?”

“Well, f ust I tackled stock .”

“What kind of stock ?”

“Why, live stock — cat t le, you know. I put ten dollars in a c ow. But I
ain’ gwyne to resk no mo’ money in sto ck. De cow up ’n’ died on my
han ’s.”

“So you lost the ten dollar s.”

“No, I didn’t lose it all. I on’y lo s’ ’bout nine of it. I so le de hide
en tall er for a dollar en ten cent s.”

“You had five dollars and ten cents left. Did you spe cul ate any mor e?”

“Yes. You know that one- la i gged nigger dat b’ long s to old Mis to
Bra dish ? Well, he s ot up a bank, en say anybody dat put in a dollar
would git fo’ dollars mo’ at de en’ er de year. Well, all de niggers
went in, but dey didn’t have much. I wuz de on’y one dat had much. So
I stuck out for mo’ d an fo’ dollars, en I said ’f I didn’ git it I’d
start a bank my se f . Well, o’ course dat nigger wan t ’ to keep me out er
de business, bekase he says dey warn’t business ’n ough for two ban ks,
so he say I could put in my five dollars en he pay me thirty- five at de
en’ er de year.

“So I done it. Den I reck ’n ’d I’d inv es’ de thirty- five dollars right
off en keep things a- mov in’. Dey wuz a nigger na me’ Bob , dat had
ketched a wood- fl at, en his mar ster didn’ know it; en I bought it
off ’n him en told him to take de thirty- five dollars when de en’ er de
year come; but somebody stole de wood- flat dat night, en nex ’ day de
one- la i gged nigger say de bank ’s bu sted. So dey didn’ none uv us git no
money.”

“What did you do with the ten cent s, Jim?”

“Well, I ’uz gwyne to sp en’ it, but I had a drea m, en de dream tole me
to give it to a nigger na me’ Bal um — Bal um ’s A ss dey call him for shor t;
he’s one er dem chuck le heads, you know. But he’s luck y, dey say, en I
see I warn’t luck y. De dream say let Balum inv es’ de ten cents en he’d
make a raise for me. Well, Balum he tuck de money, en when he wuz in
church he hear de preacher say dat whoever give to de po’ len ’ to de
Lor d, en b oun’ to git his money back a hund’d times. So Balum he tuck
en give de ten cents to de po ’, en laid low to see what wuz gwyne to
come of it.”

“Well, what did come of it, Jim?”

“N uff n never come of it. I couldn’ manage to k’ le ck dat money no way;
en Balum he couldn ’. I ain’ gwyne to len ’ no mo’ money ’d out I see de
secur ity. B oun’ to git yo’ money back a hund’d times, de preacher says !
E f I could git de ten cents back, I’d call it squ a h, en be glad er de
chan st.”

“Well, it’s all right anyway, Jim, long as you’re going to be rich
again some time or other .”

“Yes; en I’s rich now, come to look at it. I owns my se f, en I’s wu th
eight hund’d dollars. I wisht I had de money, I wouldn’ want no mo ’.”




CHAPTER IX


I wanted to go and look at a place right about the middle of the island
that I’d found when I was ex pl or ing; so we started and soon got to it,
because the island was only three miles long and a quarter of a mile
wid e.

This place was a tolerable long, steep hill or ridge about forty foot
high . We had a rough time getting to the top , the sides was so steep
and the bushes so thi ck. We tramp ed and clumb around all over it, and
by and by found a good big cavern in the ro ck, most up to the top on
the side towards Illino is. The cavern was as big as two or three rooms
bun ched together, and Jim could stand up straight in it. It was cool in
there. Jim was for putting our traps in there right away, but I said we
didn’t want to be clim bing up and down there all the time.

Jim said if we had the canoe hid in a good place, and had all the
traps in the caver n, we could rush there if anybody was to come to the
island, and they would never find us without dog s. And, besides, he
said them little birds had said it was going to rain, and did I want
the things to get we t?

So we went back and got the canoe, and paddled up abreast the caver n,
and lu gged all the traps up there. Then we hunted up a place close by
to hide the canoe in, amongst the thick will ows. We took some fish off
of the lines and set them again, and begun to get ready for dinner.

The door of the cavern was big enough to roll a hog s head in, and on one
side of the door the floor stuck out a little bit, and was flat and a
good place to build a fire on. So we built it there and cooked dinner.

We spread the blankets inside for a carpe t, and eat our dinner in
there. We put all the other things handy at the back of the caver n.
Pretty soon it dark ened up, and begun to thunder and light en; so the
birds was right about it. D ire ctly it begun to rain, and it ra ined
like all fur y, too, and I never see the wind blow so. It was one of
these regular summer storm s. It would get so dark that it looked all
blu e- black outside, and lovel y; and the rain would thr ash along by so
thick that the trees off a little ways looked dim and spi der- web by;
and here would come a bl ast of wind that would bend the trees down and
turn up the pale under side of the leav es; and then a perfect ri pper of
a gust would follow along and set the branches to tossing their arms
as if they was just wil d; and next, when it was just about the blu est
and bl ac ke st — f st ! it was as bright as glor y, and you’d have a little
glimpse of tre e- top s a- plun ging about away off yonder in the stor m,
hundreds of yards further than you could see befor e; dark as sin again
in a second, and now you’d hear the thunder let go with an awful cr ash,
and then go rum bling, grum bling, tum bling, down the sky towards the
under side of the world, like ro lling empty barre ls down-stair s— where
it’s long stairs and they b ounce a good de al, you know.

“ Jim, this is nice ,” I says. “I wouldn’t want to be now here else but
here. P ass me along another hunk of fish and some hot corn- brea d.”

“Well, you wouldn’t ’a’ ben here ’f it hadn’t ’a’ ben for Jim. You’d
’a’ ben down dah in de woods wid out any dinner, en g itt in’ mos’
drownded, too; dat you would, hone y. Chi ck ens knows when it’s gwyne to
rain, en so do de bir ds, chi le.”

The river went on raising and raising for ten or twelve days, till at
last it was over the ban ks. The water was three or four foot deep on
the island in the low places and on the Illinois bott om. On that side
it was a good many miles wide, but on the Missouri side it was the same
old distance acro s s—a half a mi le —because the Missouri shore was just a
wall of high blu ff s.

Da y times we paddled all over the island in the cano e. It was mighty
cool and sha dy in the deep woods, even if the sun was blazing outside.
We went winding in and out amongst the trees, and sometimes the vines
hung so thick we had to back away and go some other way. Well, on every
old bro ken -down tree you could see rab b its and snakes and such things;
and when the island had been over fl owed a day or two they got so ta me,
on account of being hungry, that you could paddle right up and put your
hand on them if you wanted to; but not the snakes and tur tle s— they
would slide off in the water. The ridge our cavern was in was full of
them. We could ’a’ had pe ts enough if we’d wanted them.

One night we catched a little se ction of a lumber- raf t— nice p ine
plan ks. It was twelve foot wide and about fifteen or sixteen foot long,
and the top stood above water six or seven inch es —a solid, level floor.
We could see saw- logs go by in the daylight sometimes, but we let them
go ; we didn’t show ourselves in day light.

Another night when we was up at the head of the island, just before
daylight, here comes a fra me- house down, on the west side. She was
a two- story, and tilted over consider able. We paddled out and got
abo ard — clumb in at an up-stairs window. But it was too dark to see yet,
so we made the canoe fast and set in her to wait for day light.

The light begun to come before we got to the foot of the island. Then
we looked in at the window. We could make out a bed, and a table, and
two old chairs, and lots of things around about on the floor, and there
was clothes hanging against the wall. There was something laying on the
floor in the far corner that looked like a man. So Jim says:

“Hello, you!”

But it didn’t bu dge. So I hollered again, and then Jim says:

“D e man ain’t asleep — he’s dead. You hold still —I’ll go en see.”

He went, and bent down and loo ked, and says:

“It’s a dead man. Yes, indeed y; na ked, too. He’s ben shot in de back. I
reck’n he’s ben dead two er three days. Come in, Huck, but doan’ look
at his fac e— it’s too g ash ly.”

I didn’t look at him at all. Jim throwed some old rags over him, but
he needn’t done it; I didn’t want to see him. There was hea ps of old
greasy cards scattered around over the floor, and old whisky- bott les,
and a couple of mas ks made out of black cloth ; and all over the walls
was the ignor an test kind of words and pictures made with char co al.
There was two old dirty calico dres ses, and a sun-bon net, and some
wom en’s under clothes hanging against the wall, and some men’s clo thing,
too. We put the lot into the cano e— it might come good. There was a
bo y’s old speckled straw hat on the floor ; I took that, too. And there
was a bott le that had had milk in it, and it had a rag stop per for a
bab y to su ck. We would ’a’ took the bott le, but it was bro ke. There was
a see dy old ch est, and an old hair trunk with the hing es bro ke. They
stood open, but there warn’t nothing left in them that was any accoun t.
The way things was scattered about we reckoned the people left in a
hurry, and warn’t fixed so as to carry off most of their stuff .

We got an old tin lantern, and a but ch er- knife without any hand le,
and a bran - new Bar low knife worth two b its in any store, and a lot of
ta llow candles, and a tin candle stick, and a g our d, and a tin c up,
and a rat ty old bed quil t off the bed, and a reti cu le with need les and
p ins and be es wax and buttons and thread and all such truck in it, and
a hat ch et and some na ils, and a fish- line as thick as my little finger
with some monstrous hoo ks on it, and a roll of buck skin, and a leather
dog- coll ar, and a horse sho e, and some vi als of medi c ine that didn’t
have no la be l on them; and just as we was leaving I found a tolerable
good cur ry com b, and Jim he found a rat ty old fi dd le- b ow, and a wooden
leg. The stra ps was broke off of it, but, barr ing that, it was a good
enough leg, though it was too long for me and not long enough for Jim,
and we couldn’t find the other one, though we hunted all around.

And so, take it all around, we made a good haul . When we was ready
to shove off we was a quarter of a mile below the island, and it was
pretty broad day; so I made Jim lay down in the canoe and cover up with
the quil t, because if he set up people could tell he was a nigger a
good ways off. I paddled over to the Illinois shore, and drifted down
most a half a mile doing it. I crept up the dead water under the bank,
and hadn’t no accid ents and didn’t see nobody. We got home all safe.




CHAPTER X


After breakfast I wanted to talk about the dead man and guess out how
he come to be killed, but Jim didn’t want to. He said it would fetch
bad luck ; and besides, he said, he might come and ha ’n t us; he said a
man that warn’t buried was more likely to go a- ha ’n ting around than
one that was plan ted and comfortable. That s ounded pretty reasonable,
so I didn’t say no more; but I couldn’t keep from studying over it and
wish ing I knowed who shot the man, and what they done it for.

We rummaged the clothes we’d go t, and found eight dollars in silver
se wed up in the lining of an old blanket over coat. Jim said he reckoned
the people in that house stole the coat, because if they’d ’a’ knowed
the money was there they wouldn’t ’a’ left it. I said I reckoned they
killed him, too; but Jim didn’t want to talk about that. I says:

“Now you think it’s bad luck ; but what did you say when I fetched
in the snake-skin that I found on the top of the ridge day before
yesterday ? You said it was the worst bad luck in the world to touch a
snake-skin with my hands. Well, here’s your bad luck ! We ’ve ra ked in
all this truck and eight dollars besid es. I wish we could have some bad
luck like this every day, Jim.”

“Never you mind, honey, never you mind. Don’t you git too pe ar t. It’s
a-com in’. M ind I tell you, it’s a-com in ’.”

It did come, too. It was a T u es day that we had that talk. Well, after
dinner Fri day we was laying around in the grass at the upper end of the
ri dge, and got out of tobacco. I went to the cavern to get some, and
found a rattlesnake in there. I killed him, and curled him up on the
foot of Jim’s blanke t, ever so natur al, thinking there’d be some fun
when Jim found him there. Well, by night I forgot all about the sna ke,
and when Jim flung himself down on the blanket while I struck a light
the sna ke ’s mate was there, and bit him.

He jumped up yelling, and the first thing the light showed was the
v ar min t curled up and ready for another spr ing. I laid him out in a
second with a stick, and Jim grabbed pap’s whisky- jug and begun to p our
it down.

He was bare foo ted, and the snake bit him right on the heel . That all
comes of my being such a fool as to not remember that wherever you
leave a dead snake its mate always comes there and cur ls around it.
Jim told me to chop off the sna ke ’s head and throw it away, and then
skin the body and ro ast a piece of it. I done it, and he eat it and
said it would help c ure him. He made me take off the ratt les and tie
them around his wrist, too. He said that that would hel p. Then I slid
out quiet and throwed the snakes clear away amongst the bush es; for I
warn’t going to let Jim find out it was all my fault, not if I could
help it.

Jim sucked and sucked at the ju g, and now and then he got out of his
head and pit ched around and yell ed; but every time he come to himself
he went to su cking at the jug again. His foot swelled up pretty big,
and so did his leg ; but by and by the drunk begun to come, and so I
judged he was all right; but I’d druther been bit with a snake than
pap’s whisk y.

Jim was laid up for four days and nights. Then the swe lling was all
gone and he was around again. I made up my mind I wouldn’t ever take
a-holt of a snake-skin again with my hands, now that I see what had
come of it. Jim said he reckoned I would believe him next time. And
he said that handling a snake-skin was such awful bad luck that maybe
we hadn’t got to the end of it yet. He said he druther see the new
moon over his left shoulder as much as a thousand times than take up a
snake-skin in his hand. Well, I was getting to feel that way myself,
though I’ve always reckoned that looking at the new moon over your left
shoulder is one of the careles sest and foolish est things a body can
do. Old H ank B un ker done it once, and bra gged about it; and in less
than two years he got drunk and fell off of the sho t- tow er, and spread
himself out so that he was just a kind of a la yer, as you may say ; and
they slid him ed ge ways between two bar n doors for a coffin, and buried
him so, so they say, but I didn’t see it. Pap told me. But anyway it
all come of looking at the moon that way, like a foo l.

Well, the days went along, and the river went down between its banks
again; and about the first thing we done was to ba it one of the big
hoo ks with a skin ned rabbit and set it and catch a cat fish that was
as big as a man, being six foot two inches long, and weigh ed over two
hundred pound s. We couldn’t handle him, of course; he would ’a’ flung
us into Illino is. We just set there and watched him rip and tear around
till he drown ded. We found a brass but ton in his stoma ch and a round
ba ll, and lots of rubbag e. We spl it the ball open with the hat ch et,
and there was a sp ool in it. Jim said he’d had it there a long time,
to coat it over so and make a ball of it. It was as big a fish as was
ever catched in the Mississippi , I reckon. Jim said he hadn’t ever seen
a bigger one. He would ’a’ been worth a good deal over at the village.
They pe ddle out such a fish as that by the pound in the marke t- house
there; everybody bu ys some of him; his me at’s as white as snow and
makes a good fr y.

Next morning I said it was getting slow and dull, and I wanted to get
a stir r ing- up some way. I said I reckoned I would slip over the river
and find out what was going on. Jim liked that noti on; but he said I
must go in the dark and look shar p. Then he studied it over and said,
couldn’t I put on some of them old things and dress up like a girl ?
That was a good noti on, too. So we shor tened up one of the calico
g own s, and I turned up my trouser - legs to my knees and got into it. Jim
hitched it behind with the hoo ks, and it was a fair f it. I put on the
sun-bon net and tied it under my chin, and then for a body to look in
and see my face was like looking down a jo int of st ov e- pip e. Jim said
nobody would know me, even in the day time, hard ly. I practi sed around
all day to get the hang of the things, and by and by I could do pretty
well in them, only Jim said I didn’t walk like a girl ; and he said
I must quit pulling up my gown to get at my br itch es- pocket. I took
notice, and done better.

I started up the Illinois shore in the canoe just after dark.

I started across to the town from a little below the fer ry- landing,
and the dri ft of the current fetched me in at the bottom of the town.
I tied up and started along the bank. There was a light burning in a
little shan ty that hadn’t been lived in for a long time, and I wondered
who had took up quarters there. I slipped up and peeped in at the
window. There was a woman about forty year old in there kn itting by
a candle that was on a p ine table. I didn’t know her fac e; she was a
stranger, for you couldn’t start a face in that town that I didn’t
know. Now this was luck y, because I was wea ken ing; I was getting
afraid I had come; people might know my voice and find me out. But if
this woman had been in such a little town two days she could tell me
all I wanted to know; so I knocked at the door, and made up my mind I
wouldn’t forget I was a girl.




CHAPTER X I


“Come in,” says the woman, and I did. She says: “Take a che er.”

I done it. She looked me all over with her little shiny eyes, and says:

“What might your name be ?”

“S ar ah William s.”

“W here ’ bou ts do you live ? In this neighbor hoo d?”

“No’ m. In Hoo ker ville, seven mile below. I’ve walked all the way and
I’m all tired out.”

“H un gr y, too, I reckon. I’ll find you some thing.”

“No’ m, I ain’t hungr y. I was so hungry I had to stop two miles below
here at a farm ; so I ain’t hungry no more. It’s what makes me so late.
My mother ’s down sick, and out of money and everything, and I come to
tell my uncle Abner Mo or e. He lives at the upper end of the town, she
says. I hain’t ever been here before. Do you know him?”

“No; but I don’t know everybody yet. I haven’t lived here quite two
wee ks. It’s a considerable ways to the upper end of the town. You
better stay here all night. Take off your bon ne t.”

“No,” I says; “I’ll rest awhile, I reckon, and go on. I ain’t afeard of
the dark.”

She said she wouldn’t let me go by myself, but her husband would be in
by and by, maybe in a hour and a half, and she’d send him along with
me. Then she got to talking about her husband, and about her relations
up the river, and her relations down the river, and about how much
better off they used to was, and how they didn’t know but they’d made a
mistake coming to our town, instead of letting well al one —and so on and
so on, till I was afeard I had made a mistake coming to her to find
out what was going on in the town; but by and by she dropped on to pap
and the murder, and then I was pretty willing to let her cl atter right
along. She told about me and Tom Sawyer finding the twelve thousand
dollars ( only she got it twent y ) and all about pap and what a hard lot
he was, and what a hard lot I was, and at last she got down to where I
was murder ed. I says:

“Who done it? We ’ve heard considerable about these go ing s- on down in
Hoo ker ville, but we don’t know who ’twas that killed Huck Fin n.”

“Well, I reckon there’s a right smart chance of people here that ’d
like to know who killed him. Some think old Finn done it him self.”

“No — is that so?”

“M o st everybody thought it at first. He ’ll never know how nigh he come
to getting lyn ched. But before night they changed around and judged it
was done by a runaway nigger named Jim.”

“Why he —”

I stopped. I reckoned I better keep still. She run on, and never
noticed I had put in at all :

“The nigger run off the very night Huck Finn was killed. So there’s
a reward out for him — three hundred dollars. And there’s a reward out
for old Finn, too— two hundred dollars. You see, he come to town the
morning after the murder, and told about it, and was out with ’em on
the ferryboat hun t, and right away after he up and left. Be fore night
they wanted to lynch him, but he was gone, you see. Well, next day
they found out the nigger was gone; they found out he hadn’t ben seen
sence ten o’clock the night the mur der was done. So then they put it on
him, you see; and while they was full of it, next day, back comes old
Finn, and went boo - hoo ing to Judge Thatcher to get money to hunt for
the nigger all over Illinois with. The judge gave him some, and that
evening he got drunk, and was around till after midnight with a couple
of mighty hard -looking strang ers, and then went off with them. Well, he
hain’t come back sen ce, and they ain’t looking for him back till this
thing blows over a little, for people thinks now that he killed his boy
and fixed things so folks would think robbers done it, and then he’d
get Huck ’s money without having to bother a long time with a law su it.
People do say he warn’t any too good to do it. Oh, he’s sly, I reckon.
If he don’t come back for a year he’ll be all right. You can’t prove
anything on him, you know; everything will be qui e ted down then, and
he’ll walk in Huck ’s money as easy as nothing.”

“Yes, I reckon so, ’ m. I don’t see nothing in the way of it. Has
everybody quit thinking the nigger done it?”

“Oh, no, not everybody. A good many thinks he done it. But they’ll get
the nigger pretty soon now, and maybe they can scare it out of him.”

“Why, are they after him ye t?”

“Well, you’re innocent, ain’t you! Does three hundred dollars lay
around every day for people to pick up? Some folks think the nigger
ain’t far from here. I’m one of them —but I hain’t talked it around. A
few days ago I was talking with an old couple that lives next door in
the log shan ty, and they happened to say hardly anybody ever goes to
that island over yonder that they call Jackson’s I slan d. Don’t anybody
live there? says I. No, nobody, says the y. I didn’t say any more, but
I done some thinking. I was pretty near certain I’d seen smoke over
there, about the head of the island, a day or two before that, so I
says to myself, like as not that nigger’s hiding over there; anyway,
says I, it’s worth the trouble to give the place a hun t. I hain’t
seen any smoke sen ce, so I reckon maybe he’s gone, if it was him; but
husband’s going over to see — him and another man. He was gone up the
river; but he got back to-day, and I told him as soon as he got here
two hours ago.”

I had got so uneasy I couldn’t set still. I had to do something with
my hand s; so I took up a needle off of the table and went to th reading
it. My hands shoo k, and I was making a bad job of it. When the woman
stopped talking I looked up, and she was looking at me pretty curious
and smiling a little. I put down the needle and th read, and let on to
be interest ed —and I was, too —and says:

“Th ree hundred dollars is a power of money. I wish my mother could get
it. Is your husband going over there to-night?”

“Oh, yes. He went up-town with the man I was telling you of, to get a
boat and see if they could borrow another gun. They ’ll go over after
mid night.”

“C ouldn’t they see better if they was to wait till day time?”

“Yes. And couldn’t the nigger see better, too ? After midnight he’ll
likely be asleep, and they can slip around through the woods and hunt
up his camp-fire all the better for the dark, if he’s got one.”

“I didn’t think of that.”

The woman kept looking at me pretty curi ous, and I didn’t feel a bit
comfortable. Pretty soon she says:

“What did you say your name was, hone y?”

“M — Mary William s.”

Some how it didn’t seem to me that I said it was Mary before, so I
didn’t look up — seemed to me I said it was Sar a h ; so I felt sort of
corner ed, and was afeard maybe I was looking it, too. I wished the
woman would say something more; the longer she set still the un easier I
was. But now she says:

“H one y, I thought you said it was Sar ah when you first come in?”

“Oh, y es ’m, I did. Sar ah Mary William s. Sar a h’s my first name. Some
calls me Sar a h, some calls me Mar y.”

“Oh, that’s the way of it?”

“Yes ’m .”

I was feeling better then, but I wished I was out of there, anyway. I
couldn’t look up yet.

Well, the woman fell to talking about how hard times was, and how
poor they had to li ve, and how the rats was as free as if they owned
the place, and so forth and so on, and then I got easy again. She was
right about the rats. You’d see one stick his nose out of a hole in the
corner every little while. She said she had to have things handy to
throw at them when she was alone, or they wouldn’t give her no peac e.
She showed me a bar of lead twisted up into a kno t, and said she was a
good shot with it gener ly, but she’d wr enched her arm a day or two ago,
and didn’t know whether she could throw true now. But she watched for a
chance, and directly bang ed away at a rat ; but she missed him wide, and
said, “O u ch!” it hurt her arm so. Then she told me to try for the next
one. I wanted to be getting away before the old man got back, but of
course I didn’t let on. I got the thing, and the first rat that showed
his nose I let drive, and if he’d ’a’ stayed where he was he’d ’a’ been
a tolerable sick rat. She said that was first- rate, and she reckoned I
would hive the next one. She went and got the l ump of lead and fetched
it back, and brought along a han k of yar n which she wanted me to help
her with. I held up my two hands and she put the han k over them, and
went on talking about her and her husband’s matter s. But she broke off
to say:

“Keep your eye on the rats. You better have the lead in your lap,
hand y.”

So she dropped the l ump into my lap just at that moment, and I clapped
my legs together on it and she went on tal king. But only about a
minute. Then she took off the han k and looked me straight in the face,
and very pleas ant, and says:

“C ome, now, what’s your real na me?”

“Wh - hat, mum ?”

“What’s your real na me? Is it Bi ll, or Tom, or Bob ?— or what is it?”

I reckon I shook like a le af , and I didn’t know hardly what to do. But
I says:

“P lease to don’t poke fun at a poor girl like me, mum . If I’m in the
way here, I’ ll —”

“No, you won ’t. S et down and stay where you are. I ain’t going to
hurt you, and I ain’t going to tell on you, nuther. You just tell me
your secret, and trust me. I’ll keep it; and, what’s more, I’ll help
you. So ’ll my old man if you want him to. You see, you’re a runaway
’ pr enti ce, that’s all. It ain’t anything. There ain’t no harm in it.
You ’ve been treated bad, and you made up your mind to cut . B less you,
child, I wouldn’t tell on you. Tell me all about it now, that’s a good
bo y.”

So I said it wouldn’t be no use to try to play it any longer, and I
would just make a clean breast and tell her everything, but she mustn’t
go back on her promi se. Then I told her my father and mother was dead,
and the law had bound me out to a mean old farm er in the country thirty
mile back from the river, and he treated me so bad I couldn’t stand it
no long er; he went away to be gone a couple of days, and so I took my
chance and stole some of his daughter ’s old clothes and cleared out,
and I had been three nights coming the thirty mi les. I travel ed nights,
and hid day times and slep t, and the bag of bread and meat I carried
from home la sted me all the way, and I had a- pl ent y. I said I believed
my uncle Abner Mo ore would take care of me, and so that was why I
struck out for this town of Gosh en.

“Go sh en, chil d? This ain’t Gosh en. This is St. Peter sbur g. Gosh en’s ten
mile further up the river. Who told you this was Gosh en ?”

“Why, a man I met at daybreak this morning, just as I was going to turn
into the woods for my regular sleep . He told me when the road s for ked I
must take the right hand, and five mile would fetch me to Gosh en.”

“He was drunk, I reckon. He told you just exactly wrong .”

“Well, he did act like he was drunk, but it ain’t no matter now. I got
to be moving along. I’ll fetch Gosh en before day light .”

“Hold on a minute. I’ll put you up a sn ack to e at. You might want it.”

So she put me up a sn ack, and says:

“Say, when a cow ’s laying down, which end of her gets up fir st ? An sw er
up prompt now— don’t stop to study over it. Which end gets up fir st?”

“The h ind end, mum.”

“Well, then, a horse ?”

“The for ’r ard end, mum.”

“Which side of a tree does the mo ss grow on?”

“N or th side.”

“If fifteen c ows is br ow sing on a hill side, how many of them e ats with
their heads pointed the same directi on?”

“The whole fif teen, mum.”

“Well, I reckon you have lived in the country. I thought maybe you
was trying to ho cus me again. What’s your real name, now?”

“G eor ge Peter s, mum.”

“Well, try to remember it, Geor ge. Don’t forget and tell me it’s
Elexander before you go, and then get out by saying it’s George
Elexander when I catch you. And don’t go about women in that old
ca li co. You do a girl tolerable poor, but you might fool men, may be.
B less you, child, when you set out to thread a needle don’t hold the
thread still and fetch the needle up to it; hold the needle still and
poke the thread at it; that’s the way a woman most always do es, but a
man always does t’other way. And when you throw at a rat or anything,
hitch yourself up a- tipto e and fetch your hand up over your head as
awk ward as you can, and miss your rat about six or seven foot. Th row
stiff - arm ed from the shoulder, like there was a pi v ot there for it
to turn on, like a girl ; not from the wrist and elb ow, with your arm
out to one side, like a bo y. And, mind you, when a girl tries to
catch anything in her lap she throws her knees a par t; she don’t cla p
them together, the way you did when you catched the l ump of lea d.
Why, I spotted you for a boy when you was th reading the need le; and I
con tri ved the other things just to make certain . Now tr ot along to your
uncle, Sar ah Mary William s George Elexander Peter s, and if you get into
trouble you send word to Mrs. Ju di th L of t us, which is me, and I’ll do
what I can to get you out of it. Keep the river road all the way, and
next time you tra mp take shoes and so cks with you. The river road ’s a
rock y one, and your feet ’ll be in a condition when you get to Gosh en,
I reck on.”

I went up the bank about fifty yards, and then I d ou bled on my tracks
and slipped back to where my canoe was, a good piece below the house.
I jumped in, and was off in a hur ry. I went up- stream far enough to
make the head of the island, and then started acro ss. I took off the
sun-bon net, for I didn’t want no blin ders on then. When I was about the
middle I heard the clock begin to stri ke, so I stop s and listen s; the
sound come faint over the water but clear — ele ven. When I struck the
head of the island I never waited to blow, though I was most w inde d,
but I shoved right into the timber where my old camp used to be, and
started a good fire there on a high and dry spo t.

Then I jumped in the canoe and dug out for our place, a mile and a half
below, as hard as I could go. I lan ded, and slo pped through the timber
and up the ridge and into the caver n. There Jim la id, sound asleep on
the ground. I roused him out and says:

“G it up and hum p yourself, Jim ! There ain’t a minute to lo se. They’re
after us !”

Jim never asked no questions, he never said a wor d; but the way he
worked for the next half an hour showed about how he was scared. By
that time everything we had in the world was on our raft, and she was
ready to be shoved out from the willow co ve where she was hi d. We put
out the camp-fire at the cavern the first thing, and didn’t show a
candle outside after that.

I took the canoe out from the shore a little piece, and took a loo k;
but if there was a boat around I couldn’t see it, for stars and shad ows
ain’t good to see by. Then we got out the raft and slipped along down
in the sha de, past the foot of the island dead still — never saying a
word.




CHAPTER X II


It must ’a’ been close on to one o’clock when we got below the island
at last, and the raft did seem to go mighty slow. If a boat was to come
along we was going to take to the canoe and break for the Illinois
shor e; and it was well a boat didn’t come, for we hadn’t ever thought
to put the gun in the canoe, or a fish ing- line, or anything to e at. We
was in ruther too much of a sweat to think of so many things. It warn’t
good judgment to put everything on the raft.

If the men went to the island I just expect they found the camp-fire I
buil t, and watched it all night for Jim to come. Any ways, they stayed
away from us, and if my building the fire never fooled them it warn’t
no fault of mine. I played it as low down on them as I could.

When the first streak of day began to show we tied up to a towhead in a
big bend on the Illinois side, and hacked off cottonwood branches with
the hat ch et, and covered up the raft with them so she looked like there
had been a ca ve- in in the bank there. A towhead is a sand -b ar that has
cotton woods on it as thick as har row - tee th.

We had m oun tains on the Missouri shore and heavy timber on the Illinois
side, and the channel was down the Missouri shore at that place, so
we warn’t afraid of anybody running across us. We laid there all day,
and watched the rafts and steamboats sp in down the Missouri shore, and
up -b ound steamboats fight the big river in the midd le. I told Jim all
about the time I had jab ber ing with that woman ; and Jim said she was
a smart one, and if she was to start after us herself she wouldn’t
set down and watch a camp- fire — no, sir, she’d fetch a dog . Well, then,
I said, why couldn’t she tell her husband to fetch a dog ? Jim said he
bet she did think of it by the time the men was ready to start, and
he believed they must ’a’ gone up-town to get a dog and so they lost
all that time, or else we wouldn’t be here on a towhead sixteen or
seventeen mile below the villag e— no, indeed y, we would be in that same
old town again. So I said I didn’t care what was the reason they didn’t
get us as long as they didn’t.

When it was beginning to come on dark we poked our heads out of the
cottonwood thick et, and looked up and down and acro ss; nothing in
si ght; so Jim took up some of the top plan ks of the raft and built a
snu g wigwam to get under in blazing weather and ra in y, and to keep the
things dr y. Jim made a floor for the wigwam, and raised it a foot or
more above the level of the raft, so now the blankets and all the traps
was out of reach of steamboat wa ves. R ight in the middle of the wigwam
we made a la yer of dirt about five or six inches deep with a fra me
around it for to hold it to its place; this was to build a fire on in
slo pp y weather or chill y; the wigwam would keep it from being seen. We
made an ex tr a ste er ing- oar, too, because one of the others might get
broke on a snag or something. We fixed up a short for ked stick to hang
the old lantern on, because we must always light the lantern whenever
we see a steamboat coming down-stream, to keep from getting run over;
but we wouldn’t have to light it for up- stream boats unless we see we
was in what they call a “ cros sing ”; for the river was pretty high yet,
very low banks being still a little under water; so up -b ound boats
didn’t always run the chan ne l, but hunted easy water.

This second night we run between seven and eight hours, with a current
that was making over four mile an hour. We catched fish and tal ked,
and we took a swim now and then to keep off sleep in ess. It was kind of
solemn, drifting down the big, still river, laying on our backs looking
up at the star s, and we didn’t ever feel like talking lou d, and it
warn’t often that we laugh ed— only a little kind of a low chuck le. We
had mighty good weather as a general thing, and nothing ever happened
to us at all —that night, nor the next, nor the nex t.

Every night we passed town s, some of them away up on black hill sides,
nothing but just a shiny bed of light s; not a house could you see.
The fif th night we passed St. Lou is, and it was like the whole world
lit up. In St. Peter sbur g they used to say there was twenty or thirty
thousand people in St. Lou is, but I never believed it till I see that
wonderful spread of lights at two o’clock that still night. There
warn’t a sound there; everybody was asleep.

Every night now I used to slip ashore toward ten o’clock at some little
village, and buy ten or fifteen cent s’ worth of meal or bac on or other
stuff to eat ; and sometimes I li fted a chick en that warn’t roo sting
comfortable, and took him along. Pap always said, take a chick en when
you get a chance, because if you don’t want him yourself you can easy
find somebody that do es, and a good deed ain’t ever forgo t. I never see
pap when he didn’t want the chick en himself, but that is what he used
to say, anyway.

Mor nings before daylight I slipped into corn- fields and borrowed a
watermel on, or a mus h mel on, or a pun k in, or some new cor n, or things of
that kind. Pap always said it warn’t no harm to borrow things if you
was meaning to pay them back some time; but the widow said it warn’t
anything but a soft name for steal ing, and no de cent body would do it.
Jim said he reckoned the widow was par tly right and pap was par tly
right; so the best way would be for us to pick out two or three things
from the list and say we wouldn’t borrow them any more— then he reckoned
it wouldn’t be no harm to borrow the others. So we talked it over all
one night, drifting along down the river, trying to make up our minds
whether to drop the watermel ons, or the can te lo p es, or the mus h mel ons,
or what. But toward daylight we got it all settled satisfactor y, and
concl uded to drop cr ab app les and p ’ si m mon s. We warn’t feeling just
right before that, but it was all comfortable now. I was glad the way
it come out, too, because cr ab app les ain’t ever good, and the p ’ si mm ons
wouldn’t be ri pe for two or three months yet.

We shot a water- fow l now and then that got up too early in the morning
or didn’t go to bed early enough in the evening. Take it all round, we
lived pretty high .

The fif th night below St. Louis we had a big storm after midnight, with
a power of thunder and light ning, and the rain poured down in a solid
she et. We stayed in the wigwam and let the raft take care of itself.
When the lightning gl ared out we could see a big straight river ahead,
and high, rock y blu ffs on both sid es. By and by says I, “H el - lo ,
Jim, looky yonder !” It was a steamboat that had killed herself on a
rock. We was drifting straight down for her. The lightning showed her
very distin ct. She was leaning over, with part of her upper deck above
water, and you could see every little chim bl y- gu y clean and cle ar, and
a chair by the big bell, with an old slouch hat hanging on the back of
it, when the fl ashes come.

Well, it being away in the night and storm y, and all so
myster ious - like, I felt just the way any other boy would ’a’ felt when
I seen that wreck laying there so mournful and lonesome in the middle
of the river. I wanted to get aboard of her and sl ink around a little,
and see what there was there. So I says:

“L e’s land on her, Jim.”

But Jim was dead against it at first. He says:

“I doan’ want to go fool ’n’ ’long er no wr ac k. W e’s do in’ blame’ well,
en we better let blame’ well alone, as de good book says. Li ke as not
dey’s a watchman on dat wr ack .”

“W at chman your grand mother ,” I says; “ there ain’t nothing to watch but
the texas and the pi lo t- house; and do you reckon any body’s going to
resk his life for a texas and a pi lo t- house such a night as this, when
it’s likely to break up and wash off down the river any minute ?” Jim
couldn’t say nothing to that, so he didn’t try. “And besid es,” I says,
“we might borrow something worth having out of the cap tain ’s statero om.
S ee g ars, I bet you —and cost five cents a piece, solid cas h . Ste am boat
cap tains is always ri ch, and get six ty dollars a mon th, and they
don’t care a cent what a thing co st s, you know, long as they want it.
S tick a candle in your pocket ; I can’t rest, Jim, till we give her a
rum mag ing. Do you reckon Tom Sawyer would ever go by this thing ? Not
for pie, he wouldn’t. He’d call it an adventure —that’s what he’d call
it; and he’d land on that wreck if it was his last ac t. And wouldn’t
he throw style into it ?— wouldn’t he spread himself, nor nothing ? Why,
you’d think it was Chri stop her C ’l um b us discovering K ing dom Com e. I
wish Tom Sawyer was here.”

Jim he grum bled a little, but give in. He said we mustn’t talk any more
than we could help, and then talk mighty l ow. The lightning showed us
the wreck again just in time, and we fetched the stab board der ri ck, and
made fast there.

The deck was high out here. We went snea king down the slo pe of it to
lab board, in the dark, towards the tex as, feeling our way slow with our
feet, and spreading our hands out to f end off the gu ys, for it was so
dark we couldn’t see no sign of them. Pretty soon we struck the forward
end of the sky light, and clumb on to it; and the next step fetched us
in front of the cap tain ’s door, which was open, and by Jim min y, away
down through the tex as - hall we see a light ! and all in the same second
we seem to hear low voic es in yonder !

Jim whispered and said he was feeling powerful sick, and told me to
come along. I says, all right, and was going to start for the raft; but
just then I heard a voice wa il out and say:

“Oh, please don’t, boy s; I swear I won’t ever tell !”

Another voice said, pretty lou d:

“It’s a li e, Jim Turner. You ’ve acted this way before. You always want
more’n your share of the truck , and you’ve always got it, too, because
you’ve swore ’t if you didn’t you’d tell. But this time you’ve said it
jest one time too man y. You’re the mean est, t rea cher ou sest h ound in
this countr y.”

By this time Jim was gone for the raft. I was just a- b iling with
curiosit y; and I says to myself, Tom Sawyer wouldn’t back out now,
and so I won’t ei ther ; I’m a-going to see what’s going on here. So I
dropped on my hands and knees in the little passage, and crept af t
in the dark till there warn’t but one statero om betwixt me and the
cross- hall of the tex as . Then in there I see a man stretched on the
floor and tied hand and foot, and two men standing over him, and one
of them had a dim lantern in his hand, and the other one had a pistol .
This one kept pointing the pistol at the man’s head on the floor, and
say ing:

“ I’d like to ! And I or ter, too —a mean sk un k !”

The man on the floor would shri vel up and say, “Oh, please don’t, Bill ;
I hain’t ever goin’ to tell.”

And every time he said that the man with the lantern would laugh and
say:

“’ De ed you ain ’t! You never said no tru er thing ’n that, you bet
you.” And once he said: “H ear him beg ! and y it if we hadn’t got the
best of him and tied him he’d ’a’ killed us both . And what for? J ist
for noth ’n ’. J ist because we stood on our right s— that’s what for. But
I lay you ain’t a-goin’ to threat en nobody any more, Jim Turner. Put
up that pistol , Bill .”

Bill says:

“I don’t want to, J ake Pack ard. I’m for kill in’ him —and didn’t he kill
old Hat field jist the same way —and don’t he deser ve it?”

“But I don’t want him killed, and I’ve got my reasons for it.”

“B less yo’ heart for them words, J ake Pack ard ! I’ll never forgit you
long ’s I live !” says the man on the floor, sort of blubber ing.

Pack ard didn’t take no notice of that, but hung up his lantern on a
na il and started toward where I was, there in the dark, and motioned
Bill to come. I craw fished as fast as I could about two yards, but the
boat slan ted so that I couldn’t make very good time; so to keep from
getting run over and catched I crawled into a statero om on the upper
side. The man came a- pa wing along in the dark, and when Pack ard got to
my statero om, he says:

“H er e— come in here.”

And in he come, and Bill after him. But before they got in I was up in
the upper ber th, corner ed, and sorry I come. Then they stood there,
with their hands on the le dge of the ber th, and tal ked. I couldn’t see
them, but I could tell where they was by the whisky they’d been ha v ing.
I was glad I didn’t dr ink whisk y; but it wouldn’t made much difference
anyway, because most of the time they couldn’t ’a’ tre ed me because
I didn’t brea the . I was too scared. And, besides, a body couldn’t
breathe and hear such talk. They talked low and earne st. Bill wanted to
kill Turner. He says:

“He’s said he’ll tell, and he will. If we was to give both our shar es
to him now it wouldn’t make no difference after the row and the way
we’ve served him. Shor e’s you’re born, he’ll turn stat e’s evid ence; now
you hear me. I’m for putting him out of his trouble s.”

“S o’ m I ,” says Pack ard, very qui et.

“Blame it, I’d sor ter begun to think you was n ’t. Well, then, that’s all
right. Le’s go and do it.”

“Hold on a minute; I hain’t had my say y it. You listen to me.
S hoo ting ’s good, but there’s qui e ter ways if the things got to be
done. But what I say is this: it ain’t good sense to go cour t ’n’
around after a hal ter if you can git at what you’re up to in some way
that’s jist as good and at the same time don’t bring you into no re sk s.
Ain’t that so?”

“You bet it is. But how you goin’ to manage it this time?”

“Well, my idea is this: we’ll rust le around and gather up whatever
pick in ’s we’ve over looked in the statero om s, and shove for shore and
hide the truck . Then we’ll wait. Now I say it ain’t a-goin’ to be
more’n two hours be fo’ this wr ack breaks up and wa shes off down the
river. S ee ? He ’ll be drownded, and won’t have nobody to blame for
it but his own self. I reckon that’s a considerable sight better ’n
kill in’ of him. I’m un fav or able to kill in’ a man as long as you can git
aroun’ it; it ain’t good sen se, it ain’t good mor als. Ain’t I right ?”

“Yes, I reck’n you are. But s’pose she don’t break up and wash off?”

“Well, we can wait the two hours anyway and see, can’t we ?”

“All right, then; come along.”

So they star ted, and I lit out, all in a cold swe at, and scra m bled
for ward. It was dark as pitch there; but I said, in a kind of a coarse
whisper, “ Jim!” and he answered up, right at my elb ow, with a sort of a
mo an, and I says:

“Qui ck, Jim, it ain’t no time for fooling around and moan ing; there’s a
gang of murder ers in yonder, and if we don’t hunt up their boat and set
her drifting down the river so these fellows can’t get away from the
wreck there’s one of ’em going to be in a bad fix . But if we find their
boat we can put all of ’em in a bad fix —for the sh eri ff ’ll get ’em.
Qu i ck — hurry ! I’ll hunt the lab board side, you hunt the stab bo ard. You
start at the raft, and—”

“Oh, my lor dy, lor d y! R af ’? Dey ain’ no raf’ no mo ’; she done broke
loose en gone !— en here we is !”




CHAPTER X III


Well, I catched my breath and most fain ted. Sh ut up on a wreck with
such a gang as that ! But it warn’t no time to be sen tim enter ing. We ’d
got to find that boat now— had to have it for ourselves. So we went
a- qu a king and shaking down the stab board side, and slow work it was,
too— seemed a week before we got to the ster n. No sign of a boat. Jim
said he didn’t believe he could go any far ther —so scared he hadn’t
hardly any strength left, he said. But I said, come on, if we get left
on this wreck we are in a fix , sure. So on we pr ow led again. We struck
for the stern of the tex as, and found it, and then scrab bled along
forwar ds on the sky light, hanging on from shut ter to shut ter, for the
edge of the sky light was in the water. When we got pretty close to the
cross- hall door there was the skiff, sure enough ! I could just bar ely
see her. I felt ever so thank ful. In another second I would ’a’ been
aboard of her, but just then the door open ed. One of the men stuck his
head out only about a couple of foot from me, and I thought I was gone;
but he jerked it in again, and says:

“H ea ve that blame lantern out o’ sight, Bill !”

He flung a bag of something into the boat, and then got in himself and
set down. It was Pack ard. Then Bill he come out and got in. Pack ard
says, in a low voi ce :

“All read y— shove off !”

I couldn’t hardly hang on to the shut ters, I was so wea k. But Bill says:

“Hold on — ’d you go through him?”

“No. Di dn’t you?”

“No. So he’s got his share o’ the cas h yet.”

“Well, then, come along; no use to take truck and leave money.”

“Say, won’t he suspicion what we’re up to?”

“Maybe he won ’t. But we got to have it anyway. Come along.”

So they got out and went in.

The door slammed to because it was on the care ened side ; and in a half
second I was in the boat, and Jim come tum bling after me. I out with my
knife and cut the rope, and away we w ent!

We didn’t touch an oar, and we didn’t speak nor whisper, nor hardly
even brea the . We went gliding swift along, dead silent, past the ti p of
the padd le- bo x, and past the ster n; then in a second or two more we was
a hundred yards below the wreck, and the darkness soa ked her up, every
last sign of her, and we was safe, and knowed it.

When we was three or four hundred yards down- stream we see the lantern
show like a little spark at the texas door for a second, and we knowed
by that that the rascal s had missed their boat, and was beginning to
understand that they was in just as much trouble now as Jim Turner was.

Then Jim man ned the o ars, and we took out after our raft. Now was
the first time that I begun to worry about the men —I reckon I hadn’t
had time to before. I begun to think how dreadful it was, even for
murder ers, to be in such a fix . I says to myself, there ain’t no
telling but I might come to be a murder er myself yet, and then how
would I like it? So says I to Jim :

“The first light we see we’ll land a hundred yards below it or above
it, in a place where it’s a good hi ding- place for you and the skiff,
and then I’ll go and fix up some kind of a yar n, and get somebody to
go for that gang and get them out of their sc rap e, so they can be hung
when their time com es.”

But that idea was a fa il ure ; for pretty soon it begun to storm again,
and this time worse than ever. The rain poured down, and never a light
show ed; everybody in bed, I reckon. We boom ed along down the river,
watching for lights and watching for our raft. After a long time the
rain let up, but the clouds sta yed, and the lightning kept whim per ing,
and by and by a flash showed us a black thing ahead, flo at ing, and we
made for it.

It was the raft, and mighty glad was we to get aboard of it again. We
seen a light now away down to the right, on shore. So I said I would
go for it. The skiff was half full of pl under which that gang had
stole there on the wreck . We hust led it on to the raft in a pile, and
I told Jim to float along down, and show a light when he judged he had
gone about two mile, and keep it burning till I come; then I man ned my
oars and shoved for the light. As I got down towards it three or four
more show ed— up on a hill side. It was a village. I closed in above the
shore light, and laid on my oars and flo ated. As I went by I see it
was a lantern hanging on the jack st af f of a double- hu ll ferry boat. I
sk im med around for the watch man, a- wondering where ab ou ts he slep t; and
by and by I found him roo sting on the b itt s forward, with his head down
between his knees. I gave his shoulder two or three little shov es, and
begun to cr y.

He stirred up in a kind of a start li sh way; but when he see it was only
me he took a good gap and stret ch, and then he says:

“Hello, what’s up? Don’t cry, bu b . What’s the trouble ?”

I says:

“P ap , and ma m, and si s, and—”

Then I broke down. He says:

“Oh, d ang it now, don’t take on so; we all has to have our troub les,
and this ’n ’ll come out all right. What’s the matter with ’em ?”

“ They ’ re — they ’ re — are you the watchman of the boat ?”

“Yes,” he says, kind of prett y- well- satisfied like. “I’m the captain
and the owner and the mate and the pi lot and watchman and head
de ck- hand ; and sometimes I’m the fre ight and pas sen g ers. I ain’t as
rich as old Jim Horn back, and I can’t be so blame’ generous and good to
Tom, Di ck, and Har ry as what he is, and slam around money the way he
does; but I’ve told him a many a time ’t I wouldn’t trade places with
him; for, says I, a sail or ’s life ’s the life for me, and I’m der ned if
I’d live two mile out o’ town, where there ain’t nothing ever goin’
on, not for all his spon du li cks and as much more on top of it. Says I —”

I broke in and says:

“ They’re in an awful pe ck of trouble, and—”

“Who is?”

“Why, pap and ma m and s is and Miss Hoo ker ; and if you’d take your
ferryboat and go up there —”

“ U p wher e? Where are they?”

“On the wreck .”

“What wreck ?”

“Why, there ain’t but one.”

“What, you don’t mean the W alter Sco tt ?”

“Yes.”

“Good land! what are they do in’ there, for gracious sak es?”

“Well, they didn’t go there a- purpo se.”

“I bet they didn ’t! Why, great goodness, there ain’t no chance for ’em
if they don’t git off mighty quick ! Why, how in the nation did they
ever git into such a scra pe ?”

“E as y enough. Miss Hooker was a- visit ing up there to the town —”

“Yes, Boo th ’s L and ing— go on.”

“She was a- visit ing there at Boo th ’s L and ing, and just in the edge of
the evening she started over with her nigger woman in the horse - fer ry
to stay all night at her friend’s house, Miss W hat- you - ma y- ca ll- her —I
dis remember her na me —and they lost their ste er ing- oar, and swung
around and went a- floating down, stern first, about two mile, and
saddle- bagg sed on the wreck, and the ferry man and the nigger woman and
the horses was all lo st, but Miss Hooker she made a grab and got aboard
the wreck . Well, about an hour after dark we come along down in our
tra ding- sc ow, and it was so dark we didn’t notice the wreck till we was
right on it; and so we saddle- bagg se d; but all of us was saved but
Bill Whi pp le —and oh, he was the best cre tur ! —I most wish ’t it had
been me, I do.”

“My George ! It’s the beat en est thing I ever struck. And then what did
you all do?”

“Well, we hollered and took on, but it’s so wide there we couldn’t
make nobody hear . So pap said somebody got to get ashore and get help
somehow. I was the only one that could swi m, so I made a d ash for it,
and Miss Hooker she said if I didn’t strike help soon er, come here and
hunt up her uncle, and he’d fix the thing. I made the land about a mile
below, and been fooling along ever since, trying to get people to do
something, but they said, ’ W hat, in such a night and such a curr ent ?
There ain’t no sense in it; go for the steam - ferry .’ Now if you’ll go
and—”

“By Jackson, I’d like to, and, blame it, I don’t know but I will ; but
who in the ding n ation ’s a-going to pay for it? Do you reckon your
pap —”

“Why that’s all right. Miss Hooker she tole me, particul ar, that
her uncle Horn back —”

“Gre at gun s! is he her uncle ? Looky here, you break for that light
over yon der- way, and turn out west when you git there, and about a
quarter of a mile out you’ll come to the ta ver n; tell ’em to dar t you
out to Jim Horn back ’s, and he’ll foot the bi ll. And don’t you fool
around any, because he’ll want to know the new s. Tell him I’ll have
his niece all safe before he can get to town. H ump yourself, now; I’m
a-going up around the corner here to roust out my engine er.”

I struck for the light, but as soon as he turned the corner I went back
and got into my skiff and ba iled her out, and then pulled up shore in
the easy water about six hundred yards, and tucked myself in among some
wood- boat s; for I couldn’t rest easy till I could see the ferryboat
start. But take it all around, I was feeling ruther comfortable on
accounts of taking all this trouble for that gang, for not many would
’a’ done it. I wished the widow knowed about it. I judged she would
be proud of me for hel ping these rapscallions, because rapscallions
and dead - beats is the kind the widow and good people takes the most
interest in.

Well, before long here comes the wreck, dim and d us ky, sliding along
down ! A kind of cold shi ver went through me, and then I struck out for
her. She was very deep , and I see in a minute there warn’t much chance
for anybody being alive in her. I pulled all around her and hollered a
little, but there wasn’t any answer ; all dead still. I felt a little
bit heav y- hearted about the gang, but not much, for I reckoned if they
could stand it I could.

Then here comes the ferry boat ; so I shoved for the middle of the river
on a long down- stream slan t; and when I judged I was out of eye - reach
I laid on my o ars, and looked back and see her go and smell around the
wreck for Miss Hoo ker’s remain der s, because the captain would know her
uncle Horn back would want them; and then pretty soon the ferryboat
give it up and went for the shore, and I laid into my work and went
a- booming down the river.

It did seem a powerful long time before Jim’s light showed up; and when
it did show it looked like it was a thousand mile off. By the time I
got there the sky was beginning to get a little gray in the ea st; so we
struck for an island, and hid the raft, and sunk the skiff, and turned
in and slept like dead people.




CHAPTER X IV


By and by, when we got up, we turned over the truck the gang had stole
off of the wreck, and found boots, and blanke ts, and clothes, and all
sorts of other things, and a lot of books, and a sp y- glas s, and three
boxes of see g ars. We hadn’t ever been this rich before in neither of
our li ves. The see g ars was pri me. We laid off all the afternoon in the
woods talking, and me reading the books, and having a general good
time. I told Jim all about what happened inside the wreck and at the
ferry boat, and I said these kinds of things was adventure s; but he
said he didn’t want no more adventure s. He said that when I went in
the texas and he crawled back to get on the raft and found her gone he
nearly died, because he judged it was all up with him anyway it could
be fix ed; for if he didn’t get saved he would get drownde d; and if he
did get sa ved, whoever saved him would send him back home so as to get
the reward, and then Miss Watson would sell him Sou th, sure. Well, he
was right; he was most always right; he had an uncommon level head for
a nigger.

I read considerable to Jim about kings and du kes and ear ls and su ch,
and how ga udy they dressed, and how much style they put on, and called
each other and so on, ’stead of mi ster ; and Jim’s eyes bu gged out, and
he was interest ed. He says:

“I didn’ know dey was so many un um. I hain’t hear n ’bout none un um,
ska sel y, but ole King Sollermun , on less you coun ts dem kings dat’s in a
pack er k’ yard s. How much do a king g it?”

“G et ?” I says; “ why, they get a thousand dollars a month if they want
it; they can have just as much as they wan t; everything belongs to
them.”

“A in’ dat ga y? En what dey got to do, Huck?”

“They don’t do nothing ! Why, how you talk ! They just set around.”

“No; is dat so?”

“Of course it is. They just set around — exce p t, maybe, when there’s a
war ; then they go to the war . But other times they just lazy around; or
go haw king —just haw king and sp — Sh !— d ’you hear a noi se?”

We skipped out and loo ke d; but it warn’t nothing but the fl utter of a
steambo at’s wheel away down, coming around the poin t; so we come back.

“Yes,” says I, “and other times, when things is dull, they fuss with
the par ly ment ; and if everybody don’t go just so he wha cks their heads
off. But mostly they hang round the harem .”

“R oun’ de whi ch?”

“H ar em .”

“What’s de harem ?”

“The place where he keeps his wi ves. Don’t you know about the harem ?
Solomon had one; he had about a million wi ves.”

“Why, yes, dat’s so; I— I’d done forgot it. A harem ’s a bo ’d ’n - house, I
reck ’n . Mo s’ likely dey has rac ke ty times in de n us ser y. En I reck’n
de wi ves quarre ls consid ab le; en dat ’ cre ase de rac ket. Y it dey say
Soller mun de wi se s’ man dat ever live ’. I doan’ take no stock in
dat . Be kase wh y : would a wise man want to live in de mid s’ er sich a
b lim - bla m min ’ all de time? No — ’ deed he wouldn’t. A wise man ’ ud take en
buil ’ a bil er- fac tr y; en den he could she t down de bil er- fac try when
he want to re s’ .”

“Well, but he was the wi sest man, anyway; because the widow she told
me so, her own self.”

“I doan’ k’yer what de widder say, he warn’t no wise man nuther. He
had some er de da d- fet ch ed es’ ways I ever see. Does you know ’bout dat
chile dat he ’uz gwyne to chop in two ?”

“Yes, the widow told me all about it.”

“Well, den ! War n ’ dat de beat en es’ notion in de worl ’? You j es’ take
en look at it a minute. Da h’s de stum p, da h — dat’s one er de wom en;
hea h’s you — dat’s de yuther one; I’s Sollermun ; en dish yer dollar
bill ’s de chi le. B of e un you claim s it. What does I do? Does I shin
aroun’ m ong s’ de neighbor s en fine out which un you de bill do b’ long
to, en han ’ it over to de right one, all safe en soun ’, de way dat
anybody dat had any gum ption woul d? No; I take en wha ck de bill in
two, en give half un it to you, en de yuther half to de yuther woman.
D at’s de way Soller mun was gwyne to do wid de chi le. Now I want to ast
you : what’s de use er dat half a bill ?— can’t buy noth ’n wid it. En what
use is a half a chi le ? I wouldn’ give a der n for a million un um .”

“But hang it, Jim, you’ve clean missed the point — blame it, you’ve
missed it a thousand mi le.”

“Who ? M e? Go ’ long. Doan’ talk to me ’bout yo’ pin ts. I reck’n I
knows sense when I sees it; en dey ain’ no sense in sich do in ’s as dat .
De ’ sp ute warn’t ’bout a half a chile, de ’ sp ute was ’bout a whole
chi le; en de man dat think he kin settle a ’ sp ute ’bout a whole chile
wid a half a chile doan’ know enough to come in out’n de ra in. Doan’
talk to me ’bout Sollermun , Huck, I knows him by de back.”

“But I tell you you don’t get the point.”

“Blame de point ! I reck’n I knows what I know s. En mine you, de real
p int fur der —it’s down dee per. It lays in de way Soller mun was rai sed.
You take a man dat’s got on’y one or two chill en; is dat man gwyne to
be wa se ful o’ chill en ? No, he ain ’t; he can’t ’ ford it. He know how
to value ’em. But you take a man dat’s got ’bout five million chill en
run nin’ roun’ de house, en it’s di ff un t. He as soon chop a chile in
two as a cat. Dey’s plenty mo ’. A chile er two, mo’ er less, warn’t no
con se ken s to Sollermun , dad fetch him!”

I never see such a nigger. If he got a notion in his head once, there
warn’t no getting it out again. He was the most down on Solomon of any
nigger I ever see. So I went to talking about other kings, and let
Solomon sli de. I told about Louis Si x te en th that got his head cut off
in France long time ago ; and about his little boy the d ol ph in, that
would ’a’ been a king, but they took and shut him up in ja il, and some
say he died there.

“P o’ little cha p .”

“But some says he got out and got away, and come to Ameri ca .”

“D at’s goo d! But he’ll be pooty lonesom e— dey ain’ no kings here, is
de y, Huck?”

“No.”

“D en he ca in’t git no situation. What he gwyne to do?”

“Well, I don’t know. Some of them gets on the police, and some of them
lear ns people how to talk Fren ch.”

“Why, Huck, doan’ de French people talk de same way we do es?”

“No, Jim; you couldn’t understand a word they said —not a single word.”

“Well, now, I be ding- bust ed! How do dat come?”

“I don’t know; but it’s so. I got some of their jab ber out of a boo k.
S’pose a man was to come to you and say Poll y- v oo - fran z y— what would you
think ?”

“I wouldn’ think nuff n; I’d take en bust him over de head — dat is, if he
warn’t whi te. I wouldn’t ’ low no nigger to call me dat .”

“Shucks, it ain’t calling you anything. It’s only saying, do you know
how to talk Fren ch?”

“Well, den, why couldn’t he say it?”

“Why, he is a- saying it. That’s a Fren ch man’s way of saying it.”

“Well, it’s a blame ridi ck l ous way, en I doan’ want to hear no mo’
’bout it. Dey ain’ no sense in it.”

“Looky here, Jim; does a cat talk like we do?”

“No, a cat don ’t.”

“Well, does a cow ?”

“No, a cow don’t, nuther.”

“Do es a cat talk like a c ow, or a cow talk like a cat ?”

“No, dey don ’t.”

“It’s natural and right for ’em to talk different from each other,
ain’t it?”

“C our se.”

“And ain’t it natural and right for a cat and a cow to talk different
from us ?”

“Why, mos’ sho ly it is.”

“Well, then, why ain’t it natural and right for a Fren chman to talk
different from us ? You answer me that.”

“Is a cat a man, Huck?”

“No.”

“Well, den, dey ain’t no sense in a cat talk in’ like a man. Is a cow a
man ?— er is a cow a cat ?”

“No, she ain’t either of them.”

“Well, den, she ain’t got no business to talk like either one er the
yuther of ’em. Is a Fren chman a man ?”

“Yes.”

“Well, den ! D ad blame it, why doan’ he talk like a man? You answer
me dat !”

I see it warn’t no use wa sting word s— you can’t learn a nigger to ar gu e.
So I qu it.




CHAPTER X V


We judged that three nights more would fetch us to Cairo , at the bottom
of Illino is, where the Ohi o R i ver comes in, and that was what we was
after. We would sell the raft and get on a steamboat and go way up the
Ohi o amongst the free stat es, and then be out of trouble.

Well, the second night a fog begun to come on, and we made for a
towhead to tie to, for it wouldn’t do to try to run in a fog ; but
when I paddled ahead in the canoe, with the line to make fast, there
warn’t anything but little sa pl ings to tie to. I passed the line around
one of them right on the edge of the cut bank, but there was a sti ff
curr ent, and the raft come booming down so li vely she tore it out by
the roo ts and away she went. I see the fog closing down, and it made me
so sick and scared I couldn’t budge for most a half a minute it seemed
to me —and then there warn’t no raft in si ght; you couldn’t see twenty
yard s. I jumped into the canoe and run back to the ster n, and grabbed
the paddle and set her back a stro ke. But she didn’t come. I was in
such a hurry I hadn’t unti ed her. I got up and tried to unti e her, but
I was so excited my hands shook so I couldn’t hardly do anything with
them.

As soon as I got started I took out after the raft, hot and heavy,
right down the tow head. That was all right as far as it went, but the
towhead warn’t six ty yards long, and the minute I flew by the foot of
it I shot out into the solid white fog, and hadn’t no more idea which
way I was going than a dead man.

Thinks I, it won’t do to padd le; first I know I’ll run into the bank
or a towhead or some thing; I got to set still and flo at, and yet it’s
mighty fidge ty business to have to hold your hands still at such a
time. I whoo ped and listened. A way down there somewheres I hears
a small whoop, and up comes my spirit s. I went tearing after it,
listening sharp to hear it again. The next time it come I see I warn’t
heading for it, but heading away to the right of it. And the next time
I was heading away to the left of it—and not gain ing on it much either,
for I was flying around, this way and that and t’ other, but it was
going straight ahead all the time.

I did wish the fool would think to beat a tin pan, and beat it all
the time, but he never did, and it was the still places between the
whoops that was making the trouble for me. Well, I f ought along, and
directly I hears the whoop behind me. I was tangled good now. That
was somebody el se ’s whoop, or else I was turned around.

I throwed the paddle down. I heard the whoop again; it was behind me
yet, but in a different place; it kept coming, and kept changing its
place, and I kept answer ing, till by and by it was in front of me
again, and I knowed the current had swung the cano e’s head down-stream,
and I was all right if that was Jim and not some other raft s man
holl er ing. I couldn’t tell nothing about voic es in a fog, for nothing
don’t look natural nor sound natural in a fo g.

The whooping went on, and in about a minute I come a- booming down on a
cut bank with smo ky gho sts of big trees on it, and the current throwed
me off to the left and shot by, amongst a lot of snag s that fairly
ro ar ed, the current was tearing by them so swif t.

In another second or two it was solid white and still again. I set
perfectly still then, listening to my heart thum p, and I reckon I
didn’t draw a breath while it thum ped a hundre d.

I just give up then. I knowed what the matter was. That cut bank was an
island, and Jim had gone down t’other side of it. It warn’t no towhead
that you could float by in ten minutes. It had the big timber of a
regular island ; it might be five or six miles long and more than half a
mile wid e.

I kept quiet, with my ears cock ed, about fifteen minutes, I reckon.
I was floating along, of course, four or five miles an hour ; but you
don’t ever think of that. No, you feel like you are laying dead still
on the water; and if a little glimpse of a snag sli ps by you don’t
think to yourself how fast you’re going, but you catch your breath
and think, my ! how that snag ’s tearing along. If you think it ain’t
di sm al and lonesome out in a fog that way by yourself in the night, you
try it on ce— you’ll see.

Nex t, for about a half an hour, I whoops now and then; at last I hears
the answer a long ways off, and tries to follow it, but I couldn’t
do it, and directly I judged I’d got into a nest of tow heads, for I
had little dim glimp ses of them on both sides of me— sometimes just a
narrow channel bet we en, and some that I couldn’t see I knowed was there
because I’d hear the wash of the current against the old dead brush and
tr ash that hung over the ban ks. Well, I warn’t long loo sing the whoops
down amongst the towhead s; and I only tried to chase them a little
while, anyway, because it was worse than chasing a Jack - o’ - lantern. You
never knowed a sound do dge around so, and swa p places so quick and so
much.

I had to cla w away from the bank pretty li vely four or five times, to
keep from kno cking the islands out of the river; and so I judged the
raft must be but ting into the bank every now and then, or else it would
get further ahead and clear out of hear ing— it was floating a little
faster than what I was.

Well, I seemed to be in the open river again by and by, but I couldn’t
hear no sign of a whoop now her es. I reckoned Jim had fetched up on a
snag , maybe, and it was all up with him. I was good and tired, so I
laid down in the canoe and said I wouldn’t bother no more. I didn’t
want to go to sleep, of course; but I was so sleepy I couldn’t help it;
so I thought I would take jest one little cat - na p.

But I reckon it was more than a cat - na p, for when I waked up the stars
was shining bright, the fog was all gone, and I was spinning down a
big bend stern first. Fir st I didn’t know where I was; I thought I was
dream ing; and when things began to come back to me they seemed to come
up dim out of last week.

It was a monstrous big river here, with the tall est and the thick est
kind of timber on both bank s; just a solid wall, as well as I could see
by the star s. I looked away down-stream, and seen a black spe ck on the
water. I took after it; but when I got to it it warn’t nothing but a
couple of saw- logs made fast together. Then I see another spe ck, and
chased that; then another, and this time I was right. It was the raft.

When I got to it Jim was setting there with his head down between his
knees, asleep, with his right arm hanging over the ste er ing- o ar. The
other o ar was smashed off, and the raft was lit tered up with leaves and
branches and dir t. So she’d had a rough time.

I made fast and laid down under Jim’s nose on the raft, and began to
gap , and stretch my fists out against Jim, and says:

“Hello, Jim, have I been asleep ? Why didn’t you stir me up ?”

“Goo dn ess grac i ous, is dat you, Huck ? En you ain’ dead —you ain’
drownde d— you’s back ag’ in ? It’s too good for true, honey, it’s too good
for true. L em me look at you chile, lemme feel o’ you. No, you ain’
dead ! you’s back ag’in, ’ live en soun ’, jis de same ole Huck — de same
ole Huck, thanks to goodn ess !”

“What’s the matter with you, Jim ? You been a- drin king ?”

“D rin kin ’? Has I ben a- drin kin ’? Has I had a chance to be a- drin kin ’ ?”

“Well, then, what makes you talk so wil d?”

“How does I talk wil d?”

“How ? Why, hain’t you been talking about my coming back, and all that
stuff, as if I’d been gone away ?”

“H uck — Huck Finn, you look me in de eye ; look me in de eye. Hain’t you
ben gone away ?”

“G one away ? Why, what in the nation do you mean? I hain’t been gone
anywher es. Where would I go to?”

“Well, looky here, bo ss, dey’s sumf n wrong, dey is. Is I me, or who
is I? Is I hea h, or whah is I? Now dat’s what I wants to know.”

“Well, I think you’re here, plain enough, but I think you’re a
tang le- headed old fool, Jim.”

“I is, is I? Well, you answer me dis : Di dn’t you to te out de line in de
canoe fer to make fas ’ to de towhead ?”

“No, I didn’t. What towhead ? I hain’t seen no tow head.”

“You hain’t seen no towhead ? Looky here, didn’t de line pull loose en
de raf’ go a- hum min ’ down de river, en leave you en de canoe behine in
de fog ?”

“What fog ?”

“Why, de fog !— de fog dat’s been aroun’ all night. En didn’t you
whoop, en didn’t I whoop, tell we got mix ’ up in de islands en one un
us got lo s’ en t’other one was jis’ as good as lo s’ , ’kase he didn’
know whah he wu z ? En didn’t I bust up agin a lot er dem islands en have
a tur rible time en mos’ git drownde d? Now ain’ dat so, bo s s— ain’t it
so? You answer me dat .”

“Well, this is too many for me, Jim. I hain’t seen no fog, nor no
island s, nor no troub les, nor nothing. I been setting here talking
with you all night till you went to sleep about ten minutes ago, and I
reckon I done the same. You couldn’t ’a’ got drunk in that time, so of
course you’ve been dream ing.”

“D ad fetch it, how is I gwyne to dream all dat in ten minut es?”

“Well, hang it all, you did dream it, because there didn’t any of it
happen .”

“But, Huck, it’s all jis’ as plain to me as —”

“It don’t make no difference how plain it is ; there ain’t nothing in
it. I know, because I’ve been here all the time.”

Jim didn’t say nothing for about five minutes, but set there studying
over it. Then he says:

“Well, den, I reck’n I did dream it, Huck; but dog my cat s ef it ain’t
de power fu lest dream I ever see. En I hain’t ever had no dream b’fo’
dat’s tired me like dis one.”

“Oh, well, that’s all right, because a dream does tire a body like
everything some times. But this one was a sta ving dream ; tell me all
about it, Jim.”

So Jim went to work and told me the whole thing right through, just as
it happened, only he painted it up consider able. Then he said he must
start in and “’ ter pre t ” it, because it was sent for a warn ing. He said
the first towhead stood for a man that would try to do us some good,
but the current was another man that would get us away from him. The
whoops was warn ings that would come to us every now and then, and if
we didn’t try hard to make out to understand them they’d just take us
into bad luck, ’stead of keeping us out of it. The lot of tow heads was
troubles we was going to get into with quarrel some people and all kinds
of mean folks, but if we minded our business and didn’t talk back and
ag grav ate them, we would pull through and get out of the fog and into
the big clear river, which was the free stat es, and wouldn’t have no
more trouble.

It had clouded up pretty dark just after I got on to the raft, but it
was clearing up again now.

“Oh, well, that’s all inter pre ted well enough as far as it go es, Jim ,”
I says; “but what does these things stand for?”

It was the leaves and rub bi sh on the raft and the smashed o ar. You
could see them first- rate now.

Jim looked at the tr ash, and then looked at me, and back at the tr ash
again. He had got the dream fixed so strong in his head that he
couldn’t seem to shake it loose and get the facts back into its place
again right away. But when he did get the thing straightened around he
looked at me steady without ever smiling, and says:

“What do dey stan ’ for? I’s gwyne to tell you. When I got all wore out
wid work, en wid de call in’ for you, en went to sleep, my heart wuz
mos’ broke bekase you wuz lo s’ , en I didn’ k’yer no ’ mo’ what become er
me en de raf ’. En when I wake up en fine you back ag’in, all safe en
soun ’, de tears come, en I could ’a’ got down on my knees en kiss yo’
foot, I’s so thank ful. En all you wuz think in’ ’bout wuz how you could
make a fool uv ole Jim wid a lie. D at truck dah is tr ash ; en tr ash
is what people is dat put s dirt on de head er dey fr en’s en makes ’em
asha me d.”

Then he got up slow and walked to the wigwam, and went in there without
saying anything but that. But that was enough. It made me feel so mean
I could almost kissed his foot to get him to take it back.

It was fifteen minutes before I could work myself up to go and humble
myself to a nigger ; but I done it, and I warn’t ever sorry for it
after ward, nei ther. I didn’t do him no more mean tri cks, and I wouldn’t
done that one if I’d ’a’ knowed it would make him feel that way.




CHAPTER X VI


We slept most all day, and started out at night, a little ways behind
a monstrous long raft that was as long going by as a proc essi on. She
had four long swee ps at each end, so we judged she carried as many as
thirty men, likely. She had five big wigwa ms aboard, wide a part, and an
open camp-fire in the middle, and a tall fla g- po le at each end. There
was a power of style about her. It amoun ted to something being a
raft s man on such a c raft as that.

We went drifting down into a big ben d, and the night clouded up and
got ho t. The river was very wide, and was wa lled with solid timber on
both sid es; you couldn’t see a break in it hardly ever, or a light. We
talked about Cairo , and wondered whether we would know it when we got
to it. I said likely we wouldn ’t, because I had heard say there warn’t
but about a dozen houses there, and if they didn’t happen to have them
lit up, how was we going to know we was passing a town ? Jim said if
the two big river s joined together there, that would show. But I said
maybe we might think we was passing the foot of an island and coming
into the same old river again. That disturbed Jim —and me too. So the
question was, what to do? I said, paddle ashore the first time a light
show ed, and tell them pap was behind, coming along with a tra ding- sc ow,
and was a green hand at the business, and wanted to know how far it was
to Cairo . Jim thought it was a good idea, so we took a smoke on it and
wait ed.

There warn’t nothing to do now but to look out sharp for the town, and
not pass it without seeing it. He said he’d be mighty sure to see it,
because he’d be a free man the minute he seen it, but if he missed it
he’d be in a slave country again and no more show for freed om. Every
little while he jumps up and says:

“D ah she is?”

But it warn’t. It was Jack - o’ - lanter n s, or lightning- bu g s; so he set
down again, and went to watch ing, same as before. Jim said it made him
all over trem bly and f ever ish to be so close to freed om. Well, I can
tell you it made me all over trem bly and f ever i sh, too, to hear him,
because I begun to get it through my head that he was most fre e—and
who was to blame for it? Why, me. I couldn’t get that out of my
consci ence, no how nor no way. It got to trou bling me so I couldn’t
re st; I couldn’t stay still in one place. It hadn’t ever come home to
me before, what this thing was that I was do ing. But now it did; and it
stayed with me, and scor ched me more and more. I tried to make out to
myself that I warn’t to bla me, because I didn’t run Jim off from
his right ful own er; but it warn’t no use, conscience up and says, every
time, “But you knowed he was running for his freed om, and you could ’a’
paddled ashore and told some bod y.” That was so —I couldn’t get around
that no way. That was where it p inch ed. Con sc i ence says to me, “What
had poor Miss Watson done to you that you could see her nigger go off
right under your eyes and never say one single word ? What did that poor
old woman do to you that you could treat her so mean? Why, she tried to
learn you your book, she tried to learn you your manner s, she tried to
be good to you every way she knowed how. That’s what she done.”

I got to feeling so mean and so miserable I most wished I was dead.
I fidge ted up and down the raft, ab using myself to myself, and Jim
was fidge ting up and down past me. We neither of us could keep still.
Every time he d anced around and says, “D a h’s Cairo !” it went through me
like a shot, and I thought if it was Cairo I reckoned I would die of
miser ablen ess.

Jim talked out loud all the time while I was talking to myself. He was
saying how the first thing he would do when he got to a free state he
would go to sa ving up money and never spend a single c ent, and when
he got enough he would buy his wife, which was owned on a farm close
to where Miss Watson liv ed; and then they would both work to buy the
two children, and if their master wouldn’t sell them, they’d get an
A b’ l iti oni st to go and steal them.

It most fro ze me to hear such talk. He wouldn’t ever dar ed to talk such
talk in his life before. Just see what a difference it made in him the
minute he judged he was about fre e. It was according to the old saying,
“G ive a nigger an in ch and he’ll take an ell .” Thinks I, this is what
comes of my not thinking. Here was this nigger, which I had as good as
helped to run away, coming right out fl at- foo ted and saying he would
steal his childr en — children that belonged to a man I didn’t even know;
a man that hadn’t ever done me no harm.

I was sorry to hear Jim say that, it was such a low ering of him. My
conscience got to stirring me up ho t ter than ever, until at last I says
to it, “Let up on me— it ain’t too late yet— I’ll paddle ashore at the
first light and tell.” I felt easy and happy and light as a feather
right off. All my troubles was gone. I went to looking out sharp for a
light, and sort of singing to myself. By and by one show ed. Jim sings
out:

“W e’s safe, Huck, we ’s safe ! Jump up and crack yo’ heel s! D at’s de good
ole Cairo at las ’, I jis knows it!”

I says:

“I’ll take the canoe and go and see, Jim. It mightn’t be, you know.”

He jumped and got the canoe ready, and put his old coat in the bottom
for me to set on, and give me the padd le; and as I shoved off, he says:

“P oo ty soon I’ll be a- shout ’n’ for jo y, en I’ll say, it’s all on
accounts o’ Huck; I’s a free man, en I couldn’t ever ben free ef it
ha dn’ ben for Huck; Huck done it. Jim won’t ever forgit you, Huck;
you’s de be s’ fr en’ Jim’s ever ha d; en you’s de only fr en’ ole Jim’s
got now.”

I was padd ling off, all in a sweat to tell on him; but when he says
this, it seemed to kind of take the tuck all out of me. I went along
slow then, and I warn’t right down certain whether I was glad I started
or whether I warn’t. When I was fifty yards off, Jim says:

“D ah you go es, de ole true Huck; de on’y white genl man dat ever kep’
his promise to ole Jim.”

Well, I just felt si ck. But I says, I got to do it —I can’t get out
of it. R ight then along comes a skiff with two men in it with guns, and
they stopped and I stopped. One of them says:

“What’s that yonder ?”

“A piece of a raf t,” I says.

“Do you belong on it?”

“Yes, sir.”

“ Any men on it?”

“Only one, sir.”

“Well, there’s five niggers run off to-night up yonder, above the head
of the ben d. Is your man white or black ?”

I didn’t answer up promp t. I tried to, but the words wouldn’t come. I
tried for a second or two to brace up and out with it, but I warn’t man
enough — hadn’t the sp un k of a rab bit. I see I was wea ken ing; so I just
give up tr ying, and up and says:

“He’s white .”

“I reckon we’ll go and see for oursel ves.”

“I wish you woul d,” says I, “because it’s pap that’s there, and maybe
you’d help me t ow the raft ashore where the light is. He’s sick —and so
is ma m and Mary An n.”

“Oh, the devil ! we’re in a hurry, bo y. But I s’pose we’ve got to. Come,
buck le to your padd le, and let’s get along.”

I buck led to my paddle and they laid to their o ars. When we had made a
stro ke or two, I says:

“P a p ’ll be mighty much obleeged to you, I can tell you. Everybody goes
away when I want them to help me t ow the raft ashor e, and I can’t do it
by myself.”

“Well, that’s infer nal mean . O d d, too. Say, boy, what’s the matter with
your father?”

“It’s the — a — the —well, it ain’t anything much.”

They stopped pu ll ing. It warn’t but a mighty little ways to the raft
now. One says:

“ Bo y, that’s a lie. What is the matter with your pap ? An sw er up
square now, and it ’ll be the better for you.”

“I will, sir, I will, honest —but don’t leave us, plea se. It’s the — the —
G ent lem en, if you’ll only pull ahead, and let me hea ve you the
head line, you won’t have to come a-near the raf t— please do.”

“S et her back, Joh n, set her back !” says one. They backed water. “Keep
away, bo y— keep to loo ard. Con found it, I just expect the wind has
blowed it to us. Your pap’s got the smallpo x, and you know it precious
well. Why didn’t you come out and say so? Do you want to spread it all
over ?”

“Well,” says I, a- blubber ing, “I’ve told everybody before, and they
just went away and left us.”

“P o or dev il, there’s something in that. We are right down sorry for
you, but we —well, hang it, we don’t want the smallpo x, you see. Look
here, I’ll tell you what to do. Don’t you try to land by yourself, or
you’ll sm ash everything to piec es. You float along down about twenty
miles, and you’ll come to a town on the left-hand side of the river. It
will be long after sun-up then, and when you ask for help you tell them
your folks are all down with chi lls and f ever. Don’t be a fool again,
and let people guess what is the matter. Now we’re trying to do you a
kind nes s; so you just put twenty miles between us, that’s a good bo y.
It wouldn’t do any good to land yonder where the light is —it’s only a
wood- y ard. Say, I reckon your father’s poor, and I’m bound to say he’s
in pretty hard luck. Here, I’ll put a twenty- dollar gold piece on this
board, and you get it when it flo ats by. I feel mighty mean to leave
you; but my king dom ! it won’t do to fool with smallpo x, don’t you see ?”

“Hold on, Par ker ,” says the man, “ here’s a twenty to put on the board
for me. Good- by, bo y; you do as Mr. Par ker told you, and you’ll be all
right.”

“That’s so, my bo y— good- by, good- by e. If you see any runaway niggers
you get help and n ab them, and you can make some money by it.”

“Good- by, sir,” says I; “I won’t let no runaway niggers get by me if I
can help it.”

They went off and I got aboard the raft, feeling bad and low, because
I knowed very well I had done wrong, and I see it warn’t no use for me
to try to learn to do right; a body that don’t get started right when
he’s little ain’t got no show — when the pin ch comes there ain’t nothing
to back him up and keep him to his work, and so he gets be at. Then I
thought a minute, and says to myself, hold on; s’pose you’d ’a’ done
right and give Jim up, would you felt better than what you do now ? No,
says I, I’d feel bad — I’d feel just the same way I do now. Well, then,
says I, what’s the use you learning to do right when it’s trouble some
to do right and ain’t no trouble to do wrong, and the wag es is just the
sa me? I was st uck . I couldn’t answer that. So I reckoned I wouldn’t
bother no more about it, but after this always do whi ch ever come
han diest at the time.

I went into the wigwa m ; Jim warn’t there. I looked all around; he
warn’t anywher e. I says:

“ Jim!”

“Here I is, Huck. Is dey out o’ sight y it? Don’t talk lou d.”

He was in the river under the stern oar, with just his nose out. I told
him they were out of sight, so he come abo ard. He says:

“I was a- listen in’ to all de talk, en I sli ps into de river en was
gwyne to shove for sho’ if dey come abo ard. Den I was gwyne to swim to
de raf’ agin when dey was gone. But law sy, how you did fool ’em, Huck !
D at wuz de smar t es’ do dge ! I tell you, chile, I ’ spec it sa ve ’ ole
Jim — ole Jim ain’t going to forgit you for d at, hone y.”

Then we talked about the money. It was a pretty good rai se — twenty
dollars apiece. Jim said we could take deck passage on a steamboat
now, and the money would last us as far as we wanted to go in the free
stat es. He said twenty mile more warn’t far for the raft to go, but he
wished we was already there.

T ow ards daybreak we tied up, and Jim was mighty particular about hiding
the raft good. Then he worked all day fix ing things in bund les, and
getting all ready to quit raft ing.

That night about ten we hove in sight of the lights of a town away down
in a left-hand ben d.

I went off in the canoe to ask about it. Pretty soon I found a man out
in the river with a skiff, setting a tro t- line. I r ang ed up and says:

“M ist er, is that town Cairo ?”

“C airo ? no. You must be a blame’ fool .”

“What town is it, mi ster ?”

“If you want to know, go and find out. If you stay here bother in’
around me for about a half a minute longer you’ll get something you
won’t wan t.”

I paddled to the raft. Jim was awful disappoin ted, but I said never
mind, Cairo would be the next place, I reck one d.

We passed another town before daylight, and I was going out again; but
it was high ground, so I didn’t go. No high ground about Cairo , Jim
said. I had forgot it. We laid up for the day on a towhead tolerable
close to the left-hand bank. I begun to suspicion something. So did
Jim. I says:

“Maybe we went by Cairo in the fog that night.”

He says:

“Do an’ le’s talk about it, Huck. P o’ niggers can’t have no luck. I
awluz ’ spe cted dat rattle snake-skin warn’t done wid its wor k.”

“I wish I’d never seen that snake- skin, Jim —I do wish I’d never laid
eyes on it.”

“It ain’t yo’ fault, Huck; you didn’t know. Don’t you blame y o’ self
’bout it.”

When it was daylight, here was the clear Ohi o water in shore, sure
enough, and outside was the old regular M u dd y! So it was all up with
Cairo .

We talked it all over. It wouldn’t do to take to the shor e; we couldn’t
take the raft up the stream, of course. There warn’t no way but to wait
for dark, and start back in the canoe and take the chanc es. So we slept
all day amongst the cottonwood thick et, so as to be fresh for the work,
and when we went back to the raft about dark the canoe was gone!

We didn’t say a word for a good while. There warn’t anything to say. We
both knowed well enough it was some more work of the rattle snake- sk in;
so what was the use to talk about it? It would only look like we was
finding fault, and that would be bound to fetch more bad luck —and keep
on fet ching it, too, till we knowed enough to keep still.

By and by we talked about what we better do, and found there warn’t no
way but just to go along down with the raft till we got a chance to buy
a canoe to go back in. We warn’t going to borrow it when there warn’t
anybody around, the way pap would do, for that might set people after
us.

So we shoved out after dark on the raft.

Anybody that don’t believe yet that it’s foolishness to handle a
snake- skin, after all that that snake-skin done for us, will believe it
now if they read on and see what more it done for us.

The place to buy cano es is off of rafts laying up at shore. But we
didn’t see no rafts laying up; so we went along during three hours and
more. Well, the night got gray and ruther thick, which is the next
mean est thing to fo g. You can’t tell the shape of the river, and you
can’t see no distan ce. It got to be very late and still, and then along
comes a steamboat up the river. We lit the lantern, and judged she
would see it. U p- stream boats didn’t generly come close to us; they go
out and follow the bars and hunt for easy water under the re ef s; but
nights like this they bu ll right up the channel against the whole river.

We could hear her p oun ding along, but we didn’t see her good till she
was clo se. She aim ed right for us. O f ten they do that and try to see
how close they can come without tou ch ing; sometimes the wheel bit es off
a sweep , and then the pi lot sti cks his head out and laugh s, and thinks
he’s mighty smar t. Well, here she comes, and we said she was going to
try and s have us; but she didn’t seem to be she ering off a bit. She was
a big one, and she was coming in a hurry, too, looking like a black
cloud with r ows of gl ow- wor ms around it; but all of a sudden she bul ged
out, big and sc ary, with a long row of wi de - open furn ace doors shining
like red- hot tee th, and her monstrous b ows and gu ards hanging right
over us. There was a ye ll at us, and a j ing ling of be lls to stop the
eng in es, a powwow of cussing, and whist ling of steam —and as Jim went
overboard on one side and I on the other, she come sm ashing straight
through the raft.

I di v ed —and I aim ed to find the bott om, too, for a thirty- foot wheel
had got to go over me, and I wanted it to have plenty of room. I could
always stay under water a minute; this time I reckon I stayed under a
minute and a half . Then I b oun ced for the top in a hurry, for I was
nearly bust ing. I pop ped out to my ar mp its and blowed the water out of
my nose, and puff ed a bit. Of course there was a booming curr ent; and
of course that boat started her eng in es again ten seconds after she
stopped them, for they never cared much for raft sm en; so now she was
chur ning along up the river, out of sight in the thick weather, though
I could hear her.

I sung out for Jim about a dozen times, but I didn’t get any answer ;
so I grabbed a plan k that touched me while I was “ t reading water ,” and
struck out for shore, shoving it ahead of me. But I made out to see
that the dri ft of the current was towards the left-hand shore, which
meant that I was in a cros sing ; so I changed off and went that way.

It was one of these long, slan ting, two- mile cros sing s; so I was a good
long time in getting over. I made a safe landing, and clumb up the
bank. I couldn’t see but a little ways, but I went po king along over
rough ground for a quarter of a mile or more, and then I run across a
big old-fashioned double log house before I noticed it. I was going to
rush by and get away, but a lot of dogs jumped out and went to howling
and bar king at me, and I knowed better than to move another pe g.




CHAPTER X VII


In about a minute somebody spoke out of a window without putting his
head out, and says:

“B e done, boy s! Who ’s there?”

I says:

“It’s me.”

“Who ’s me?”

“G eor ge Jackson, sir.”

“What do you wan t?”

“I don’t want nothing, sir. I only want to go along by, but the dogs
won’t let me.”

“What are you pr owling around here this time of night for — he y?”

“I warn’t pr owling around, sir; I fell overboard off of the steambo at.”

“Oh, you did, did you? St ri ke a light there, some body. What did you say
your name wa s?”

“G eor ge Jackson, sir. I’m only a bo y.”

“Look here, if you’re telling the truth you needn’t be afra id — nobody
’ll hurt you. But don’t try to bu dge; stand right where you are. R ouse
out Bob and Tom, some of you, and fetch the gun s. George Jackson, is
there anybody with you?”

“No, sir, no bod y.”

I heard the people stirring around in the house now, and see a light.
The man sung out:

“S nat ch that light away, Bet sy, you old fool — ain’t you got any sen se?
Put it on the floor behind the front door. Bob , if you and Tom are
ready, take your plac es.”

“All read y.”

“Now, George Jackson, do you know the Shepherdson s?”

“No, sir; I never heard of them.”

“Well, that may be so, and it may n ’t. Now, all ready. Ste p forward,
George Jack son. And mind, don’t you hurry — come mighty slow. If there’s
anybody with you, let him keep back —if he shows himself he’ll be shot.
Come along now. Come slow ; p ush the door open yourself —just enough to
squee ze in, d ’you hear?”

I didn’t hurry; I couldn’t if I’d a- wanted to. I took one slow step at
a time and there warn’t a sound, only I thought I could hear my heart.
The dogs were as still as the hum ans, but they followed a little behind
me. When I got to the three log door steps I heard them un locking and
un barr ing and un bol t ing. I put my hand on the door and pushed it a
little and a little more till somebody said, “Th ere, that’s enough — put
your head in.” I done it, but I judged they would take it off.

The candle was on the floor, and there they all was, looking at me,
and me at them, for about a quarter of a minute : Three big men with
guns pointed at me, which made me win ce, I tell you; the ol de st, gray
and about six ty, the other two thirty or more— all of them fine and
hand some —and the sweet est old gra y- headed lady, and back of her two
young women which I couldn’t see right well. The old gentleman says:

“Ther e; I reckon it’s all right. Come in.”

As soon as I was in the old gentleman he locked the door and barred it
and bol ted it, and told the young men to come in with their guns, and
they all went in a big parlor that had a new rag car pet on the floor,
and got together in a corner that was out of the r ange of the front
window s— there warn’t none on the side. They held the candle, and took
a good look at me, and all said, “Why, he ain’t a Shepherdson — no,
there ain’t any Shepherd son about him.” Then the old man said he hoped
I wouldn’t mind being sear ched for arms, because he didn’t mean no harm
by it— it was only to make sure. So he didn’t pr y into my pockets, but
only felt outside with his hands, and said it was all right. He told me
to make myself easy and at home, and tell all about myself; but the old
lady says:

“Why, bless you, Sa ul , the poor thing’s as wet as he can be; and don’t
you reckon it may be he’s hungr y?”

“T ru e for you, R a chel —I forgo t.”

So the old lady says:

“B et sy ” ( this was a nigger woman ), “you fly around and get him
something to eat as quick as you can, poor thing; and one of you girls
go and wake up Buck and tell him —oh, here he is himself. Buck, take
this little stranger and get the wet clothes off from him and dress him
up in some of yours that’s dr y.”

Buck looked about as old as me— thir teen or fourteen or along there,
though he was a little bigger than me. He hadn’t on anything but a
shirt, and he was very fr ow z y- hea ded. He came in gaping and digging one
fi st into his eyes, and he was dragging a gun along with the other one.
He says:

“A in’t they no Shepherdsons around ?”

They said, no, ’twas a false alarm.

“Well,” he says, “if they’d ’a’ ben some, I reckon I’d ’a’ got one.”

They all laughed, and Bob says:

“Why, Buck, they might have sc al ped us all, you’ve been so slow in
com ing.”

“Well, nobody come after me, and it ain’t right. I’m always kept down ;
I don’t get no show .”

“Never mind, Buck, my bo y,” says the old man, “ you’ll have show enough,
all in good time, don’t you fre t about that. Go ’long with you now, and
do as your mother told you.”

When we got up-stairs to his room he got me a coarse shirt and a
round about and pan ts of his, and I put them on. While I was at it he
asked me what my name was, but before I could tell him he started to
tell me about a blu e ja y and a young rabbit he had catched in the woods
day before yesterday, and he asked me where Moses was when the candle
went out. I said I didn’t know; I hadn’t heard about it before, no way.

“Well, gu ess ,” he says.

“How ’m I going to gu ess ,” says I, “when I never heard tell of it
befor e?”

“But you can gu ess, can’t you? It’s just as easy.”

“Which candle ?” I says.

“Why, any candle ,” he says.

“I don’t know where he was ,” says I; “ where was he?”

“Why, he was in the dark ! That’s where he was !”

“Well, if you knowed where he was, what did you ask me for?”

“Why, blame it, it’s a ri dd le, don’t you see ? Say, how long are you
going to stay her e? You got to stay al ways. We can just have booming
tim es— they don’t have no school now. Do you own a dog ? I’ve got a
dog —and he’ll go in the river and bring out chi ps that you throw in. Do
you like to comb up Sun days, and all that kind of foolish ness ? You bet
I don’t, but ma she makes me. Con found these ole br itch es! I reckon I’d
better put ’em on, but I’d ruther not, it’s so war m. Are you all read y?
All right. Come along, old ho ss.”

C old corn-p one, cold corn- be ef, butter and butter mil k —that is what they
had for me down there, and there ain’t nothing better that ever I’ve
come across yet. Buck and his ma and all of them smoked co b pip es,
except the nigger woman, which was gone, and the two young wom en.
They all smoked and tal ked, and I eat and tal ked. The young women had
quil ts around them, and their hair down their back s. They all asked me
questions, and I told them how pap and me and all the family was living
on a little farm down at the bottom of Arkan saw, and my sister Mary An n
run off and got married and never was heard of no more, and Bill went
to hunt them and he warn’t heard of no more, and Tom and Mor t died,
and then there warn’t nobody but just me and pap left, and he was just
tri mmed down to nothing, on account of his trouble s; so when he died
I took what there was left, because the farm didn’t belong to us, and
started up the river, deck passage, and fell over board ; and that was
how I come to be here. So they said I could have a home there as long
as I wanted it. Then it was most daylight and everybody went to bed,
and I went to bed with Buck, and when I waked up in the morning, drat
it all, I had forgot what my name was. So I laid there about an hour
trying to think, and when Buck waked up I says:

“C an you spe ll, Buck?”

“Yes,” he says.

“I bet you can’t spell my name,” says I.

“I bet you what you dare I can ,” says he.

“All right,” says I, “ go a head.”

“G - e- o- r - g- e J - a- x- o- n —there now,” he says.

“Well,” says I, “you done it, but I didn’t think you could. It ain’t no
slouch of a name to spell — right off without stud y ing.”

I set it down, private, because somebody might want me to spell it
next, and so I wanted to be handy with it and rattle it off like I was
used to it.

It was a mighty nice family, and a mighty nice house, too. I hadn’t
seen no house out in the country before that was so nice and had so
much style. It didn’t have an iron lat ch on the front door, nor a
wooden one with a buck skin string, but a brass kn ob to tur n, the same
as houses in town. There warn’t no bed in the parl or, nor a sign of a
bed; but hea ps of par lor s in town s has be ds in them. There was a big
fire place that was bri cked on the bott om, and the bri cks was kept clean
and red by p ouring water on them and sc rubbing them with another brick ;
sometimes they wash them over with red water- pain t that they call
Span i sh- br own, same as they do in town. They had big brass dog- ir ons
that could hold up a saw- lo g. There was a clock on the middle of the
mantel piece, with a picture of a town painted on the bottom half of
the glass front, and a round place in the middle of it for the sun,
and you could see the pen dul um swinging behind it. It was beautiful to
hear that clock tick ; and sometimes when one of these pe dd l ers had been
along and sc oured her up and got her in good sha pe, she would start
in and strike a hundred and fifty before she got t uck ered out. They
wouldn’t took any money for her.

Well, there was a big out lan dish par rot on each side of the clo ck,
made out of something like chal k, and painted up ga ud y. By one of the
par ro ts was a cat made of cro ck er y, and a cro ck ery dog by the other ;
and when you pressed down on them they squ ea ked, but didn’t open
their mou ths nor look different nor interest ed. They squ ea ked through
undernea th. There was a couple of big wil d- tur ke y- wing fan s spread out
behind those things. On the table in the middle of the room was a kind
of a lovely cro ck ery bas ket that had app les and or ang es and pe a ches and
gra pes piled up in it, which was much re d der and yell ow er and pre tti er
than real ones is, but they warn’t real because you could see where
pieces had got chi pped off and showed the white chal k, or whatever it
was, undernea th.

This table had a cover made out of beautiful o il clo th, with a red and
blue sp rea d- eag le painted on it, and a painted border all around. It
come all the way from Phi la del phi a, they said. There was some books,
too, piled up perfectly exac t, on each corner of the table. One was a
big family Bible full of picture s. One was P il gri m ’s Pro gre ss, about
a man that left his family, it didn’t say why. I read considerable in
it now and then. The statements was interest ing, but t ough . Another
was Fri end ship ’s O ffer ing, full of beautiful stuff and poe tr y; but I
didn’t read the poe try. Another was Henry Cla y’s Spe e ches, and another
was Dr. G un n’s F ami ly M e di cin e, which told you all about what to do
if a body was sick or dead. There was a hy m n- book, and a lot of other
boo ks. And there was nice spl it- bottom chairs, and perfectly sound,
too— not bag ged down in the middle and bust ed, like an old bas ket.

They had pictures hung on the wall s— mainly W ash ing t ons and La fa ye tt es,
and batt les, and Hi gh land Mar ys, and one called “S igning the
D ec lar ation.” There was some that they called cra yon s, which one of
the daugh ters which was dead made her own self when she was only
fifteen years old. They was different from any pictures I ever see
befor e— black er, mo st ly, than is comm on. One was a woman in a slim black
dress, bel ted small under the ar mp it s, with bul ges like a cab bage in
the middle of the sleev es, and a large black scoo p- shov el bonnet with
a black veil, and white slim ank les crossed about with black ta pe, and
very we e black slipper s, like a chi sel , and she was leaning pen sive
on a tom b stone on her right elb ow, under a we ep ing will ow, and her
other hand hanging down her side holding a white handkerchief and a
reti cu le, and undernea th the picture it said “S hall I Never See The e
More Al as.” Another one was a young lady with her hair all com bed up
straight to the top of her head, and kno tted there in front of a comb
like a chair - back, and she was crying into a handkerchief and had a
dead bird laying on its back in her other hand with its heels up, and
undernea th the picture it said “I S hall Never He ar Th y S we et Chi r r up
More Al as.” There was one where a young lady was at a window looking
up at the mo on, and tears running down her chee k s; and she had an open
letter in one hand with black se al ing- wax showing on one edge of it,
and she was m ashing a lock et with a chain to it against her mouth, and
undernea th the picture it said “And Ar t Th ou Gone Y es Th ou Ar t Gone
Al as.” These was all nice picture s, I reckon, but I didn’t somehow
seem to take to them, because if ever I was down a little they always
give me the fan to ds. Everybody was sorry she died, because she had
laid out a lot more of these pictures to do, and a body could see by
what she had done what they had lost. But I reckoned that with her
disposition she was having a better time in the gravey ard. She was at
work on what they said was her greatest picture when she took sick,
and every day and every night it was her pra yer to be allowed to live
till she got it done, but she never got the chance. It was a picture of
a young woman in a long white gown, standing on the ra il of a bri dge
all ready to jump off, with her hair all down her back, and looking
up to the mo on, with the tears running down her face, and she had two
arms folded across her breast, and two arms stretched out in front,
and two more reaching up toward the moon —and the idea was to see which
pair would look be st, and then scratch out all the other arm s; but, as
I was saying, she died before she got her mind made up, and now they
kept this picture over the head of the bed in her room, and every time
her bir th day come they hung flow ers on it. O ther times it was hid with
a little curtain . The young woman in the picture had a kind of a nice
sweet face, but there was so many arms it made her look too spi der y,
seemed to me.

This young girl kept a sc rap -book when she was alive, and used to pa ste
ob itu ar ies and accid ents and cases of pati ent suffer ing in it out of
the Pres by ter i an Ob ser ver, and write poetry after them out of her own
head. It was very good poe try. This is what she wrote about a boy by
the name of Stephen Dowling Bo ts that fell down a well and was drownde d:

O D E TO ST E PH EN D O W L ING BO T S , D EC ’ D

And did young Stephen sick en,
And did young Stephen di e?
And did the sad hear ts thick en,
And did the mourn ers cr y?

No; such was not the fate of
Young Stephen Dowling Bo ts;
Th ough sad hear ts round him thick en ed,
’ T was not from sick ness ’ sho ts.

No whoo p ing- c ough did r ack his fra me,
N or meas les dre ar with spo ts;
Not these im pair ed the sa cr ed name
Of Stephen Dowling Bo ts.

Des p ised love struck not with w o e
That head of cur ly kno ts,
N or stoma ch troubles laid him low,
Young Stephen Dowling Bo ts.

O no. Then list with tear ful ey e,
Whi lst I his fate do tell.
His soul did from this cold world fly
By falling down a well.

They got him out and emp tied him;
Al as it was too lat e;
His spirit was gone for to spor t al of t
In the re al ms of the good and gre at.

If Emmeline Grangerford could make poetry like that before she was
four teen, there ain’t no telling what she could ’a’ done by and by.
Buck said she could rattle off poetry like nothing. She didn’t ever
have to stop to think. He said she would sla p down a line, and if she
couldn’t find anything to r hy me with it would just scratch it out and
sla p down another one, and go a head. She warn’t particul ar ; she could
write about anything you choose to give her to write about just so it
was sa d ful. Every time a man died, or a woman died, or a child died,
she would be on hand with her “ tribu te ” before he was col d. She called
them tri but es. The neighbor s said it was the doctor first, then
Emme line, then the underta ker —the undertaker never got in ahead of
Emmeline but once, and then she hung fire on a r hy me for the dead
person’s name, which was Whi st l er. She warn’t ever the same after
that; she never compla in ed, but she kinder p ined away and did not live
long. Poor thing, man y’s the time I made myself go up to the little
room that used to be her s and get out her poor old sc rap -book and read
in it when her pictures had been ag grav ating me and I had s oured on
her a little. I liked all that family, dead ones and all, and warn’t
going to let anything come between us. Poor Emmeline made poetry about
all the dead people when she was alive, and it didn’t seem right that
there warn’t nobody to make some about her now she was gone; so I
tried to sweat out a ver se or two myself, but I couldn’t seem to make
it go somehow. They kept Emme lin e’s room tri m and ni ce, and all the
things fixed in it just the way she liked to have them when she was
alive, and nobody ever slept there. The old lady took care of the room
her self, though there was plenty of niggers, and she se wed there a
good deal and read her Bible there mo st ly.

Well, as I was saying about the parl or, there was beautiful curtain s
on the window s: white, with pictures painted on them of cast les with
vines all down the wall s, and cat tle coming down to drin k. There was a
little old pi an o, too, that had tin pans in it, I reckon, and nothing
was ever so lovely as to hear the young ladies sing “The L ast L ink is
Bro ken ” and play “The B att le of P ra gu e ” on it. The walls of all the
rooms was pla ster ed, and most had carpe ts on the floor s, and the whole
house was whitewashed on the outside.

It was a double house, and the big open place betwixt them was roof ed
and floor ed, and sometimes the table was set there in the middle of
the day, and it was a coo l, comfortable place. Nothing couldn’t be
better. And warn’t the coo king good, and just bus hel s of it too !




CHAPTER X VIII


Col . Grangerford was a gentleman, you see. He was a gentleman all over;
and so was his family. He was well born, as the saying is, and that’s
worth as much in a man as it is in a hor se, so the W id ow D ou gl as said,
and nobody ever denied that she was of the first aristo crac y in our
town; and pap he always said it, too, though he warn’t no more qu ality
than a mu d cat himself. Col . Grangerford was very tall and very sli m,
and had a dar ki sh- pal y complex ion, not a sign of red in it anywher es;
he was clean-sha ved every morning all over his thin face, and he had
the thin nest kind of lips, and the thin nest kind of nostri l s, and a
high nose, and heavy eyebr ows, and the black est kind of eyes, sunk so
deep back that they seemed like they was looking out of caver ns at
you, as you may say. His forehead was high, and his hair was gray and
straight and hung to his shoulders. His hands was long and thin, and
every day of his life he put on a clean shirt and a full suit from
head to foot made out of linen so white it hurt your eyes to look at
it; and on Sun days he wore a blue tail - coat with brass buttons on it.
He carried a ma hog any cane with a silver head to it. There warn’t no
fri vo li sh ness about him, not a bit, and he warn’t ever lou d. He was
as kind as he could be —you could feel that, you know, and so you had
confid ence. Sometimes he smi led, and it was good to see; but when he
straightened himself up like a liber ty- po le, and the lightning begun to
fli ck er out from under his eyebr ows, you wanted to climb a tree first,
and find out what the matter was afterwards. He didn’t ever have to
tell anybody to mind their manner s— everybody was always good- man n ered
where he was. Everybody loved to have him around, too; he was sun sh ine
most al way s—I mean he made it seem like good weather. When he turned
into a clou d- bank it was awful dark for half a minute, and that was
enough ; there wouldn’t nothing go wrong again for a week.

When him and the old lady come down in the morning all the family got
up out of their chairs and give them good day, and didn’t set down
again till they had set down. Then Tom and Bob went to the side board
where the de can ter was, and mixed a glass of bit ters and handed it to
him, and he held it in his hand and waited till Tom’s and Bob ’s was
mix ed, and then they bowed and said, “Our duty to you, sir, and madam ”;
and they bowed the least bit in the world and said thank you, and so
they dr an k, all thre e, and Bob and Tom poured a spo on ful of water on
the su gar and the m ite of whisky or app le- brandy in the bottom of their
tum bl ers, and give it to me and Buck, and we drank to the old people
too.

Bob was the ol dest and Tom nex t— tall, beautiful men with very broad
shoulders and brown fac es, and long black hair and black eyes. They
dressed in white linen from head to foot, like the old gentleman, and
wore broad P an am a hat s.

Then there was Miss Char lot te ; she was twenty- five, and tall and proud
and gr and, but as good as she could be when she warn’t stirred up; but
when she was she had a look that would make you wi lt in your track s,
like her father. She was beauti ful.

So was her sist er, Miss Sophi a, but it was a different kind. She was
gentle and sweet like a do ve, and she was only twent y.

E ach person had their own nigger to wait on them — Buck too. My nigger
had a monstrous easy time, because I warn’t used to having anybody do
anything for me, but Buck ’s was on the jump most of the time.

This was all there was of the family now, but there used to be
more— three son s; they got kill ed; and Emmeline that di ed.

The old gentleman owned a lot of f arms and over a hundred nigger s.
Sometimes a stack of people would come there, horse back, from ten
or fifteen mile around, and stay five or six days, and have such
j un ket ings round about and on the river, and d anc es and pic ni c s in the
woods day times, and b all s at the house nights. These people was mostly
kin folks of the family. The men brought their guns with them. It was a
handsome lot of qual ity, I tell you.

There was another cl an of aristo crac y around there— five or six
famili es— mostly of the name of Shepherd son. They was as high- t oned
and well born and rich and grand as the tri be of Grangerfor ds. The
Shepherdsons and Grangerfords used the same steambo at- landing, which
was about two mile above our house; so sometimes when I went up there
with a lot of our folks I used to see a lot of the Shepherdsons there
on their fine horse s.

One day Buck and me was away out in the woods hun ting, and heard a
horse com ing. We was cros sing the road. Buck says:

“Qui ck ! Jump for the wood s!”

We done it, and then peeped down the woods through the lea ves. Pretty
soon a splendid young man came gall op ing down the road, setting his
horse easy and looking like a soldi er. He had his gun across his
p om me l. I had seen him before. It was young Harney Shepherd son. I heard
Buck ’s gun go off at my ear, and Har ne y’s hat tum bled off from his
head. He grabbed his gun and rode straight to the place where we was
hi d. But we didn’t wait. We started through the woods on a run. The
woods warn’t thick, so I looked over my shoulder to do dge the bull et,
and twice I seen Harney cover Buck with his gun ; and then he rode away
the way he com e— to get his hat, I reckon, but I couldn’t see. We never
stopped running till we got home. The old gentleman’s eyes bla zed a
minute — ’twas pleas ure, main ly, I judg ed— then his face sort of smoo thed
down, and he says, kind of gentle :

“I don’t like that shooting from behind a bush . Why didn’t you step
into the road, my bo y?”

“The Shepherdsons don’t, father. They always take advant ag e.”

Miss Char lot te she held her head up like a que en while Buck was telling
his ta le, and her nostrils spread and her eyes sna p ped. The two young
men looked dark, but never said nothing. Miss Sophia she turned pale,
but the col or come back when she found the man warn’t hurt.

So on as I could get Buck down by the corn- cri bs under the trees by
ourselves, I says:

“Did you want to kill him, Buck?”

“Well, I bet I did.”

“What did he do to you?”

“H im ? He never done nothing to me.”

“Well, then, what did you want to kill him for?”

“Why, noth ing— only it’s on account of the fe ud .”

“What’s a fe ud ?”

“Why, where was you rai se d? Don’t you know what a fe ud is?”

“Never heard of it befor e— tell me about it.”

“Well,” says Buck, “a fe ud is this way: A man has a quarrel with
another man, and kill s him; then that other man’s brother kill s him;
then the other brother s, on both sides, goes for one another ; then the
cous ins chi p in —and by and by everybod y’s killed off, and there ain’t
no more fe u d. But it’s kind of slow, and takes a long time.”

“Has this one been going on long, Buck?”

“Well, I should reck on! It started thirty year ago, or som ’ ers along
there. There was trouble ’bout something, and then a law suit to settle
it; and the suit went agin one of the men, and so he up and shot the
man that w on the su it— which he would naturally do, of course. Anybody
woul d.”

“What was the trouble about, Buck ?— land ?”

“I reckon may be —I don’t know.”

“Well, who done the shoo ting ? Was it a Grangerford or a Shepherdson ?”

“L aw s, how do I know ? It was so long ago.”

“Don’t anybody know ?”

“Oh, yes, pa know s, I reckon, and some of the other old peop le; but
they don’t know now what the row was about in the first place.”

“Has there been many killed, Buck?”

“Yes; right smart chance of funer als. But they don’t always kill . Pa ’s
got a few buck shot in him; but he don’t mind it ’ cuz he don’t wei gh
much, anyway. Bob ’s been car ved up some with a bow i e, and Tom’s been
hurt once or twi ce.”

“Has anybody been killed this year, Buck?”

“Yes; we got one and they got one. ’ B out three months ago my cousin
B u d, fourteen year old, was riding through the woods on t’other side
of the river, and didn’t have no weapon with him, which was blame’
foolish ness, and in a lonesome place he hears a horse a- coming behind
him, and sees old Bal dy Shepherd son a- lin kin’ after him with his gun in
his hand and his white hair a- flying in the wind ; and ’stead of jum ping
off and taking to the br ush, B ud ’lowed he could ou tru n him; so they
had it, ni p and t uck , for five mile or more, the old man a- gain ing all
the time; so at last B ud seen it warn’t any use, so he stopped and
faced around so as to have the bull et - holes in front, you know, and the
old man he rode up and shot him down. But he didn’t git much chance to
en joy his luck, for inside of a week our folks laid him out.”

“I reckon that old man was a cow ard, Buck .”

“I reckon he warn’t a cow ard. Not by a blame’ sight. There ain’t a
cow ard amongst them Shepherdson s— not a one. And there ain’t no cow ards
amongst the Grangerfords ei ther. Why, that old man kep’ up his end
in a fight one day for half an hour against three Grangerfor ds, and
come out win ner. They was all a- horse back ; he lit off of his horse and
got behind a little wood pile, and kep’ his horse before him to stop
the bull et s; but the Grangerfords stayed on their horses and ca per ed
around the old man, and pe pper ed away at him, and he pe pper ed away at
them. H im and his horse both went home pretty lea ky and cripp led, but
the Grangerfords had to be fetched hom e—and one of ’em was dead, and
another died the next day. No, sir; if a body’s out hunting for cow ards
he don’t want to fool away any time amongst them Shepherdson s, be cuz
they don’t bre ed any of that kind .”

Next Sun day we all went to church, about three mile, everybody
a- horse back. The men took their guns along, so did Buck, and kept
them between their knees or stood them handy against the wall. The
Shepherdsons done the same. It was pretty ornery preach ing— all about
brother ly lo ve, and su ch- like tire som en es s; but everybody said it was
a good ser m on, and they all talked it over going home, and had such
a powerful lot to say about faith and good works and free grace and
pre for eor de stin ation, and I don’t know what all, that it did seem to me
to be one of the rough est Sun days I had run across yet.

About an hour after dinner everybody was doz ing around, some in their
chairs and some in their rooms, and it got to be pretty du ll. Buck and
a dog was stretched out on the grass in the sun sound asleep. I went
up to our room, and judged I would take a na p myself. I found that
sweet Miss Sophia standing in her door, which was next to our s, and
she took me in her room and shut the door very soft, and asked me if I
liked her, and I said I did; and she asked me if I would do something
for her and not tell any body, and I said I would. Then she said she’d
forgot her Testam ent, and left it in the seat at church between two
other books, and would I slip out quiet and go there and fetch it to
her, and not say nothing to nobody. I said I would. So I slid out and
slipped off up the road, and there warn’t anybody at the church, except
maybe a ho g or two, for there warn’t any lock on the door, and hogs
li kes a pun che on floor in sum mer - time because it’s coo l. If you notice,
most folks don’t go to church only when they’ve got to; but a ho g is
different.

Says I to myself, some thing’s up; it ain’t natural for a girl to be in
such a sweat about a Testam ent. So I give it a sha ke, and out drops
a little piece of paper with “H al f past two ” wrote on it with a
pen c il. I ransacked it, but couldn’t find anything else. I couldn’t
make anything out of that, so I put the paper in the book again,
and when I got home and up-stairs there was Miss Sophia in her door
waiting for me. She pulled me in and shut the door; then she looked
in the Testament till she found the paper, and as soon as she read
it she looked gla d; and before a body could think she grabbed me and
give me a squee ze, and said I was the best boy in the world, and not
to tell any body. She was mighty red in the face for a minute, and her
eyes li ghted up, and it made her powerful prett y. I was a good deal
astonished, but when I got my breath I asked her what the paper was
about, and she asked me if I had read it, and I said no, and she asked
me if I could read writing, and I told her “ no, only co ar se- hand ,” and
then she said the paper warn’t anything but a book - mark to keep her
place, and I might go and play now.

I went off down to the river, studying over this thing, and pretty soon
I noticed that my nigger was following along behind. When we was out of
sight of the house he looked back and around a second, and then comes
a- run ning, and says:

“ Mars J aw ge, if you’ll come down into de swamp I’ll show you a whole
stack o’ water- mo c cas in s.”

Thinks I, that’s mighty curi ou s; he said that yester day. He ough ter
know a body don’t love water- mo c cas ins enough to go around hunting for
them. What is he up to, anyway ? So I says:

“All right; tr ot a head.”

I followed a half a mi le; then he struck out over the swa mp, and wa ded
ank le- deep as much as another half- mi le. We come to a little flat piece
of land which was dry and very thick with trees and bushes and vin es,
and he says:

“You shove right in dah jist a few steps, Mars J aw ge ; da h’s whah dey
is. I’s se ed ’m be fo ’; I don’t k’yer to see ’em no mo ’.”

Then he slo pped right along and went away, and pretty soon the trees
hid him. I poked into the place a ways and come to a little open pat ch
as big as a bedroom all hung around with vin es, and found a man laying
there asleep — and, by jings, it was my old Jim !

I waked him up, and I reckoned it was going to be a grand surprise to
him to see me again, but it warn’t. He nearly cried he was so gla d, but
he warn’t surprised. Said he swum along behind me that night, and heard
me ye ll every time, but dasn’t answer, because he didn’t want nobody to
pick him up and take him into sla very again. Says he :

“I got hurt a little, en couldn’t swim fas ’, so I wuz a considerable
ways behine you towards de las ’; when you landed I reck ’ ned I could
ketch up wid you on de lan ’ ’d out ha v in’ to sh out at you, but when I
see dat house I begin to go slow. I ’uz off too fur to hear what dey
say to you —I wuz ’ fra id o’ de dog s; but when it ’uz all quiet ag’in I
knowed you’s in de house, so I struck out for de woods to wait for day.
E arly in de ma w nin’ some er de niggers come along, gwyne to de fiel ds,
en dey tu k me en showed me dis place, whah de dogs can’t track me on
accounts o’ de water, en dey br ings me truck to eat every night, en
tells me how you’s a- g itt in’ along.”

“Why didn’t you tell my Jack to fetch me here soon er, Jim?”

“Well, ’t warn’t no use to ’ st ur b you, Huck, tell we could do sumf n —but
we ’s all right now. I ben a- bu yin’ po ts en pans en vitt les, as I got a
chan st, en a- pat ch in’ up de raf’ nights when —”

“What raft, Jim?”

“Our ole raf ’.”

“You mean to say our old raft warn’t smashed all to fl in der s?”

“No, she warn’t. She was tore up a good deal —one en’ of her was; but
dey warn’t no great harm done, on’y our traps was mos’ all lo s’. E f
we ha dn’ di ve ’ so deep en swum so fur under water, en de night hadn’t
ben so dark, en we warn’t so sk ’y er d, en ben sich pun kin - heads, as de
say in’ is, we’d a se ed de raf ’. But it’s jis’ as well we didn ’t, ’kase
now she’s all fixed up ag’in mos’ as good as new , en we ’s got a new lot
o’ stuff, in de place o’ what ’uz lo s’ .”

“Why, how did you get hold of the raft again, Jim — did you catch her ?”

“How I gwyne to ketch her en I out in de wood s? No; some er de niggers
f oun’ her ketched on a snag along heah in de ben ’, en dey hid her in
a crick ’m ongst de willows, en dey wuz so much jaw in’ ’bout which un
’ um she b’ long to de mos’ dat I come to heah ’bout it pooty soon, so
I up s en sett les de trouble by tell in’ ’ um she don’t b’ long to none
uv ’ um, but to you en me; en I ast ’m if dey gwyne to grab a young
white genl man’s pro pat y, en git a hi d ’n for it? Den I g in ’m ten cents
a piece, en dey ’uz mighty well satisfied, en wisht some mo’ raf ’s ’ ud
come along en make ’m rich ag’in. Dey’s mighty good to me, d ese niggers
is, en whatever I wants ’m to do fur me I doan’ have to ast ’m twi ce,
hone y. D at Jack ’s a good nigger, en pooty smar t.”

“Yes, he is. He ain’t ever told me you was here; told me to come, and
he’d show me a lot of water- mo c cas in s. If anything happen s he ain’t
mixed up in it. He can say he never seen us together, and it ’ll be the
tru th.”

I don’t want to talk much about the next day. I reckon I’ll cut it
pretty shor t. I waked up about daw n, and was a-going to turn over and
go to sleep again when I noticed how still it wa s— didn’t seem to be
anybody stir ring. That warn’t usual. Next I noticed that Buck was up
and gone. Well, I gets up, a- wonder ing, and goes down-stair s— nobody
around; everything as still as a mou se. Just the same outside. Thinks
I, what does it mean? D own by the woodpile I comes across my J ack, and
says:

“What’s it all about?”

Says he :

“Don’t you know, Mars J aw ge ?”

“No,” says I, “I don ’t.”

“Well, den, Miss Sophi a ’s run off ! ’ deed she ha s. She run off in de
night some time — nobody don’t know jis’ when ; run off to get married
to dat young Harney Shepherd son, you know — leastways, so dey ’ spec .
De fa m bly f oun’ it out ’bout half an hour ago — maybe a little mo ’— en’
I tell you dey warn’t no time lo s’. Si ch another hurry in’ up guns
en ho s ses you never see ! De women folks has gone for to stir up de
rel ations, en ole Mars S au l en de boys tuck dey guns en rode up de
river road for to try to ketch dat young man en kill him ’ fo’ he kin
git acro st de river wid Miss Sophi a. I reck’n dey’s gwyne to be mighty
rough tim es.”

“B uck went off ’ thout wa king me up.”

“Well, I reck’n he di d! Dey warn’t gwyne to mi x you up in it.
Mars Buck he loaded up his gun en ’lowed he’s gwyne to fetch home a
Shepherd son or bust. Well, dey ’ll be plenty un ’m da h, I reck ’n, en you
bet you he’ll fetch one ef he g its a chan st.”

I took up the river road as hard as I could put . By and by I begin to
hear guns a good ways off. When I came in sight of the log store and
the woodpile where the steamboats land s I worked along under the trees
and brush till I got to a good place, and then I clumb up into the
for ks of a cottonwood that was out of rea ch, and watch ed. There was a
wood- rank four foot high a little ways in front of the tree, and first
I was going to hide behind that; but maybe it was luck ier I didn’t.

There was four or five men cavor ting around on their horses in the open
place before the log store, cussing and yelling, and trying to get at
a couple of young cha ps that was behind the wood- rank along side of the
steambo at- land ing; but they couldn’t come it. Every time one of them
showed himself on the river side of the woodpile he got shot at. The
two boys was squ at ting back to back behind the pile, so they could
watch both ways.

By and by the men stopped cavor ting around and yell ing. They started
riding towards the stor e; then up gets one of the boys, draw s a steady
be ad over the wood- ran k, and drops one of them out of his sadd le. All
the men jumped off of their horses and grabbed the hurt one and started
to carry him to the stor e; and that minute the two boys started on the
run. They got half-way to the tree I was in before the men notice d.
Then the men see them, and jumped on their horses and took out after
them. They gained on the boys, but it didn’t do no good, the boys had
too good a star t; they got to the woodpile that was in front of my
tree, and slipped in behind it, and so they had the bul ge on the men
again. One of the boys was Buck, and the other was a slim young chap
about nine teen years old.

The men ri pped around awhile, and then rode away. As soon as they
was out of sight I sung out to Buck and told him. He didn’t know
what to make of my voice coming out of the tree at first. He was
awful surprised. He told me to watch out sharp and let him know when
the men come in sight again; said they was up to some devil ment or
other — wouldn’t be gone long. I wished I was out of that tree, but I
dasn’t come down. Buck begun to cry and ri p, and ’lowed that him and
his cousin Joe ( that was the other young cha p ) would make up for this
day yet. He said his father and his two brothers was killed, and two or
three of the enem y. Said the Shepherdsons laid for them in am bush . Buck
said his father and brothers ought to waited for their rel ation s— the
Shepherdsons was too strong for them. I asked him what was become of
young Harney and Miss Sophi a. He said they’d got across the river and
was safe. I was glad of that; but the way Buck did take on because he
didn’t manage to kill Harney that day he shot at him —I hain’t ever
heard anything like it.

All of a sudden, bang! bang! bang! goes three or four gun s— the men had
slipped around through the woods and come in from behind without their
horse s! The boys jumped for the river — both of them hur t —and as they
swum down the current the men run along the bank shooting at them and
singing out, “ K ill them, kill them !” It made me so sick I most fell
out of the tre e. I ain’t a-going to tell all that happen ed— it would
make me sick again if I was to do that. I wished I hadn’t ever come
ashore that night to see such things. I ain’t ever going to get shut of
them — lots of times I dream about them.

I stayed in the tree till it begun to get dark, afraid to come down.
Sometimes I heard guns away off in the wood s; and twice I seen little
gang s of men gall op past the log store with gun s; so I reckoned the
trouble was still a-going on. I was mighty down hear ted; so I made up
my mind I wouldn’t ever go a-near that house again, because I reckoned
I was to bla me, somehow. I judged that that piece of paper meant that
Miss Sophia was to meet Harney somewheres at half past two and run
off; and I judged I ought to told her father about that paper and the
curious way she ac ted, and then maybe he would ’a’ locked her up, and
this awful m ess wouldn’t ever happened.

When I got down out of the tree I crept along down the river - bank a
piece, and found the two bodi es laying in the edge of the water, and
tugged at them till I got them ashor e; then I covered up their fac es,
and got away as quick as I could. I cried a little when I was cover ing
up Buck ’s face, for he was mighty good to me.

It was just dark now. I never went near the house, but struck through
the woods and made for the swa mp . Jim warn’t on his island, so I
tramp ed off in a hurry for the crick, and crowded through the willows,
red- hot to jump aboard and get out of that awful country. The raft was
gone! My soul s, but I was scar ed! I couldn’t get my breath for most a
minute. Then I raised a ye ll. A voice not twenty-five foot from me says:

“Good lan ’! is dat you, hone y? Doan’ make no noi se.”

It was Jim’s voi ce— nothing ever s ounded so good before. I run along the
bank a piece and got aboard, and Jim he grabbed me and hugged me, he
was so glad to see me. He says:

“L aw s bless you, chile, I ’uz right down sho’ you’s dead ag’in. Jack ’s
been hea h ; he say he reck’n you’s ben shot, kase you didn’ come home no
mo ’; so I’s j es’ dis minute a- start in’ de raf’ down towards de mou f er
de crick, so ’s to be all ready for to shove out en leave soon as Jack
comes ag’in en tells me for certain you is dead. Law sy, I’s mighty
glad to git you back ag’in, hone y.”

I says:

“All right —that’s mighty good; they won’t find me, and they’ll think
I’ve been killed, and floated down the river — there’s something up there
that ’ll help them think so —so don’t you lose no time, Jim, but just
shove off for the big water as fast as ever you can.”

I never felt easy till the raft was two mile below there and out in
the middle of the Mississippi . Then we hung up our signal lantern, and
judged that we was free and safe once more. I hadn’t had a bite to eat
since yesterday, so Jim he got out some corn- do dg ers and butter mil k,
and por k and cab bage and gre en s— there ain’t nothing in the world so
good when it’s cooked right —and whilst I eat my supper we talked and
had a good time. I was powerful glad to get away from the fe ud s, and so
was Jim to get away from the swa mp . We said there warn’t no home like a
raft, after all. O ther places do seem so cra mped up and sm other y, but a
raft don ’t. You feel mighty free and easy and comfortable on a raft.




CHAPTER X IX


Two or three days and nights went by; I reckon I might say they swum
by, they slid along so quiet and smoo th and lovel y. Here is the way we
put in the time. It was a monstrous big river down there— sometimes a
mile and a half wi de; we run nights, and laid up and hid day times; soon
as night was most gone we stopped na vig ating and tied up — nearly always
in the dead water under a towhead ; and then cut young cotton woods
and willows, and hid the raft with them. Then we set out the lin es.
Next we slid into the river and had a swi m, so as to fresh en up
and cool off; then we set down on the sand y bottom where the water
was about kne e- deep , and watched the daylight come. Not a sound
anywher es— perfectly still —just like the whole world was asleep, only
sometimes the bull fro gs a- clut ter ing, may be. The first thing to see,
looking away over the water, was a kind of dull lin e— that was the
woods on t’other side ; you couldn’t make nothing else out; then a pale
place in the sk y; then more pal eness spreading around; then the river
softened up away off, and warn’t black any more, but gra y; you could
see little dark spo ts drifting along ever so far away — tra ding- sc ows,
and such things; and long black strea k s— raf ts; sometimes you could hear
a swe ep screa king; or jum ble d- up voic es, it was so still, and sounds
come so far ; and by and by you could see a streak on the water which
you know by the look of the streak that there’s a snag there in a swift
current which breaks on it and makes that streak look that way; and you
see the mi st cur l up off of the water, and the east re dd ens up, and
the river, and you make out a log cabin in the edge of the woods, away
on the bank on t’other side of the river, being a wood- yard, like ly,
and piled by them che ats so you can throw a dog through it anywher es;
then the nice bree ze spr ings up, and comes fan ning you from over there,
so cool and fresh and sweet to smell on account of the woods and the
flow ers; but sometimes not that way, because they’ve left dead fish
laying around, g ars and su ch, and they do get pretty ran k; and next
you’ve got the full day, and everything smiling in the sun, and the
song - birds just going it!

A little smoke couldn’t be noticed now, so we would take some fish off
of the lines and cook up a hot breakfast. And afterwards we would
watch the lonesom eness of the river, and kind of lazy along, and by
and by lazy off to sleep . W ake up by and by, and look to see what done
it, and maybe see a steamboat cough ing along up- stream, so far off
towards the other side you couldn’t tell nothing about her only
whether she was a ster n- wheel or side- wheel ; then for about an hour
there wouldn’t be nothing to hear nor nothing to see —just solid
lonesom en ess. Next you’d see a raft sliding by, away off yonder, and
maybe a g al oo t on it ch op p ing, because they’re most always doing it on
a raft; you’d see the ax flash and come down —you don’t hear nothing;
you see that ax go up again, and by the time it’s above the man’s head
then you hear the k’ ch un k !— it had took all that time to come over
the water. So we would put in the day, laz ying around, listening to
the still ness. Once there was a thick fog, and the rafts and things
that went by was beating tin pans so the steamboats wouldn’t run over
them. A sc ow or a raft went by so close we could hear them talking and
cussing and laugh ing— heard them pla in; but we couldn’t see no sign of
them; it made you feel craw ly; it was like spirits carrying on that
way in the air. Jim said he believed it was spirit s; but I says:

“No; spirits wouldn’t say, ’ D er n the der n fo g. ’”

So on as it was night out we shov ed; when we got her out to about the
middle we let her alone, and let her float wherever the current wanted
her to; then we lit the pip es, and dang led our legs in the water, and
talked about all kinds of thing s— we was always na ked, day and night,
whenever the mo squ it o es would let us —the new clothes Buck ’s folks
made for me was too good to be comfortable, and besides I didn’t go
much on clothes, nohow.

Sometimes we’d have that whole river all to ourselves for the long est
time. Y on der was the banks and the island s, across the water; and
maybe a spark —which was a candle in a cabin window ; and sometimes on
the water you could see a spark or two — on a raft or a sc ow, you know;
and maybe you could hear a fi ddle or a s ong coming over from one of
them c raf ts. It’s lovely to live on a raft. We had the sky up there,
all speckled with star s, and we used to lay on our backs and look up
at them, and discuss about whether they was made or only just
happened. Jim he allowed they was made, but I allowed they happen ed; I
judged it would have took too long to make so man y. Jim said the
moon could ’a’ laid them; well, that looked kind of reasonable, so I
didn’t say nothing against it, because I’ve seen a fro g lay most as
man y, so of course it could be done. We used to watch the stars that
fe ll, too, and see them streak down. Jim allowed they’d got spoiled
and was hove out of the ne st.

Once or twice of a night we would see a steamboat slipping along in
the dark, and now and then she would bel ch a whole world of spar ks up
out of her chim ble ys, and they would rain down in the river and look
awful prett y; then she would turn a corner and her lights would wink
out and her powwow shut off and leave the river still again; and by
and by her wa ves would get to us, a long time after she was gone, and
jo gg le the raft a bit, and after that you wouldn’t hear nothing for
you couldn’t tell how long, except maybe fro gs or something.

After midnight the people on shore went to bed, and then for two or
three hours the shor es was black — no more spar ks in the cabin windows.
These spar ks was our clo ck —the first one that showed again meant
morning was coming, so we hunted a place to hide and tie up right
away.

One morning about daybreak I found a canoe and crossed over a ch ute to
the main shor e— it was only two hundred yard s—and paddled about a
mile up a crick amongst the cy press woods, to see if I couldn’t get
some ber ries. Just as I was passing a place where a kind of a cow path
crossed the crick, here comes a couple of men tearing up the path as
tight as they could foot it. I thought I was a g on er, for whenever
anybody was after anybody I judged it was me— or maybe Jim. I was
about to dig out from there in a hurry, but they was pretty close to
me then, and sung out and begged me to save their li ves —said they
hadn’t been doing nothing, and was being chased for it— said there was
men and dogs a-com ing. They wanted to jump right in, but I says:

“Don’t you do it. I don’t hear the dogs and horses ye t; you’ve got
time to crowd through the brush and get up the crick a little way s;
then you take to the water and wa de down to me and get in —that ’ll
throw the dogs off the sc ent.”

They done it, and soon as they was aboard I lit out for our tow head,
and in about five or ten minutes we heard the dogs and the men away
off, shout ing. We heard them come along towards the crick, but
couldn’t see them; they seemed to stop and fool around a whi le; then,
as we got further and further away all the time, we couldn’t hardly
hear them at all; by the time we had left a mile of woods behind us
and struck the river, everything was quiet, and we paddled over to the
towhead and hid in the cotton woods and was safe.

One of these fellows was about sev enty or up war ds, and had a bald head
and very gray whisk ers. He had an old b atter ed-up slouch hat on, and a
greasy blue woo l en shirt, and ra gged old blue je ans britches stuff ed
into his boot- top s, and hom e- kn it gall use s— no, he only had one. He
had an old long - tail ed blue je ans coat with slick brass buttons flung
over his arm, and both of them had big, f at, rat ty- looking
carpet-bag s.

The other fellow was about thir ty, and dressed about as orner y. After
breakfast we all laid off and tal ked, and the first thing that come
out was that these cha ps didn’t know one another.

“What got you into trouble ?” says the bald head to t’other cha p.

“Well, I’d been se lling an arti cle to take the t ar tar off the
tee th —and it does take it off, too, and generly the en a me l along with
it— but I stayed about one night longer than I ought to, and was just
in the act of sliding out when I ran across you on the tra il this side
of town, and you told me they were coming, and begged me to help you
to get off. So I told you I was expecting trouble myself, and would
sc atter out with you. That’s the whole yar n — what’s your n ?”

“Well, I’d ben a- run nin’ a little temper ance re vi val th ar ’bout a
week, and was the pet of the women folks, big and little, for I was
ma kin’ it mighty warm for the rum mi es, I tell you, and ta kin’ as
much as five or six dollars a night — ten cents a head, children and
niggers fre e—and business a- gr ow in’ all the time, when somehow or
another a little repor t got around last night that I had a way of
put t in’ in my time with a private jug on the sly. A nigger rou sted me
out this morn in ’, and told me the people was ge ther in’ on the quiet
with their dogs and hor ses, and they’d be along pretty soon and give
me ’bout half an hour ’s start, and then run me down if they coul d; and
if they got me they’d tar and feather me and ride me on a ra il, sure.
I didn’t wait for no breakfa st —I warn’t hungr y.”

“O ld man,” said the young one, “I reckon we might double- te am it
together ; what do you think ?”

“I ain’t un dispo sed. What’s your lin e— main ly?”

“ J our prin ter by trade ; do a little in pat ent medi cin es;
theat er- ac tor — traged y, you know; take a turn to mes mer is m and
ph ren olog y when there’s a chance; te ach sing ing- ge ogra phy school for a
chang e; sl ing a lecture some tim es— oh, I do lots of thing s— most
anything that comes handy, so it ain’t work. What’s your la y?”

“I’ve done consider ble in the doctor ing way in my time. La yin’ on o’
hands is my best hol t— for can cer and par al ysi s, and sich things; and
I k’n tell a fortune pretty good when I’ve got somebody along to find
out the facts for me. P rea ch in ’s my line, too, and work in’
camp-meet in ’s, and missi on ar yin’ around.”

Nobody never said anything for a whi le; then the young man hove a si gh
and says:

“Alas !”

“What ’re you al as s in’ about?” says the bald head.

“To think I should have lived to be leading such a life, and be
de gra ded down into such company .” And he begun to wi pe the corner of
his eye with a ra g.

“D er n your skin, ain’t the company good enough for you?” says the
bald head, pretty per t and up pi sh .

“Yes, it is good enough for me; it’s as good as I deser ve; for who
fetched me so low when I was so high ? I did myself. I don’t blame
you, gentlemen — far from it; I don’t blame any body. I deser ve it
all. Let the cold world do its wor st; one thing I know — there’s a
grave somewhere for me. The world may go on just as it’s always done,
and take everything from me— loved ones, proper ty, everything; but it
can’t take that. Some day I’ll lie down in it and forget it all, and
my poor broken heart will be at re st.” He went on a- wi p ing.

“D rot your pore broken hear t,” says the bald head ; “what are you
hea ving your pore broken heart at us f ’r ? We hain’t done nothing.”

“No, I know you haven ’t. I ain’t bla ming you, gentle men. I
brought myself down — yes, I did it myself. It’s right I should
suffer — perfectly right —I don’t make any moan .”

“B r ought you down from whar ? Wh ar was you brought down from?”

“Ah, you would not believe me; the world never believ es— let it
pas s— ’t is no matter. The secret of my bir th —”

“The secret of your bir th ! Do you mean to say —”

“G ent lemen ,” says the young man, very solemn, “I will reve al it to
you, for I feel I may have confidence in you. By rights I am a duke !”

Jim’s eyes bu gged out when he heard that; and I reckon mine did, too.
Then the bald head says: “No! you can’t mean it?”

“Yes. My great - grand father, el dest son of the Duke of Bri dge water,
fled to this country about the end of the last cent ur y, to breathe the
p ure air of freed om ; married here, and died, leaving a son, his own
father dying about the same time. The second son of the late duke
seized the tit les and est at es —the inf ant real duke was ignor ed. I am
the lin e al descen dant of that in fan t —I am the right ful Duke of
Bri dge water; and here am I, for lor n, torn from my high estate, hunted
of men, desp ised by the cold world, ra gg ed, wor n, hear t bro ken, and
de gra ded to the companion ship of fel ons on a raft !”

Jim piti ed him ever so much, and so did I. We tried to comfor t him,
but he said it warn’t much use, he couldn’t be much comfor ted; said if
we was a mind to ac knowledge him, that would do him more good than
most anything else; so we said we would, if he would tell us how. He
said we ought to bow when we spoke to him, and say “Your Gr ac e,” or
“My Lor d,” or “Your Lor d ship ”—and he wouldn’t mind it if we called
him plain “B ri dge water ,” which, he said, was a tit le anyway, and not a
na me; and one of us ought to wait on him at dinner, and do any little
thing for him he wanted done.

Well, that was all eas y, so we done it. All through dinner Jim stood
around and waited on him, and says, “Will yo’ Gr ace have some o’ dis
or some o’ dat ?” and so on, and a body could see it was mighty
pleas ing to him.

But the old man got pretty silent by and b y— didn’t have much to say,
and didn’t look pretty comfortable over all that pe tting that was
going on around that duke. He seemed to have something on his mind.
So, along in the afternoon, he says:

“Looky here, Bilge water ,” he says, “I’m nation sorry for you, but you
ain’t the only person that’s had troubles like that.”

“No ?”

“No, you ain ’t. You ain’t the only person that’s ben sna ked down
wrong fully out’n a high place.”

“Alas !”

“No, you ain’t the only person that’s had a secret of his bir th.” And,
by jings, he begins to cr y.

“ Hol d! What do you mean?”

“B ilge water, kin I trust you?” says the old man, still sort of
so bb ing.

“To the bitter death !” He took the old man by the hand and squee zed
it, and says, “That secret of your be ing: spea k !”

“B ilge water, I am the late Da up hin !”

You bet you, Jim and me stared this time. Then the duke says:

“You are what?”

“Yes, my friend, it is too tru e— your eyes is look in’ at this very
moment on the pore disappeared Da up h in, Loo y the S even teen, son of
Loo y the Si x teen and Mar ry An t one t te .”

“You ! At your ag e! No ! You mean you’re the late Char le mag ne ; you must
be six or seven hundred years old, at the very lea st.”

“T r oub le has done it, Bilge water, trouble has done it; trouble has
brung these gray hair s and this pre mat ure bald itud e. Yes, gentlemen,
you see before you, in blue je ans and miser y, the wand er in ’, ex i led,
tramp led- on, and suffer in’ right ful King of Fran ce.”

Well, he cried and took on so that me and Jim didn’t know hardly what
to do, we was so sor ry —and so glad and proud we’d got him with us,
too. So we set in, like we done before with the duke, and tried to
comfor t him. But he said it warn’t no use, nothing but to be dead
and done with it all could do him any good; though he said it often
made him feel easier and better for a while if people treated him
according to his right s, and got down on one kne e to speak to him, and
always called him “Your Majest y,” and waited on him first at me als,
and didn’t set down in his presence till he asked them. So Jim and me
set to majest ying him, and doing this and that and t’other for him,
and standing up till he told us we might set down. This done him hea ps
of good, and so he got cheer ful and comfortable. But the duke kind of
s oured on him, and didn’t look a bit satisfied with the way things was
go ing; still, the king acted real friendly towards him, and said the
duke’s great - grand father and all the other Du kes of Bilge water was a
good deal thought of by his father, and was allowed to come to the
palace consider ab le; but the duke stayed hu ffy a good while, till by
and by the king says:

“L i ke as not we got to be together a blamed long time on this h - yer
raft, Bilge water, and so what’s the use o’ your bein’ sour ? It ’ll
only make things on comfortable. It ain’t my fault I warn’t born a
duke, it ain’t your fault you warn’t born a king —so what’s the use to
wor ry ? Ma ke the best o’ things the way you find ’em, says I —that’s my
mo t to. This ain’t no bad thing that we’ve struck here— plenty g ru b and
an easy life — come, give us your hand, duke, and le’s all be friend s.”

The duke done it, and Jim and me was pretty glad to see it. It took
away all the un comfort ablen ess and we felt mighty good over it,
because it would ’a’ been a miserable business to have any
un friend lin ess on the raft; for what you wan t, above all things, on a
raft, is for everybody to be satisfied, and feel right and kind
towards the others.

It didn’t take me long to make up my mind that these li ars warn’t no
kings nor du kes at all, but just low-down hum bu gs and fraud s. But I
never said nothing, never let on; kept it to myself; it’s the best
way; then you don’t have no quarrel s, and don’t get into no trouble.
If they wanted us to call them kings and du kes, I hadn’t no
objec ti ons, ’long as it would keep pe ace in the fami ly; and it warn’t
no use to tell Jim, so I didn’t tell him. If I never learnt nothing
else out of pap, I learnt that the best way to get along with his kind
of people is to let them have their own way.




CHAPTER XX


They asked us considerable many questi on s; wanted to know what we
covered up the raft that way for, and laid by in the daytime instead
of run n ing— was Jim a runaway nigger ? Says I :

“Goo dn ess sak es! would a runaway nigger run sou th ?”

No, they allowed he wouldn’t. I had to account for things some way, so
I says:

“My folks was living in Pi ke Coun ty, in Missou ri , where I was born,
and they all died off but me and pa and my brother I ke. P a, he ’lowed
he’d break up and go down and live with Uncle B en, who ’s got a little
one-horse place on the river forty- four mile below Orleans. Pa was
pretty poor, and had some deb ts; so when he’d squ ared up there warn’t
nothing left but sixteen dollars and our nigger, Jim. That warn’t
enough to take us fourteen hundred mile, deck passage nor no other
way. Well, when the river rose pa had a streak of luck one day; he
ketched this piece of a raft; so we reckoned we’d go down to Orleans
on it. Pa ’s luck didn’t hold out; a steamboat run over the for r ard
corner of the raft one night, and we all went overboard and do ve under
the wheel ; Jim and me come up all right, but pa was drunk, and I ke was
only four years old, so they never come up no more. Well, for the next
day or two we had considerable trouble, because people was always
coming out in ski ffs and trying to take Jim away from me, saying they
believed he was a runaway nigger. We don’t run day times no more now;
nights they don’t bother us.”

The duke says:

“L ea ve me alone to ci p her out a way so we can run in the daytime if we
want to. I’ll think the thing over —I’ll invent a plan that ’ll fix
it. We’ll let it alone for to-day, because of course we don’t want to
go by that town yonder in day light —it mightn’t be heal th y.”

T ow ards night it begun to dar ken up and look like ra in; the
he at- lightning was squir ting around low down in the sky, and the
leaves was beginning to shiver —it was going to be pretty ug ly, it was
easy to see that. So the duke and the king went to over haul ing our
wigwam, to see what the be ds was like. My bed was a straw tick — better
than Jim ’s, which was a corn- shuck tick ; there’s always co bs around
about in a shuck ti ck, and they poke into you and hur t; and when you
roll over the dry shucks sound like you was ro lling over in a pile of
dead leav es; it makes such a rust ling that you wake up. Well, the duke
allowed he would take my bed; but the king allowed he wouldn’t. He
says:

“I should ’a’ reckoned the difference in rank would a se jest ed to you
that a corn- shuck bed warn’t just fitten for me to sleep on. Your
Gr ace ’ll take the shuck bed yourself.”

Jim and me was in a sweat again for a minute, being afraid there was
going to be some more trouble amongst them; so we was pretty glad when
the duke says:

“’ T is my fate to be always ground into the mir e under the iron he el of
op pressi on. Mis fortune has broken my once ha ugh ty spir it; I y i el d, I
sub m it; ’t is my f ate. I am alone in the worl d— let me suffer ; I can
bear it.”

We got away as soon as it was good and dark. The king told us to stand
well out towards the middle of the river, and not show a light till we
got a long ways below the town. We come in sight of the little bunch
of lights by and by —that was the town, you know —and slid by, about a
half a mile out, all right. When we was three- quarters of a mile below
we ho i sted up our signal lanter n; and about ten o’clock it come on to
rain and blow and thunder and light en like everything; so the king
told us to both stay on watch till the weather got better ; then him
and the duke crawled into the wigwam and turned in for the night. It
was my watch below till twel ve, but I wouldn’t ’a’ turned in anyway if
I’d had a bed, because a body don’t see such a storm as that every day
in the week, not by a long sight. My soul s, how the wind did scream
along ! And every second or two there’d come a gl are that lit up the
white- ca ps for a half a mile around, and you’d see the islands looking
du sty through the rain, and the trees thr ashing around in the wind ;
then comes a h - wha ck !— b um! b um! b um ble - um ble - um-b um-b um-b um-b um —and
the thunder would go rum bling and grum bling away, and qu it—and then
rip comes another flash and another so ck- do la g er. The wa ves most
washed me off the raft sometimes, but I hadn’t any clothes on, and
didn’t mind. We didn’t have no trouble about snag s; the lightning
was gl aring and fl it tering around so constant that we could see them
plenty soon enough to throw her head this way or that and miss them.

I had the middle watch, you know, but I was pretty sleepy by that
time, so Jim he said he would stand the first half of it for me; he
was always mighty good that way, Jim was. I crawled into the wigwam,
but the king and the duke had their legs sp ra wled around so there
warn’t no show for me; so I laid out side —I didn’t mind the rain,
because it was war m, and the wa ves warn’t running so high now. About
two they come up again, though, and Jim was going to call me; but he
changed his mind, because he reckoned they warn’t high enough yet to
do any harm ; but he was mistaken about that, for pretty soon all of a
sudden along comes a regular ri pper and washed me over bo ard. It most
killed Jim a- laughing. He was the easi est nigger to laugh that ever
was, anyway.

I took the watch, and Jim he laid down and snor ed away; and by and by
the storm let up for good and all; and the first cab in- light that
showed I rou sted him out, and we slid the raft into hi ding- quarters
for the day.

The king got out an old rat ty deck of cards after breakfast, and him
and the duke played seven - up awhile, five cents a gam e. Then they got
tired of it, and allowed they would “ lay out a campaig n ,” as they
called it. The duke went down into his carpet-bag , and fetched up a
lot of little printed bills and read them out lou d. One bill said,
“The celebrated Dr. Arm and de Mon tal ban , of Par is,” would “ lecture on
the S ci ence of P h ren olog y ” at such and such a place, on the bl ank day
of blan k, at ten cents ad mission, and “ furnish char ts of character at
twenty-five cents a pie ce.” The duke said that was him. In another
bill he was the “ worl d- ren owned Shak espe ari an trage di an, Garrick the
Youn g er, of Dr ury Lane, London .” In other bills he had a lot of other
names and done other wonderful things, like finding water and gold
with a “ di vin ing- ro d,” “ di ssi p ating witch spell s,” and so on. By and
by he says:

“But the hi stri onic m use is the dar ling. Have you ever tro d the
boards, Royal t y?”

“No,” says the king.

“You sha ll, then, before you’re three days ol der, F all en G ran de ur ,”
says the duke. “The first good town we come to we’ll hi re a hall and
do the s wor d- fight in ’ Richard II I .’ and the bal con y scene in ’ Romeo
and Juli et .’ How does that strike you?”

“I’m in, up to the hu b, for anything that will pa y, Bilge water; but,
you see, I don’t know nothing about pla y- ac tin ’, and hain’t ever seen
much of it. I was too small when pap used to have ’em at the pal ac e.
Do you reckon you can learn me?”

“E as y!”

“All right. I’m jist a- fre e z in’ for something fresh , anyway. Le’s
commence right away.”

So the duke he told him all about who Romeo was and who Juli et was,
and said he was used to being Rome o, so the king could be Juli et.

“But if Juli e t’s such a young g al, duke, my pe eled head and my white
whiskers is goin’ to look on common odd on her, may be.”

“No, don’t you wor ry; these country ja kes won’t ever think of that.
Besides, you know, you’ll be in costum e, and that makes all the
difference in the worl d; Juli e t’s in a bal con y, en jo ying the moon light
before she goes to bed, and she’s got on her night gown and her ru ffled
night cap . Here are the costum es for the part s.”

He got out two or three curtain - calico suit s, which he said was
me ed y evil arm or for Richard III. and t’other cha p, and a long white
cott on night shirt and a ru ffled night cap to mat ch. The king was
satisfi ed; so the duke got out his book and read the parts over in the
most splendid sp rea d- eag le way, pr ancing around and acting at the same
time, to show how it had got to be don e; then he give the book to the
king and told him to get his part by heart.

There was a little one-horse town about three mile down the ben d, and
after dinner the duke said he had ci pher ed out his idea about how to
run in daylight without it being danger some for Jim; so he allowed he
would go down to the town and fix that thing. The king allowed he
would go, too, and see if he couldn’t strike something. We was out of
coffee, so Jim said I better go along with them in the canoe and get
som e.

When we got there there warn’t nobody stir r ing; streets emp ty, and
perfectly dead and still, like Sun day. We found a sick nigger sun ning
himself in a back yard, and he said everybody that warn’t too young or
too sick or too old was gone to camp-meet ing, about two mile back in
the woods. The king got the directi ons, and allowed he’d go and work
that camp- meeting for all it was wor th, and I might go, too.

The duke said what he was after was a prin ting- offi ce. We found it; a
little bit of a concer n, up over a carpen ter- shop — carpen ters and
pr inter s all gone to the meet ing, and no doors locked. It was a dirty,
lit ter ed-up place, and had ink - mar ks, and hand bills with pictures of
horses and runaway niggers on them, all over the wall s. The duke shed
his coat and said he was all right now. So me and the king lit out for
the camp-meet ing.

We got there in about a half an hour fairly dri pp ing, for it was a
most awful hot day. There was as much as a thousand people there from
twenty mile around. The woods was full of te am s and wag ons, hitched
everywher es, fe ed ing out of the wag on- tr ough s and stom ping to keep off
the fli es. There was she ds made out of po les and roof ed over with
bran ches, where they had le mon ade and g ing er bread to se ll, and pi les
of watermel ons and green cor n and su ch- like truck .

The prea ching was going on under the same kinds of she ds, only they
was bigger and held crow ds of people. The ben ches was made out of
outside slab s of lo gs, with holes bor ed in the round side to drive
sti cks into for leg s. They didn’t have no back s. The preach ers had
high plat form s to stand on at one end of the she ds. The women had on
sun-bon ne ts; and some had lin se y- woo l sey fro cks, some g ing ham ones,
and a few of the young ones had on ca li co. Some of the young men was
bare foo ted, and some of the children didn’t have on any clothes but
just a tow - linen shir t. Some of the old women was kn itt ing, and some
of the young folks was cour ting on the sly.

The first shed we come to the preacher was lining out a hy m n. He lined
out two lin es, everybody sung it, and it was kind of grand to hear it,
there was so many of them and they done it in such a rou sing way; then
he lined out two more for them to sing —and so on. The people woke up
more and more, and sung lou der and lou der ; and towards the end some
begun to gro an, and some begun to sh out. Then the preacher begun to
prea ch, and begun in earne st, too; and went wea ving first to one side
of the plat form and then the other, and then a- leaning down over the
front of it, with his arms and his body going all the time, and
shouting his words out with all his might ; and every now and then he
would hold up his Bible and spread it open, and kind of pass it around
this way and that, shout ing, “It’s the bra z en ser p ent in the
wilder ness ! Look upon it and live !” And people would sh out out,
“G lor y !— A- a- men !” And so he went on, and the people groan ing and
crying and saying amen :

“Oh, come to the mour ner s’ ben ch ! come, black with sin ! ( amen !)
come, sick and sor e! ( amen !) come, lame and hal t and bl ind !
( amen !) come, pore and need y, sunk in sha me! ( a- a- men !) come, all
that’s worn and so iled and suffer ing !— come with a broken spir it! come
with a contr ite hear t! come in your rags and sin and dir t! the wa ters
that clean se is free, the door of hea ven stands open —oh, enter in and
be at rest !” ( a- a- men ! glor y, glor y ha ll el u ja h !)

And so on. You couldn’t make out what the preacher said any more, on
account of the shouting and crying. F ol ks got up everywher es in the
crowd, and worked their way just by main strength to the mour ner s’
ben ch, with the tears running down their fac es; and when all the
mourn ers had got up there to the front ben ches in a crowd, they sung
and shouted and flung themselves down on the stra w, just cra zy and
wil d.

Well, the first I knowed the king got a- going, and you could hear him
over everybody; and next he went a- char ging up onto the plat form, and
the preacher he begged him to speak to the people, and he done it. He
told them he was a pir at e— been a pirate for thirty years out in the
Indian O ce an —and his cre w was thin ned out considerable last spring in
a fi ght, and he was home now to take out some fresh men, and thanks to
goodness he’d been robbed last night and put ashore off of a steamboat
without a c ent, and he was glad of it; it was the ble s se dest thing
that ever happened to him, because he was a changed man now, and happy
for the first time in his life; and, poor as he was, he was going to
start right off and work his way back to the Indian O ce an, and put in
the rest of his life trying to turn the pirates into the true pa th;
for he could do it better than anybody else, being acquain ted with all
pirate cre ws in that o ce an ; and though it would take him a long time
to get there without money, he would get there anyway, and every time
he convinced a pirate he would say to him, “Don’t you thank me, don’t
you give me no cred it; it all belongs to them dear people in Po k eville
camp-meet ing, natural brothers and bene factor s of the rac e, and that
dear preacher there, the tru est friend a pirate ever ha d!”

And then he busted into te ars, and so did everybody. Then somebody
sings out, “Take up a collection for him, take up a collec tion !” Well,
a half a dozen made a jump to do it, but somebody sings out, “Let
him pass the hat around !” Then everybody said it, the preacher too.

So the king went all through the crowd with his hat, swa bbing his
eyes, and ble ssing the people and pra ising them and than king them for
being so good to the poor pirates away off there; and every little
while the pre tti est kind of girls, with the tears running down their
cheeks, would up and ask him would he let them kiss him for to
remember him by; and he always done it; and some of them he hugged and
kissed as many as five or six tim es —and he was inv ited to stay a
wee k; and everybody wanted him to live in their houses, and said
they’d think it was an hon or ; but he said as this was the last day of
the camp- meeting he couldn’t do no good, and besides he was in a sweat
to get to the Indian O ce an right off and go to work on the pir at es.

When we got back to the raft and he come to count up he found he had
collec ted eight y- seven dollars and se vent y- five cent s. And then he had
fetched away a three- gall on jug of whisk y, too, that he found under a
wagon when he was starting home through the woods. The king said, take
it all around, it laid over any day he’d ever put in in the
missi on ar ying line. He said it warn’t no use talking, hea then s don’t
amount to shucks along side of pirates to work a camp- meeting with.

The duke was thinking he’d been doing pretty well till the king
come to show up, but after that he didn’t think so so much. He
had set up and printed off two little job s for farm ers in that
prin ting- offi ce— horse bill s—and took the money, four dollars. And he
had got in ten dollar s’ worth of advertise ments for the paper, which
he said he would put in for four dollars if they would pay in
advan ce —so they done it. The price of the paper was two dollars a
year, but he took in three sub scri p tions for half a dollar apiece on
condition of them paying him in advan ce; they were going to pay in
cor d wood and oni ons as usual, but he said he had just bought the
concer n and knocked down the price as low as he could afford it, and
was going to run it for cas h . He set up a little piece of poe tr y,
which he made, himself, out of his own head — three ver se s— kind of
sweet and sa d dish —the name of it was, “Yes, cr ush, cold world, this
breaking hear t ”—and he left that all set up and ready to print in the
paper, and didn’t charge nothing for it. Well, he took in nine dollars
and a half, and said he’d done a pretty square day ’s work for it.

Then he showed us another little job he’d printed and hadn’t charged
for, because it was for us. It had a picture of a runaway nigger with
a bundle on a stick over his shoulder, and “ $ 2 00 re war d ” under it. The
reading was all about Jim and just described him to a do t. It said he
run away from St. J acqu es ’s plantation, forty mile below New Orleans,
last w inter , and likely went north, and whoever would catch him and
send him back he could have the reward and expen ses.

“N ow,” says the duke, “ after to-night we can run in the daytime if we
want to. When ever we see anybody coming we can tie Jim hand and foot
with a rope, and lay him in the wigwam and show this hand bill and say
we cap tured him up the river, and were too poor to travel on a
steamboat, so we got this little raft on credit from our friends and
are going down to get the re ward. H and cu ffs and chains would look
still better on Jim, but it wouldn’t go well with the story of us
being so po or. Too much like jewel ry. R op es are the correct thing— we
must preserve the un iti es, as we say on the board s.”

We all said the duke was pretty smar t, and there couldn’t be no
trouble about running day times. We judged we could make miles enough
that night to get out of the reach of the powwow we reckoned the
duke’s work in the prin ting- office was going to make in that little
town; then we could bo om right along if we wanted to.

We laid low and kept still, and never shoved out till nearly ten
o’clo ck ; then we slid by, pretty wide away from the town, and didn’t
ho ist our lantern till we was clear out of sight of it.

When Jim called me to take the watch at four in the morning, he says:

“H uck , does you reck’n we gwyne to run acro st any mo’ kings on dis
tri p ?”

“No,” I says, “I reckon not.”

“Well,” says he, “ dat’s all right, d en. I doan’ mine one er two kings,
but dat’s enough. D is one’s powerful drunk, en de duke ain’ much
better .”

I found Jim had been trying to get him to talk Fren ch, so he could
hear what it was like ; but he said he had been in this country so
long, and had so much trouble, he’d forgot it.




CHAPTER XX I


It was after sun-up now, but we went right on and didn’t tie up. The
king and the duke turned out by and by looking pretty rust y; but after
they’d jumped overboard and took a swim it chi pper ed them up a good
de al. After breakfast the king he took a seat on the corner of the
raft, and pulled off his boots and rolled up his br itch es, and let his
legs dang le in the water, so as to be comfortable, and lit his pipe,
and went to getting his “ Romeo and Juli et ” by heart. When he had got
it pretty good him and the duke begun to practi se it together. The
duke had to learn him over and over again how to say every spee ch ; and
he made him sigh , and put his hand on his heart, and after a while he
said he done it pretty well ; “ on ly,” he says, “you mustn’t be llow out
Rome o! that way, like a bull —you must say it soft and sick and
langu i sh y, so— R - o- o- me o! that is the idea ; for Juli e t’s a dear sweet
mere child of a girl, you know, and she do es n’t b ray like a jack as s.”

Well, next they got out a couple of long s words that the duke made out
of oa k la ths, and begun to practi se the s wor d- fight —the duke called
himself Richard II I . ; and the way they laid on and pr anced around the
raft was grand to see. But by and by the king tri pped and fell
over board, and after that they took a rest, and had a talk about all
kinds of adventures they’d had in other times along the river.

After dinner the duke says:

“Well, Ca pe t, we’ll want to make this a first- cl ass show, you know, so
I guess we’ll ad d a little more to it. We want a little something to
answer en cor es with, any way.”

“What’s on k or es, Bilge water ?”

The duke told him, and then says:

“I’ll answer by doing the Hi gh land fling or the sail or ’s hor n pi pe ; and
you —well, let me see —oh, I’ve got it— you can do H amlet’s
so li lo qu y.”

“H amlet’s whi ch?”

“H amlet’s so li lo qu y, you know; the most celebrated thing in
Shak espe are. Ah, it’s sub li me, sub li me! Al ways fet ches the house. I
haven’t got it in the book — I’ve only got one volu me— but I reckon I
can piece it out from memory. I’ll just walk up and down a minute, and
see if I can call it back from recollec tion ’s vaul ts.”

So he went to mar ching up and down, thinking, and fr own ing horrible
every now and then; then he would ho ist up his eyebr ow s; next he would
squee ze his hand on his forehead and stag ger back and kind of moan ;
next he would sigh , and next he’d let on to drop a te ar. It was
beautiful to see him. By and by he got it. He told us to give
attention. Then he strikes a most noble att itud e, with one leg shoved
forwar ds, and his arms stretched away up, and his head tilted back,
looking up at the sk y; and then he begins to rip and ra ve and gr it his
tee th; and after that, all through his speech, he how led, and spread
around, and swelled up his ch est, and just knocked the spo ts out of
any acting ever I see before. This is the spee ch —I learned it, easy
enough, while he was learning it to the king :

To be, or not to be; that is the bare bod kin
That makes cal am ity of so long life;
For who would far de ls be ar, till B ir n am W ood do come to
Dun sin an e,
But that the fear of something after death
M ur ders the innocent sleep,
Great nature ’s second course,
And makes us rather sl ing the arr ows of outrage ous fortune
Th an fly to others that we know not of.
There’s the respe ct must give us pa use :
W ake Duncan with thy kno ck ing ! I would th ou coul d st;
For who would bear the whi ps and scor ns of time,
The op pres sor ’s wrong, the proud man’s cont u me ly,
The law ’s dela y, and the quiet us which his p ang s might take,
In the dead waste and middle of the night, when chur ch yards
yaw n
In custom ary suits of solemn black,
But that the un discovered country from whose bour ne no
travel er return s,
B rea thes forth cont ag ion on the world,
And th us the n ative h ue of re solu tion, like the poor cat i ’ the
ad age,
Is sick lied o’ er with care,
And all the clouds that low ered o’ er our house top s,
With this regard their curr ents turn a wr y,
And lose the name of action.
’ T is a con sum mation dev out ly to be wi shed. But soft you, the
fair O p he li a :
O pe not thy pon der ous and mar ble jaw s,
But get the e to a n un ner y— go !

Well, the old man he liked that speech, and he mighty soon got it so
he could do it first- rat e. It seemed like he was just born for it; and
when he had his hand in and was excited, it was perfectly lovely the
way he would rip and tear and ra ir up behind when he was getting it off.

The first chance we got the duke he had some show - bills prin ted; and
after that, for two or three days as we floated along, the raft was a
most uncommon li vely place, for there warn’t nothing but s wor d- fi gh ting
and re hear sing — as the duke called it— going on all the time. One
morning, when we was pretty well down the state of Arkan saw, we come
in sight of a little one-horse town in a big ben d; so we tied up about
three- quarters of a mile above it, in the mouth of a crick which was
shut in like a tun nel by the cy press trees, and all of us but Jim took
the canoe and went down there to see if there was any chance in that
place for our show.

We struck it mighty luck y; there was going to be a circus there that
afternoon, and the country- people was already beginning to come in, in
all kinds of old sha ck ly wag ons, and on horse s. The circus would leave
before night, so our show would have a pretty good chance. The duke he
hi red the court house, and we went around and stuck up our bill s. They
read like this:


Shak sper e an Rev i val ! ! !
W on der ful At trac ti on!
For One N ight On ly !
The worl d- ren owned trage di ans,
Da v id Garrick the young er, of Dr ury Lan e Theat re, London,
and
Ed mun d Kean the el der, of the Royal Ha y mar ket Theat re,
Whi te cha pe l, P u dding Lane, P ic ca di lly, London, and the
Royal Contin ental Theat re s, in their sub li me
Shak sper e an Spe ctac le entit led
The Bal con y S cen e
in
Romeo and Juli et ! ! !
Rome o ........ ........ .. . Mr. Garrick
Juli et ........ ........ .. Mr. Kean
Assi sted by the whole strength of the company !
New costum es, new sc ener y, new ap point ment s!
Al so:
The thri ll ing, master ly, and bloo d- cur d ling
B road - s word conf li ct
In Richard III. ! ! !
Richard II I ........ .... . Mr. Garrick
Rich mon d ........ ........ Mr. Kean
Al so:
( by special requ est )
H amlet’s Im mor tal So li lo qu y ! !
By the Ill u stri ous Ke an !
D one by him 3 00 con secu tive nights in Par is !
For One N ight On ly,
On account of imper ative Eu rope an engag em ent s!
Ad mission 2 5 cent s; children and servan ts, 1 0 cent s.


Then we went loaf ing around town. The stor es and houses was most all
old, sha ck ly, dri ed-up fra me concer ns that hadn’t ever been pain ted;
they was set up three or four foot above ground on st il ts, so as to be
out of reach of the water when the river was over flow ed. The houses
had little gard ens around them, but they didn’t seem to raise hardly
anything in them but j imp son we ed s, and sun flow ers, and ash- pi les, and
old cur led- up boots and sho es, and pieces of bott les, and rags, and
pla ye d- out tin war e. The f ences was made of different kinds of boards,
nailed on at different times; and they leaned every which way, and had
g ates that didn’t generly have but one hing e— a leather one. Some of the
f ences had been whitewashed some time or another, but the duke said
it was in Col um bus ’s time, like enough. There was generly hogs in the
gard en, and people driving them out.

All the stor es was along one street. They had white dom esti c aw nings in
front, and the country- people hitched their horses to the aw ning- post s.
There was empty dr y- goo ds boxes under the aw n ings, and loafers roo sting
on them all day long, whi tt ling them with their Bar low kni v es; and
cha wing tobac co, and gaping and yaw ning and stret ch ing —a mighty ornery
lot. They generly had on yellow straw ha ts most as wide as an um bre ll a,
but didn’t wear no co ats nor waist co at s; they called one another Bi ll,
and Buck, and Han k, and Jo e, and An dy, and talked lazy and draw ly, and
used considerable many cus s- words. There was as many as one loaf er
leaning up against every aw ning- po st, and he most always had his hands
in his britches pockets, except when he fetched them out to l end a chaw
of tobacco or scrat ch. What a body was hearing amongst them all the
time was :

“G imme a chaw ’ v to back er, Han k.”

“C ain ’t; I hain’t got but one chaw left. A s k Bill .”

Maybe Bill he gives him a cha w ; maybe he lies and says he ain’t got
n one. Some of them kinds of loafers never has a cent in the world,
nor a chaw of tobacco of their own. They get all their cha wing by
bor row ing; they say to a fellow, “I wisht you’d len ’ me a cha w, J ack, I
jist this minute give Ben Th om p son the last chaw I ha d ” —which is a lie
pretty much every time; it don’t fool nobody but a strang er; but Jack
ain’t no stranger, so he says:

“You give him a cha w, did you? So did your sister’s cat ’s
grand mother. You pay me back the cha ws you’ve aw ready bor ry ’d off ’n me,
L af e Buck ner, then I’ll lo an you one or two ton of it, and won’t charge
you no back in trust, nuther.”

“Well, I did pay you back some of it wun st.”

“Yes, you di d— ’bout six cha w s. You bor ry ’d store tobac ker and paid back
nigger - head.”

St ore tobacco is flat black plu g, but these fellows mostly cha ws the
natural leaf twi sted. When they borrow a chaw they don’t generly cut
it off with a kni fe, but set the plug in between their tee th, and g na w
with their teeth and tu g at the plug with their hands till they get it
in two ; then sometimes the one that owns the tobacco looks mournful at
it when it’s handed back, and says, sar ca stic :

“H ere, gimme the cha w, and you take the plu g .”

[Illustration: “G IM M E A CHA W ” ]

All the streets and lan es was just mu d; they warn’t nothing else but
mu d— mud as black as tar and nigh about a foot deep in some places,
and two or three inches deep in all the places. The hogs loaf ed and
gr un ted around everywher es. You’d see a mu d dy s ow and a lit ter of pi gs
come laz ying along the street and who ll op herself right down in the
way, where folks had to walk around her, and she’d stretch out and
shut her eyes and wave her ears whilst the pi gs was mil king her, and
look as happy as if she was on sa lar y. And pretty soon you’d hear a
loaf er sing out, “H i ! so bo y! sick him, T i ge !” and away the s ow would
go, squ e al ing most horri ble, with a dog or two swinging to each ear,
and three or four dozen more a-com ing; and then you would see all the
loafers get up and watch the thing out of sight, and laugh at the fun
and look grateful for the noi se. Then they’d settle back again till
there was a dog- fi ght. There couldn’t anything wake them up all over,
and make them happy all over, like a dog- fight — unless it might be
putting tur pent ine on a stra y dog and setting fire to him, or t ying a
tin pan to his tail and see him run himself to death.

On the river - front some of the houses was sticking out over the bank,
and they was bowed and b ent, and about ready to tum ble in. The people
had moved out of them. The bank was ca ved away under one corner of some
others, and that corner was hanging over. People lived in them yet, but
it was danger some, because sometimes a stri p of land as wide as a house
ca ves in at a time. Sometimes a be lt of land a quarter of a mile deep
will start in and cave along and cave along till it all ca ves into the
river in one sum m er. Such a town as that has to be always moving back,
and back, and back, because the river ’s always g na wing at it.

The nearer it got to no on that day the thick er and thick er was the
wag ons and horses in the street s, and more coming all the time.
F ami lies fetched their din n ers with them from the country, and eat them
in the wag ons. There was considerable whisky- drin king going on, and I
seen three fight s. By and by somebody sings out:

“Here comes old Bogg s !— in from the country for his little old mon th ly
drun k; here he comes, boy s!”

All the loafers looked gla d; I reckoned they was used to having fun out
of Bogg s. One of them says:

“W on der who he’s a-gwyne to chaw up this time. If he’d a- cha wed up all
the men he’s ben a-gwyne to chaw up in the last twenty year he’d have
considerable rup ut ation now.”

Another one says, “I wisht old Boggs ’d threat en me, ’ cuz then I’d know
I warn’t gwyne to die for a thous an’ year .”

Boggs comes a- tearing along on his hor se, whooping and yelling like an
Inj un, and singing out:

“C ler the trac k, th ar. I’m on the wa w - path, and the price uv coff ins is
a-gwyne to rai se.”

He was drunk, and wea ving about in his sadd le; he was over fifty year
old, and had a very red face. Everybody ye lled at him and laughed at
him and sa ssed him, and he sa ssed back, and said he’d attend to them
and lay them out in their regular tur n s, but he couldn’t wait now
because he’d come to town to kill old Colonel Sherbur n, and his mo t to
was, “M eat first, and spoon vitt les to top off on.”

He see me, and rode up and says:

“Wh ar ’d you come f ’m, bo y? You prepar ed to di e?”

Then he rode on. I was scared, but a man says:

“He don’t mean nothing; he’s always a- car ry in’ on like that when he’s
drun k. He’s the be st- nature dest old fool in Arkan saw — never hurt nobody,
drunk nor so ber.”

Boggs rode up before the bigg est store in town, and bent his head down
so he could see under the curtain of the aw ning and yell s:

“Come out here, Sherbur n ! Come out and meet the man you’ve s wind led.
You’re the h oun’ I’m af ter, and I’m a-gwyne to have you, too !”

And so he went on, calling Sherburn everything he could lay his tongue
to, and the whole street packed with people listening and laughing and
going on. By and by a prou d- looking man about fifty- fi ve —and he was a
heap the be st- dressed man in that town, too— steps out of the store, and
the crowd drops back on each side to let him come. He says to Bogg s,
mighty ca ’m and slow —he says:

“I’m tired of this, but I’ll end ure it till one o’clock. T ill one
o’clock, min d— no longer. If you open your mouth against me only once
after that time you can’t travel so far but I will find you.”

Then he turns and goes in. The crowd looked mighty so ber ; nobody
stir red, and there warn’t no more laughing. Boggs rode off
black guard ing Sherburn as loud as he could y ell, all down the street ;
and pretty soon back he comes and stop s before the store, still keeping
it up. Some men crowded around him and tried to get him to shut up, but
he wouldn ’t; they told him it would be one o’clock in about fifteen
minutes, and so he must go hom e— he must go right away. But it didn’t
do no good. He cussed away with all his might, and throwed his hat down
in the mud and rode over it, and pretty soon away he went a- raging down
the street again, with his gray hair a- fl ying. Everybody that could
get a chance at him tried their best to co ax him off of his horse so
they could lock him up and get him so ber ; but it warn’t no use — up the
street he would tear again, and give Sherburn another cus sing. By and
by somebody says:

“G o for his daughter !— quick, go for his daughter ; sometimes he’ll
listen to her. If anybody can persuade him, she can.”

So somebody started on a run. I walked down street a ways and stopped.
In about five or ten minutes here comes Boggs again, but not on his
hor se. He was a- re eling across the street towards me, bare headed, with
a friend on both sides of him a-holt of his arms and hurrying him
along. He was quiet, and looked uneas y; and he warn’t hanging back any,
but was doing some of the hurrying himself. Some body sings out:

“ Bogg s!”

I looked over there to see who said it, and it was that Colonel
Sherbur n. He was standing perfectly still in the street, and had a
pistol raised in his right hand —not aim ing it, but holding it out with
the barrel tilted up towards the sk y. The same second I see a young
girl coming on the run , and two men with her. Boggs and the men turned
round to see who called him, and when they see the pistol the men
jumped to one side, and the pistol - barrel come down slow and steady
to a level — both barre ls cock ed. Boggs throws up both of his hands and
says, “O Lor d, don’t shoo t !” B ang ! goes the first shot, and he stagg ers
back, c law ing at the air — bang! goes the second one, and he tum b les
back war ds onto the ground, heavy and solid, with his arms spread out.
That young girl screamed out and comes rus h ing, and down she throws
herself on her father, cry ing, and saying, “Oh, he’s killed him, he’s
killed him!” The crowd closed up around them, and shoulder ed and jam med
one another, with their necks stret ched, trying to see, and people on
the inside trying to shove them back and shout ing, “B ack, back ! give
him air, give him air !”

Colonel Sherburn he tossed his pistol onto the ground, and turned
around on his heels and walked off.

They took Boggs to a little dru g store, the crowd pressing around just
the same, and the whole town follow ing, and I rushed and got a good
place at the window, where I was close to him and could see in. They
laid him on the floor and put one large Bible under his head, and
opened another one and spread it on his brea st; but they tore open his
shirt first, and I seen where one of the bull ets went in. He made about
a dozen long gas ps, his breast li f ting the Bible up when he drawed
in his breath, and letting it down again when he brea thed it out —and
after that he laid still ; he was dead. Then they pulled his daughter
away from him, screaming and cry ing, and took her off. She was about
six teen, and very sweet and gentle looking, but awful pale and scared.

Well, pretty soon the whole town was there, squir ming and sc rou ging and
pushing and shoving to get at the window and have a look, but people
that had the places wouldn’t give them up, and folks behind them was
saying all the time, “Say, now, you’ve looked enough, you fell ow s;
’t ain’t right and ’t ain’t fair for you to stay th ar all the time, and
never give nobody a chance; other folks has their rights as well as
you.”

There was considerable jaw ing back, so I slid out, thinking maybe
there was going to be trouble. The streets was fu ll, and everybody was
excit ed. Everybody that seen the shooting was telling how it happened,
and there was a big crowd packed around each one of these fell ows,
stretching their necks and listening. One long, lan ky man, with long
hair and a big white fur st ove pipe hat on the back of his head, and a
cr oo ke d- hand led can e, marked out the places on the ground where Boggs
stood and where Sherburn stood, and the people following him around
from one place to t’other and watching everything he done, and bo bbing
their heads to show they under stood, and stoo ping a little and resting
their hands on their thi gh s to watch him mark the places on the ground
with his can e; and then he stood up straight and sti ff where Sherburn
had stood, fr own ing and having his hat- bri m down over his eyes, and
sung out, “ Bogg s!” and then fetched his cane down slow to a level , and
says “B ang !” staggered back war ds, says “B ang !” again, and fell down
flat on his back. The people that had seen the thing said he done it
perfe ct; said it was just exactly the way it all happened. Then as much
as a dozen people got out their bott les and treated him.

Well, by and by somebody said Sherburn ought to be lyn ched. In about a
minute everybody was saying it; so away they went, mad and yelling, and
snat ching down every cloth es- line they come to to do the hanging with.




CHAPTER XX II


They swarmed up towards Sherbur n’s house, a- whooping and raging like
Inj un s, and everything had to clear the way or get run over and tr om ped
to mus h, and it was awful to see. Chi l dr en was heel ing it ahead of the
mo b, screaming and trying to get out of the way; and every window along
the road was full of wom en’s heads, and there was nigger boys in every
tree, and bu cks and w en ches looking over every f ence; and as soon as
the mo b would get nearly to them they would break and sk add le back out
of reach. Lo ts of the women and girls was crying and taking on, scared
most to death.

They swarmed up in front of Sherbur n’s pal ings as thick as they could
j am together, and you couldn’t hear yourself think for the noi se. It
was a little twenty- foot y ard. Some sung out “T ear down the fence ! tear
down the fence !” Then there was a r ack et of ripping and tearing and
sm ash ing, and down she go es, and the front wall of the crowd begins to
roll in like a wa ve.

Just then Sherburn steps out onto the roof of his little front por ch,
with a double- barrel gun in his hand, and takes his stan d, perfectly
ca ’m and deli ber ate, not saying a word. The r ack et stopped, and the
wave sucked back.

Sherburn never said a word —just stood there, looking down. The
still ness was awful creep y and un comfortable. Sherburn run his eye
slow along the crow d; and wherever it struck the people tried a little
to out ga ze him, but they couldn ’t; they dropped their eyes and looked
snea k y. Then pretty soon Sherburn sort of laugh ed; not the pleasant
kind, but the kind that makes you feel like when you are eating bread
that’s got s and in it.

Then he says, slow and scor n ful :

“The idea of you lyn ching any bod y! It’s am us ing. The idea of you
thinking you had pl uck enough to lynch a man ! Because you’re brave
enough to tar and feather poor friend less cast - out women that come
along here, did that make you think you had gr it enough to lay your
hands on a man? Why, a man’s safe in the hands of ten thousand of
your kind — as long as it’s daytime and you’re not behind him.

“Do I know you? I know you clear through. I was born and raised in the
Sou th, and I’ve lived in the Nor th; so I know the average all around.
The average man’s a cow ard. In the Nor th he lets anybody walk over him
that wants to, and goes home and pra ys for a humble spirit to bear
it. In the Sou th one man, all by himself, has stopped a stage full
of men in the day time, and robbed the lot. Your news papers call you
a brave people so much that you think you are bra ver than any other
peop le — where as you’re just as bra ve, and no bra ver . Why don’t your
ju ries hang murder er s? Because they’re afraid the man’s friends will
shoo t them in the back, in the dark —and it’s just what they would do.

“So they always acqu it; and then a man goes in the night, with a
hundred m asked cow ards at his back, and lyn ches the rascal . Your
mistake is, that you didn’t bring a man with you; that’s one mista ke,
and the other is that you didn’t come in the dark and fetch your mas ks.
You brought part of a man — Buck Har kn ess, there —and if you hadn’t had
him to start you, you’d ’a’ taken it out in blow ing.

“You didn’t want to come. The average man don’t like trouble and
danger. You don’t like trouble and danger. But if only half a
man — like Buck Har kn ess, there— shou ts ’ L y n ch him ! lynch him !’ you’re
afraid to back down — afraid you’ll be found out to be what you
ar e— cow ard s—and so you raise a y ell, and hang yourselves onto that
half- a- man’s coat- tail , and come raging up here, swe aring what big
things you’re going to do. The piti fu lest thing out is a mo b ; that’s
what an ar my is —a mo b ; they don’t fight with cou rage that’s born in
them, but with cou rage that’s borrowed from their mas s, and from their
offi cer s. But a mo b without any man at the head of it is beneath
piti ful ness. Now the thing for you to do is to droo p your tail s and
go home and crawl in a hole. If any real lyn ch ing ’s going to be done it
will be done in the dark, Southern fashi on; and when they come they’ll
bring their mas ks, and fetch a man along. Now lea ve —and take your
half- a- man with you ” — tossing his gun up across his left arm and co cking
it when he says this.

The crowd washed back sudden, and then broke all a part, and went
tearing off every which way, and Buck Har kn ess he heel ed it after them,
looking tolerable che ap . I could ’a’ stayed if I wanted to, but I
didn’t want to.

I went to the circus and loaf ed around the back side till the watchman
went by, and then di ved in under the t ent. I had my twenty- dollar gold
piece and some other money, but I reckoned I better save it, because
there ain’t no telling how soon you are going to need it, away from
home and amongst strang ers that way. You can’t be too care ful. I ain’t
op posed to sp ending money on cir cu ses when there ain’t no other way,
but there ain’t no use in wa sting it on them.

It was a real bu lly circ us. It was the splen di dest sight that ever was
when they all come riding in, two and two, and gentleman and lady,
side by side, the men just in their draw ers and under shir ts, and no
shoes nor stir rup s, and resting their hands on their thi gh s easy and
comfort able —there must ’a’ been twenty of them —and every lady with
a lovely complex ion, and perfectly beautiful, and looking just like
a gang of real sure - enough que en s, and dressed in clothes that cost
mi llions of dollars, and just lit tered with di am on ds. It was a powerful
fine si ght; I never see anything so lovel y. And then one by one they
got up and stood, and went a- wea ving around the ring so gentle and
wa v y and grac e ful, the men looking ever so tall and air y and stra ight,
with their heads bo bbing and sk im ming along, away up there under the
t ent - roof, and every lady’s ro se- le af y dress fla pping soft and sil ky
around her hi ps, and she looking like the most lo ve liest par as ol .

And then faster and faster they went, all of them d anc ing, first
one foot out in the air and then the other, the horses leaning more
and more, and the ringmaster going round and round the cen ter po le,
crac king his whip and shouting “H i !— hi !” and the cl own crac king jo kes
behind him; and by and by all hands dropped the re ins, and every lady
put her kn uck les on her hi ps and every gentleman folded his arms, and
then how the horses did le an over and hum p themsel ves ! And so one after
the other they all skipped off into the ring, and made the sweet est bow
I ever see, and then sca m per ed out, and everybody clapped their hands
and went just about wil d.

Well, all through the circus they done the most astonish ing things;
and all the time that cl own carried on so it most killed the people.
The ringmaster couldn’t ever say a word to him but he was back at him
quick as a wink with the fun ni est things a body ever said; and how
he ever could think of so many of them, and so sudden and so p at,
was what I couldn’t no way understand. Why, I couldn’t ’a’ thought
of them in a year. And by and by a drunken man tried to get into the
r ing— said he wanted to ri de; said he could ride as well as anybody
that ever was. They ar gu ed and tried to keep him out, but he wouldn’t
list en, and the whole show come to a stand still. Then the people begun
to holl er at him and make fun of him, and that made him mad, and he
begun to rip and tear ; so that stirred up the people, and a lot of
men begun to pile down off of the ben ches and swarm toward the ring,
saying, “ K no ck him down ! throw him out!” and one or two women begun to
screa m. So, then, the ringmaster he made a little speech, and said he
hoped there wouldn’t be no disturbance, and if the man would promise
he wouldn’t make no more trouble he would let him ride if he thought
he could stay on the hor se. So everybody laughed and said all right,
and the man got on. The minute he was on, the horse begun to rip and
tear and jump and cavor t around, with two circus men hanging on to his
brid le trying to hold him, and the drunk man hanging on to his neck,
and his heels flying in the air every jum p, and the whole crowd of
people standing up shouting and laughing till tears rolled down. And at
last, sure enough, all the circus men could do, the horse broke loose,
and away he went like the very n ation, round and round the ring, with
that s ot laying down on him and hanging to his neck, with first one
leg hanging most to the ground on one side, and then t’other one on
t’other side, and the people just craz y. It warn’t funny to me, though ;
I was all of a trem ble to see his danger. But pretty soon he strugg led
up a stra ddle and grabbed the brid le, a- re eling this way and that; and
the next minute he sprung up and dropped the brid le and stoo d! and
the horse a-going like a house a fire, too. He just stood up there,
a- sailing around as easy and comfortable as if he warn’t ever drunk in
his life —and then he begun to pull off his clothes and sl ing them. He
shed them so thick they kind of clo gged up the air, and altogether he
shed seventeen suit s. And, then, there he was, slim and handsome, and
dressed the ga u diest and pre tti est you ever saw, and he lit into that
horse with his whip and made him fairly hum —and finally skipped off,
and made his bow and d anced off to the dressing- room, and everybody
just a- howling with pleasure and astonishment.

Then the ringmaster he see how he had been foo led, and he was the
sick est ringmaster you ever see, I reckon. Why, it was one of his
own men ! He had got up that joke all out of his own head, and never
let on to nobody. Well, I felt she epi sh enough to be took in so, but
I wouldn’t ’a’ been in that ring master ’s place, not for a thousand
dollars. I don’t know; there may be bu lli er cir cu ses than what that one
was, but I never struck them yet. Any ways, it was plenty good enough
for me; and wherever I run across it, it can have all of my custom
every time.

Well, that night we had our show ; but there warn’t only about twelve
people there— just enough to pay expen ses. And they laughed all the
time, and that made the duke ma d; and everybody left, anyway, before
the show was over, but one boy which was asleep. So the duke said these
Arkan saw lun k heads couldn’t come up to Shak espe ar e; what they wanted
was low com ed y —and maybe something ruther worse than low com ed y, he
reck one d. He said he could size their style. So next morning he got
some big sheets of wra pp ing- paper and some black pain t, and drawed off
some hand bill s, and stuck them up all over the village. The bills said:


AT THE C OU R T H OU SE !
FOR 3 N I GH T S ON L Y !
The W or l d- R en owned T rage di ans
DA VI D G AR RI CK THE YOU N G ER !
AND
E D M UN D K E AN THE EL D ER !
Of the London and Contin ental
Theat re s,
In their Th ri lling T rage dy of
THE K IN G ’S C A M E LE O P AR D,
OR
THE RO Y AL N ON ES U CH ! ! !
Ad mission 5 0 cent s.

Then at the bottom was the bigg est line of all, which said:

L AD I ES AND CH I L D R EN NOT AD MIT T ED

“Ther e,” says he, “if that line don’t fetch them, I don’t know
Arkan saw !”




CHAPTER XX III


Well, all day him and the king was hard at it, ri gging up a stage and
a curtain and a row of candles for foot light s; and that night the
house was j am full of men in no time. When the place couldn’t hold no
more, the duke he quit ten ding door and went around the back way and
come onto the stage and stood up before the curtain and made a little
speech, and p raised up this traged y, and said it was the most
thri ll ing est one that ever was; and so he went on a- bra gging about the
traged y, and about Ed mun d Kean the E l der, which was to play the main
principal part in it; and at last when he’d got everybod y’s
expe ct ations up high enough, he rolled up the curtain , and the next
minute the king come a- pr ancing out on all four s, na ke d; and he was
painted all over, r ing- strea ke d- and- stri ped, all sorts of col ors, as
splendid as a ra in b ow. An d— but never mind the rest of his outf it; it
was just wild, but it was awful funn y. The people most killed
themselves laughing; and when the king got done ca per ing and ca per ed
off behind the scen es, they ro ared and clapped and stor med and
haw - ha wed till he come back and done it over again, and after that
they made him do it another time. Well, it would make a cow laugh to
see the shin es that old idi ot cut .

Then the duke he lets the curtain down, and b ows to the people, and
says the great tragedy will be per formed only two nights more, on
accounts of pressing London engag em ents, where the seats is all sold
already for it in Dr ury Lan e; and then he makes them another b ow, and
says if he has succeeded in pleas ing them and instru cting them, he
will be deeply obleeged if they will mention it to their friends and
get them to come and see it.

Tw enty people sings out:

“What, is it over ? Is that all?”

The duke says yes. Then there was a fine time. Everybody sings out,
“S ol d!” and rose up mad, and was a-going for that stage and them
trage di ans. But a big, fin e- looking man jumps up on a ben ch and
shout s:

“Hold on! Just a word, gentlemen .” They stopped to list en. “We are
sol d— mighty bad ly sol d. But we don’t want to be the laugh ing- stock of
this whole town, I reckon, and never hear the last of this thing as
long as we li ve. No. What we want is to go out of here quiet, and
talk this show up, and sell the rest of the town ! Then we’ll all be
in the same boat. Ain’t that sensi ble ?” ( “You bet it is !— the j edge is
right !” everybody sings out . ) “All right, then —not a word about any
se ll. Go along home, and advise everybody to come and see the
traged y.”

Next day you couldn’t hear nothing around that town but how splendid
that show was. House was jam med again that night, and we sold this
crowd the same way. When me and the king and the duke got home to the
raft we all had a supper ; and by and by, about midnight, they made Jim
and me back her out and float her down the middle of the river, and
fetch her in and hide her about two mile below town.

The third night the house was cra mmed again —and they warn’t
new - com ers this time, but people that was at the show the other two
nights. I stood by the duke at the door, and I see that every man that
went in had his pockets bul g ing, or something mu ffled up under his
co at —and I see it warn’t no per fu mer y, nei ther, not by a long sight.
I smelt sick ly egg s by the barre l, and rotten cab bag es, and such
things; and if I know the signs of a dead cat being around, and I bet
I do, there was six ty- four of them went in. I shoved in there for a
minute, but it was too v ar ious for me; I couldn’t stand it. Well, when
the place couldn’t hold no more people the duke he give a fellow a
quarter and told him to tend door for him a minute, and then he
started around for the stage door, I after him; but the minute we
turned the corner and was in the dark he says:

“W al k fast now till you get away from the houses, and then shin for
the raft like the di ck ens was after you!”

I done it, and he done the same. We struck the raft at the same time,
and in less than two seconds we was gliding down-stream, all dark and
still, and ed ging towards the middle of the river, nobody saying a
word. I reckoned the poor king was in for a ga udy time of it with the
audi ence, but nothing of the sor t; pretty soon he craw ls out from
under the wigwam, and says:

“Well, how ’d the old thing pan out this time, duke ?” He hadn’t been
up-town at all.

We never showed a light till we was about ten mile below the village.
Then we lit up and had a supper, and the king and the duke fairly
laughed their b ones loose over the way they’d served them people. The
duke says:

“Gre en hor n s, fla the ad s! I knew the first house would keep mu m and let
the rest of the town get ro ped in; and I knew they’d lay for us the
third night, and consider it was their turn now. Well, it is their
tur n, and I’d give something to know how much they’d take for it. I
would just like to know how they’re putting in their opportun ity.
They can turn it into a pic ni c if they want to— they brought plenty
provi si on s.”

The m rapscallions took in four hundred and six ty- five dollars in that
three nights. I never see money haul ed in by the wag on- lo ad like that
before.

By and by, when they was asleep and snor ing, Jim says:

“Don’t it s’ pri se you de way dem kings carries on, Huck?”

“No,” I says, “it don ’t.”

“Why don’t it, Huck?”

“Well, it don’t, because it’s in the bre ed. I reckon they’re all
a like .”

“But, Huck, d ese kings o’ ourn is re gl ar rapscallion s; dat’s jist what
dey is ; dey’s re gl ar rapscallion s.”

“Well, that’s what I’m a-say ing; all kings is mostly rapscallions, as
fur as I can make out.”

“Is dat so?”

“You read about them on ce— you’ll see. Look at Henry the E ight ; this
’n’ ’s a Sunday-school S up er inten dent to him. And look at Char les
Se con d, and Louis Four teen, and Louis F if teen, and James Se con d, and
Ed ward Se con d, and Richard Thi r d, and forty more; besides all them
Sax on he p t ar chi es that used to rip around so in old times and raise
C ain . My, you ought to seen old Henry the E ight when he was in blo om.
He was a blo s som . He used to marry a new wife every day, and chop
off her head next morning. And he would do it just as in different as
if he was order ing up egg s. ’ F et ch up Ne ll G w y n n ,’ he says. They fetch
her up. Next morning, ’ C hop off her head !’ And they chop it off.
’ F et ch up Jane Shor e,’ he says; and up she com es. Next morning, ’ C hop
off her head ’ —and they chop it off. ’ R ing up F air Ro sa mun .’ F air
Ro sa mun answ ers the bell. Next morning, ’ C hop off her head .’ And he
made every one of them tell him a ta le every night; and he kept that
up till he had ho gged a thousand and one ta les that way, and then he
put them all in a book, and called it D om es day Boo k —which was a good
name and stated the case. You don’t know kings, Jim, but I know them;
and this old rip of ourn is one of the clean est I’ve struck in
hi story. Well, Henry he takes a notion he wants to get up some trouble
with this country. How does he go at it— give notice ?— give the
country a show ? No. All of a sudden he hea ves all the te a in Bo st on
Har b or over board, and wha cks out a decl ar ation of indepen d ence, and
dar es them to come on. That was his sty le —he never give anybody a
chance. He had suspicions of his father, the Duke of W ell ing t on. Well,
what did he do? A s k him to show up? No — drownded him in a but t of
ma m se y, like a cat. S’pose people left money laying around where he
wa s— what did he do? He coll ared it. S’pose he con tracted to do a
thing, and you paid him, and didn’t set down there and see that he
done it— what did he do? He always done the other thing. S’pose he
opened his mou th —what then? If he didn’t shut it up powerful quick
he’d lose a lie every time. That’s the kind of a bu g Henry was; and if
we’d ’a’ had him along ’stead of our kings he’d ’a’ fooled that town a
heap worse than ourn done. I don’t say that ourn is lam b s, because
they ain ’t, when you come right down to the cold fac ts; but they ain’t
nothing to that old ra m, anyway. All I say is, kings is kings, and
you got to make allow anc es. Take them all around, they’re a mighty
ornery lot. It’s the way they’re rai se d.”

“But dis one do smell so like de n ation, Huck .”

“Well, they all do, Jim. We can’t help the way a king sme ll s; hi story
don’t tell no way.”

“Now de duke, he’s a toler ble likely man in some way s.”

“Yes, a duke’s different. But not very different. This one’s a
midd ling hard lot for a duke. When he’s drunk there ain’t no
near - si ghted man could tell him from a king.”

“Well, any ways, I doan’ han ker for no mo’ un um, Huck. D ese is all I
kin stan ’.”

“It’s the way I feel , too, Jim. But we’ve got them on our hands, and
we got to remember what they are, and make allow anc es. Sometimes I
wish we could hear of a country that’s out of king s.”

What was the use to tell Jim these warn’t real kings and du k es? It
wouldn’t ’a’ done no good; and, besides, it was just as I said: you
couldn’t tell them from the real kind.

I went to sleep, and Jim didn’t call me when it was my turn. He often
done that. When I waked up just at daybreak he was sitting there with
his head down betwixt his knees, moan ing and mour ning to himself. I
didn’t take notice nor let on. I knowed what it was about. He was
thinking about his wife and his children, away up yonder, and he was
low and hom es i ck ; because he hadn’t ever been away from home before in
his life; and I do believe he cared just as much for his people as
white folks does for the ir ’n . It don’t seem natur al, but I reckon it’s
so. He was often moan ing and mour ning that way nights, when he judged
I was asleep, and saying, “P o’ little ’ Li z abe th ! po’ little John n y!
it’s mighty hard ; I spec ’ I ain’t ever gwyne to see you no mo ’, no
mo ’ !” He was a mighty good nigger, Jim was.

But this time I somehow got to talking to him about his wife and young
on es; and by and by he says:

“What makes me feel so bad dis time ’uz bekase I hear su mp n over
yonder on de bank like a wha ck, er a sla m, while ago, en it mine me er
de time I treat my little ’ Li z abe th so orner y. She warn’t on’y ’bout
fo’ year o le, en she tuck de sk ’ yar let fever, en had a pow ful rough
spell ; but she got well, en one day she was a- stannin’ ar oun ’, en I
says to her, I says:

“‘ She t de do ’ .’

“She never done it; jis’ stood da h, kin er smi lin’ up at me. It make me
ma d; en I says ag’in, mighty lou d, I says:

“‘ Doan’ you hear me? She t de do ’ !”

“She jis stood de same way, kin er smi lin’ up. I was a- bil in ’! I says:

“‘I lay I make you min e!’

“E n wid dat I fet ch ’ her a sla p side de head dat son t her a- sp ra w lin ’.
Den I went into de yuther room, en ’uz gone ’bout ten minut es; en when
I come back dah was dat do’ a- stannin’ open y it, en dat chile
stannin’ mos’ right in it, a- look in’ down and mourn in ’, en de tears
run nin’ down. My, but I wuz ma d! I was a-gwyne for de chile, but
jis’ den —it was a do’ dat open in ner d s— jis’ den, ’long come de wind
en slam it to, behine de chile, ker - bla m !— en my lan ’, de chile
never mov e ’! My bre ff mos’ hop ou ter me; en I feel so— so —I doan’
know how I feel . I cro pe out, all a- trem blin ’, en cro pe aroun’ en
open de do’ easy en slow, en poke my head in behine de chile, sof ’ en
still, en all uv a sudden I says pow ! jis’ as loud as I could ye ll.
She never bu dge ! Oh, Huck, I bust out a- cry in’ en grab her up in my
arms, en say, ‘ Oh, de po’ little thing ! De Lord God A mighty fo give po’
ole Jim, k a ze he never gwyne to fo give hi s self as long ’s he live !’ Oh,
she was plumb deef en dum b, Huck, plumb deef en dum b — en I’d ben
a- treat ’n her so !”




CHAPTER XX IV


Next day, towards night, we laid up under a little willow towhead out
in the middle, where there was a village on each side of the river,
and the duke and the king begun to lay out a plan for working them
town s. Jim he spoke to the duke, and said he hoped it wouldn’t take
but a few hours, because it got mighty heavy and tire some to him when
he had to lay all day in the wigwam tied with the rope. You see, when
we left him all alone we had to tie him, because if anybody happened
on to him all by himself and not tied it wouldn’t look much like he
was a runaway nigger, you know. So the duke said it was kind of hard
to have to lay ro ped all day, and he’d ci p her out some way to get
around it.

He was uncommon bright, the duke was, and he soon struck it. He
dressed Jim up in King L ear ’s outf it— it was a long curtain - calico
gown, and a white horse - hair wi g and whisk ers; and then he took his
theat er pain t and painted Jim’s face and hands and ears and neck all
over a dead, dull solid blu e, like a man that’s been drownded nine
days. Blamed if he warn’t the horri ble st- looking out rage I ever see.
Then the duke took and wrote out a sign on a shing le so:

Si ck Ar ab —but harm less when not out of his head.

And he nailed that shing le to a la th, and stood the la th up four or
five foot in front of the wigwa m. Jim was satisfied. He said it was a
sight better than lying tied a couple of years every day, and
trembling all over every time there was a sound. The duke told him to
make himself free and eas y, and if anybody ever come medd ling around,
he must hop out of the wigwam, and carry on a little, and fetch a howl
or two like a wild bea st, and he reckoned they would light out and
leave him alone. Which was sound enough judg ment ; but you take the
average man, and he wouldn’t wait for him to how l. Why, he didn’t only
look like he was dead, he looked considerable more than that.

These rapscallions wanted to try the Nonesu ch again, because there was
so much money in it, but they judged it wouldn’t be safe, because
maybe the news might ’a’ worked along down by this time. They couldn’t
hit no pro ject that suited exac t ly; so at last the duke said he
reckoned he’d lay off and work his brains an hour or two and see if he
couldn’t put up something on the Arkan saw villag e; and the king he
allowed he would drop over to t’other village without any plan, but
just trust in Providence to lead him the prof itable way — meaning the
dev il, I reckon. We had all bought store clothes where we stopped
la st; and now the king put hi s ’n on, and he told me to put mine on. I
done it, of course. The king’s du ds was all black, and he did look
real s well and star ch y. I never knowed how clothes could change a body
before. Why, before, he looked like the orner i est old rip that ever
was; but now, when he’d take off his new white bea ver and make a bow
and do a smi le, he looked that grand and good and pi ous that you’d say
he had walked right out of the ar k, and maybe was old Lev iti cus
himself. Jim cleaned up the canoe, and I got my paddle ready. There
was a big steamboat laying at the shore away up under the point, about
three mile above the town — been there a couple of hours, taking on
fre i ght. Says the king :

“S ee in’ how I’m dressed, I reckon maybe I better arri ve down from St.
Louis or Cincinnati , or some other big place. Go for the steamboat,
Huckleber ry; we’ll come down to the village on her.”

I didn’t have to be ordered twice to go and take a steamboat rid e. I
fetched the shore a half a mile above the village, and then went
scoo ting along the blu ff bank in the easy water. Pretty soon we come
to a nice innocent -looking young country j ake setting on a log
swa bbing the sweat off of his face, for it was powerful warm wea ther ;
and he had a couple of big carpet-bag s by him.

“ Ru n her nose in shor e,” says the king. I done it. “W her ’ you bound
for, young man ?”

“For the steambo at ; going to Orlean s.”

“G it abo ard ,” says the king. “Hold on a minute, my servant ’ll
he ’ p you with them bag s. Jump out and he ’ p the gentleman,
Ad ol ph us ” — meaning me, I see.

I done so, and then we all three started on again. The young chap was
mighty thank ful ; said it was tough work to ting his baggage such
weather. He asked the king where he was going, and the king told him
he’d come down the river and landed at the other village this morning,
and now he was going up a few mile to see an old friend on a farm up
there. The young fellow says:

“When I first see you I says to myself, ’ It’s Mr. Wil ks, sure, and he
come mighty near getting here in time .’ But then I says again, ’ No, I
reckon it ain’t him, or else he wouldn’t be padd ling up the river .’
You ain’t him, are you?”

“No, my na me ’s B lodge tt — Elexander B lodge tt — R ever end Elexander
B lodge t t, I s’pose I must say, as I’m one o’ the Lor d’s poor servan ts.
But still I’m jist as able to be sorry for Mr. Wilks for not arri ving
in time, all the same, if he’s missed anything by it— which I hope he
ha sn ’t.”

“Well, he don’t miss any property by it, because he’ll get that all
right; but he’s missed seeing his brother Peter di e— which he mayn’t
mind, nobody can tell as to that —but his brother would ’a’ give
anything in this world to see him before he di ed; never talked about
nothing else all these three week s; hadn’t seen him since they was
boys together —and hadn’t ever seen his brother William at all —that’s
the deef and d umb one — William ain’t more than thirty or thirty- fi ve.
Peter and George were the only ones that come out here; George was the
married brother ; him and his wife both died last year. Harvey and
William ’s the only ones that’s left now; and, as I was saying, they
haven’t got here in time.”

“Did anybody send ’em word ?”

“Oh, yes; a month or two ago, when Peter was first too k; because Peter
said then that he sor ter felt like he warn’t going to get well this
time. You see, he was pretty old, and George ’s g ’y ir ls was too young
to be much company for him, except Mary Jane, the red-headed one; and
so he was kinder lonesome after George and his wife died, and didn’t
seem to care much to li ve. He most desper ately wanted to see
Harvey —and William, too, for that matter —because he was one of them
kind that can’t bear to make a will. He left a letter behind for
Harvey, and said he’d told in it where his money was hi d, and how he
wanted the rest of the property di vi ded up so George ’s g ’y ir ls would
be all right —for George didn’t leave nothing. And that letter was all
they could get him to put a pen to.”

“Why do you reckon Harvey don’t com e? W her ’ does he live ?”

“Oh, he lives in England — Sheffiel d— prea ches there— ha s n’t ever been
in this country. He ha s n’t had any too much time —and besides he
mightn’t ’a’ got the letter at all, you know.”

“T o o bad, too bad he couldn’t ’a’ lived to see his brother s, poor
soul. You going to Orleans, you say ?”

“Yes, but that ain’t only a part of it. I’m going in a shi p, next
Wednes day, for Ry o Jan e er o, where my uncle li ves.”

“It’s a pretty long journe y. But it ’ll be lovel y; I wisht I was
a- go ing. Is Mary Jane the ol de st ? How old is the other s?”

“ Mary Jane’s nine teen, Sus an ’s fif teen, and Jo an na ’s about
four te en —that’s the one that gives herself to good works and has a
hare- lip .”

“P o or thing s! to be left alone in the cold world so.”

“Well, they could be worse off. Old Peter had friends, and they ain’t
going to let them come to no harm. There’s Hob son, the B ab ti s’
preach er; and De ac on L ot H ove y, and Ben R uck er, and Abner Sha ck le ford,
and Levi Bell, the lawy er; and Dr. Robin son, and their wi ves, and the
widow Bar tle y, and —well, there’s a lot of them; but these are the
ones that Peter was thick est with, and used to write about sometimes,
when he wrote hom e; so Harvey ’ll know where to look for friends when
he gets here.”

Well, the old man went on asking questions till he just fairly emp tied
that young fell ow. Blamed if he didn’t inquire about everybody and
everything in that ble ssed town, and all about the Wilk se s; and about
Peter ’s busines s— which was a tan ner ; and about George ’s— which was a
carpen ter ; and about Harvey ’s— which was a dis sen tering min ister ; and
so on, and so on. Then he says:

“What did you want to walk all the way up to the steamboat for?”

“Because she’s a big Orleans boat, and I was afeard she mightn’t stop
there. When they’re deep they won’t stop for a ha il. A Cincinnati boat
will, but this is a St. Louis one.”

“Was Peter Wilks well off?”

“Oh, yes, pretty well off. He had houses and land, and it’s reckoned
he left three or four thousand in cas h hid up som ’ er s.”

“When did you say he di ed?”

“I didn’t say, but it was last night.”

“F un er al to-morrow, like ly?”

“Yes, ’bout the middle of the day.”

“Well, it’s all terrible sa d; but we’ve all got to go, one time or
another. So what we want to do is to be prepar ed; then we’re all
right.”

“Yes, sir, it’s the best way. M a used to always say that.”

When we struck the boat she was about done load ing, and pretty soon
she got off. The king never said nothing about going aboard, so I lost
my ri de, after all. When the boat was gone the king made me paddle up
another mile to a lonesome place, and then he got ashore and says:

“Now hust le back, right off, and fetch the duke up here, and the new
carpet-bag s. And if he’s gone over to t’other side, go over there and
git him. And tell him to git himself up regard less. S hove along, now.”

I see what he was up to; but I never said nothing, of course. When I
got back with the duke we hid the canoe, and then they set down on a
log, and the king told him everything, just like the young fellow had
said it— every last word of it. And all the time he was a- doing it he
tried to talk like an English man; and he done it pretty well, too, for
a sl ou ch. I can’t imitate him, and so I ain’t a-going to try to; but
he really done it pretty good. Then he says:

“How are you on the deef and dum b, Bilge water ?”

The duke said, leave him alone for that; said he had played a deef and
d umb person on the hi stri onic board s. So then they waited for a
steambo at.

About the middle of the afternoon a couple of little boats come along,
but they didn’t come from high enough up the river; but at last there
was a big one, and they ha iled her. She sent out her yaw l, and we went
aboard, and she was from Cincinnati ; and when they found we only
wanted to go four or five mile they was booming mad, and gave us a
cussing, and said they wouldn’t land us. But the king was ca ’ m. He
says:

“If gentlemen kin afford to pay a dollar a mile apiece to be took on
and put off in a yaw l, a steamboat kin afford to carry ’em, can’t it?”

So they softened down and said it was all right; and when we got to
the village they yaw led us ashore. About two dozen men flo cked down
when they see the yaw l a-com ing, and when the king says:

“ K in any of you gentlemen tell me wher ’ Mr. Peter Wilks li ves ?” they
give a glance at one another, and nodded their heads, as much as to
say, “What ’d I tell you?” Then one of them says, kind of soft and
gentle :

“I’m sorry, sir, but the best we can do is to tell you where he did
live yesterday evening.”

Sudd en as win king the ornery old cre tu r went all to sm ash, and fell up
against the man, and put his chin on his shoulder, and cried down his
back, and says:

“A l as, al as, our poor brother — gone, and we never got to see him; oh,
it’s too, too hard !”

Then he turns around, blubber ing, and makes a lot of idio tic signs to
the duke on his hands, and blamed if he didn’t drop a carpet- bag and
bust out a- crying. If they warn’t the beat en est lo t, them two frauds,
that ever I struck.

Well, the men gathered around and sympa thi zed with them, and said all
sorts of kind things to them, and carried their carpet-bag s up the
hill for them, and let them le an on them and cry, and told the king
all about his brother ’s last mom ents, and the king he told it all over
again on his hands to the duke, and both of them took on about that
dead tan ner like they’d lost the twelve disc i ple s. Well, if ever I
struck anything like it, I’m a nigger. It was enough to make a body
ashamed of the human rac e.




CHAPTER XX V


The news was all over town in two minutes, and you could see the
people tearing down on the run from every which way, some of them
putting on their co ats as they come. Pretty soon we was in the middle
of a crowd, and the noise of the tramp ing was like a soldi er mar ch.
The windows and door yards was full ; and every minute somebody would
say, over a fence :

“Is it them?”

And somebody tro tting along with the gang would answer back and say:

“You bet it is.”

When we got to the house the street in front of it was pac ked, and the
three girls was standing in the door. Mary Jane was red- headed, but
that don’t make no differ ence, she was most awful beautiful, and her
face and her eyes was all lit up like glor y, she was so glad her
uncles was come. The king he spread his arms, and Mary Jane she jumped
for them, and the hare-lip jumped for the duke, and there they had
it! Everybody mo st, least ways women, cried for joy to see them meet
again at last and have such good times.

Then the king he hun ched the duke priv at e— I see him do it—and then
he looked around and see the coffin, over in the corner on two chair s;
so then him and the duke, with a hand across each other’s shoulder,
and t’other hand to their eyes, walked slow and solemn over there,
everybody dropping back to give them room, and all the talk and noise
stop p ing, people saying “’ Sh !” and all the men taking their ha ts off
and drooping their heads, so you could ’a’ heard a pin fa ll. And when
they got there they bent over and looked in the coffin, and took one
sight, and then they bust out a- crying so you could ’a’ heard them to
Orleans, mo st; and then they put their arms around each other’s ne cks,
and hung their ch ins over each other’s shoulder s; and then for three
minutes, or maybe four , I never see two men lea k the way they done.
And, mind you, everybody was doing the sa me; and the place was that
damp I never see anything like it. Then one of them got on one side of
the coffin, and t’other on t’other side, and they kne eled down and
rested their fore heads on the coffin, and let on to pray all to
themsel ves. Well, when it come to that it worked the crowd like you
never see anything like it, and everybody broke down and went to
so bbing right out lou d —the poor girls, too; and every woman, near ly,
went up to the girls, without saying a word, and kissed them, solemn,
on the fore head, and then put their hand on their head, and looked up
towards the sky, with the tears running down, and then busted out and
went off so bbing and swa bb ing, and give the next woman a show. I never
see anything so disgu st ing.

Well, by and by the king he gets up and comes forward a little, and
works himself up and slo b bers out a speech, all full of tears and
fla p d ood le, about its being a sor e trial for him and his poor brother
to lose the disea sed, and to miss seeing di se ased alive after the long
journey of four thousand mile, but it’s a trial that’s sweet ened and
san cti fied to us by this dear sympathy and these ho ly te ars, and so he
thanks them out of his heart and out of his brother ’s heart, because
out of their mou ths they can ’t, words being too weak and cold, and all
that kind of rot and sl ush, till it was just sick en ing; and then he
blub bers out a pi ous good y- goo dy A men, and turns himself loose and goes
to crying fit to bust.

And the minute the words were out of his mouth somebody over in the
crowd struck up the do x olo j er, and everybody joined in with all their
might, and it just warmed you up and made you feel as good as church
letting out. M usic is a good thing; and after all that soul - butter and
ho gwa sh I never see it fresh en up things so, and sound so honest and
bull y.

Then the king begins to work his ja w again, and says how him and his
ni ec es would be glad if a few of the main principal friends of the
family would take supper here with them this evening, and help set up
with the ashes of the disea se d; and says if his poor brother laying
yonder could speak he knows who he would name, for they was names that
was very dear to him, and mentioned often in his letter s; and so he
will name the same, to w it, as foll ows, vi z . : — Rev . Mr. Hob son, and
De ac on L ot H ove y, and Mr. Ben R uck er, and Abner Sha ck le ford, and Levi
Bell, and Dr. Robin son, and their wi ves, and the widow Bar tle y.

Rev . Hob son and Dr. Robin son was down to the end of the town a- hunting
together —that is, I mean the doctor was shi pping a sick man to
t’other world, and the preacher was pin ting him right. Law yer Be ll was
away up to Lou is ville on business. But the rest was on hand, and so
they all come and shook hands with the king and than ked him and talked
to him; and then they shook hands with the duke and didn’t say
nothing, but just kept a- smiling and bo bbing their heads like a pas sel
of sa p heads whilst he made all sorts of signs with his hands and said
“Goo -goo — goo-goo -goo ” all the time, like a bab y that can’t talk.

So the king he bl attered along, and managed to inquire about pretty
much everybody and dog in town, by his name, and mentioned all sorts
of little things that happened one time or another in the town, or to
George ’s family, or to Pe ter. And he always let on that Peter wrote
him the things; but that was a li e: he got every ble ssed one of them
out of that young fla the ad that we cano ed up to the steambo at.

Then Mary Jane she fetched the letter her father left behind, and the
king he read it out loud and cried over it. It give the d well ing- house
and three thousand dollars, gold, to the girl s; and it give the
tany ard ( which was doing a good business ), along with some other
houses and land ( worth about seven thous and ), and three thousand
dollars in gold to Harvey and William, and told where the six thousand
cas h was hid down cellar. So these two frauds said they’d go and fetch
it up, and have everything square and abov e- board ; and told me to come
with a cand le. We shut the cellar door behind us, and when they found
the bag they spi lt it out on the floor, and it was a lovely sight, all
them yaller- boy s. My, the way the king’s eyes did shin e! He sla ps the
duke on the shoulder and says:

“Oh, this ain’t bu lly nor noth ’n ! Oh, no, I reckon not ! Why, B il j y,
it beats the Nonesu ch, don’t it?”

The duke allowed it did. They pa wed the yaller- boys, and si fted them
through their fingers and let them j ing le down on the floor ; and the
king says:

“It ain’t no use tal kin ’; bein’ brothers to a rich dead man and
represent ati ves of fur r in he irs that’s got left is the line for you
and me, B il ge. Thi sh yer comes of tru st ’n to Provi d ence. It’s the best
way, in the long run. I’ve tried ’em all, and ther’ ain’t no better
way.”

Most everybody would ’a’ been satisfied with the pile, and took it on
tru st; but no, they must count it. So they coun ts it, and it comes out
four hundred and fifteen dollars shor t. Says the king :

“D er n him, I wonder what he done with that four hundred and fifteen
dollar s?”

They wor ried over that awhile, and ransacked all around for it. Then
the duke says:

“Well, he was a pretty sick man, and likely he made a mista ke —I
reckon that’s the way of it. The best way ’s to let it go, and keep
still about it. We can spare it.”

“Oh, sh ucks, yes, we can spare it. I don’t k’yer noth ’n ’bout
that —it’s the count I’m think in’ about. We want to be awful square
and open and abov e- board here, you know. We want to lu g this h ’ yer
money up-stairs and count it before everybod y— then ther’ ain’t noth ’n
suspici ous. But when the dead man says ther ’s six thous ’n dollars, you
know, we don’t want to —”

“Hold on,” says the duke. “L e’s make up the de ffi sit ,” and he begun to
haul out yaller- boys out of his pocket.

“It’s a most ama z ’n’ good idea, duke —you have got a ratt lin’ clever
head on you,” says the king. “B lest if the old Nonesu ch ain’t a
he pp in’ us out ag’ in,” and he begun to haul out yaller- jac ke ts and
stack them up.

It most busted them, but they made up the six thousand clean and
clear.

“Sa y,” says the duke, “I got another idea. Le’s go up-stairs and count
this money, and then take and give it to the girl s.”

“Good land, duke, lemme hug you! It’s the most da zz ling idea ’at ever
a man struck. You have cer t ’n ly got the most astonish in’ head I ever
see. Oh, this is the bo ss do dge, ther’ ain’t no mistake ’bout it. Let
’em fetch along their suspicions now if they want to— this ’ll lay ’em
out.”

When we got up-stairs everybody ge thered around the table, and the
king he counted it and stac ked it up, three hundred dollars in a
pi le — twenty ele g ant little pi les. Everybody looked hungry at it, and
li cked their ch op s. Then they ra ked it into the bag again, and I see
the king begin to s well himself up for another speech. He says:

“ Fri en ds all, my poor brother that lays yonder has done generous by
them that’s left behind in the va le of sor r ers. He has done generous
by these yer poor little lam bs that he loved and shel ter ed, and that’s
left father less and mother less. Yes, and we that knowed him knows that
he would ’a’ done more generous by ’em if he hadn’t ben afeard o’
w ound in’ his dear William and me. Now, wouldn’t he? Th er ’ ain’t no
question ’bout it in my mind. Well, then, what kind o’ brothers
would it be that ’d stand in his way at se ch a time? And what kind o’
uncles would it be that ’d rob — yes, rob — se ch poor sweet lam bs as
these ’at he loved so at se ch a time? If I know William —and I think
I do — he —well, I’ll jest ask him.” He turns around and begins to make
a lot of signs to the duke with his hands, and the duke he looks at
him stup id and leather- headed a whi le; then all of a sudden he seems to
catch his mean ing, and jumps for the king, goo-gooing with all his
might for jo y, and hu gs him about fifteen times before he lets up.
Then the king says, “I knowed it; I reckon that ’ll convin ce anybody
the way he feel s about it. Here, Mary Jane, Sus an, Jo an ner, take the
mone y— take it all. It’s the gi ft of him that lays yonder, cold but
joy ful.”

Mary Jane she went for him, Susan and the hare-lip went for the duke,
and then such another hu gging and kis sing I never see yet. And
everybody crowded up with the tears in their eyes, and most shook the
hands off of them frauds, saying all the time :

“You dear good soul s !— how lovel y !— how could you!”

Well, then, pretty soon all hands got to talking about the di se ased
again, and how good he was, and what a loss he was, and all that; and
before long a big ir on- jaw ed man worked himself in there from outside,
and stood a- listening and looking, and not saying any thing; and nobody
saying anything to him either, because the king was talking and they
was all busy listening. The king was say ing— in the middle of
something he’d started in on —

“ — they bein’ parti ck ler friends o’ the disea sed. That’s why they’re
inv ited here this even in ’; but to-morrow we want all to
com e— everybody; for he respe cted everybod y, he liked everybod y, and
so it’s fitten that his funeral orgies sh ’d be public .”

And so he went a- mo oning on and on, li king to hear himself talk, and
every little while he fetched in his funeral orgies again, till the
duke he couldn’t stand it no more; so he writ es on a little scra p of
paper, “O b se qui es, you old fool ,” and fol ds it up, and goes to
goo-gooing and reaching it over people’s heads to him. The king he
rea ds it and put s it in his pocket, and says:

“P o or William, aff lic ted as he is, his hear t’s al uz right. A s ks me
to inv ite everybody to come to the funer al — wants me to make ’em all
wel come. But he needn’t ’a’ wor ri ed— it was jest what I was at.”

Then he wea ves along again, perfectly ca ’m, and goes to dropping in
his funeral orgies again every now and then, just like he done before.
And when he done it the third time he says:

“I say or gi es, not because it’s the common ter m, because it
ain ’t — ob se qui es bein’ the common ter m —but because orgies is the
right ter m. Ob se qui es ain’t used in England no more now —it’s gone
out. We say orgies now in England. Or gies is better, because it means
the thing you’re after more exac t. It’s a word that’s made up out’n
the Gre ek or go, outside, open, ab road ; and the He bre w je es um, to
plan t, cover up; hence inter . So, you see, funeral orgies is an open
er public funer al.”

He was the worst I ever struck. Well, the ir on- jaw ed man he laughed
right in his face. Everybody was sho ck ed. Everybody says, “Why,
doctor !” and Abner Sha ck le ford says:

“Why, Robin son, hain’t you heard the new s? This is Harvey Wilk s.”

The king he smiled eag er, and shoved out his fla pp er, and says:

“Is it my poor brother ’s dear good friend and physi ci an ? I —”

“Keep your hands off me!” says the do ctor. “You talk like an
English man, don’t you? It’s the worst im itation I ever heard. You
Peter Wilk s’s brother ! You’re a frau d, that’s what you ar e!”

Well, how they all took on! They crowded around the doctor and tried
to quiet him down, and tried to explain to him and tell him how
Harvey ’s showed in forty ways that he was Harvey, and knowed
everybody by name, and the names of the very dogs, and begged and
begged him not to hurt Harvey ’s feel ings and the poor girl s’
feel ings, and all that. But it warn’t no use; he stor med right along,
and said any man that pre tended to be an English man and couldn’t
imitate the l ing o no better than what he did was a fra ud and a li ar.
The poor girls was hanging to the king and cry ing; and all of a sudden
the doctor up s and turns on them. He says:

“I was your father’s friend, and I’m your frien d; and I warn you as a
friend, and an honest one that wants to protect you and keep you out
of harm and trouble, to turn your backs on that scoundre l and have
nothing to do with him, the ignorant tramp , with his idio tic Gre ek and
He bre w, as he calls it. He is the thin nest kind of an im po stor — has
come here with a lot of empty names and facts which he picked up
somewher es; and you take them for proof s, and are helped to fool
yourselves by these foolish friends here, who ought to know better.
Mary Jane Wil ks, you know me for your friend, and for your un sel fish
friend, too. Now listen to me; turn this piti ful ras cal out —I beg
you to do it. Will you?”

Mary Jane straightened herself up, and m y, but she was hand some ! She
says:

“Here is my answer .” She hove up the bag of money and put it in the
king’s hands, and says, “Take this six thousand dollars, and inv est
for me and my sist ers any way you want to, and don’t give us no
receipt for it.”

Then she put her arm around the king on one side, and Susan and the
hare-lip done the same on the other. Everybody clapped their hands and
stom ped on the floor like a perfect stor m, whilst the king held up his
head and smiled prou d. The doctor says:

“All right; I wash my hands of the matter. But I warn you all that a
time ’s coming when you’re going to feel sick whenever you think of
this day.” And away he went.

“All right, doctor ,” says the king, kinder mo cking him; “ we’ll try and
get ’em to send for you ; ” which made them all laugh , and they said it
was a pri me good hi t.




CHAPTER XX VI


Well, when they was all gone the king he as ks Mary Jane how they was
off for spare rooms, and she said she had one spare room, which would
do for Uncle William, and she’d give her own room to Uncle Harvey,
which was a little bigg er, and she would turn into the room with her
sist ers and sleep on a co t; and up g arre t was a little cub by, with a
pallet in it. The king said the cub by would do for his v all ey — meaning
me.

So Mary Jane took us up, and she showed them their rooms, which was
plain but ni ce. She said she’d have her fro cks and a lot of other
traps took out of her room if they was in Uncle Harvey ’s way, but he
said they warn’t. The fro cks was hung along the wall, and before them
was a curtain made out of calico that hung down to the floor. There
was an old hair trunk in one corner, and a gu it ar - box in another, and
all sorts of little kni ck kn ac ks and j im crac ks around, like girls
brisk en up a room with. The king said it was all the more homely and
more pleas an ter for these fix ings, and so don’t disturb them. The
duke’s room was pretty small, but plenty good enough, and so was my
cub by.

That night they had a big supper, and all them men and women was
there, and I stood behind the king and the duke’s chairs and waited on
them, and the niggers waited on the re st. Mary Jane she set at the
head of the table, with Susan along side of her, and said how bad the
b is cu its was, and how mean the preser ves was, and how ornery and tough
the fri ed chick ens was —and all that kind of ro t, the way women always
do for to force out complim ent s; and the people all knowed everything
was tip top , and said so— said “How do you get b is cu its to brown so
ni ce?” and “Where, for the land’s sake, did you get these ama z ’n
pick le s?” and all that kind of hum bu g talk y- talk, just the way people
always does at a supper, you know.

And when it was all done me and the hare-lip had supper in the kitchen
off of the leav ings, whilst the others was hel ping the niggers clean
up the things. The hare-lip she got to p um ping me about England, and
ble st if I didn’t think the ice was getting mighty thin some times. She
says:

“Did you ever see the king ?”

“Who ? William Four th ? Well, I bet I ha ve —he goes to our church.” I
knowed he was dead years ago, but I never let on. So when I says he
goes to our church, she says:

“What — regul ar ?”

“Yes — regul ar. His pew ’s right over oppos ite our n — on t’other side the
pul p it.”

“I thought he lived in London ?”

“Well, he do es. Where would he live ?”

“But I thought you lived in Sheffiel d?”

I see I was up a stum p. I had to let on to get choked with a
chick en -b one, so as to get time to think how to get down again. Then I
says:

“I mean he goes to our church regular when he’s in Sheffiel d. That’s
only in the sum mer - time, when he comes there to take the sea ba th s.”

“Why, how you talk — Sheffi eld ain’t on the sea .”

“Well, who said it wa s?”

“Why, you did.”

“I didn ’t, nuther.”

“You di d!”

“I didn ’t.”

“You did.”

“I never said nothing of the kind .”

“Well, what did you say, then?”

“Sa id he come to take the sea ba th s— that’s what I said.”

“Well, then, how ’s he going to take the sea ba ths if it ain’t on the
sea ?”

“Looky here,” I says; “ did you ever see any C ong res s- water ?”

“Yes.”

“Well, did you have to go to C ong re ss to get it?”

“Why, no .”

“Well, neither does William Four th have to go to the sea to get a sea
ba th.”

“How does he get it, then?”

“G ets it the way people down here gets C ong res s- water —in bar rel s.
There in the palace at Sheffi eld they’ve got furn ac es, and he wants
his water ho t. They can’t bi le that amount of water away off there at
the se a. They haven’t got no conveni ences for it.”

“Oh, I see, now. You might ’a’ said that in the first place and saved
time.”

When she said that I see I was out of the woods again, and so I was
comfortable and gla d. Nex t, she says:

“Do you go to church, too?”

“Yes — regul ar.”

“Where do you se t?”

“Why, in our pew .”

“Who se pew ?”

“Why, our n — your Uncle Harvey ’s.”

“H is ’n ? What does he want with a pew ?”

“W an ts it to set in. What did you reckon he wanted with it?”

“Why, I thought he’d be in the pul p it.”

R ot him, I forgot he was a preach er. I see I was up a stump again, so
I played another chick en -b one and got another think. Then I says:

“Blame it, do you suppose there ain’t but one preacher to a chur ch?”

“Why, what do they want with mor e?”

“What !— to prea ch before a king ? I never did see such a girl as you.
They don’t have no less than seven te en.”

“S even te en! My land! Why, I wouldn’t set out such a str ing as that,
not if I never got to glor y. It must take ’em a wee k.”

“Shucks, they don’t all of ’em prea ch the same day — only one of
’em .”

“Well, then, what does the rest of ’em do?”

“Oh, nothing much. Lo ll around, pass the plat e—and one thing or
another. But mainly they don’t do nothing.”

“Well, then, what are they for?”

“Why, they’re for style. Don’t you know noth ing?”

“Well, I don’t want to know no such foolishness as that. How is
servants treated in England ? Do they treat ’em better ’n we treat our
nigger s?”

“No! A servant ain’t nobody there. They treat them worse than dog s.”

“Don’t they give ’em holi days, the way we do, Christmas and New Y ear ’s
week, and Four th of J ul y?”

“Oh, just listen ! A body could tell you hain’t ever been to England
by that. Why, Har e- l — why, Jo an na , they never see a holi day from
year ’s end to year ’s en d; never go to the circ us, nor theat er, nor
nigger sh ows, nor now her es.”

“Nor chur ch?”

“Nor church.”

“But you always went to church.”

Well, I was gone up again. I forgot I was the old man’s servan t. But
next minute I whir led in on a kind of an explanation how a v alley was
different from a common servan t, and had to go to church whether he
wanted to or not, and set with the family, on account of its being the
law. But I didn’t do it pretty good, and when I got done I see she
warn’t satisfied. She says:

“H onest injun, now, hain’t you been telling me a lot of li es?”

“H onest inj un ,” says I.

“None of it at all?”

“None of it at all. Not a lie in it,” says I.

“L a y your hand on this book and say it.”

I see it warn’t nothing but a di ction ary, so I laid my hand on it and
said it. So then she looked a little better satisfied, and says:

“Well, then, I’ll believe some of it; but I hope to gracious if I’ll
believe the re st.”

“What is it you won’t believe, Jo ?” says Mary Jane, stepping in with
Susan behind her. “It ain’t right nor kind for you to talk so to him,
and him a stranger and so far from his people. How would you like to
be treated so?”

“That’s always your way, Ma im — always sailing in to help somebody
before they’re hurt. I hain’t done nothing to him. He’s told some
stret ch ers, I reckon, and I said I wouldn’t swa llow it all; and that’s
every bit and gra in I did say. I reckon he can stand a little thing
like that, can’t he?”

“I don’t care whether ’twas little or whether ’twas bi g ; he’s here in
our house and a stranger, and it wasn’t good of you to say it. If you
was in his place it would make you feel asha me d; and so you ough t n’t
to say a thing to another person that will make them feel asha me d.”

“Why, Ma im , he said —”

“It don’t make no difference what he said —that ain’t the thing. The
thing is for you to treat him kind, and not be saying things to make
him remember he ain’t in his own country and amongst his own fol k s.”

I says to myself, this is a girl that I’m letting that old re pti le
rob her of her mone y!

Then Susan she walt zed in; and if you’ll believe me, she did give
Har e- lip har k from the tom b !

Says I to myself, and this is another one that I’m letting him rob
her of her mone y!

Then Mary Jane she took another in ning, and went in sweet and lovely
again —which was her way; but when she got done there warn’t hardly
anything left o’ poor Har e- li p. So she holl er ed.

“All right, then,” says the other girl s; “you just ask his par don .”

She done it, too; and she done it beauti ful. She done it so beautiful
it was good to hear ; and I wished I could tell her a thousand li es, so
she could do it again.

I says to myself, this is another one that I’m letting him rob her
of her money. And when she got through they all jest laid the ir sel ves
out to make me feel at home and know I was amongst friend s. I felt so
ornery and low down and mean that I says to myself, my min d’s made up;
I’ll hive that money for them or bust.

So then I lit out —for bed, I said, meaning some time or another. When
I got by myself I went to thinking the thing over. I says to myself,
shall I go to that doctor, private, and blow on these fraud s? No —that
won’t do. He might tell who told him; then the king and the duke would
make it warm for me. S hall I go, private, and tell Mary Jan e? No —I
dasn’t do it. Her face would give them a hin t, sure ; they’ve got the
money, and they’d slide right out and get away with it. If she was to
fetch in help I’d get mixed up in the business before it was done
with, I jud ge. No; there ain’t no good way but one. I got to steal
that money, somehow ; and I got to steal it some way that they won’t
suspicion that I done it. They’ve got a good thing here, and they
ain’t a-going to leave till they’ve played this family and this town
for all they’re wor th, so I’ll find a chance time enough. I’ll steal
it and hide it; and by and by, when I’m away down the river, I’ll
write a letter and tell Mary Jane where it’s hi d. But I better hive it
to-night if I can, because the doctor maybe ha s n’t let up as much as
he lets on he ha s; he might scare them out of here yet.

So, thinks I, I’ll go and search them rooms. Up stairs the hall was
dark, but I found the duke’s room, and started to pa w around it with
my hand s; but I recollec ted it wouldn’t be much like the king to let
anybody else take care of that money but his own self ; so then I went
to his room and begun to pa w around there. But I see I couldn’t do
nothing without a candle, and I dasn’t light one, of course. So I
judged I’d got to do the other thing— lay for them and ea ves dro p.
About that time I hears their foot steps coming, and was going to ski p
under the bed; I reached for it, but it wasn’t where I thought it
would be; but I touched the curtain that hid Mary Jane’s fro cks, so I
jumped in behind that and snu ggled in amongst the g own s, and stood
there perfectly still.

They come in and shut the door; and the first thing the duke done was
to get down and look under the bed. Then I was glad I hadn’t found the
bed when I wanted it. And yet, you know, it’s kind of natural to hide
under the bed when you are up to anything priv ate. They se ts down then,
and the king says:

“Well, what is it? And cut it midd lin’ short, because it’s better for
us to be down there a- whoo p in’ up the mour nin’ than up here gi v in’ ’em
a chance to talk us over.”

“Well, this is it, Ca pe t. I ain’t eas y; I ain’t comfortable. That
doctor lays on my mind. I wanted to know your plans. I’ve got a
noti on, and I think it’s a sound one.”

“What is it, duke ?”

“That we better gli de out of this before three in the morning, and
clip it down the river with what we’ve go t. Spe ci ally, seeing we got
it so eas y— given back to us, flung at our heads, as you may say,
when of course we allowed to have to steal it back. I’m for kno cking
off and ligh ting out.”

That made me feel pretty ba d. About an hour or two ago it would ’a’
been a little differ ent, but now it made me feel bad and disappoin ted.
The king ri ps out and says:

“What! And not sell out the rest o’ the proper ty ? Mar ch off like a
pas sel of fools and leave eight or nine thous ’n’ dollar s’ worth o’
property la yin’ around jest suffer in’ to be scoo ped in ? —and all good,
sal able stuff, too.”

The duke he grum ble d; said the bag of gold was enough, and he didn’t
want to go no dee per — didn’t want to rob a lot of or phan s of
everything they had.

“Why, how you talk !” says the king. “We sha’n’t rob ’em of nothing at
all but jest this money. The people that bu ys the property is the
suff ’r ers; because as soon ’s it’s found out ’at we didn’t own
it— which won’t be long after we’ve sli d —the sale won’t be v ali d, and
it ’ll all go back to the est ate. These yer or phan s ’ll git their
house back ag’in, and that’s enough for them; they’re young and
sp ry, and k’n easy earn a li vin ’. They ain’t a-goin’ to suff er. Why,
jest think — there’s thous ’n ’s and thous ’n ’s that ain’t nigh so well
off. B less you, they ain’t got noth ’n’ to compla in of.”

Well, the king he talked him bl ind ; so at last he give in, and said
all right, but said he believed it was blamed foolishness to sta y, and
that doctor hanging over them. But the king says:

“C uss the doctor ! What do we k’yer for him ? Hain’t we got all the
fools in town on our side ? And ain’t that a big enough ma j or ity in any
town ?”

So they got ready to go down- stairs again. The duke says:

“I don’t think we put that money in a good place.”

That che ered me up. I’d begun to think I warn’t going to get a h int of
no kind to help me. The king says:

“Wh y?”

“Because Mary Jane ’ll be in mour ning from this out; and first you
know the nigger that does up the rooms will get an order to box these
du ds up and put ’em away; and do you reckon a nigger can run across
money and not borrow some of it?”

“Your head ’s level ag’in, duke ,” says the king; and he comes
a- fum bling under the curtain two or three foot from where I was. I
stuck tight to the wall and kept mighty still, though qui ver y; and I
wondered what them fellows would say to me if they catched me; and I
tried to think what I’d better do if they did catch me. But the king
he got the bag before I could think more than about a half a thought,
and he never suspici oned I was around. They took and shoved the bag
through a rip in the straw tick that was under the fea ther- bed, and
cra mmed it in a foot or two amongst the straw and said it was all
right now, because a nigger only makes up the fea ther- bed, and don’t
turn over the straw tick only about twice a year, and so it warn’t in
no danger of getting stole now.

But I knowed better. I had it out of there before they was half-way
down-stair s. I gro ped along up to my cub by, and hid it there till I
could get a chance to do better. I judged I better hide it outside of
the house somewher es, because if they missed it they would give the
house a good ransa ck ing: I knowed that very well. Then I turned in,
with my clothes all on; but I couldn’t ’a’ gone to sleep if I’d ’a’
wanted to, I was in such a sweat to get through with the business. By
and by I heard the king and the duke come up; so I rolled off my
pallet and laid with my chin at the top of my ladder, and waited to
see if anything was going to happ en. But nothing did.

So I held on till all the late sounds had quit and the early ones
hadn’t begun ye t; and then I slipped down the lad der.




CHAPTER XX VII


I crept to their doors and listen ed; they was snor ing. So I tipto ed
along, and got down- stairs all right. There warn’t a sound anywher es. I
peeped through a crack of the dining-room door, and see the men that
was watching the corpse all sound asleep on their chair s. The door was
open into the parl or, where the corpse was la ying, and there was a
candle in both rooms. I passed along, and the parlor door was open ;
but I see there warn’t nobody in there but the remain ders of Peter ; so
I shoved on by; but the front door was locked, and the key wasn’t
there. Just then I heard somebody coming down the stairs, back behind
me. I run in the parlor and took a swift look around, and the only
place I see to hide the bag was in the coff in. The lid was shoved
along about a foot, showing the dead man’s face down in there, with a
wet cloth over it, and his sh rou d on. I tucked the mone y- bag in under
the lid, just down beyond where his hands was cros sed, which made me
creep , they was so cold, and then I run back across the room and in
behind the door.

The person coming was Mary Jan e. She went to the coffin, very soft,
and kne eled down and looked in; then she put up her handkerchi ef, and
I see she begun to cry, though I couldn’t hear her, and her back was
to me. I slid out, and as I passed the dining-room I thought I’d make
sure them watch ers hadn’t seen me; so I looked through the crac k, and
everything was all right. They hadn’t stir red.

I slipped up to bed, feeling ruther blu e, on accounts of the thing
playing out that way after I had took so much trouble and run so much
resk about it. Says I, if it could stay where it is, all right;
because when we get down the river a hundred mile or two I could write
back to Mary Jane, and she could dig him up again and get it; but that
ain’t the thing that’s going to happen ; the thing that’s going to
happen is, the mone y ’ll be found when they come to scre w on the li d.
Then the king ’ll get it again, and it ’ll be a long day before he
gives anybody another chance to smouch it from him. Of course I
wanted to slide down and get it out of there, but I dasn’t try it.
Every minute it was getting ear lier now, and pretty soon some of them
watch ers would begin to st ir, and I might get cat ch ed— catched with
six thousand dollars in my hands that nobody hadn’t hi red me to take
care of. I don’t wish to be mixed up in no such business as that, I
says to myself.

When I got down- stairs in the morning the parlor was shut up, and the
watch ers was gone. There warn’t nobody around but the family and the
widow Bar tle y and our tri be. I watched their fac es to see if anything
had been happen ing, but I couldn’t tell.

T ow ards the middle of the day the undertaker come with his man, and
they set the coffin in the middle of the room on a couple of chairs,
and then set all our chairs in row s, and borrowed more from the
neighbor s till the hall and the parlor and the dining-room was fu ll. I
see the coffin lid was the way it was before, but I dasn’t go to look
in under it, with folks around.

Then the people begun to f lock in, and the beats and the girls took
seats in the front row at the head of the coffin, and for a half an
hour the people fi led around slow, in single ran k, and looked down at
the dead man’s face a minute, and some dropped in a te ar, and it was
all very still and solemn, only the girls and the beats holding
handkerchi ef s to their eyes and keeping their heads b ent, and so bbing
a little. There warn’t no other sound but the scra ping of the feet on
the floor and blowing no se s— because people always blows them more at
a funeral than they do at other places except church.

When the place was packed full the undertaker he slid around in his
black glo ves with his sof ty soo thering ways, putting on the last
tou ches, and getting people and things all shi p- shape and comfortable,
and making no more sound than a cat. He never spo ke ; he moved people
around, he squee zed in late ones, he opened up passa ge ways, and done
it with no ds, and signs with his hands. Then he took his place over
against the wall. He was the sof te st, gli ding est, steal thi est man I
ever see; and there warn’t no more smile to him than there is to a
ha m.

They had borrowed a me lo de um —a sick one; and when everything was
ready a young woman set down and worked it, and it was pretty sk ree ky
and co lick y, and everybody joined in and sun g, and Peter was the only
one that had a good thing, according to my noti on. Then the R ever end
Hob son opened up, slow and solemn, and begun to tal k; and straight off
the most outrage ous row busted out in the cellar a body ever he ard ; it
was only one dog, but he made a most powerful rac ke t, and he kept it
up right along; the parson he had to stand there, over the coffin, and
wait —you couldn’t hear yourself think. It was right down awk ward, and
nobody didn’t seem to know what to do. But pretty soon they see that
long - legged undertaker make a sign to the preacher as much as to say,
“Don’t you wor ry —just depend on me.” Then he stooped down and begun
to gli de along the wall, just his shoulders showing over the people’s
head s. So he glided along, and the powwow and r ack et getting more and
more outrage ous all the time; and at last, when he had gone around two
sides of the room, he disappe ars down cellar. Then in about two
seconds we heard a wha ck, and the dog he finished up with a most
ama zing howl or two, and then everything was dead still, and the
parson begun his solemn talk where he left off. In a minute or two
here comes this underta ker’s back and shoulders gliding along the wall
again; and so he glided and glided around three sides of the room, and
then rose up, and sha ded his mouth with his hands, and stretched his
neck out towards the preach er, over the people’s heads, and says, in a
kind of a coarse whisper, “He had a rat !” Then he droo ped down and
glided along the wall again to his place. You could see it was a great
satisfaction to the people, because naturally they wanted to know. A
little thing like that don’t cost nothing, and it’s just the little
things that makes a man to be looked up to and li ked. There warn’t no
more pop ular man in town than what that undertaker was.

Well, the funeral ser m on was very good, but pis on long and tire some ;
and then the king he shoved in and got off some of his usual rub b age,
and at last the job was through, and the undertaker begun to snea k up
on the coffin with his scre w - d river. I was in a sweat then, and
watched him pretty ke en. But he never medd led at all; just slid the
lid along as soft as mus h, and scre wed it down tight and fa st. So
there I was ! I didn’t know whether the money was in there or not. So,
says I, s’pose somebody has ho gged that bag on the sl y?— now how do
I know whether to write to Mary Jane or not ? S’pose she dug him up
and didn’t find nothing, what would she think of me? B lame it, I says,
I might get hunted up and j ai le d; I’d better lay low and keep dark,
and not write at all; the thing’s awful mixed now; trying to better
it, I’ve wor s ened it a hundred times, and I wish to goodness I’d just
let it alone, dad fetch the whole business !

They buried him, and we come back home, and I went to watching fac es
again —I couldn’t help it, and I couldn’t rest easy. But nothing come
of it; the fac es didn’t tell me nothing.

The king he vis ited around in the evening, and sweet ened everybody up,
and made himself ever so friend ly; and he give out the idea that his
con gre g ation over in England would be in a sweat about him, so he must
hurry and settle up the est ate right away and leave for home. He was
very sorry he was so p us he d, and so was everybody; they wished he
could stay longer, but they said they could see it couldn’t be done.
And he said of course him and William would take the girls home with
them; and that pleased everybody too, because then the girls would be
well fixed and amongst their own rel ation s; and it pleased the girls,
too— tick led them so they clean forgot they ever had a trouble in the
worl d; and told him to sell out as quick as he wanted to, they would
be ready. The m poor things was that glad and happy it made my heart
ac he to see them getting fooled and lied to so, but I didn’t see no
safe way for me to chi p in and change the general tun e.

Well, blamed if the king didn’t bill the house and the niggers and all
the property for auction straight off — sale two days after the
funer al; but anybody could buy private befor e hand if they wanted to.

So the next day after the funer al, along about no on- time, the girl s’
joy got the first jol t. A couple of nigger - tra ders come along, and the
king sold them the niggers reasonable, for three- day dra fts as they
called it, and away they went, the two sons up the river to M emp his,
and their mother down the river to Orleans. I thought them poor girls
and them niggers would break their hear ts for gri ef ; they cried around
each other, and took on so it most made me down sick to see it. The
girls said they hadn’t ever drea med of seeing the family separ ated or
sold away from the town. I can’t ever get it out of my memory, the
sight of them poor miserable girls and niggers hanging around each
other’s necks and cry ing; and I reckon I couldn’t ’a’ stood it all,
but would ’a’ had to bust out and tell on our gang if I hadn’t knowed
the sale warn’t no account and the niggers would be back home in a
week or two.

The thing made a big stir in the town, too, and a good many come out
fl at- foo ted and said it was scand al ous to separate the mother and the
children that way. It injured the frauds some ; but the old fool he
bu lled right along, spite of all the duke could say or do, and I tell
you the duke was powerful uneasy.

Next day was auction day. About broad day in the morning the king and
the duke come up in the g arre t and woke me up, and I see by their look
that there was trouble. The king says:

“Was you in my room night before la st?”

“No, your majest y ” —which was the way I always called him when nobody
but our gang warn’t around.

“Was you in there y ister day er last night?”

“No, your majest y.”

“H on or bright, now— no li es.”

“H on or bright, your majest y, I’m telling you the truth. I hain’t been
a-near your room since Miss Mary Jane took you and the duke and showed
it to you.”

The duke says:

“Have you seen anybody else go in there?”

“No, your grac e, not as I remember, I believ e.”

“St op and think.”

I studied awhile and see my chance; then I says:

“Well, I see the niggers go in there several tim es.”

Both of them gave a little jum p, and looked like they hadn’t ever
expected it, and then like they had. Then the duke says:

“What, all of them?”

“No — leastways, not all at on ce —that is, I don’t think I ever see
them all come out at once but just one time.”

“Hell o! When was that?”

“It was the day we had the funer al. In the morning. It warn’t early,
because I over slep t. I was just starting down the ladder, and I see
them.”

“Well, go on, go on! What did they do? How ’d they ac t?”

“They didn’t do nothing. And they didn’t act anyway much, as fur as I
see. They tipto ed away; so I seen, easy enough, that they’d shoved in
there to do up your majest y’s room, or something, s’ posing you was up;
and found you warn’t up, and so they was hop ing to slide out of the
way of trouble without wa king you up, if they hadn’t already waked you
up.”

“Gre at guns, this is a go !” says the king; and both of them looked
pretty sick and tolerable si ll y. They stood there a- thinking and
scrat ching their heads a minute, and the duke he bust into a kind of a
little ras p y chuck le, and says:

“It does beat all how neat the niggers played their hand. They let on
to be sorry they was going out of this regi on! And I believed they
was sorry, and so did you, and so did everybody. Don’t ever tell
me any more that a nigger ain’t got any hi stri onic tal ent. Why, the
way they played that thing it would fool any body. In my opinion,
there’s a fortune in ’em. If I had capital and a theat er, I wouldn’t
want a better la y- out than that —and here we’ve gone and sold ’em for
a song . Yes, and ain’t pri vi le ged to sing the s ong yet. Say, where
is that song —that dra f t?”

“In the bank for to be collec ted. Where would it be ?”

“Well, that’s all right then, thank goodn es s.”

Says I, kind of ti mi d- like :

“Is something gone wrong ?”

The king whir ls on me and ri ps out:

“None o’ your business ! You keep your head she t, and mind y ’r own
affair s— if you got an y. L ong as you’re in this town don’t you forgit
that —you hear?” Then he says to the duke, “We got to jest swa ll er
it and say noth ’n ’ : mum ’s the word for us.”

As they was starting down the ladder the duke he chuck les again, and
says:

“Qui ck sa les and small prof it s! It’s a good busines s— y es.”

The king snar ls around on him and says:

“I was trying to do for the best in sell in’ ’em out so qui ck. If the
prof its has turned out to be none, l ack in’ consid able, and none to
car ry, is it my fault any more’n it’s your n ?”

“Well, they’d be in this house yet and we wouldn’t if I could ’a’
got my advice listened to.”

The king sa ssed back as much as was safe for him, and then swa pped
around and lit into me again. He give me down the banks for not
coming and telling him I see the niggers come out of his room acting
that way —said any fool would ’a’ knowed something was up. And then
walt zed in and cussed himself awhile, and said it all come of him
not laying late and taking his natural rest that morning, and he’d be
blamed if he’d ever do it again. So they went off a- jaw ing; and I felt
dreadful glad I’d worked it all off onto the niggers, and yet hadn’t
done the niggers no harm by it.




CHAPTER XX VIII


By and by it was ge tt ing- up time. So I come down the ladder and
started for down-stair s; but as I come to the girl s’ room the door was
open, and I see Mary Jane setting by her old hair trun k, which was
open and she’d been pac king things in it— getting ready to go to
England. But she had stopped now with a folded gown in her lap, and
had her face in her hands, crying. I felt awful bad to see it; of
course anybody would. I went in there and says:

“Miss Mary Jane, you can’t a- bear to see people in trouble, and I
can ’t — most al ways. Tell me about it.”

So she done it. And it was the nigger s—I just expected it. She said
the beautiful tri p to England was most about spoiled for her; she
didn’t know how she was ever going to be happy there, knowing the
mother and the children warn’t ever going to see each other no
more —and then busted out bit ter er than ever, and flung up her hands,
and says:

“Oh, dear, dear, to think they ain’t ever going to see each other
any more !”

“But they will —and inside of two week s—and I know it!” says I.

Law s, it was out before I could think ! And before I could budge she
throws her arms around my neck and told me to say it again, say it
again, say it again !

I see I had spoke too sudden and said too much, and was in a close
place. I asked her to let me think a minute; and she set there, very
impati ent and excited and handsome, but looking kind of happy and
ea se d- up, like a person that’s had a too th pulled out. So I went to
studying it out. I says to myself, I reckon a body that up s and tells
the truth when he is in a tight place is taking considerable many
re sk s, though I ain’t had no experience, and can’t say for certain ;
but it looks so to me, anyway; and yet here’s a case where I’m ble st
if it don’t look to me like the truth is better and actuly sa fer
than a lie. I must lay it by in my mind, and think it over some time
or other, it’s so kind of strange and un regul ar. I never see nothing
like it. Well, I says to myself at last, I’m a-going to chance it;
I’ll up and tell the truth this time, though it does seem most like
setting down on a k a g of pow der and tou ching it off just to see where
you’ll go to. Then I says:

“Miss Mary Jane, is there any place out of town a little ways where
you could go and stay three or four day s?”

“Yes; Mr. Lothrop ’ s. Wh y?”

“Never mind why yet. If I’ll tell you how I know the niggers will see
each other again— inside of two week s— here in this house —and prove
how I know it— will you go to Mr. Lothrop ’s and stay four day s?”

“F our day s!” she says; “I’ll stay a year !”

“All right,” I says, “I don’t want nothing more out of you than just
your word —I druther have it than another man’s kis s- the - Bi ble .” She
smiled and re dd ened up very swe et, and I says, “If you don’t mind it,
I’ll shut the door —and bol t it.”

Then I come back and set down again, and says:

“Don’t you holl er. Just set still and take it like a man. I got to
tell the truth, and you want to brace up, Miss Mary, because it’s a
bad kind, and going to be hard to take, but there ain’t no help for
it. These uncles of your n ain’t no uncles at all; they’re a couple of
fraud s— regular dead - beat s. There, now we’re over the worst of it, you
can stand the rest midd ling easy.”

It jol ted her up like everything, of course; but I was over the sho al
water now, so I went right along, her eyes a- blazing higher and higher
all the time, and told her every blame thing, from where we first
struck that young fool going up to the steamboat, clear through to
where she flung herself onto the king’s breast at the front door and
he kissed her sixteen or seventeen tim es —and then up she jum ps, with
her face af ir e like sun set, and says:

“The bru te ! Come, don’t waste a minute —not a secon d— we’ll have
them t ar red and fea ther ed, and flung in the river !”

Says I :

“C er t ’n ly. But do you mean before you go to Mr. Lothrop ’s, or —”

“O h,” she says, “what am I thinking ab out!” she says, and set right
down again. “Don’t mind what I said — please don ’t —you won ’t, now,
will you?” La ying her sil ky hand on mine in that kind of a way that
I said I would die first. “I never thought, I was so stirred up ,” she
says; “ now go on, and I won’t do so any more. You tell me what to do,
and whatever you say I’ll do it.”

“Well,” I says, “it’s a rough gang, them two frauds, and I’m fixed so
I got to travel with them a while longer, whether I want to or not —I
druther not tell you wh y; and if you was to blow on them this town
would get me out of their c law s, and I’d be all right; but there’d be
another person that you don’t know about who ’d be in big trouble.
Well, we got to save him, hain’t we ? Of course. Well, then, we won’t
blow on them.”

Sa ying them words put a good idea in my head. I see how maybe I could
get me and Jim rid of the fraud s; get them jailed here, and then
lea ve. But I didn’t want to run the raft in the daytime without
anybody aboard to answer questions but me; so I didn’t want the plan
to begin working till pretty late to-night. I says:

“Miss Mary Jane, I’ll tell you what we’ll do, and you won’t have to
stay at Mr. Lothrop ’s so long, nuther. How fur is it?”

“A little short of four mi le s— right out in the country, back here.”

“Well, that ’ll answ er. Now you go along out there, and lay low till
nine or half past to-night, and then get them to fetch you home
again— tell them you’ve thought of something. If you get here before
eleven put a candle in this window, and if I don’t turn up wait till
ele ven, and then if I don’t turn up it means I’m gone, and out of
the way, and safe. Then you come out and spread the news around, and
get these beats j ai le d.”

“Goo d,” she says, “I’ll do it.”

“And if it just happen s so that I don’t get away, but get took up
along with them, you must up and say I told you the whole thing
befor e hand, and you must stand by me all you can.”

“St and by you! indeed I will. They sha’n’t touch a hair of your head !”
she says, and I see her nostrils spread and her eyes sna p when she
said it, too.

“If I get away I sha’n’t be here,” I says, “to prove these
rapscallions ain’t your uncle s, and I couldn’t do it if I was here.
I could swear they was beats and b um mer s, that’s all, though that’s
worth something. Well, there’s others can do that better than what I
can, and they’re people that ain’t going to be doub ted as quick as I’d
be. I’ll tell you how to find them. G imme a pencil and a piece of
paper. Th er e— ’ Royal Nonesu ch, Bri cks vill e.’ Put it away, and don’t
lose it. When the court wants to find out something about these two,
let them send up to Bri cks ville and say they’ve got the men that
played the ’ Royal Nonesuch ,’ and ask for some wit nes se s— why, you’ll
have that enti re town down here before you can hardly win k, Miss Mar y.
And they’ll come a- bil ing, too.”

I judged we had got everything fixed about right now. So I says:

“Just let the auction go right along, and don’t wor ry. Nobody don’t
have to pay for the things they buy till a whole day after the auction
on accounts of the short notice, and they ain’t going out of this till
they get that mone y; and the way we’ve fixed it the sale ain’t going
to coun t, and they ain’t going to get no money. It’s just like the way
it was with the nigger s— it warn’t no sa le, and the niggers will be
back before long. Why, they can’t collec t the money for the niggers
yet— they’re in the worst kind of a fix , Miss Mar y.”

“Well,” she says, “I’ll run down to breakfast now, and then I’ll start
straight for Mr. Lothrop ’s.”

“’ De ed, that ain’t the tick et, Miss Mary Jan e,” I says, “by no
manner of mean s; go before breakfast.”

“Wh y?”

“What did you reckon I wanted you to go at all for, Miss Mar y?”

“Well, I never thought —and come to think, I don’t know. What was it?”

“Why, it’s because you ain’t one of these leather- face people. I don’t
want no better book than what your face is. A body can set down and
read it off like coarse prin t. Do you reckon you can go and face your
uncles when they come to kiss you good- morning, and never —”

“Th ere, there, don ’t! Yes, I’ll go before breakfa st —I’ll be glad to.
And leave my sist ers with them?”

“Yes; never mind about them. They’ve got to stand it yet a while. They
might suspicion something if all of you was to go. I don’t want you to
see them, nor your sister s, nor nobody in this town; if a neigh b or was
to ask how is your uncles this morning your face would tell something.
No, you go right along, Miss Mary Jane, and I’ll fix it with all of
them. I’ll tell Miss Susan to give your love to your uncles and say
you’ve went away for a few hours for to get a little rest and chang e,
or to see a friend, and you’ll be back to-night or early in the
morning.”

“G one to see a friend is all right, but I won’t have my love given to
them.”

“Well, then, it sha’n’t be.” It was well enough to tell her so— no
harm in it. It was only a little thing to do, and no trouble; and it’s
the little things that smoo ths people’s road s the mo st, down here
be low ; it would make Mary Jane comfortable, and it wouldn’t cost
nothing. Then I says: “There’s one more thing —that bag of money.”

“Well, they’ve got that; and it makes me feel pretty si lly to think
how they got it.”

“No, you’re out, there. They hain’t got it.”

“Why, who ’s got it?”

“I wish I know ed, but I don ’t. I had it, because I stole it from
them; and I stole it to give to you; and I know where I hid it, but
I’m afraid it ain’t there no more. I’m awful sorry, Miss Mary Jane,
I’m just as sorry as I can be; but I done the best I coul d; I did
honest . I come nigh getting cau ght, and I had to shove it into the
first place I come to, and run —and it warn’t a good place.”

“Oh, stop bla ming yourself —it’s too bad to do it, and I won’t allow
it— you couldn’t help it; it wasn’t your faul t. Where did you hide
it?”

I didn’t want to set her to thinking about her troubles again; and I
couldn’t seem to get my mouth to tell her what would make her see that
corpse laying in the coffin with that bag of money on his stoma ch. So
for a minute I didn’t say nothing; then I says:

“ I’d ruther not tell you where I put it, Miss Mary Jane, if you
don’t mind letting me off; but I’ll write it for you on a piece of
paper, and you can read it along the road to Mr. Lothrop ’s, if you
want to. Do you reckon that ’ll do?”

“Oh, y es.”

So I wro te : “I put it in the coff in. It was in there when you was
crying there, away in the night. I was behind the door, and I was
mighty sorry for you, Miss Mary Jan e.”

It made my eyes water a little to remember her crying there all by
herself in the night, and them devil s laying there right under her own
roof, sha ming her and rob bing her; and when I folded it up and give it
to her I see the water come into her eyes, too; and she shook me by
the hand, hard, and says:

“Good- by. I’m going to do everything just as you’ve told me; and if
I don’t ever see you again, I sha’n’t ever forget you, and I’ll think
of you a many and a many a time, and I’ll pray for you, too ! ”—and
she was gone.

Pray for me! I reckoned if she knowed me she’d take a job that was
more nearer her si ze. But I bet she done it, just the sa me— she was
just that kind. She had the gr it to pray for Ju du s if she took the
noti on —there warn’t no back -down to her, I jud ge. You may say what
you want to, but in my opinion she had more s and in her than any girl
I ever see; in my opinion she was just full of san d. It sounds like
fl atter y, but it ain’t no fl atter y. And when it comes to beaut y —and
goodness, too— she lays over them all. I hain’t ever seen her since
that time that I see her go out of that door; no, I hain’t ever seen
her since, but I reckon I’ve thought of her a many and a many a
million times, and of her saying she would pray for me; and if ever
I’d ’a’ thought it would do any good for me to pray for her, blamed
if I wouldn’t ’a’ done it or bust.

Well, Mary Jane she lit out the back way, I reck on; because nobody see
her go. When I struck Susan and the hare- lip, I says:

“What’s the name of them people over on t’other side of the river that
you all goes to see some tim es?”

They says:

“There’s sever al; but it’s the Pro ctors, main ly.”

“That’s the name,” I says; “I most forgot it. Well, Miss Mary Jane she
told me to tell you she’s gone over there in a dreadful hurry —one of
them ’s sick .”

“Which one ?”

“I don’t know; leastways, I kinder for ge t; but I thinks it ’ s —”

“Sa kes alive, I hope it ain’t Han ner ?”

“I’m sorry to say it,” I says, “but Han ner ’s the very one.”

“My goodness, and she so well only last week ! Is she took bad ?”

“It ain’t no name for it. They set up with her all night, Miss Mary
Jane said, and they don’t think she ’ll last many hour s.”

“Only think of that, now! What’s the matter with her ?”

I couldn’t think of anything reasonable, right off that way, so I
says:

“M um p s.”

“M um ps your gr ann y! They don’t set up with people that’s got the
mump s.”

“They don’t, don’t they ? You better bet they do with these mump s.
These mum ps is different. It’s a new kind, Miss Mary Jane said.”

“How ’s it a new kind ?”

“Because it’s mixed up with other thing s.”

“What other thing s?”

“Well, me asle s, and whoo p ing- cough , and er ysi pl as, and con su mp tion,
and yaller j and ers, and brain- fever, and I don’t know what all.”

“My land! And they call it the mump s?”

“That’s what Miss Mary Jane said.”

“Well, what in the nation do they call it the mum ps for?”

“Why, because it is the mump s. That’s what it star ts with .”

“Well, ther’ ain’t no sense in it. A body might stump his to e, and
take pis on, and fall down the well, and break his neck, and bust his
brains out, and somebody come along and ask what killed him, and some
numsk ull up and say, ’ Why, he stum ped his to e.’ Would ther’ be any
sense in that? No. And ther’ ain’t no sense in this, nuther. Is it
ket ch ing?”

“Is it ket ch ing ? Why, how you talk. Is a har row cat ch ing— in the
dark ? If you don’t hitch on to one too th, you’re bound to on another,
ain’t you? And you can’t get away with that too th without fet ching the
whole har row along, can you? Well, these kind of mum ps is a kind of a
har row, as you may say —and it ain’t no slouch of a har row, nu ther,
you come to get it hitched on good.”

“Well, it’s aw ful, I think ,” says the hare- li p. “I’ll go to Uncle
Harvey and—”

“Oh, y es,” I says, “I would. Of course I would. I wouldn’t lose no
time.”

“Well, why wouldn’t you?”

“Just look at it a minute, and maybe you can see. Hain’t your uncles
obleeged to get along home to England as fast as they can ? And do you
reckon they’d be mean enough to go off and leave you to go all that
journey by yoursel ves ? You know they’ll wait for you. So fur , so
good. Your uncle Harvey ’s a preach er, ain’t he? Very well, then; is a
preacher going to de ceive a steamboat cler k ? is he going to de ceive
a ship cler k ?— so as to get them to let Miss Mary Jane go abo ard ?
Now you know he ain ’t. What will he do, then? Why, he’ll say,
’ It’s a great pit y, but my church matters has got to get along the
best way they can ; for my niece has been exposed to the dreadful
plu ri bus - un um mum ps, and so it’s my b ound en duty to set down here and
wait the three months it takes to show on her if she’s got it.’ But
never mind, if you think it’s best to tell your uncle Harvey —”

“Shucks, and stay fooling around here when we could all be having good
times in England whilst we was waiting to find out whether Mary Jane’s
got it or not ? Why, you talk like a mugg in s.”

“Well, anyway, maybe you’d better tell some of the neighbor s.”

“L ist en at that, now. You do beat all for natural stup id ness. C an ’t
you see that they’d go and tell ? Th er ’ ain’t no way but just to
not tell anybody at all.”

“Well, maybe you’re right — yes, I judge you are right.”

“But I reckon we ought to tell Uncle Harvey she’s gone out awhile,
anyway, so he won’t be uneasy about her ?”

“Yes, Miss Mary Jane she wanted you to do that. She says, ’ Tell them
to give Uncle Harvey and William my love and a kis s, and say I’ve run
over the river to see Mr . ’— Mr . —what is the name of that rich
family your uncle Peter used to think so much of ? —I mean the one
that —”

“Why, you must mean the A p thor ps, ain’t it?”

“Of course; bother them kind of nam es, a body can’t ever seem to
remember them, half the time, somehow. Yes, she said, say she has run
over for to ask the A p thor ps to be sure and come to the auction and
buy this house, because she allowed her uncle Peter would ruther they
had it than anybody else; and she’s going to stick to them till they
say they’ll come, and then, if she ain’t too tired, she’s coming hom e;
and if she is, she ’ll be home in the morning anyway. She said, don’t
say nothing about the Pro ctors, but only about the A p thor p s— which ’ll
be perfectly true, because she is going there to speak about their
bu ying the house; I know it, because she told me so her self.”

“All right,” they said, and cleared out to lay for their uncle s, and
give them the love and the kis ses, and tell them the messa ge.

Ever y thing was all right now. The girls wouldn’t say nothing because
they wanted to go to England ; and the king and the duke would ruther
Mary Jane was off working for the auction than around in reach of
Do ctor Robin son. I felt very good; I judged I had done it pretty
neat —I reckoned Tom Sawyer couldn’t ’a’ done it no neat er himself. Of
course he would ’a’ throwed more style into it, but I can’t do that
very handy, not being brung up to it.

Well, they held the auction in the public s quare, along towards the
end of the afternoon, and it strung along, and strung along, and the
old man he was on hand and looking his level pis on est, up there
long side of the au cti one er, and chi pping in a little S crip ture now and
then, or a little good y- goo dy saying of some kind, and the duke he was
around goo-gooing for sympathy all he knowed how, and just spreading
himself gener ly.

But by and by the thing dragged through, and everything was
sol d— everything but a little old trifling lot in the gravey ard. So
they’d got to work that off —I never see such a gi raf ft as the king
was for wanting to swa llow everything. Well, whilst they was at it a
steamboat lan ded, and in about two minutes up comes a crowd a- whooping
and yelling and laughing and carrying on, and singing out:

“H ere’s your op position lin e! here’s your two se ts o’ he irs to old
Peter Wilk s—and you pa ys your money and you takes your cho i ce !”




CHAPTER XX IX


They was fet ching a very ni ce- looking old gentleman along, and a
ni ce- looking younger one, with his right arm in a sl ing. And, my
soul s, how the people ye lled and laughed, and kept it up. But I didn’t
see no joke about it, and I judged it would strain the duke and the
king some to see an y. I reckoned they’d turn pa le. But no, n ary a pale
did they turn. The duke he never let on he suspici oned what was up,
but just went a goo-gooing around, happy and satisfied, like a jug
that’s goo g ling out butter mil k; and as for the king, he just gazed and
gazed down sorrow ful on them new - com ers like it give him the
stoma ch- ac he in his very heart to think there could be such frauds and
rascal s in the world. Oh, he done it admir able. Lo ts of the principal
people ge thered around the king, to let him see they was on his side.
That old gentleman that had just come looked all puzzled to death.
Pretty soon he begun to spea k, and I see straight off he pr on oun ced
like an English man —not the king’s way, though the king’s was
pretty good for an im it ation. I can’t give the old gent ’s words, nor I
can’t imitate him; but he turned around to the crowd, and says, about
like this:

“This is a surprise to me which I wasn’t looking for ; and I’ll
ac knowle dge, can did and fran k, I ain’t very well fixed to meet it and
answer it; for my brother and me has had mis fortun es; he’s broke his
arm, and our baggage got put off at a town above here last night in
the night by a mista ke. I am Peter Wilk s’s brother Harvey, and this is
his brother William, which can’t hear nor spea k —and can’t even make
signs to amount to much, now ’t he’s only got one hand to work them
with. We are who we say we ar e; and in a day or two, when I get the
bagg age, I can prove it. But up till then I won’t say nothing more,
but go to the hotel and wa it.”

So him and the new dum my started off; and the king he laugh s, and
ble ther s out:

“B ro ke his arm — very like ly, ain’t it ? —and very conveni ent, too,
for a fra ud that’s got to make sign s, and ain’t learnt how. Lo st their
bagg ag e! That’s mighty good ! —and mighty ingen ious — under the
circumstan c es !”

So he laughed again; and so did everybody else, except three or four ,
or maybe half a doz en. One of these was that doctor ; another one was a
shar p- looking gentleman, with a carpet- bag of the old-fashioned kind
made out of carpet- stuff, that had just come off of the steamboat and
was talking to him in a low voice, and glancing towards the king now
and then and no dding their head s— it was Levi Bell, the lawyer that
was gone up to Lou is vill e; and another one was a big rough hus ky that
come along and listened to all the old gentlemen said, and was
listening to the king now. And when the king got done this hus ky up
and says:

“Say, looky here; if you are Harvey Wil ks, when ’d you come to this
town ?”

“The day before the funer al, friend ,” says the king.

“But what time o’ day ?”

“In the even in ’— ’bout an hour er two before sun down.”

“How ’d you come?”

“I come down on the Susan P ow ell from Cincinnati .”

“Well, then, how ’d you come to be up at the P int in the morn in ’ —in
a cano e?”

“I warn’t up at the P int in the morn in ’.”

“It’s a li e.”

S ever al of them jumped for him and begged him not to talk that way to
an old man and a preach er.

“P rea cher be hang ed, he’s a fra ud and a li ar. He was up at the P int
that morn in’. I live up there, don’t I? Well, I was up there, and he
was up there. I see him there. He come in a canoe, along with T im
C oll ins and a bo y.”

The doctor he up and says:

“W ould you know the boy again if you was to see him, Hin es?”

“I reckon I would, but I don’t know. Why, yonder he is, now. I know
him perfectly easy.”

It was me he pointed at. The doctor says:

“N ei gh bor s, I don’t know whether the new couple is frauds or not ; but
if these two ain’t frauds, I am an idio t, that’s all. I think it’s
our duty to see that they don’t get away from here till we’ve looked
into this thing. Come along, Hin es; come along, the rest of you. We’ll
take these fellows to the ta ver n and af front them with t’other cou ple,
and I reckon we’ll find out something before we get through.”

It was nuts for the crowd, though maybe not for the king’s friend s; so
we all started. It was about sun down. The doctor he led me along by
the hand, and was plenty kind enough, but he never let go my hand.

We all got in a big room in the hotel, and lit up some candles, and
fetched in the new cou ple. Fir st, the doctor says:

“I don’t wish to be too hard on these two men, but I think they’re
frauds, and they may have comp lic es that we don’t know nothing about.
If they have, won’t the comp lic es get away with that bag of gold Peter
Wilks lef t? It ain’t un likely. If these men ain’t frauds, they won’t
object to sending for that money and letting us keep it till they
prove they’re all right — ain’t that so?”

Everybody agreed to that. So I judged they had our gang in a pretty
tight place right at the out start. But the king he only looked
sorrow ful, and says:

“G ent lem en, I wish the money was there, for I ain’t got no disposition
to throw anything in the way of a fa ir, open, out -and- out
investigation o’ this mi sa ble business; but, al as, the money ain’t
there; you k’n send and see, if you want to.”

“Where is it, then?”

“Well, when my niece give it to me to keep for her I took and hid it
inside o’ the straw tick o’ my bed, not wish in’ to bank it for the few
days we’d be here, and consider in’ the bed a safe place, we not bein’
used to niggers, and sup pos ’n’ ’em hon est, like servants in England.
The niggers stole it the very next morn in’ after I had went
down-stair s; and when I sold ’em I hadn’t missed the money y it, so
they got clean away with it. My servant here k’n tell you ’bout it,
gentlemen .”

The doctor and several said “Sh uck s!” and I see nobody didn’t
altogether believe him. One man asked me if I see the niggers steal
it. I said no, but I see them snea king out of the room and hust ling
away, and I never thought nothing, only I reckoned they was afraid
they had waked up my master and was trying to get away before he made
trouble with them. That was all they asked me. Then the doctor whir ls
on me and says:

“A re you English , too?”

I says yes; and him and some others laughed, and said, “St uff !”

Well, then they sa iled in on the general investig ation, and there we
had it, up and down, hour in, hour out, and nobody never said a word
about supper, nor ever seemed to think about it—and so they kept it
up, and kept it up; and it was the worst mix ed-up thing you ever
see. They made the king tell his yar n, and they made the old gentleman
tell hi s’ n; and anybody but a lot of pre ju di ced chuck le heads would ’a’
seen that the old gentleman was spinning truth and t’other one li es.
And by and by they had me up to tell what I know ed. The king he give
me a left- handed look out of the corner of his ey e, and so I knowed
enough to talk on the right side. I begun to tell about Sheffiel d, and
how we lived there, and all about the English Wilk ses, and so on; but
I didn’t get pretty fur till the doctor begun to laugh ; and Levi Bell,
the law yer, says:

“S et down, my bo y; I wouldn’t strain myself if I was you. I reckon you
ain’t used to ly ing, it don’t seem to come hand y; what you want is
practi ce. You do it pretty awk war d.”

I didn’t care nothing for the complim ent, but I was glad to be let
off, anyway.

The doctor he started to say something, and turns and says:

“If you’d been in town at first, Levi B ell —”

The king broke in and reached out his hand, and says:

“Why, is this my poor dead brother ’s old friend that he’s wrote so
often about?”

The lawyer and him shook hands, and the lawyer smiled and looked
plea sed, and they talked right along awhile, and then got to one side
and talked low ; and at last the lawyer spea ks up and says:

“That ’ll fix it. I’ll take the order and send it, along with your
brother ’s, and then they’ll know it’s all right.”

So they got some paper and a pen, and the king he set down and twisted
his head to one side, and cha wed his tong ue, and scrawled off
some thing; and then they give the pen to the duke —and then for the
first time the duke looked si ck. But he took the pen and wro te. So
then the lawyer turns to the new old gentleman and says:

“You and your brother please write a line or two and sign your nam es.”

The old gentleman wro te, but nobody couldn’t read it. The lawyer
looked powerful astonished, and says:

“Well, it beats me —and sna ked a lot of old letters out of his
pocket, and examined them, and then examined the old man’s writing,
and then them again; and then says: “Th ese old letters is from
Harvey Wilk s; and here’s these two hand writ ings, and anybody can see
they didn’t write them ” ( the king and the duke looked sold and
foolish, I tell you, to see how the lawyer had took them in ), “and
here’s this old gentleman’s hand writing, and anybody can tell, easy
enough, he didn’t write them — fact is, the scrat ches he makes ain’t
proper ly writing at all. Now, here’s some letters from —”

The new old gentleman says:

“If you please, let me expla in. Nobody can read my hand but my brother
there— so he copies for me. It’s his hand you’ve got there, not
min e.”

“Well !” says the law yer, “this is a state of things. I’ve got some
of William ’s letters, too; so if you’ll get him to write a line or so
we can com —”

“He can’t write with his left hand ,” says the old gentle man. “If he
could use his right hand, you would see that he wrote his own letters
and mine too. Look at both , plea se — they’re by the same hand .”

The lawyer done it, and says:

“I believe it’s so —and if it ain’t so, there’s a heap strong er
resem bl ance than I’d noticed before, anyway. Well, well, well ! I
thought we was right on the track of a slu tion, but it’s gone to
gras s, part ly. But anyway, one thing is pro v ed— these two ain’t
either of ’em Wilk se s ”—and he wa gged his head towards the king and
the duke.

Well, what do you think ? That mu le- headed old fool wouldn’t give in
then ! In deed he wouldn’t. Said it warn’t no fair te st. Said his
brother William was the cus se dest jo ker in the world, and hadn’t
tried to writ e— he see William was going to play one of his jo kes
the minute he put the pen to paper. And so he warmed up and went
war bling right along till he was actuly beginning to believe what he
was saying him self ; but pretty soon the new gentleman broke in, and
says:

“I’ve thought of something. Is there anybody here that helped to lay
out my br — helped to lay out the late Peter Wilks for bur y ing?”

“Yes,” says some body, “ me and A b Turner done it. We ’re both here.”

Then the old man turns toward the king, and says:

“P er a ps this gentleman can tell me what was tattooed on his brea st?”

Blamed if the king didn’t have to brace up mighty quick, or he’d ’a’
sq ushed down like a blu ff bank that the river has cut un der, it took
him so sudd en; and, mind you, it was a thing that was calcul ated to
make most anybody sq ush to get fetched such a solid one as that
without any notice, because how was he going to know what was
tattooed on the man? He whi tened a litt le; he couldn’t help it; and
it was mighty still in there, and everybody bending a little forwar ds
and gazing at him. Says I to myself, Now he’ll throw up the
spong e— there ain’t no more u se. Well, did he? A body can’t hardly
believe it, but he didn’t. I reckon he thought he’d keep the thing up
till he tired them people out, so they’d thin out, and him and the
duke could break loose and get away. Any way, he set there, and pretty
soon he begun to smi le, and says:

“M f ! It’s a very tough question, ain’t it! Yes, sir, I k’n tell
you what’s tattooed on his brea st. It’s jest a small, thin, blue
arr ow —that’s what it is ; and if you don’t look clo st, you can’t see
it. Now what do you say — he y?”

Well, I never see anything like that old bli ster for clean
out -and- out chee k.

The new old gentleman turns bris k towards A b Turner and his par d, and
his eye lights up like he judged he’d got the king this time, and
says:

“Ther e— you’ve heard what he said ! Was there any such mark on Peter
Wilk s’s brea st?”

Both of them spoke up and says:

“We didn’t see no such mar k.”

“Goo d!” says the old gentle man. “Now, what you did see on his breast
was a small dim P , and a B ( which is an initi al he dropped when he was
young ), and a W , and das hes between them, so: P — B — W ”—and he marked
them that way on a piece of paper. “C ome, ain’t that what you saw ?”

Both of them spoke up again, and says:

“No, we didn’t. We never seen any marks at all.”

Well, everybody was in a state of mind now, and they sings out:

“The whole bil in’ of ’m ’s fraud s! Le’s du ck ’em ! le’s dr own ’em !
le’s ride ’em on a rail !” and everybody was whooping at once, and
there was a rattling poww ow. But the lawyer he jumps on the table and
yell s, and says:

“G ent lemen — gentlemen ! He ar me just a word —just a single word —if
you P LE A SE ! There’s one way yet— let’s go and dig up the corpse and
loo k.”

That took them.

“H o or a y!” they all shouted, and was starting right off; but the lawyer
and the doctor sung out:

“Hold on, hold on! C oll ar all these four men and the boy, and fetch
them along, too !”

“W e ’ll do it!” they all shou ted; “and if we don’t find them marks
we’ll lynch the whole gang !”

I was scared, now, I tell you. But there warn’t no getting away, you
know. They gri pped us all, and mar ched us right along, straight for
the gravey ard, which was a mile and a half down the river, and the
whole town at our heel s, for we made noise enough, and it was only
nine in the evening.

As we went by our house I wished I hadn’t sent Mary Jane out of town;
because now if I could ti p her the wink she’d light out and save me,
and blow on our dead - beat s.

Well, we swarmed along down the river road, just carrying on like
wil d cat s; and to make it more sc ary the sky was dar king up, and the
lightning beginning to wink and fl it ter, and the wind to shi ver
amongst the lea ves. This was the most awful trouble and most
danger some I ever was in; and I was kinder st un ne d; everything was
going so different from what I had allowed for ; stead of being fixed
so I could take my own time if I wanted to, and see all the fun , and
have Mary Jane at my back to save me and set me free when the
clo se- fit come, here was nothing in the world betwixt me and sudden
death but just them tattoo - mar ks. If they didn’t find them —

I couldn’t bear to think about it; and yet, some how, I couldn’t think
about nothing else. It got dar ker and dark er, and it was a beautiful
time to give the crowd the sli p ; but that big hus ky had me by the
wri st — Hin es —and a body might as well try to give Go liar the sli p. He
dragged me right along, he was so excited, and I had to run to keep
up.

When they got there they swarmed into the gravey ard and washed over it
like an over fl ow. And when they got to the grave they found they had
about a hundred times as many shovel s as they wan ted, but nobody
hadn’t thought to fetch a lantern. But they sa iled into digging anyway
by the fli ck er of the light ning, and sent a man to the near est house,
a half a mile off, to borrow one.

So they dug and dug like everything; and it got awful dark, and the
rain star ted, and the wind swi shed and sw ushed along, and the
lightning come brisk er and brisk er, and the thunder boom ed; but them
people never took no notice of it, they was so full of this business;
and one minute you could see everything and every face in that big
crowd, and the shovel fu ls of dirt sailing up out of the grave, and the
next second the dark wi ped it all out, and you couldn’t see nothing at
all.

At last they got out the coffin and begun to un scre w the lid, and then
such another crow ding and shoulder ing and shoving as there was, to
sc rou ge in and get a sight, you never see; and in the dark, that way,
it was aw ful. Hin es he hurt my wrist dreadful pulling and tu gging so,
and I reckon he clean forgot I was in the world, he was so excited and
pan t ing.

All of a sudden the lightning let go a perfect slu ice of white gl are,
and somebody sings out:

“By the living j ing o, here’s the bag of gold on his brea st !”

Hin es let out a whoop, like everybody else, and dropped my wrist and
give a big sur ge to bust his way in and get a look, and the way I lit
out and shin ned for the road in the dark there ain’t nobody can tell.

I had the road all to myself, and I fairly fle w — leastways, I had it
all to myself except the solid dark, and the now -and- then gl ar es, and
the bu zz ing of the rain, and the thr ashing of the win d, and the
spl itting of the th under ; and sure as you are born I did clip it
along !

When I struck the town I see there warn’t nobody out in the stor m, so
I never hunted for no back street s, but hum ped it straight through the
main one; and when I begun to get towards our house I aim ed my eye and
set it. No light there; the house all dark —which made me feel sorry
and disappoin ted, I didn’t know why. But at last, just as I was
sailing by, flash comes the light in Mary Jane’s window ! and my
heart swelled up sudden, like to bu st; and the same second the house
and all was behind me in the dark, and wasn’t ever going to be before
me no more in this world. She was the best girl I ever see, and had
the most san d.

The minute I was far enough above the town to see I could make the
tow head, I begun to look sharp for a boat to bor row, and the first
time the lightning showed me one that wasn’t chained I snatched it and
shov ed. It was a canoe, and warn’t fastened with nothing but a rope.
The towhead was a rattling big distance off, away out there in the
middle of the river, but I didn’t lose no time; and when I struck the
raft at last I was so fagged I would ’a’ just laid down to blow and
gas p if I could af for ded it. But I didn’t. As I sprung aboard I sung
out:

“O ut with you, Jim, and set her loo se! G lor y be to goodness, we’re
shut of them !”

Jim lit out, and was a- coming for me with both arms sp read, he was so
full of jo y; but when I glimp sed him in the lightning my heart shot up
in my mouth and I went overboard back war d s; for I forgot he was old
King Le ar and a drownded A-rab all in one, and it most scared the
li vers and lights out of me. But Jim fished me out, and was going to
hug me and bless me, and so on, he was so glad I was back and we was
shut of the king and the duke, but I says:

“Not now; have it for breakfast, have it for breakfa st ! C ut loose and
let her sli de !”

So in two seconds away we went a- sliding down the river, and it did
seem so good to be free again and all by ourselves on the big river,
and nobody to bother us. I had to ski p around a bit, and jump up and
crack my heels a few tim es —I couldn’t help it; but about the third
crack I noticed a sound that I knowed mighty well, and held my breath
and listened and wait ed; and sure enough, when the next flash busted
out over the water, here they com e ! —and just a- laying to their oars
and making their skiff hum ! It was the king and the duke.

So I wil ted right down onto the plan ks then, and give up; and it was
all I could do to keep from crying.




CHAPTER XXX


When they got aboard the king went for me, and shook me by the coll ar,
and says:

“T ry in’ to give us the sli p, was y e, you p up! T ir ed of our compan y,
he y?”

I says:

“No, your majest y, we warn ’t — please don’t, your majest y!”

“Qui ck, then, and tell us what was your idea, or I’ll shake the
in sides out o’ you!”

“H on est, I’ll tell you everything just as it happened, your majest y.
The man that had a-holt of me was very good to me, and kept saying he
had a boy about as big as me that died last year, and he was sorry to
see a boy in such a dangerous fix ; and when they was all took by
surprise by finding the gold, and made a rush for the coffin, he lets
go of me and whisper s, ’ He el it now, or they’ll hang y e, sure !’ and I
lit out. It didn’t seem no good for me to sta y —I couldn’t do
nothing, and I didn’t want to be hung if I could get away. So I
never stopped running till I found the cano e; and when I got here I
told Jim to hurry, or they’d catch me and hang me yet, and said I was
afeard you and the duke wasn’t alive now, and I was awful sorry, and
so was Jim, and was awful glad when we see you coming; you may ask Jim
if I didn ’t.”

Jim said it was so; and the king told him to shut up, and said, “Oh,
yes, it’s mighty like ly !” and shook me up again, and said he reckoned
he’d drown d me. But the duke says:

“L egg o the boy, you old idio t! Would you ’a’ done any differ ent ?
Did you inquire around for him when you got loo se? I don’t remember
it.”

So the king let go of me, and begun to cus s that town and everybody in
it. But the duke says:

“You better a blame’ sight give yourself a good cussing, for you’re
the one that’s entit led to it most. You hain’t done a thing from the
start that had any sense in it, except coming out so cool and chee ky
with that imagin ary blu e- arr ow mark. That was bright —it was right
down bull y; and it was the thing that saved us. For if it hadn’t been
for that they’d ’a’ jailed us till them English men’s baggage com e—and
then —the pen it enti ary, you bet ! But that trick took ’em to the
gravey ard, and the gold done us a still bigger kind nes s; for if the
excited fools hadn’t let go all hol ts and made that rush to get a look
we’d ’a’ slept in our crav ats to-night — crav ats war ran ted to we ar,
too— longer than we’d need ’em .”

They was still a minute — think ing; then the king says, kind of
ab sent - minded like :

“M f ! And we reckoned the niggers stole it!”

That made me squir m !

“Yes,” says the duke, kinder slow and deli ber ate and sar ca sti c, “we
did.”

After about a half a minute the king draw ls out:

“L ea st ways, I did.”

The duke says, the same way:

“On the contrary, I did.”

The king kind of ru ff les up, and says:

“Looky here, Bilge water, what ’r you refer r in’ to?” The duke says,
pretty brisk :

“When it comes to that, maybe you’ll let me ask what was you
refer ring to?”

“Sh uck s!” says the king, very sar ca stic ; “but I don’t know — maybe
you was asleep, and didn’t know what you was ab out.”

The duke bri st les up now, and says:

“Oh, let up on this cussed non sen se; do you take me for a blame’
fool ? Don’t you reckon I know who hid that money in that coff in?”

“Yes, sir! I know you do know, because you done it yourself !”

“It’s a lie ! ”—and the duke went for him. The king sings out:

“Take y ’r hands off !— le gg o my thro at ! —I take it all back !”

The duke says:

“Well, you just own up, first, that you did hide that money there,
inten ding to give me the slip one of these days, and come back and dig
it up, and have it all to yourself.”

“W a it jest a minute, duke — answer me this one question, honest and
fair ; if you didn’t put the money there, say it, and I’ll b’lieve you,
and take back everything I said.”

“You old scoundre l, I didn ’t, and you know I didn’t. There, now!”

“Well, then, I b’lieve you. But answer me only jest this one more— now
don’t git ma d; didn’t you have it in your mind to hook the money and
hide it?”

The duke never said nothing for a little b it; then he says:

“Well, I don’t care if I did, I didn’t do it, anyway. But you not
only had it in mind to do it, but you done it.”

“I wisht I never die if I done it, duke, and that’s honest . I won’t
say I warn’t goin’ to do it, because I was; but you —I mean
some bod y— got in ahead o’ me.”

“It’s a li e! You done it, and you got to say you done it, or —”

The king began to g ur g le, and then he gas ps out:

“’ N ough ! —I own up !”

I was very glad to hear him say that; it made me feel much more easier
than what I was feeling before. So the duke took his hands off and
says:

“If you ever deny it again I’ll dr own you. It’s well for you to set
there and blub ber like a bab y— it’s fitten for you, after the way
you’ve ac ted. I never see such an old o stri ch for wanting to go b ble
every thing —and I a- tru sting you all the time, like you was my own
father. You ought to been ashamed of yourself to stand by and hear it
sadd led on to a lot of poor niggers, and you never say a word for ’em.
It makes me feel ridi cul ous to think I was soft enough to believe
that rubbag e. C uss you, I can see now why you was so anxious to make
up the de ffi s it— you wanted to get what money I’d got out of the
‘ Nonesuch ’ and one thing or another, and scoop it all !”

The king says, ti mi d, and still a- snuff l ing:

“Why, duke, it was you that said make up the de ffer s it; it warn’t me.”

“D ry up! I don’t want to hear no more out of you!” says the duke. “And
now you see what you got by it. They’ve got all their own money
back, and all of ourn but a she ke l or two besid es. G ’long to bed,
and don’t you de ffer sit me no more de ffer sit s, long ’s you live !”

So the king snea ked into the wigwam and took to his bott le for
comfor t, and before long the duke tackled his bott le; and so in
about a half an hour they was as thick as thiev es again, and the
ti gh ter they got the lo v ing er they go t, and went off a- snor ing in each
other’s arms. They both got powerful me ll ow, but I noticed the king
didn’t get me llow enough to forget to remember to not deny about
hiding the mone y- bag again. That made me feel easy and satisfied. Of
course when they got to snor ing we had a long g ab ble, and I told Jim
everything.




CHAPTER XXX I


We dasn’t stop again at any town for days and day s; kept right along
down the river. We was down sou th in the warm weather now, and a
mighty long ways from home. We begun to come to trees with Span ish
mo ss on them, hanging down from the limbs like long, gray be ard s. It
was the first I ever see it gr ow ing, and it made the woods look solemn
and di sm al. So now the frauds reckoned they was out of dang er, and
they begun to work the vill ages again.

Fir st they done a lecture on temper an ce; but they didn’t make enough
for them both to get drunk on. Then in another village they started a
d anc ing- school ; but they didn’t know no more how to dance than a
k ang ar o o does; so the first pr ance they made the general public jumped
in and pr anced them out of town. Another time they tried to go at
yell o cu ti on; but they didn’t yell oc ute long till the audi ence got up
and give them a solid good cussing, and made them ski p out. They
tackled missi on ar ying, and mes mer i z ing, and doctor ing, and telling
fortun es, and a little of everything; but they couldn’t seem to have
no luck. So at last they got just about dead bro ke, and laid around
the raft as she floated along, thinking and thinking, and never saying
nothing, by the half a day at a time, and dreadful blue and desper ate.

And at last they took a change and begun to lay their heads together
in the wigwam and talk low and confid ential two or three hours at a
time. Jim and me got uneasy. We didn’t like the look of it. We judged
they was studying up some kind of worse devil try than ever. We turned
it over and over, and at last we made up our minds they was going to
break into somebody’s house or store, or was going into the
counter fe it- money business, or something. So then we was pretty
scared, and made up an agreement that we wouldn’t have nothing in the
world to do with such acti ons, and if we ever got the least show we
would give them the cold shake and clear out and leave them behind.
Well, early one morning we hid the raft in a good, safe place about
two mile below a little bit of a sha b by village named Pi k es ville, and
the king he went ashore and told us all to stay hid whilst he went up
to town and smelt around to see if anybody had got any wind of the
“ Royal Nonesuch ” there yet. ( “H ouse to rob , you mean ,” says I to
myself; “and when you get through rob bing it you’ll come back here and
wonder what has become of me and Jim and the raft —and you’ll have to
take it out in wonder ing . ” ) And he said if he warn’t back by mid day
the duke and me would know it was all right, and we was to come along.

So we stayed where we was. The duke he fre tted and swe ated around, and
was in a mighty s our way. He sc ol ded us for everything, and we
couldn’t seem to do nothing right; he found fault with every little
thing. Some thing was a- bre w ing, sure. I was good and glad when mid day
come and no king; we could have a chang e, anyway —and maybe a chance
for the chance on top of it. So me and the duke went up to the
village, and hunted around there for the king, and by and by we found
him in the back room of a little low do gg er y, very ti ght, and a lot of
loafers bull y ra gging him for spor t, and he a- cussing and a- threat ening
with all his might, and so tight he couldn’t wal k, and couldn’t do
nothing to them. The duke he begun to ab use him for an old fool, and
the king begun to sa ss back, and the minute they was fairly at it I
lit out and shook the re ef s out of my h ind leg s, and sp un down the
river road like a de er, for I see our chance; and I made up my mind
that it would be a long day before they ever see me and Jim again. I
got down there all out of breath but loaded up with jo y, and sung out:

“S et her loose, Jim; we’re all right now!”

But there warn’t no answer, and nobody come out of the wigwa m. Jim was
gone! I set up a shout —and then another —and then another one; and
run this way and that in the woods, whooping and scre e ch ing; but it
warn’t no use — old Jim was gone. Then I set down and cried; I couldn’t
help it. But I couldn’t set still long. Pretty soon I went out on the
road, trying to think what I better do, and I run across a boy
wal king, and asked him if he’d seen a strange nigger dressed so and
so, and he says:

“Yes.”

“W here ab out s?” says I.

“D own to Silas Phelp s’s place, two mile below here. He’s a runaway
nigger, and they’ve got him. Was you looking for him?”

“You bet I ain ’t! I run across him in the woods about an hour or two
ago, and he said if I hollered he’d cut my li vers out —and told me to
lay down and stay where I was; and I done it. Be en there ever sin ce;
afeard to come out.”

“Well,” he says, “you needn’t be afeard no more, be cuz they’ve got
him. He run off f ’m down Sou th som ’ er s.”

“It’s a good job they got him.”

“Well, I reck on! There’s two hundred dollars reward on him.
It’s like picking up money out’n the road .”

“Yes, it is —and I could ’a’ had it if I’d been big enough ; I see him
first. Who nailed him?”

“It was an old fell ow —a strang er —and he sold out his chance in him
for forty dollars, be cuz he’s got to go up the river and can’t wait.
Think o’ that, now! You bet I’d wait, if it was seven year .”

“That’s me, every time ,” says I. “But maybe his chance ain’t worth no
more than that, if he’ll sell it so che ap . Maybe there’s something
ain’t straight about it.”

“But it is, though — straight as a str ing. I see the hand bill myself.
It tells all about him, to a do t— pain ts him like a pict ure, and tells
the plant ation he’s fr um, below Ne wr lean s. No - sir re e- bo b, they
ain’t no trouble ’bout that spe cul ation, you bet you. Say, gimme a
chaw to back er, won’t ye ?”

I didn’t have none, so he left. I went to the raft, and set down in
the wigwam to think. But I couldn’t come to nothing. I thought till I
wore my head sor e, but I couldn’t see no way out of the trouble. After
all this long journey, and after all we’d done for them scoundrel s,
here it was all come to nothing, everything all busted up and ru in ed,
because they could have the heart to serve Jim such a trick as that,
and make him a slave again all his life, and amongst strang ers, too,
for forty dirty dollars.

Once I said to myself it would be a thousand times better for Jim to
be a slave at home where his family was, as long as he’d got to be a
sla ve, and so I’d better write a letter to Tom Sawyer and tell him to
tell Miss Watson where he was. But I soon give up that notion for two
thing s: she’d be mad and disgu sted at his rascal ity and un grate ful ness
for leaving her, and so she’d sell him straight down the river again;
and if she didn ’t, everybody naturally des pi ses an ungrateful nigger,
and they’d make Jim feel it all the time, and so he’d feel ornery and
disgrac ed. And then think of me! It would get all around that Huck
Finn helped a nigger to get his freed om ; and if I was ever to see
anybody from that town again I’d be ready to get down and lick his
boots for sha me. That’s just the way: a person does a low-down thing,
and then he don’t want to take no consequ ences of it. Thinks as long
as he can hi de, it ain’t no disgrac e. That was my fix exac t ly. The
more I studied about this the more my conscience went to gr inding me,
and the more wicked and low-down and ornery I got to feel ing. And at
last, when it hit me all of a sudden that here was the plain hand of
Providence sla pping me in the face and letting me know my wickedness
was being watched all the time from up there in heav en, whilst I was
steal ing a poor old woman’s nigger that hadn’t ever done me no h arm,
and now was showing me there’s One that’s always on the look out, and
ain’t a-going to allow no such miserable do ings to go only just so fur
and no further, I most dropped in my tracks I was so scared. Well, I
tried the best I could to kinder sof ten it up somehow for myself by
saying I was brung up wick ed, and so I warn’t so much to bla me; but
something inside of me kept saying, “There was the Sunday- school, you
could ’a’ gone to it; and if you’d ’a’ done it they’d ’a’ learnt you
there that people that ac ts as I’d been acting about that nigger goes
to ever la sting fire .”

It made me shiver . And I about made up my mind to pra y, and see if I
couldn’t try to quit being the kind of a boy I was and be better. So I
kne eled down. But the words wouldn’t come. Why wouldn’t they ? It
warn’t no use to try and hide it from H im . N or from me, nei ther. I
knowed very well why they wouldn’t come. It was because my heart
warn’t right; it was because I warn’t s quar e; it was because I was
playing doub le. I was letting on to give up s in, but away inside of
me I was holding on to the bigg est one of all. I was trying to make my
mouth say I would do the right thing and the clean thing, and go and
write to that nigger’s owner and tell where he was; but deep down in
me I knowed it was a li e, and He knowed it. You can’t pray a li e— I
found that out.

So I was full of trouble, full as I could be; and didn’t know what to
do. At last I had an idea ; and I says, I’ll go and write the
letter —and then see if I can pra y. Why, it was astonish ing, the way I
felt as light as a feather right straight off, and my troubles all
gone. So I got a piece of paper and a pen c il, all glad and excited,
and set down and wro te :

Miss Watson, your runaway nigger Jim is down here two mile below
Pi k es ville, and Mr. Phelps has got him and he will give him up for the
reward if you sen d. HUC K FINN .

I felt good and all washed clean of sin for the first time I had ever
felt so in my life, and I knowed I could pray now. But I didn’t do it
straight off, but laid the paper down and set there think ing— thinking
how good it was all this happened so, and how near I come to being
lost and going to he ll. And went on thinking. And got to thinking over
our tri p down the river; and I see Jim before me all the time : in the
day and in the night- time, sometimes moon light, sometimes storm s, and
we a- floating along, talking and singing and laughing. But somehow I
couldn’t seem to strike no places to hard en me against him, but only
the other kind. I’d see him standing my watch on top of hi s’ n, ’stead
of calling me, so I could go on sleep ing; and see him how glad he was
when I come back out of the fog ; and when I come to him again in the
swa mp, up there where the fe ud was; and su ch- like times; and would
always call me honey, and pet me, and do everything he could think of
for me, and how good he always was; and at last I struck the time I
saved him by telling the men we had smallpo x aboard, and he was so
grate ful, and said I was the best friend old Jim ever had in the
world, and the only one he’s got now; and then I happened to look
around and see that paper.

It was a close place. I took it up, and held it in my hand. I was
a- trem bling, because I’d got to de cid e, for ever, betwixt two things,
and I knowed it. I studied a minute, sort of holding my breath, and
then says to myself :

“All right, then, I’ll go to he ll ”—and tore it up.

It was awful thoughts and awful words, but they was said. And I let
them stay said; and never thought no more about re form ing. I shoved the
whole thing out of my head, and said I would take up wickedness again,
which was in my line, being brung up to it, and the other warn’t. And
for a star ter I would go to work and steal Jim out of sla very again;
and if I could think up anything wor se, I would do that, too; because
as long as I was in, and in for good, I might as well go the whole ho g.

Then I set to thinking over how to get at it, and turned over some
considerable many ways in my min d; and at last fixed up a plan that
suited me. So then I took the bear ings of a woo dy island that was down
the river a piece, and as soon as it was fairly dark I crept out with
my raft and went for it, and hid it there, and then turned in. I slept
the night through, and got up before it was light, and had my
breakfast, and put on my store clothes, and tied up some others and
one thing or another in a bund le, and took the canoe and cleared for
shore. I landed below where I judged was Phelp s’s place, and hid my
bundle in the woods, and then filled up the canoe with water, and
loaded rocks into her and sunk her where I could find her again when I
wanted her, about a quarter of a mile below a little steam - saw mi ll
that was on the bank.

Then I struck up the road, and when I passed the mi ll I see a sign on
it, “P help s’s Saw mill ,” and when I come to the farm - houses, two or
three hundred yards further along, I kept my eyes pe ele d, but didn’t
see nobody around, though it was good daylight now. But I didn’t mind,
because I didn’t want to see nobody just ye t —I only wanted to get the
lay of the land. A c cor ding to my plan, I was going to turn up there
from the village, not from below. So I just took a look, and shoved
along, straight for town. Well, the very first man I see when I got
there was the duke. He was sticking up a bill for the “ Royal
Nonesuch ” — three- night performan ce— like that other time. They had the
chee k, them fraud s! I was right on him before I could shir k. He looked
astonished, and says:

“H el - lo ! W here ’d you come from?” Then he says, kind of glad and
eag er, “W here’s the raft ?— got her in a good plac e?”

I says:

“Why, that’s just what I was going to ask your grac e.”

Then he didn’t look so joy ful, and says:

“What was your idea for asking me?” he says.

“Well,” I says, “when I see the king in that do gg ery yesterday I says
to myself, we can’t get him home for hours, till he’s so ber er; so I
went a- loaf ing around town to put in the time and wait. A man up and
offered me ten cents to help him pull a skiff over the river and back
to fetch a sheep , and so I went along; but when we was dragging him to
the boat, and the man left me a-holt of the rope and went behind him
to shove him along, he was too strong for me and jerked loose and run ,
and we after him. We didn’t have no dog, and so we had to chase him
all over the country till we tired him out. We never got him till
dar k; then we fetched him over, and I started down for the raft. When
I got there and see it was gone, I says to myself, ’ They’ve got into
trouble and had to lea ve; and they’ve took my nigger, which is the
only nigger I’ve got in the world, and now I’m in a strange country,
and ain’t got no property no more, nor nothing, and no way to make my
liv ing ’; so I set down and cried. I slept in the woods all night. But
what did become of the raft, then ? —and Jim — poor Jim!”

“B lamed if I know —that is, what’s become of the raft. That old fool
had made a trade and got forty dollars, and when we found him in the
do gg ery the loafers had mat ched half- dollars with him and got every
cent but what he’d spent for whisk y; and when I got him home late last
night and found the raft gone, we said, ‘ That little ras cal has stole
our raft and shook us, and run off down the river .’”

“I wouldn’t shake my nigger, would I ?— the only nigger I had in the
world, and the only proper t y.”

“We never thought of that. F act is, I reckon we’d come to consider him
our nigger ; yes, we did consider him so— goodness knows we had
trouble enough for him. So when we see the raft was gone and we flat
bro ke, there warn’t anything for it but to try the ‘ Royal Nonesuch ’
another sha ke. And I’ve pe gged along ever since, dry as a pow der- hor n.
W here’s that ten cent s? Give it here.”

I had considerable money, so I give him ten cent s, but begged him to
spend it for something to eat, and give me some, because it was all
the money I had, and I hadn’t had nothing to eat since yester day. He
never said nothing. The next minute he whir ls on me and says:

“Do you reckon that nigger would blow on us ? We ’d skin him if he done
that !”

“How can he blow ? Hain’t he run off?”

“No! That old fool sold him, and never di vi ded with me, and the
mone y’s gone.”

“S old him?” I says, and begun to cr y; “ why, he was my nigger, and
that was my money. Where is he ? —I want my nigger.”

“Well, you can’t get your nigger, that’s all —so dry up your
blubber ing. Looky here— do you think you’d vent ure to blow on us ?
Blamed if I think I’d trust you. Why, if you was to blow on us —”

He stopped, but I never see the duke look so ug ly out of his eyes
before. I went on a- whim per ing, and says:

“I don’t want to blow on no bod y; and I ain’t got no time to blow,
no how ; I got to turn out and find my nigger.”

He looked kinder bother ed, and stood there with his bills fl uttering
on his arm, thinking, and wrink ling up his fore head. At last he says:

“I’ll tell you something. We got to be here three days. If you’ll
promise you won’t blow, and won’t let the nigger blow, I’ll tell you
where to find him.”

So I promi sed, and he says:

“A farm er by the name of Silas P h —” and then he stopped. You see, he
started to tell me the tru th; but when he stopped that way, and begun
to study and think again, I reckoned he was changing his mind. And so
he was. He wouldn’t trust me; he wanted to make sure of having me out
of the way the whole three days. So pretty soon he says:

“The man that bought him is named A bra m F o ster — A bra m G . F o ster —and
he lives forty mile back here in the country, on the road to
La fa ye t te .”

“All right,” I says, “I can walk it in three days. And I’ll start this
very afterno on.”

“No you won ’t, you’ll start now; and don’t you lose any time about
it, nei ther, nor do any g ab bling by the way. Just keep a tight tongue
in your head and move right along, and then you won’t get into trouble
with us, d ’y e hear?”

That was the order I wan ted, and that was the one I played for. I
wanted to be left free to work my plans.

“So clear out ,” he says; “and you can tell Mr. F o ster whatever you
want to. Maybe you can get him to believe that Jim is your
nigger — some idio ts don’t requir e do cum ent s— least ways I’ve heard
there’s such down Sou th here. And when you tell him the hand bill and
the re war d’s bo g us, maybe he’ll believe you when you explain to him
what the idea was for getting ’em out. Go ’long now, and tell him
anything you want to; but mind you don’t work your ja w any between
here and there.”


So I left, and struck for the back country. I didn’t look around, but
I kinder felt like he was watching me. But I knowed I could tire him
out at that. I went straight out in the country as much as a mile
before I stop pe d; then I d ou bled back through the woods towards
Phelp s’ s. I reckoned I better start in on my plan straight off without
fooling around, because I wanted to stop Jim’s mouth till these
fellows could get away. I didn’t want no trouble with their kind. I’d
seen all I wanted to of them, and wanted to get entirely shut of them.




CHAPTER XXX II


When I got there it was all still and Sunday- like, and hot and
sun shin y; the hands was gone to the fiel d s; and there was them kind of
faint dr on ings of bu gs and f lies in the air that makes it seem so
lonesome and like everybod y’s dead and gone; and if a bree ze fan s
along and qui vers the leaves it makes you feel mourn ful, because you
feel like it’s spirits whisper ing— spirits that’s been dead ever so
many year s—and you always think they’re talking about you. As a
general thing it makes a body wish he was dead, too, and done with
it all.

Phelp s’s was one of these little one-horse cott on plant ations, and
they all look ali ke. A ra il fence round a two- ac re yard ; a stile made
out of logs sawed off and up- ended in steps, like barre ls of a
different leng th, to climb over the fence with, and for the women to
stand on when they are going to jump onto a horse ; some sick ly
gras s- pat ches in the big yard, but mostly it was bare and smoo th, like
an old hat with the na p rubbed off; big double log house for the white
fol k s— he wed lo gs, with the ch inks stopped up with mud or mor t ar, and
these mud- stri pes been whitewashed some time or another ; r oun d- log
kitch en, with a big broad, open but roof ed passage jo in ing it to the
house; log smoke house back of the kitch en; three little nigger cabins
in a row t’other side the smoke house; one little hut all by itself
away down against the back fence, and some out build ings down a piece
the other side ; ash-hop per and big ke tt le to bi le soa p in by the
little h ut ; ben ch by the kitchen door, with buck et of water and a
g our d; h ound asleep there in the sun ; more h ounds asleep round ab out;
about three shade trees away off in a corner ; some cur ran t bushes and
goo se ber ry bushes in one place by the f ence; outside of the fence a
garden and a watermel on pat ch ; then the cott on- fields beg ins, and
after the fields the woods.

I went around and clumb over the back stile by the ash-hop per, and
started for the kitch en. When I got a little ways I heard the dim hu m
of a sp in ning- wheel wa iling along up and sin king along down again; and
then I knowed for certain I wished I was dead —for that is the
lonesom est sound in the whole world.

I went right along, not fix ing up any particular plan, but just
tru sting to Providence to put the right words in my mouth when the
time come; for I’d noticed that Providence always did put the right
words in my mouth if I left it alone.

When I got half- way, first one h ound and then another got up and went
for me, and of course I stopped and faced them, and kept still. And
such another powwow as they ma de ! In a quarter of a minute I was a
kind of a hu b of a wheel , as you may say — spo kes made out of
dog s— circle of fifteen of them packed together around me, with their
necks and no ses stretched up towards me, a- bar king and how l ing; and
more a-com ing; you could see them sailing over f ences and around
cor n ers from everywher es.

A nigger woman come tearing out of the kitchen with a ro ll ing- pin in
her hand, singing out, “Be gone! you T i ge ! you S po t! beg one sah !” and
she fetched first one and then another of them a clip and sent them
how ling, and then the rest follow ed; and the next second half of them
come back, wa gging their tail s around me, and making friends with me.
There ain’t no harm in a h ound, nohow.

And behind the woman comes a little nigger girl and two little nigger
boys without anything on but tow - linen shir ts, and they hung on to
their mother ’s gown, and peeped out from behind her at me, b ash ful,
the way they always do. And here comes the white woman running from
the house, about forty- five or fifty year old, bare headed, and her
sp in ning- stick in her hand ; and behind her comes her little white
children, acting the same way the little niggers was go ing. She was
smiling all over so she could hardly stand —and says:

“It’s you, at last !— ain’t it?”

I out with a “Yes ’m ” before I thought.

She grabbed me and hugged me ti ght; and then gri pped me by both hands
and shook and shoo k; and the tears come in her eyes, and run down
over; and she couldn’t seem to hug and shake enough, and kept saying,
“You don’t look as much like your mother as I reckoned you woul d; but
law sa kes, I don’t care for that, I’m so glad to see you! D ear, dear,
it does seem like I could eat you up! Chi l dr en, it’s your cousin
Tom !— tell him how d y.”

But they du cked their heads, and put their fingers in their mou ths,
and hid behind her. So she run on :

“L i ze, hurry up and get him a hot breakfast right away — or did you get
your breakfast on the boat ?”

I said I had got it on the boat. So then she started for the house,
leading me by the hand, and the children tag ging after. When we got
there she set me down in a spl it- bott omed chair, and set herself down
on a little low st ool in front of me, holding both of my hands, and
says:

“Now I can have a good look at you; and, law s- a- me, I’ve been hungry
for it a many and a many a time, all these long years, and it’s come
at last ! We been expecting you a couple of days and more. What kep’
you?— boat get ag round ?”

“Yes ’m — she —”

“Don’t say y es ’m — say Aunt Sally. W here ’d she get ag round ?”

I didn’t right ly know what to say, because I didn’t know whether the
boat would be coming up the river or down. But I go a good deal on
instin ct; and my instin ct said she would be coming up — from down
towards Orleans. That didn’t help me much, though ; for I didn’t know
the names of bars down that way. I see I’d got to invent a b ar, or
forget the name of the one we got ag round on — or — Now I struck an
idea, and fetched it out:

“It warn’t the ground ing —that didn’t keep us back but a little. We
blowed out a cylin der- head.”

“Good grac ious ! anybody hur t?”

“No’ m. K i lled a nigger.”

“Well, it’s luck y; because sometimes people do get hurt. Two years ago
last Christmas your uncle Silas was coming up from Ne wr lean s on the
old L ally R oo k, and she blowed out a cylin der- head and crippled a man.
And I think he died afterwards. He was a B ap ti st. Your uncle Silas
knowed a family in B at on R ou ge that knowed his people very well. Yes,
I remember now, he did di e. Mor ti fication set in, and they had to
am put ate him. But it didn’t save him. Yes, it was mor ti fic ation —that
was it. He turned blue all over, and died in the hope of a glor ious
re sur re cti on. They say he was a sight to look at. Your uncle’s been up
to the town every day to fetch you. And he’s gone again, not more’n an
hour ago ; he’ll be back any minute now. You must ’a’ met him on the
road, didn’t you?— ol dish man, with a —”

“No, I didn’t see nobody, Aunt Sally. The boat landed just at
daylight, and I left my baggage on the whar f - boat and went looking
around the town and out a piece in the country, to put in the time and
not get here too so on; and so I come down the back way.”

“Who ’d you give the baggage to?”

“No bod y.”

“Why, child, it ’ll be sto le !”

“Not where I hid it I reckon it won ’t,” I says.

“How ’d you get your breakfast so early on the boat ?”

It was kinder thin i ce, but I says:

“The captain see me standing around, and told me I better have
something to eat before I went ashor e; so he took me in the texas to
the offi cer s’ lunch, and give me all I wan te d.”

I was getting so uneasy I couldn’t listen good. I had my mind on the
children all the time; I wanted to get them out to one side and p ump
them a little, and find out who I was. But I couldn’t get no show,
Mrs. Phelps kept it up and run on so. Pretty soon she made the cold
chi lls streak all down my back, because she says:

“But here we’re a- running on this way, and you hain’t told me a word
about S is, nor any of them. Now I’ll rest my works a little, and you
start up your n; just tell me every thing— tell me all about ’m
all — every one of ’m ; and how they are, and what they’re do ing, and
what they told you to tell me; and every last thing you can think of.”

Well, I see I was up a stum p —and up it good. Providence had stood by
me this fur all right, but I was hard and tight ag round now. I see it
warn’t a bit of use to try to go a head — I’d got to throw up my hand.
So I says to myself, here’s another place where I got to resk the
truth. I opened my mouth to beg in; but she grabbed me and hust led me
in behind the bed, and says:

“Here he com es! S tick your head down low er — there, that ’ll do; you
can’t be seen now. Don’t you let on you’re here. I’ll play a joke on
him. Chi l dr en, don’t you say a word.”

I see I was in a fix now. But it warn’t no use to wor ry; there
warn’t nothing to do but just hold still, and try and be ready to
stand from under when the lightning struck.

I had just one little glimpse of the old gentleman when he come in;
then the bed hid him. Mrs. Phelps she jumps for him, and says:

“Has he come?”

“No,” says her husband.

“Good- ness grac ious !” she says, “what in the world can have become
of him?”

“I can’t imagin e,” says the old gentle man; “and I must say it makes me
dreadful uneas y.”

“ U ne as y!” she says; “I’m ready to go di str ac te d! He must ’a’ come;
and you’ve missed him along the road. I know it’s so— something
tells me so.”

“Why, Sally, I couldn’t miss him along the road —you know that.”

“But oh, dear, dear, what will S is say ! He must ’a’ com e! You must
’a’ missed him. He —”

“Oh, don’t distre ss me any more’n I’m already distre s sed. I don’t know
what in the world to make of it. I’m at my wit’s end, and I don’t mind
ac knowle dg ing ’t I’m right down scared. But there’s no hope that he’s
come; for he couldn’t come and me miss him. Sally, it’s
terri ble —just terri ble — some thing’s happened to the boat, sure !”

“Why, Silas ! Look yonder !— up the road !— ain’t that somebody com ing?”

He sprung to the window at the head of the bed, and that give
Mrs. Phelps the chance she wan ted. She stooped down quick at the foot
of the bed and give me a pu ll, and out I come; and when he turned back
from the window there she stood, a- be am ing and a- smiling like a house
a fire, and I standing pretty me ek and sweat y along side. The old
gentleman star ed, and says:

“Why, who ’s that?”

“Who do you reckon ’ti s?”

“I hain’t no idea. Who is it?”

“It’s Tom Sawyer !”

By jings, I most sl um ped through the floor ! But there warn’t no time
to swa p kni v es; the old man grabbed me by the hand and shoo k, and kept
on sha king; and all the time how the woman did dance around and laugh
and cr y; and then how they both did fire off questions about Sid, and
Mary, and the rest of the tri be.

But if they was joy ful, it warn’t nothing to what I was; for it was
like being born again, I was so glad to find out who I was. Well, they
fro ze to me for two hour s; and at last, when my chin was so tired it
couldn’t hardly go any more, I had told them more about my family —I
mean the Sawyer fami l y— than ever happened to any six Sawyer famili es.
And I explained all about how we blowed out a cylin der- head at the
mouth of Whi te R i ver, and it took us three days to fix it. Which was
all right, and worked first- rat e; because they didn’t know but what
it would take three days to fix it. If I’d ’a’ called it a bol the ad it
would ’a’ done just as well.

Now I was feeling pretty comfortable all down one side, and pretty
un comfortable all up the other. Be ing Tom Sawyer was easy and
comfortable, and it stayed easy and comfortable till by and by I hear
a steamboat cough ing along down the river. Then I says to myself,
s’pose Tom Sawyer comes down on that boat ? And s’pose he steps in
here any minute, and sings out my name before I can throw him a wink
to keep quiet ?

Well, I couldn’t have it that way; it wouldn’t do at all. I must go
up the road and way lay him. So I told the folks I reckoned I would go
up to the town and fetch down my bagg age. The old gentleman was for
going along with me, but I said no, I could drive the horse myself,
and I druther he wouldn’t take no trouble about me.




CHAPTER XXX III


So I started for town in the wag on, and when I was half-way I see a
wagon coming, and sure enough it was Tom Sawyer, and I stopped and
waited till he come along. I says “Hold on !” and it stopped along side,
and his mouth opened up like a trun k, and stayed so; and he swa ll owed
two or three times like a person that’s got a dry thro at, and then
says:

“I hain’t ever done you no harm. You know that. So, then, what you
want to come back and ha ’n t me for?”

I says:

“I hain’t come back —I hain’t been gone.”

When he heard my voice it ri ghted him up some, but he warn’t quite
satisfied yet. He says:

“Don’t you play nothing on me, because I wouldn’t on you. H onest
injun, you ain’t a gho st?”

“H onest injun, I ain ’t,” I says.

“Well — I— I— well, that ought to settle it, of course; but I can’t
somehow seem to understand it no way. Looky here, warn’t you ever
murdered at all?”

“No. I warn’t ever murdered at all —I played it on them. You come in
here and feel of me if you don’t believe me.”

So he done it; and it satisfied him; and he was that glad to see me
again he didn’t know what to do. And he wanted to know all about it
right off, because it was a grand advent ure, and myster i ous, and so it
hit him where he li ved. But I said, leave it alone till by and by; and
told his d river to wait, and we drove off a little piece, and I told
him the kind of a fix I was in, and what did he reckon we better do?
He said, let him alone a minute, and don’t disturb him. So he thought
and thought, and pretty soon he says:

“It’s all right; I’ve got it. Take my trunk in your wag on, and let on
it’s your ’n ; and you turn back and fool along slow, so as to get to
the house about the time you ought to; and I’ll go towards town a
piece, and take a fresh start, and get there a quarter or a half an
hour after you; and you needn’t let on to know me at first.”

I says:

“All right; but wait a minute. There’s one more thing —a thing that
nobody don’t know but me. And that is, there’s a nigger here that
I’m a- trying to steal out of sla ver y, and his name is Jim — old Miss
Watson’s Jim.”

He says:

“What! Why, Jim is —”

He stopped and went to stud ying. I says:

“I know what you’ll say. You ’ll say it’s dirty, low-down business;
but what if it is ? I’m low down ; and I’m a-going to steal him, and I
want you keep mu m and not let on. Will you?”

His eye lit up, and he says:

“I’ll help you steal him!”

Well, I let go all hol ts then, like I was shot. It was the most
astonish ing speech I ever he ard —and I’m bound to say Tom Sawyer fell
considerable in my est im ation. On ly I couldn’t believe it. Tom Sawyer
a nigger - steal er !

“Oh, shuck s!” I says; “ you’re jo king.”

“I ain’t jo king, ei ther.”

“Well, then,” I says, “ jo king or no jo king, if you hear anything said
about a runaway nigger, don’t forget to remember that you don’t know
nothing about him, and I don’t know nothing about him.”

Then he took the trunk and put it in my wag on, and he drove off his
way and I drove mine. But of course I forgot all about driving slow on
accounts of being glad and full of think ing; so I got home a heap too
quick for that length of a tri p. The old gentleman was at the door,
and he says:

“Why, this is wonder ful ! Who ever would ’a’ thought it was in that m are
to do it? I wish we’d ’a’ tim ed her. And she hain’t swe ated a
hair —not a hair. It’s wonder ful. Why, I wouldn’t take a hundred
dollars for that horse now —I wouldn ’t, honest ; and yet I’d ’a’ sold
her for fifteen before, and thought ’twas all she was wor th.”

That’s all he said. He was the innocen te st, best old soul I ever see.
But it warn’t surpri sing ; because he warn’t only just a farm er, he was
a preach er, too, and had a little one-horse log church down back of
the plantation, which he built it himself at his own expen se, for a
church and school house, and never charged nothing for his preach ing,
and it was worth it, too. There was plenty other farm er- preach ers like
that, and done the same way, down Sou th.

In about half an hour Tom’s wagon drove up to the front sti le, and
Aunt Sally she see it through the window, because it was only about
fifty yards, and says:

“Why, there’s somebody com e! I wonder who ’ti s? Why, I do believe it’s
a strang er. Jim my ” ( that’s one of the childr en ), “ run and tell Li ze to
put on another plate for din ner .”

Everybody made a rush for the front door, because, of course, a
stranger don’t come every year, and so he lays over the
yaller- fever, for interest, when he does come. Tom was over the stile
and starting for the house; the wagon was spinning up the road for the
village, and we was all bun ched in the front door. Tom had his store
clothes on, and an audi ence —and that was always nuts for Tom Sawy er.
In them circumstances it warn’t no trouble to him to throw in an
amount of style that was suit able. He warn’t a boy to me e ky along up
that yard like a sheep ; no, he come ca ’m and important, like the ra m.
When he got a- front of us he li fts his hat ever so gracious and
d ain ty, like it was the lid of a box that had butter f lies asleep in it
and he didn’t want to disturb them, and says:

“Mr. Archi bald N ich ol s, I presume?”

“No, my bo y,” says the old gentleman, “I’m sorry to say ’t your d river
has de cei ved you; N ich ol s’s place is down a matter of three mile more.
Come in, come in.”

Tom he took a look back over his shoulder, and says, “T o o lat e— he’s
out of si ght .”

“Yes, he’s gone, my son, and you must come in and eat your dinner with
us; and then we’ll hitch up and take you down to N ich ol s’ s.”

“Oh, I can’t make you so much trouble; I couldn’t think of it. I’ll
wal k —I don’t mind the distan ce.”

“But we won’t let you wal k —it wouldn’t be Southern ho spit ality to
do it. Come right in.”

“Oh, do,” says Aunt Sally; “it ain’t a bit of trouble to us, not a
bit in the world. You must sta y. It’s a long, du sty three mile, and we
can’t let you wal k. And, besides, I’ve already told ’em to put on
another plate when I see you coming; so you mustn’t disap point us.
Come right in and make yourself at hom e.”

So Tom he than ked them very hearty and handsome, and let himself be
persu a ded, and come in; and when he was in he said he was a stranger
from Hi cks ville, Ohi o, and his name was William Th om p son —and he made
another b ow.

Well, he run on, and on, and on, making up stuff about Hi cks ville and
everybody in it he could inv ent, and I getting a little ner vi ous, and
wondering how this was going to help me out of my scra pe ; and at last,
still talking along, he reached over and kissed Aunt Sally right on
the mouth, and then settled back again in his chair comfortable, and
was going on talk ing; but she jumped up and wi ped it off with the back
of her hand, and says:

“You ow d ac ious p up p y!”

He looked kind of hurt, and says:

“I’m surprised at you, m’ am .”

“You ’re s’ r p — Why, what do you reckon I am ? I’ve a good notion to
take and — Say, what do you mean by kis sing me?”

He looked kind of hum ble, and says:

“I didn’t mean nothing, m’ am. I didn’t mean no harm. I— I— thought
you’d like it.”

“Why, you born fool !” She took up the sp in ning- stick, and it looked
like it was all she could do to keep from giving him a crack with it.
“What made you think I’d like it?”

“Well, I don’t know. On ly, they — they — told me you woul d.”

“They told you I would. Who ever told you’s another lun ati c. I
never heard the beat of it. Who ’s they?”

“Why, everybody. They all said so, m’ am .”

It was all she could do to hold in; and her eyes sna p ped, and her
fingers worked like she wanted to scratch him; and she says:

“Who ’s ’ everybod y ’? Out with their nam es, or ther ’ll be an idi ot
shor t.”

He got up and looked distre s sed, and fum bled his hat, and says:

“I’m sorry, and I warn’t expecting it. They told me to. They all told
me to. They all said, kiss her; and said she’d like it. They all said
it— every one of them. But I’m sorry, m’ am , and I won’t do it no
more— I won ’t, honest .”

“You won ’t, won’t you? Well, I sh ’d reckon you won ’t !”

“No’ m, I’m honest about it; I won’t ever do it again— till you ask
me.”

“T ill I ask you! Well, I never see the beat of it in my born day s! I
lay you’ll be the M e th usa lem - numsk ull of cre ation before ever I ask
you — or the li kes of you.”

“Well,” he says, “it does surprise me so. I can’t make it out,
somehow. They said you would, and I thought you would. B ut —” He
stopped and looked around slow, like he wished he could run across a
friendly eye somewher es, and fetched up on the old gentle man ’s, and
says, “D i dn’t you think she’d like me to kiss her, sir ?”

“Why, no; I— I— well, no, I b’lieve I didn ’t.”

Then he looks on around the same way to me, and says:

“ Tom, didn’t you think Aunt Sally ’d open out her arms and say, ’ Sid
Sawyer — ’”

“My land !” she says, breaking in and jum ping for him, “you imp ud ent
young ras c al, to fool a body so —” and was going to hug him, but he
f ended her off, and says:

“No, not till you’ve asked me first.”

So she didn’t lose no time, but asked him; and hugged him and kissed
him over and over again, and then turned him over to the old man, and
he took what was left. And after they got a little quiet again she
says:

“Why, dear me, I never see such a surprise. We warn’t looking for
you at all, but only Tom . S is never wrote to me about anybody coming
but him.”

“It’s because it warn’t inten ded for any of us to come but Tom ,” he
says; “but I begged and begg ed, and at the last minute she let me
come, too; so, coming down the river, me and Tom thought it would be a
first- rate surprise for him to come here to the house first, and for
me to by and by ta g along and drop in, and let on to be a strang er.
But it was a mista ke, Aunt Sally. This ain’t no heal thy place for a
stranger to com e.”

“No —not imp ud ent w hel ps, Si d. You ought to had your jaw s box ed; I
hain’t been so put out since I don’t know wh en. But I don’t care, I
don’t mind the ter m s— I’d be willing to stand a thousand such jo kes to
have you here. Well, to think of that performan ce ! I don’t deny it, I
was most put ri fied with astonish ment when you give me that sm ack .”

We had dinner out in that broad open passage betwixt the house and the
kitch en; and there was things enough on that table for seven
famili es —and all ho t, too; none of your fl ab by, tough meat that’s
laid in a cup board in a damp cellar all night and ta st es like a hunk
of old cold can ni b al in the morning. Uncle Silas he asked a pretty
long ble ssing over it, but it was worth it; and it didn’t cool it a
bit, nei ther, the way I’ve seen them kind of interrup tions do lots of
times.

There was a considerable good deal of talk all the afternoon, and me
and Tom was on the look out all the time; but it warn’t no use, they
didn’t happen to say nothing about any runaway nigger, and we was
afraid to try to work up to it. But at supper, at night, one of the
little boys says:

“P a, mayn’t Tom and Sid and me go to the show ?”

“No,” says the old man, “I reckon there ain’t going to be any ; and you
couldn’t go if there was; because the runaway nigger told Bur ton and
me all about that scand al ous show, and Bur ton said he would tell the
peop le; so I reckon they’ve drove the ow d ac ious loafers out of town
before this time.”

So there it was !— but I couldn’t help it. Tom and me was to sleep in
the same room and bed; so, being tired, we b id good night and went up
to bed right after supper, and clumb out of the window and down the
lightning-rod, and shoved for the town; for I didn’t believe anybody
was going to give the king and the duke a hin t, and so if I didn’t
hurry up and give them one they’d get into trouble sure.

On the road Tom he told me all about how it was reckoned I was
murder ed, and how pap disappeared pretty soon, and didn’t come back no
more, and what a stir there was when Jim run away; and I told Tom all
about our “ Royal Nonesuch ” rapscallions, and as much of the raft
vo y age as I had time to; and as we struck into the town and up through
the middle of it— it was as much as half after eight then — here comes
a raging rush of people with tor ches, and an awful whooping and
yelling, and b anging tin pans and blowing hor n s; and we jumped to one
side to let them go by; and as they went by I see they had the king
and the duke a stra ddle of a rail —that is, I knowed it was the king
and the duke, though they was all over tar and fea ther s, and didn’t
look like nothing in the world that was hum an —just looked like a
couple of monstrous big soldi er- plum es. Well, it made me sick to see
it; and I was sorry for them poor piti ful rascal s, it seemed like I
couldn’t ever feel any hard ness against them any more in the world. It
was a dreadful thing to see. H u man be ings can be awful cru el to one
another.

We see we was too lat e— couldn’t do no good. We asked some stra gg l ers
about it, and they said everybody went to the show looking very
innocent ; and laid low and kept dark till the poor old king was in the
middle of his cavor t ings on the stag e; then somebody give a sign al,
and the house rose up and went for them.

So we poked along back home, and I warn’t feeling so br ash as I was
before, but kind of orner y, and hum ble, and to bla me, somehow — though
I hadn’t done nothing. But that’s always the way; it don’t make no
difference whether you do right or wrong, a person’s conscience ain’t
got no sen se, and just goes for him anyway. If I had a yaller dog
that didn’t know no more than a person’s conscience does I would pis on
him. It takes up more room than all the rest of a person’s in sides,
and yet ain’t no good, nohow. Tom Sawyer he says the same.




CHAPTER XXX IV


We stopped talking, and got to thinking. By and by Tom says:

“Looky here, Huck, what fools we are to not think of it befor e! I bet
I know where Jim is.”

“No! W here?”

“In that hut down by the ash-hop per. Why, looky here. When we was at
dinner, didn’t you see a nigger man go in there with some vitt le s?”

“Yes.”

“What did you think the vitt les was for?”

“For a dog .”

“So ’d I. Well, it wasn’t for a dog .”

“Wh y?”

“Because part of it was watermel on.”

“So it wa s—I noticed it. Well, it does beat all that I never thought
about a dog not eating watermel on. It shows how a body can see and
don’t see at the same time.”

“Well, the nigger unlocked the pad lock when he went in, and he locked
it again when he came out. He fetched uncle a key about the time we
got up from t able — same key, I be t. Water mel on shows man, lock shows
prison er; and it ain’t likely there’s two prisoners on such a little
plantation, and where the people’s all so kind and good. Jim’s the
prison er. All right — I’m glad we found it out detective fashi on; I
wouldn’t give shucks for any other way. Now you work your mind, and
study out a plan to steal Jim, and I will study out one, too; and
we’ll take the one we like the be st.”

What a head for just a boy to ha ve ! If I had Tom Sawy er’s head I
wouldn’t trade it off to be a duke, nor mate of a steamboat, nor cl own
in a circ us, nor nothing I can think of. I went to thinking out a
plan, but only just to be doing some thing; I knowed very well where
the right plan was going to come from . Pretty soon Tom says:

“ Read y?”

“Yes,” I says.

“All right — bring it out.”

“My plan is this ,” I says. “We can easy find out if it’s Jim in there.
Then get up my canoe to-morrow night, and fetch my raft over from the
island. Then the first dark night that comes steal the key out of the
old man’s britches after he goes to bed, and shove off down the river
on the raft with Jim, hiding day times and running nights, the way me
and Jim used to do before. W ouldn’t that plan work ?”

“W or k ? Why, cer t ’n ly it would work, like rats a- fight ing. But it’s
too blame’ simp le; there ain’t nothing to it. What’s the good of a
plan that ain’t no more trouble than that? It’s as mi ld as goo se- mil k.
Why, Huck, it wouldn’t make no more talk than breaking into a soa p
factor y.”

I never said nothing, because I warn’t expecting nothing differ ent;
but I knowed mighty well that whenever he got his plan ready it
wouldn’t have none of them objections to it.

And it didn’t. He told me what it was, and I see in a minute it was
worth fifteen of mine for style, and would make Jim just as free a man
as mine would, and maybe get us all killed besid es. So I was
satisfied, and said we would walt z in on it. I needn’t tell what it
was here, because I knowed it wouldn’t stay the way it was. I knowed
he would be changing it around every which way as we went along, and
hea ving in new bull in es ses wherever he got a chance. And that is what
he done.

Well, one thing was dead sure, and that was that Tom Sawyer was in
earne st, and was actuly going to help steal that nigger out of
sla ver y. That was the thing that was too many for me. Here was a boy
that was respectable and well brung up; and had a character to lo se;
and folks at home that had character s; and he was bright and not
leather- hea de d; and knowing and not ignor an t; and not mean, but kind ;
and yet here he was, without any more pri de, or right ness, or feel ing,
than to stoo p to this business, and make himself a sha me, and his
family a sha me, before everybody. I couldn’t understand it no way at
all. It was outrage ous, and I knowed I ought to just up and tell him
so; and so be his true friend, and let him quit the thing right where
he was and save himself. And I did start to tell him; but he shut me
up, and says:

“Don’t you reckon I know what I’m ab out? Don’t I generly know what
I’m about?”

“Yes.”

“D i dn’t I say I was going to help steal the nigger ?”

“Yes.”

“Well, then.”

That’s all he said, and that’s all I said. It warn’t no use to say any
more; because when he said he’d do a thing, he always done it. But I
couldn’t make out how he was willing to go into this thing; so I just
let it go, and never both ered no more about it. If he was bound to
have it so, I couldn’t help it.

When we got home the house was all dark and still ; so we went on down
to the hut by the ash-hop per for to examine it. We went through the
yard so as to see what the h ounds would do. They knowed us, and didn’t
make no more noise than country dogs is always doing when anything
comes by in the night. When we got to the cabin we took a look at the
front and the two sid es; and on the side I warn’t acquain ted
with —which was the nor th side — we found a square window- hole, up
tolerable high, with just one stout board nailed across it. I says:

“H ere’s the tick et. This ho le’s big enough for Jim to get through if
we wr en ch off the board .”

Tom says:

“It’s as simple as t it- t at- to e, three- in- a- row, and as easy as playing
hoo k y. I should hope we can find a way that’s a little more
comp lic ated than that, Huck Fin n.”

“Well, then,” I says, “ how ’ll it do to saw him out, the way I done
before I was murdered that time?”

“That’s more like ,” he says. “It’s real myster i ous, and trouble some,
and goo d,” he says; “but I bet we can find a way that’s twice as long.
There ain’t no hurry; le’s keep on looking around.”

Bet wixt the hut and the fence, on the back side, was a lean-to that
joined the hut at the ea ves, and was made out of plan k. It was as long
as the hu t, but narr ow — only about six foot wid e. The door to it was
at the sou th end, and was pad locked. Tom he went to the so ap - ke tt le
and sear ched around, and fetched back the iron thing they lift the lid
with; so he took it and pri zed out one of the sta ple s. The chain fell
down, and we opened the door and went in, and shut it, and struck a
match, and see the shed was only built against a cabin and hadn’t no
connection with it; and there warn’t no floor to the she d, nor nothing
in it but some old rusty pla ye d- out ho es and sp ad es and picks and a
crippled pl ow. The mat ch went out, and so did w e, and shoved in the
sta ple again, and the door was locked as good as ever. Tom was joy ful.
He says:

“Now we’re all right. We’ll dig him out. It ’ll take about a week !”

Then we started for the house, and I went in the back door —you only
have to pull a buck skin lat ch- string, they don’t fast en the door s— but
that warn’t rom an tical enough for Tom Sawy er; no way would do him but
he must climb up the lightning-ro d. But after he got up half-way about
three times, and missed fire and fell every time, and the last time
most busted his brains out, he thought he’d got to give it up; but
after he was rested he allowed he would give her one more turn for
luck, and this time he made the tri p.

In the morning we was up at break of day, and down to the nigger
cabins to pet the dogs and make friends with the nigger that f ed
Jim —if it was Jim that was being fe d. The niggers was just getting
through breakfast and starting for the fiel d s; and Jim’s nigger was
piling up a tin pan with bread and meat and things; and whilst the
others was leav ing, the key come from the house.

This nigger had a good- nature d, chuck le- headed face, and his woo l was
all tied up in little bun ches with th rea d. That was to keep witches
off. He said the witches was pe ster ing him awful these nights, and
making him see all kinds of strange things, and hear all kinds of
strange words and noi ses, and he didn’t believe he was ever wit ched so
long before in his life. He got so worked up, and got to running on so
about his troub les, he forgot all about what he’d been a-going to do.
So Tom says:

“What’s the vitt les for? Go ing to fe ed the dog s?”

The nigger kind of smiled around gradu ly over his face, like when you
hea ve a brick b at in a mud- pu dd le, and he says:

“Yes, Mars Sid, a dog . C ur ’ us dog, too. Does you want to go en look
at ’ im ?”

“Yes.”

I hun ched Tom, and whisper s:

“You going, right here in the day break ? That warn’t the plan .”

“No, it warn ’t; but it’s the plan now.”

So, drat him, we went along, but I didn’t like it much. When we got in
we couldn’t hardly see anything, it was so dar k; but Jim was there,
sure enough, and could see us; and he sings out:

“Why, Huck ! En good lan ’! ain’ dat Mis to Tom?”

I just knowed how it would be; I just expected it. I didn’t know
nothing to do; and if I had I couldn’t ’a’ done it, because that
nigger busted in and says:

“Why, de gracious sak es! do he know you genl men ?”

We could see pretty well now. Tom he looked at the nigger, steady and
kind of wonder ing, and says:

“Do es who know us ?”

“Why, dis - yer runaway nigger.”

“I don’t reckon he does; but what put that into your head ?”

“What put it dar ? D id n ’ he jis’ dis minute sing out like he knowed
you?”

Tom says, in a puzz led- up kind of way:

“Well, that’s mighty curi ous. Who sung out? When did he sing out?
What did he sing out?” And turns to me, perfectly ca ’m, and says,
“Did you hear anybody sing out?”

Of course there warn’t nothing to be said but the one thing; so I
says:

“No; I ain’t heard nobody say nothing.”

Then he turns to Jim, and looks him over like he never see him before,
and says:

“Did you sing out?”

“No, sah ,” says Jim; “I hain’t said nothing, sah .”

“Not a word ?”

“No, sah, I hain’t said a word.”

“Did you ever see us befor e?”

“No, sah ; not as I knows on.”

So Tom turns to the nigger, which was looking wild and distre s sed, and
says, kind of sever e:

“What do you reck on ’s the matter with you, anyway ? What made you think
somebody sung out?”

“Oh, it’s de da d- blame’ wit ches, sah, en I wisht I was dead, I do.
Dey’s awluz at it, sah, en dey do mos’ kill me, dey sk ’y ers me so.
P lease to don’t tell nobody ’bout it sah, er ole Mars Silas he’ll
sc ole me; ’kase he say dey ain’t no wit ches. I jis’ wish to goodness
he was heah now— den what would he say ! I jis’ bet he couldn’ fine
no way to git aroun’ it dis time. But it’s awluz jis’ so; people
dat’s so t, sta ys so t; dey won’t look into noth ’n’ en fine it out f’r
dey sel ves, en when you fine it out en tell um ’bout it, dey doan’
b’lieve you.”

Tom give him a di me, and said we wouldn’t tell no bod y; and told him to
buy some more thread to tie up his woo l with; and then looks at Jim,
and says:

“I wonder if Uncle Silas is going to hang this nigger. If I was to
catch a nigger that was ungrateful enough to run away, I wouldn’t give
him up, I’d hang him.” And whilst the nigger stepped to the door to
look at the di me and bite it to see if it was good, he whisper s to Jim
and says:

“Don’t ever let on to know us. And if you hear any digging going on
nights, it’s us; we’re going to set you fre e.”

Jim only had time to grab us by the hand and squee ze it; then the
nigger come back, and we said we’d come again some time if the nigger
wanted us to; and he said he would, more particular if it was dark,
because the witches went for him mostly in the dark, and it was good
to have folks around then.




CHAPTER XXX V


It would be most an hour yet till breakfast, so we left and struck
down into the wood s; because Tom said we got to have some light to
see how to dig by, and a lantern makes too much, and might get us into
trouble; what we must have was a lot of them rotten ch un ks that’s
called fo x- fire, and just makes a soft kind of a gl ow when you lay
them in a dark place. We fetched an arm ful and hid it in the we ed s,
and set down to rest, and Tom says, kind of dis satisfi ed :

“Blame it, this whole thing is just as easy and awk ward as it can be.
And so it makes it so rotten difficult to get up a difficult plan .
There ain’t no watchman to be dru gg ed— now there ought to be a
watch man. There ain’t even a dog to give a sleep ing- mix ture to. And
there’s Jim chained by one leg, with a ten - foot chain, to the leg of
his bed : why, all you got to do is to lift up the bed stead and slip
off the cha in. And Uncle Silas he tru sts everybody; sen ds the key to
the pun kin -headed nigger, and don’t send nobody to watch the nigger.
Jim could ’a’ got out of that window- hole before this, only there
wouldn’t be no use trying to travel with a ten - foot chain on his leg.
Why, drat it, Huck, it’s the stup id est arrang ement I ever see. You got
to invent all the difficul ties. Well, we can’t help it; we got to do
the best we can with the materi als we’ve go t. Any how, there’s one
thing— there’s more hon or in getting him out through a lot of
difficul ties and dang ers, where there warn’t one of them furnished to
you by the people who it was their duty to furnish them, and you had
to con tri ve them all out of your own head. Now look at just that one
thing of the lantern. When you come down to the cold facts, we simply
got to let on that a lanter n’s re sk y. Why, we could work with a
tor ch light proc ession if we wanted to, I believ e. Now, whilst I
think of it, we got to hunt up something to make a saw out of the
first chance we ge t.”

“What do we want of a saw ?”

“What do we want of a saw ? Hain’t we got to saw the leg of Jim’s bed
off, so as to get the chain loo se?”

“Why, you just said a body could lift up the bed stead and slip the
chain off.”

“Well, if that ain’t just like you, Huck Finn. You can get up the
in fan t- schoo liest ways of going at a thing. Why, hain’t you ever read
any books at all ?— Bar on T ren ck, nor C as an ov a, nor B en ven u to
C he lle en y, nor Hen ri IV ., nor none of them her o es? Who ever heard of
getting a prisoner loose in such an old- ma i dy way as that? No; the
way all the best authorities does is to saw the bed-leg in two, and
leave it just so, and swa llow the saw du st, so it can’t be found, and
put some dirt and gre ase around the sawed place so the very keenest
sen es k al can’t see no sign of its being sa wed, and thinks the bed-leg
is perfectly sound. Then, the night you’re ready, fetch the leg a
ki ck, down she go es; slip off your chain, and there you are. Nothing
to do but hitch your rope ladder to the batt le ments, shin down it,
break your leg in the mo at —because a rope ladder is nine teen foot too
short, you know —and there’s your horses and your tru sty v as sle s, and
they scoop you up and fling you across a sadd le, and away you go to
your n ative L angu do c, or N a v arre , or wherever it is. It’s ga ud y, Huck.
I wish there was a mo at to this cab in. If we get time, the night of
the escap e, we’ll dig one.”

I says:

“What do we want of a mo at when we’re going to snake him out from
under the cab in?”

But he never heard me. He had forgot me and everything else. He had
his chin in his hand, thinking. Pretty soon he sigh s and sha kes his
head ; then sigh s again, and says:

“No, it wouldn’t do —there ain’t necessity enough for it.”

“For what?” I says.

“Why, to saw Jim’s leg off ,” he says.

“Good land !” I says; “ why, there ain’t no necessity for it. And what
would you want to saw his leg off for, anyway ?”

“Well, some of the best authorities has done it. They couldn’t get the
chain off, so they just cut their hand off and shov ed. And a leg would
be better still. But we got to let that go. There ain’t necessity
enough in this case ; and, besides, Jim’s a nigger, and wouldn’t
understand the reasons for it, and how it’s the custom in Eu rope ; so
we’ll let it go. But there’s one thing —he can have a rope ladder ; we
can tear up our sheets and make him a rope ladder easy enough. And we
can send it to him in a pi e; it’s mostly done that way. And I’ve et
worse pi es.”

“Why, Tom Sawyer, how you talk ,” I says; “ Jim ain’t got no use for a
rope ladder .”

“He has got use for it. How you talk, you better say ; you don’t
know nothing about it. He’s got to have a rope ladder ; they all do.”

“What in the nation can he do with it?”

“Do with it? He can hide it in his bed, can’t he? That’s what they
all do; and he’s got to, too. Huck, you don’t ever seem to want to
do anything that’s regul ar ; you want to be starting something fresh
all the time. S’pose he don’t do nothing with it? ain’t it there in
his bed, for a clu e, after he’s gone ? and don’t you reckon they’ll
want clu es? Of course they will. And you wouldn’t leave them any ? That
would be a pretty how d y- do, wouldn’t it! I never heard of such a
thing.”

“Well,” I says, “if it’s in the regul ations, and he’s got to have it,
all right, let him have it; because I don’t wish to go back on no
regul ation s; but there’s one thing, Tom Sawyer —if we go to tearing up
our sheets to make Jim a rope ladder, we’re going to get into trouble
with Aunt Sally, just as sure as you’re bor n. Now, the way I look at
it, a hick ry- bark ladder don’t cost nothing, and don’t waste nothing,
and is just as good to lo ad up a pie with, and hide in a straw ti ck,
as any rag ladder you can star t; and as for Jim, he ain’t had no
experience, and so he don’t care what kind of a —”

“Oh, sh ucks, Huck Finn, if I was as ignorant as you I’d keep
still —that’s what I’d do. Who ever heard of a state prisoner escap ing
by a hick ry- bark ladder ? Why, it’s perfectly ridi cul ous.”

“Well, all right, Tom, fix it your own way; but if you’ll take my
advice, you’ll let me borrow a sheet off of the cloth es- lin e.”

He said that would do. And that gave him another idea, and he says:

“B or row a shirt, too.”

“What do we want of a shirt, Tom?”

“W ant it for Jim to keep a journal on.”

“ J our nal your gr ann y— Jim can’t writ e.”

“S ’pose he can’t writ e— he can make marks on the shirt, can’t he, if
we make him a pen out of an old pewter spoon or a piece of an old iron
bar rel - hoo p ?”

“Why, Tom, we can pull a feather out of a goose and make him a better
one; and quick er, too.”

“P ri son ers don’t have geese running around the don j on- keep to pull
pens out of, you mugg in s. They always make their pens out of the
har de st, t ough est, trouble som est piece of old brass candlestick or
something like that they can get their hands on; and it takes them
weeks and weeks and months and months to file it out, too, because
they’ve got to do it by rubbing it on the wall. They wouldn’t use a
goo se- qui ll if they had it. It ain’t regul ar.”

“Well, then, what ’ll we make him the ink out of ?”

“M any makes it out of ir on- r ust and tear s; but that’s the common sort
and wom en; the best authorities u ses their own bloo d. Jim can do that;
and when he wants to send any little common ordinary mysterious
messa ge to let the world know where he’s cap ti v ated, he can write it
on the bottom of a tin plate with a for k and throw it out of the
window. The I ron M ask always done that, and it’s a blame’ good way,
too.”

“ Jim ain’t got no tin plat es. They fe ed him in a pan .”

“That ain’t nothing; we can get him some .”

“C an ’t nobody read his plat es.”

“That ain’t got anything to do with it, Huck Finn. All he’s got to
do is to write on the plate and throw it out. You don’t have to be
able to read it. Why, half the time you can’t read anything a prisoner
writ es on a tin pl ate, or anywhere else.”

“Well, then, what’s the sense in wa sting the plat es?”

“Why, blame it all, it ain’t the prisoner’s plat es.”

“But it’s somebody’s plat es, ain’t it?”

“Well, spos ’n it is ? What does the prisoner care who se —”

He broke off there, because we heard the breakfast- hor n blow ing. So we
cleared out for the house.

A long during the morning I borrowed a sheet and a white shirt off of
the cloth es- lin e; and I found an old sack and put them in it, and we
went down and got the fo x- fire, and put that in too. I called it
bor row ing, because that was what pap always called it; but Tom said it
warn’t bor row ing, it was steal ing. He said we was represent ing
prison ers; and prisoners don’t care how they get a thing so they get
it, and nobody don’t blame them for it, ei ther. It ain’t no crime in a
prisoner to steal the thing he nee ds to get away with, Tom said; it’s
his right; and so, as long as we was represent ing a prisoner, we had a
perfect right to steal anything on this place we had the least use for
to get ourselves out of prison with. He said if we warn’t prisoners it
would be a very different thing, and nobody but a mean, ornery person
would steal when he warn’t a prison er. So we allowed we would steal
everything there was that come hand y. And yet he made a mighty f us s,
one day, after that, when I stole a watermel on out of the nigger pat ch
and eat it; and he made me go and give the niggers a di me without
telling them what it was for. Tom said that what he meant was, we
could steal anything we nee ded. Well, I says, I needed the
watermel on. But he said I didn’t need it to get out of prison with;
there’s where the difference was. He said if I’d ’a’ wanted it to hide
a knife in, and s mugg le it to Jim to kill the sen es k al with, it would
’a’ been all right. So I let it go at that, though I couldn’t see no
advantage in my represent ing a prisoner if I got to set down and chaw
over a lot of gol d- leaf distin ctions like that every time I see a
chance to ho g a watermel on.

Well, as I was saying, we waited that morning till everybody was
settled down to business, and nobody in sight around the yard ; then
Tom he carried the sack into the lean-to whilst I stood off a piece to
keep wat ch. By and by he come out, and we went and set down on the
woodpile to talk. He says:

“ Ever y thing’s all right now except too l s; and that’s easy fix ed.”

“T oo l s?” I says.

“Yes.”

“T oo ls for what?”

“Why, to dig with. We ain’t a-going to g na w him out, are we ?”

“A in’t them old crippled picks and things in there good enough to dig
a nigger out with?” I says.

He turns on me, looking pit ying enough to make a body cry, and says:

“H uck Finn, did you ever hear of a prisoner having picks and shovel s,
and all the moder n conveni ences in his war dro be to dig himself out
with ? Now I want to ask you —if you got any reason ablen ess in you at
all —what kind of a show would that give him to be a her o ? Why, they
might as well l end him the key and done with it. Pi cks and shovel s— why,
they wouldn’t furnish ’em to a king.”

“Well, then,” I says, “if we don’t want the picks and shovel s, what do
we wan t?”

“A couple of case-kni ves.”

“To dig the found ations out from under that cabin with?”

“Yes.”

“C on found it, it’s foolish, Tom.”

“It don’t make no difference how foolish it is, it’s the right
way —and it’s the regular way. And there ain’t no other way, that
ever I heard of, and I’ve read all the books that gives any
information about these things. They always dig out with a
case-kni fe —and not through dir t, mind you; generly it’s through solid
rock. And it takes them weeks and weeks and wee ks, and for ever and
ever. Why, look at one of them prisoners in the bottom dun ge on of the
C ast le De ef, in the har b or of Mar se ill es, that dug himself out that
way; how long was he at it, you reck on?”

“I don’t know.”

“Well, gu es s.”

“I don’t know. A month and a half .”

“T hi r ty- seven year —and he come out in Chin a. That’s the kind. I
wish the bottom of this for tre ss was solid rock .”

“ Jim don’t know nobody in Chin a.”

“What’s that got to do with it? N either did that other fell ow. But
you’re always a- wandering off on a side is su e. Why can’t you stick to
the main point ?”

“All right —I don’t care where he comes out, so he comes out; and
Jim don’t, either, I reckon. But there’s one thing, anyway — Jim’s too
old to be dug out with a case-kni fe. He won’t la st.”

“Y es he will last, too. You don’t reckon it’s going to take
thirty-seven years to dig out through a dirt found ation, do you?”

“How long will it take, Tom?”

“Well, we can’t resk being as long as we ought to, because it mayn’t
take very long for Uncle Silas to hear from down there by New Orleans.
He ’ll hear Jim ain’t from there. Then his next move will be to
adverti se Jim, or something like that. So we can’t resk being as long
digging him out as we ought to. By rights I reckon we ought to be a
couple of year s; but we can ’t. Th ings being so un certain, what I
recomm end is this: that we really dig right in, as quick as we can ;
and after that, we can let on, to ourselves, that we was at it
thirty-seven years. Then we can snat ch him out and rush him away the
first time there’s an alarm. Yes, I reckon that ’ll be the best way.”

“Now, there’s sense in that,” I says. “L et ting on don’t cost
nothing; letting on ain’t no trouble; and if it’s any objec t, I don’t
mind letting on we was at it a hundred and fifty year. It wouldn’t
strain me none, after I got my hand in. So I’ll mo sey along now, and
smouch a couple of case-kni ves.”

“S mou ch thre e,” he says; “we want one to make a saw out of.”

“ Tom, if it ain’t un regular and ir reli gi ous to se jest it,” I says,
“ there’s an old rusty saw- bla de around yonder sticking under the
wea ther- board ing behind the smoke house.”

He looked kind of weary and disc ou rag ed- like, and says:

“It ain’t no use to try to learn you nothing, Huck. Ru n along and
smouch the kni ves — three of them.” So I done it.




CHAPTER XXX VI


As soon as we reckoned everybody was asleep that night we went down
the lightning-rod, and shut ourselves up in the lean- to, and got out
our pile of fo x- fire, and went to work. We cleared everything out of
the way, about four or five foot along the middle of the bottom lo g.
Tom said we was right behind Jim’s bed now, and we’d dig in under it,
and when we got through there couldn’t nobody in the cabin ever know
there was any hole there, because Jim’s counter pin hung down most to
the ground, and you’d have to raise it up and look under to see the
hole. So we dug and dug with the case-kni ves till most mid night; and
then we was dog- tired, and our hands was bli ster ed, and yet you
couldn’t see we’d done anything hard ly. At last I says:

“This ain’t no thirty- seven - year job ; this is a thirty- eight - year job,
Tom Sawy er.”

He never said nothing. But he sigh ed, and pretty soon he stopped
di gg ing, and then for a good little while I knowed that he was
thinking. Then he says:

“It ain’t no use, Huck, it ain’t a-going to work. If we was prisoners
it would, because then we’d have as many years as we wan ted, and no
hurry; and we wouldn’t get but a few minutes to di g, every day, while
they was changing watch es, and so our hands wouldn’t get bli ster ed,
and we could keep it up right along, year in and year out, and do it
right, and the way it ought to be done. But we can’t fool along; we
got to rus h ; we ain’t got no time to spar e. If we was to put in
another night this way we’d have to knock off for a week to let our
hands get well — couldn’t touch a case-kni fe with them soon er.”

“Well, then, what we going to do, Tom?”

“I’ll tell you. It ain’t right, and it ain’t mor al, and I wouldn’t
like it to get out; but there ain’t only just the one way: we got to
dig him out with the pi cks, and let on it’s case-kni ves.”

“Now you’re tal king !” I says; “ your head gets level er and level er
all the time, Tom Sawyer ,” I says. “P i cks is the thing, moral or no
mor al; and as for me, I don’t care shucks for the mor ality of it,
nohow. When I start in to steal a nigger, or a watermel on, or a
Sunday-school book, I ain’t no ways particular how it’s done so it’s
done. What I want is my nigger ; or what I want is my watermel on; or
what I want is my Sunday-school boo k; and if a pick ’s the han diest
thing, that’s the thing I’m a-going to dig that nigger or that
watermel on or that Sunday-school book out with; and I don’t give a
dead rat what the authorities thinks about it nuther.”

“Well,” he says, “ there’s excuse for picks and letting on in a case
like this ; if it warn’t so, I wouldn’t appro ve of it, nor I wouldn’t
stand by and see the ru les bro ke —because right is right, and wrong is
wrong, and a body ain’t got no business doing wrong when he ain’t
ignorant and knows better. It might answer for you to dig Jim out
with a pi ck, without any letting on, because you don’t know no
better ; but it wouldn’t for me, because I do know better. G imme a
case-kni fe .”

He had his own by him, but I handed him mine. He flung it down, and
says:

“G imme a case-kni fe .”

I didn’t know just what to do —but then I thought. I scrat ched around
amongst the old too l s, and got a pick ax and give it to him, and he
took it and went to work, and never said a word.

He was always just that particul ar. Full of princi ple.

So then I got a shovel , and then we picked and shov ele d, turn about,
and made the fur fl y. We stuck to it about a half an hour, which was
as long as we could stand up; but we had a good deal of a hole to show
for it. When I got up-stairs I looked out at the window and see Tom
doing his level best with the lightning-rod, but he couldn’t come it,
his hands was so sor e. At last he says:

“It ain’t no use, it can’t be done. What you reckon I better do? C an ’t
you think of no way ?”

“Yes,” I says, “but I reckon it ain’t regul ar. Come up the stairs, and
let on it’s a lightning-ro d.”

So he done it.

Next day Tom stole a pewter spoon and a brass candlestick in the
house, for to make some pens for Jim out of, and six ta llow candle s;
and I hung around the nigger cabins and laid for a chance, and stole
three tin plat es. Tom says it wasn’t enough ; but I said nobody
wouldn’t ever see the plat es that Jim throwed out, because they’d fall
in the dog- f en nel and j imp son wee ds under the window- hole — then we
could to te them back and he could use them over again. So Tom was
satisfied. Then he says:

“Now, the thing to study out is, how to get the things to Jim.”

“Take them in through the hole ,” I says, “when we get it done.”

He only just looked scor n ful, and said something about nobody ever
heard of such an idio tic idea, and then he went to stud ying. By and by
he said he had ci pher ed out two or three ways, but there warn’t no
need to deci de on any of them yet. Said we’d got to post Jim first.

That night we went down the lightning-rod a little after ten, and took
one of the candles along, and listened under the window- hole, and
heard Jim snor ing; so we pit ched it in, and it didn’t wake him. Then
we whir led in with the pick and shovel , and in about two hours and a
half the job was done. We crept in under Jim’s bed and into the cabin,
and pa wed around and found the candle and lit it, and stood over Jim
awhile, and found him looking hearty and heal th y, and then we woke him
up gentle and gradu al. He was so glad to see us he most cried; and
called us honey, and all the pet names he could think of ; and was for
having us hunt up a col d- chi sel to cut the chain off of his leg with
right away, and clearing out without lo sing any time. But Tom he
showed him how un regular it would be, and set down and told him all
about our plan s, and how we could alter them in a minute any time
there was an al arm ; and not to be the least afra id, because we would
see he got away, sure. So Jim he said it was all right, and we set
there and talked over old times awhile, and then Tom asked a lot of
questions, and when Jim told him Uncle Silas come in every day or two
to pray with him, and Aunt Sally come in to see if he was comfortable
and had plenty to eat, and both of them was kind as they could be, Tom
says:

“Now I know how to fix it. We’ll send you some things by them.”

I said, “Don’t do nothing of the kind ; it’s one of the most jack ass
ide as I ever stru ck ”; but he never paid no attention to me; went right
on. It was his way when he’d got his plans se t.

So he told Jim how we’d have to s mugg le in the rope - ladder pie and
other large things by N at, the nigger that f ed him, and he must be on
the look out, and not be surpri sed, and not let Nat see him open them;
and we would put small things in uncle’s coat pockets and he must
steal them out; and we would tie things to aun t’s ap r on- str ings or put
them in her apron pocket, if we got a chance; and told him what they
would be and what they was for. And told him how to keep a journal on
the shirt with his bloo d, and all that. He told him everything. Jim he
couldn’t see no sense in the most of it, but he allowed we was white
folks and knowed better than him; so he was satisfied, and said he
would do it all just as Tom said.

Jim had plenty corn- co b pip es and tobac co ; so we had a right down good
soci able time; then we crawled out through the hole, and so home to
bed, with hands that looked like they’d been cha we d. Tom was in high
spirit s. He said it was the best fun he ever had in his life, and the
most intellec tur al; and said if he only could see his way to it we
would keep it up all the rest of our lives and leave Jim to our
children to get out; for he believed Jim would come to like it better
and better the more he got used to it. He said that in that way it
could be strung out to as much as ei ghty year, and would be the best
time on recor d. And he said it would make us all celebrated that had a
hand in it.

In the morning we went out to the woodpile and ch op ped up the brass
candlestick into handy si z es, and Tom put them and the pewter spoon in
his pocket. Then we went to the nigger cab ins, and while I got N at’s
notice off, Tom shoved a piece of candlestick into the middle of a
corn-p one that was in Jim’s pan, and we went along with Nat to see how
it would work, and it just worked noble ; when Jim bit into it it most
m ashed all his teeth out; and there warn’t ever anything could ’a’
worked better. Tom said so himself. Jim he never let on but what it
was only just a piece of rock or something like that that’s always
getting into brea d, you know; but after that he never bit into nothing
but what he jab bed his for k into it in three or four places first.

And whilst we was a-standing there in the di m mi sh light, here comes a
couple of the h ounds bul ging in from under Jim’s bed; and they kept on
piling in till there was eleven of them, and there warn’t hardly room
in there to get your brea th. By jings, we forgot to fast en that
lean-to door ! The nigger Nat he only just hollered “W itch es ” once, and
ke eled over onto the floor amongst the dogs, and begun to gro an like
he was d ying. Tom jerked the door open and flung out a slab of Jim’s
me at, and the dogs went for it, and in two seconds he was out himself
and back again and shut the door, and I knowed he’d fixed the other
door too. Then he went to work on the nigger, coa x ing him and pe tting
him, and asking him if he’d been imagin ing he saw something again. He
raised up, and blin ked his eyes around, and says:

“ Mars Sid, you’ll say I’s a fool, but if I didn’t b’lieve I see most a
million dogs, er devil s, er some ’n, I wisht I may die right heah in
d ese track s. I did, mos’ sh ol y. Mars Sid, I felt um —I felt um,
sah ; dey was all over me. D ad fetch it, I jis’ wisht I could git my
han ’s on one er dem witches jis’ wun st — on’y jis’ wun st —it’s all I’d
a st. But mo s’ ly I wisht dey’d lemme ’l one, I do es.”

Tom says:

“Well, I tell you what I think. What makes them come here just at
this runaway nigger’s breakfast- time? It’s because they’re hungr y;
that’s the reason. You make them a witch pi e; that’s the thing for
you to do.”

“But my lan ’, Mars Sid, how ’s I gwyne to make ’m a witch pi e? I doan’
know how to make it. I hain’t ever hear n er sich a thing b’ fo ’.”

“Well, then, I’ll have to make it myself.”

“Will you do it, hone y?— will you? I’ll w us sh up de gr oun’ un d ’ yo’
foot, I will !”

[Illustration: TOM AD VI S ES A W IT CH P I E ]

“All right, I’ll do it, seeing it’s you, and you’ve been good to us
and showed us the runaway nigger. But you got to be mighty care ful.
When we come around, you turn your back ; and then whatever we’ve put
in the pan, don’t you let on you see it at all. And don’t you look
when Jim un load s the pan — something might happ en, I don’t know what.
And above all, don’t you handle the wit ch- thing s.”

“H an nel ’m, Mars Sid ? What is you a- talk in’ ’ b out? I wouldn’ lay
de weight er my finger on um, not f’r ten hund’d thous ’n bill ion
dollars, I wouldn ’t.”




CHAPTER XXX VII


That was all fix ed. So then we went away and went to the
rubbag e- pile in the back yard, where they keep the old boots, and
rags, and pieces of bott les, and wor e- out tin things, and all such
truck , and scrat ched around and found an old tin wash pan, and stopped
up the holes as well as we could, to ba ke the pie in, and took it down
cellar and stole it full of fl our and started for breakfast, and found
a couple of shing le- na ils that Tom said would be handy for a prisoner
to scrabble his name and sor r ows on the dun ge on walls with, and
dropped one of them in Aunt Sall y’s apron pocket which was hanging on
a chair, and t’other we stuck in the band of Uncle Silas ’s hat, which
was on the bureau, because we heard the children say their pa and ma
was going to the runaway nigger’s house this morning, and then went to
breakfast, and Tom dropped the pewter spoon in Uncle Silas ’s coat
pocket, and Aunt Sally wasn’t come yet, so we had to wait a little
while.

And when she come she was hot and red and cro ss, and couldn’t hardly
wait for the ble s sing ; and then she went to slu ic ing out coffee with
one hand and crac king the han diest chil d’s head with her th im ble with
the other, and says:

“I’ve hunted high and I’ve hunted low, and it does beat all what has
become of your other shir t.”

My heart fell down amongst my lun gs and li vers and things, and a hard
piece of corn- cr ust started down my throat after it and got met on the
road with a cough , and was shot across the table, and took one of the
children in the eye and curled him up like a fish ing- wor m, and let a
cry out of him the size of a war - whoop, and Tom he turned kinder blue
around the gi ll s, and it all amoun ted to a considerable state of
things for about a quarter of a minute or as much as that, and I would
’a’ sold out for half price if there was a bi d der. But after that we
was all right again —it was the sudden surprise of it that knocked us
so kind of col d. Uncle Silas he says:

“It’s most uncommon curi ous, I can’t understand it. I know perfectly
well I took it off, beca use —”

“Because you hain’t got but one on. Just listen at the man ! I know
you took it off, and know it by a better way than your woo l - ge thering
memory, too, because it was on the clo ’s- line yesterday —I see it
there myself. But it’s gone, that’s the long and the short of it, and
you’ll just have to change to a red f lan n ’ l one till I can get time to
make a new one. And it ’ll be the third I’ve made in two years. It
just keeps a body on the jump to keep you in shir ts; and whatever you
do manage to do with ’m all is more’n I can make out. A bod y ’d think
you would learn to take some sort of care of ’em at your time of
life.”

“I know it, Sally, and I do try all I can. But it ough t n’t to be
altogether my fault, because, you know, I don’t see them nor have
nothing to do with them except when they’re on me; and I don’t believe
I’ve ever lost one of them off of me.”

“Well, it ain’t your fault if you haven ’t, Silas ; you’d ’a’ done it
if you could, I reckon. And the shirt ain’t all that’s gone, nuther.
Th er’s a spoon gone; and that ain’t all. There was ten, and now
ther ’s only nin e. The calf got the shirt, I reckon, but the calf never
took the spoon, that’s certain .”

“Why, what else is gone, Sall y?”

“Th er’s six candles gone —that’s what. The rats could ’a’ got the
candles, and I reckon they did; I wonder they don’t walk off with the
whole place, the way you’re always going to stop their holes and don’t
do it; and if they warn’t fools they’d sleep in your hair,
Silas — you’d never find it out; but you can’t lay the spoon on the
rat s, and that I know.”

“Well, Sally, I’m in fault, and I ac knowledge it; I’ve been re mis s;
but I won’t let to-morrow go by without stopping up them hole s.”

“Oh, I wouldn’t hurry; next year ’ll do. M ati l da Angel in a A ra min t a
Phelp s!”

W ha ck comes the th im ble, and the child snat ches her c laws out of the
su gar -b ow l without fooling around an y. Just then the nigger woman
steps onto the passage, and says:

“ Mis s us, dey’s a sheet gone.”

“A sheet gone! Well, for the land’s sa ke !”

“I’ll stop up them holes to- day ,” says Uncle Sil as, looking sorrow ful.

“Oh, do she t up !— s’pose the rats took the she et ? W here’s it
gone, Li z e?”

“C la h to goodness I hain’t no noti on, Mis s’ Sally. She wuz on de
clo ’s- line y i sti dd y, but she done gone : she ain’ dah no mo’ now.”

“I reckon the world is coming to an end. I never see the beat of
it in all my born days. A shirt, and a sheet, and a spoon, and six
can —”

“ Mis sus ,” comes a young yaller w en ch, “ dey’s a brass can ne l stick
mis s’ n.”

“C ler out from here, you hus sy, er I’ll take a sk ill et to ye !”

Well, she was just a- bil ing. I begun to lay for a chance; I reckoned I
would snea k out and go for the woods till the weather moder ated. She
kept a- raging right along, running her in sur re ction all by her self,
and everybody else mighty me ek and quiet ; and at last Uncle Sil as,
looking kind of foolish, fi shes up that spoon out of his pocket. She
stopped, with her mouth open and her hands up; and as for me, I wished
I was in Jer us le m or somewher es. But not long, because she says:

“It’s just as I expec ted. So you had it in your pocket all the time;
and like as not you’ve got the other things there, too. How ’d it get
there?”

“I re ely don’t know, Sall y,” he says, kind of ap olo gi z ing, “ or you
know I would tell. I was a- studying over my text in A cts S even teen
before breakfast, and I reckon I put it in there, not noti cing,
meaning to put my Testament in, and it must be so, because my
Testament ain’t in; but I’ll go and see; and if the Testament is where
I had it, I’ll know I didn’t put it in, and that will show that I laid
the Testament down and took up the spoon, and—”

“Oh, for the land’s sa ke ! Give a body a rest ! Go ’long now, the whole
k it and b iling of ye ; and don’t come nigh me again till I’ve got back
my pe ace of min d.”

I’d ’a’ heard her if she’d ’a’ said it to her self, let alone speaking
it out; and I’d ’a’ got up and obe yed her if I’d ’a’ been dead. As we
was passing through the sett ing-room the old man he took up his hat,
and the shing le- na il fell out on the floor, and he just merely picked
it up and laid it on the mantel - shel f, and never said nothing, and
went out. Tom see him do it, and remembered about the spoon, and says:

“Well, it ain’t no use to send things by him no more, he ain’t
reli able.” Then he says: “But he done us a good turn with the spoon,
anyway, without knowing it, and so we’ll go and do him one without
him knowing it— stop up his rat- hole s.”

There was a noble good lot of them down cell ar, and it took us a whole
hour, but we done the job tight and good and shi p- sha pe. Then we heard
steps on the stairs, and blowed out our light and hi d; and here comes
the old man, with a candle in one hand and a bundle of stuff in
t’ other, looking as ab sent - minded as year before last. He went
a- mo oning around, first to one rat- hole and then another, till he’d
been to them all. Then he stood about five minutes, picking
tall ow- dri p off of his candle and thinking. Then he turns off slow and
drea my towards the stairs, say ing:

“Well, for the life of me I can’t remember when I done it. I could
show her now that I warn’t to blame on account of the rats. But never
min d— let it go. I reckon it wouldn’t do no good.”

And so he went on a- mumbling up- stairs, and then we left. He was a
mighty nice old man. And always is.

Tom was a good deal both ered about what to do for a spoon, but he said
we’d got to have it; so he took a think. When he had ci pher ed it out
he told me how we was to do; then we went and waited around the
spo on -b as ket till we see Aunt Sally coming, and then Tom went to
coun ting the spoons and laying them out to one side, and I slid one of
them up my sleev e, and Tom says:

“Why, Aunt Sally, there ain’t but nine spoons yet.”

She says:

“G o ’long to your pla y, and don’t bother me. I know better, I counted
’m myself.”

“Well, I’ve counted them twi ce, Aun ty, and I can’t make but nin e.”

She looked out of all pati ence, but of course she come to
coun t— anybody would.

“I decl are to gracious ther’ ain’t but nine !” she says. “Why, what
in the worl d— pla gue take the things, I’ll count ’m again.”

So I slipped back the one I had, and when she got done coun ting, she
says:

“H ang the trouble some rub b age, ther ’s ten now!” and she looked hu ffy
and both ered both . But Tom says:

“Why, Aun ty, I don’t think there’s ten .”

“You numsk u ll, didn’t you see me count ’m ?”

“I know, but —”

“Well, I’ll count ’m again.”

So I sm ou ched one, and they come out n ine, same as the other time.
Well, she was in a tearing way —just a- trembling all over, she was
so ma d. But she counted and counted till she got that add led she’d
start to count in the bas ket for a spoon some times; and so, three
times they come out right, and three times they come out wrong . Then
she grabbed up the bas ket and slammed it across the house and knocked
the cat gall ey - we st; and she said cl er out and let her have some
peac e, and if we come bother ing around her again betwixt that and
dinner she’d skin us. So we had the odd spoon, and dropped it in her
apron pocket whilst she was a- giving us our sailing order s, and Jim
got it all right, along with her shing le- nail, before no on. We was
very well satisfied with this business, and Tom allowed it was worth
twice the trouble it too k, because he said now she couldn’t ever
count them spoons twice a like again to save her life; and wouldn’t
believe she’d counted them right if she did; and said that after
she’d about counted her head off for the next three days he judged
she’d give it up and offer to kill anybody that wanted her to ever
count them any more.

So we put the sheet back on the line that night, and stole one out of
her clo se t; and kept on putting it back and steal ing it again for a
couple of days till she didn’t know how many sheets she had any more,
and she didn’t care, and warn’t a-going to bull y rag the rest of her
soul out about it, and wouldn’t count them again not to save her life;
she druther die first.

So we was all right now, as to the shirt and the sheet and the spoon
and the candles, by the help of the calf and the rats and the mix ed-up
coun t ing; and as to the candle stick, it warn’t no consequ ence, it
would blow over by and by.

But that pie was a job ; we had no end of trouble with that pi e. We
fixed it up away down in the woods, and cooked it there; and we got it
done at last, and very satisfactor y, too; but not all in one day; and
we had to use up three wash pans full of fl our before we got through,
and we got bur nt pretty much all over, in places, and eyes put out
with the smoke ; because, you see, we didn’t want nothing but a cru st,
and we couldn’t pro p it up right, and she would always cave in. But of
course we thought of the right way at last —which was to cook the
ladder, too, in the pi e. So then we laid in with Jim the second night,
and tore up the sheet all in little str ings and twisted them together,
and long before daylight we had a lovely rope that you could ’a’ hung
a person with. We let on it took nine months to make it.

And in the for en o on we took it down to the woods, but it wouldn’t go
into the pi e. Be ing made of a whole sheet, that way, there was rope
enough for forty pi es if we’d ’a’ wanted them, and plenty left over
for sou p, or sa usa ge, or anything you choo se. We could ’a’ had a whole
dinner.

But we didn’t need it. All we needed was just enough for the pie, and
so we throwed the rest away. We didn’t cook none of the pi es in the
wash pan — afraid the sol der would mel t; but Uncle Silas he had a noble
brass warm ing- pan which he thought considerable of, because it
belonged to one of his ance st ers with a long wooden handle that come
over from England with William the Con qu er or in the May flow er or one
of them early shi ps and was hid away up g arre t with a lot of other old
po ts and things that was valu able, not on account of being any
accoun t, because they warn ’t, but on account of them being reli ct s,
you know, and we sna ked her out, private, and took her down there, but
she failed on the first pi es, because we didn’t know how, but she come
up smiling on the last one. We took and lined her with d ough , and set
her in the co als, and loaded her up with rag rope, and put on a d ough
roof, and shut down the lid, and put hot em bers on top , and stood off
five foot, with the long hand le, cool and comfortable, and in fifteen
minutes she turned out a pie that was a satisfaction to look at. But
the person that et it would want to fetch a couple of k ag s of
too th picks along, for if that rope ladder wouldn’t cra mp him down to
business I don’t know nothing what I’m talking about, and lay him in
enough stoma ch- ac he to last him till next time, too.

Nat didn’t look when we put the witch pie in Jim’s pan ; and we put
the three tin plat es in the bottom of the pan under the vitt le s; and
so Jim got everything all right, and as soon as he was by himself he
busted into the pie and hid the rope ladder inside of his straw ti ck,
and scrat ched some marks on a tin plate and throwed it out of the
window- hole.




CHAPTER XXX VIII


Ma king them pens was a distre ssi d tough job, and so was the saw ; and
Jim allowed the inscri ption was going to be the t ough est of all.
That’s the one which the prisoner has to scrabble on the wall. But he
had to have it; Tom said he’d got to; there warn’t no case of a
state prisoner not scrab bling his inscri ption to leave behind, and his
coat of arms.

“Look at Lady Jane Gre y,” he says; “ look at G il ford D ud le y; look at
old Nor thum ber land! Why, Huck, s’pose it is consider ble
trouble ?— what you going to do ?— how you going to get around it? Jim’s
got to do his inscri ption and coat of arms. They all do.”

Jim says:

“Why, Mars Tom, I hain’t got no coat o’ arm ; I hain’t got nuffn but
dish yer ole shirt, en you knows I got to keep de journal on dat .”

“Oh, you don’t understand, Jim; a coat of arms is very differ ent.”

“Well,” I says, “ Jim’s right, anyway, when he says he ain’t got no
coat of arms, because he ha in ’t.”

“I reckon I knowed that,” Tom says, “but you bet he’ll have one before
he goes out of this —because he’s going out right, and there ain’t
going to be no f laws in his recor d.”

So whilst me and Jim fi led away at the pens on a brick b at a piece, Jim
a- making hi s ’n out of the brass and I making mine out of the spoon,
Tom set to work to think out the coat of arms. By and by he said he’d
struck so many good ones he didn’t hardly know which to take, but
there was one which he reckoned he’d deci de on. He says:

“On the sc ut che on we’ll have a bend or in the de x ter ba se, a sal tire
mur re y in the f ess, with a dog, cou chan t, for common char ge, and
under his foot a chain em batt led, for sla ver y, with a ch ev ron ver t
in a chi ef en gra i led, and three inv ec ted lines on a field a z ure,
with the n om bri l points ra mp ant on a d ance t te ind en ted; cre st, a
runaway nigger, sa ble, with his bundle over his shoulder on a bar
sin ister ; and a couple of gu les for suppor ters, which is you and me;
mo t to, M ag gi ore fre t ta , min ore at to. G ot it out of a book — means the
more ha ste the less spe ed.”

“G ee whi lli kin s,” I says, “but what does the rest of it mean?”

“We ain’t got no time to bother over that,” he says; “we got to dig in
like all g it- out.”

“Well, anyway ,” I says, “ what’s some of it? What’s a fess ?”

“A f es s—a f ess is —you don’t need to know what a f ess is. I’ll show
him how to make it when he gets to it.”

“Shucks, Tom ,” I says, “I think you might tell a per son. What’s a bar
sin ister ?”

“Oh, I don’t know. But he’s got to have it. All the no bility do es.”

That was just his way. If it didn’t suit him to explain a thing to
you, he wouldn’t do it. You might p ump at him a week, it wouldn’t make
no difference.

He’d got all that coat- of - arms business fix ed, so now he started in to
fin ish up the rest of that part of the work, which was to plan out a
mournful inscripti on —said Jim got to have one, like they all done. He
made up a lo t, and wrote them out on a paper, and read them off, so:

1. Here a cap tive heart bu sted.

2. Here a poor prisoner, for s ook by the world and
friends, fre tted his sorrow ful life.

3. Here a lonely heart bro ke, and a worn spirit went
to its rest, after thirty-seven years of sol itary cap ti v ity.

4. Here, home less and friend less, after thirty-seven
years of bitter cap ti v ity, peri shed a noble stranger,
natural son of Louis X IV.

Tom’s voice trem bled whilst he was reading them, and he most broke
down. When he got done he couldn’t no way make up his mind which one
for Jim to scrabble onto the wall, they was all so good; but at last
he allowed he would let him scrabble them all on. Jim said it would
take him a year to scrabble such a lot of truck onto the logs with a
nail, and he didn’t know how to make letters, besid es; but Tom said he
would block them out for him, and then he wouldn’t have nothing to do
but just follow the lin es. Then pretty soon he says:

“Come to think, the logs ain’t a-going to do; they don’t have log
walls in a dun ge on : we got to dig the inscri p tions into a rock. We’ll
fetch a rock .”

Jim said the rock was worse than the lo g s; he said it would take him
such a pis on long time to dig them into a rock he wouldn’t ever get
out. But Tom said he would let me help him do it. Then he took a look
to see how me and Jim was getting along with the pen s. It was most
p es ky te di ous hard work and slow, and didn’t give my hands no show to
get well of the sor es, and we didn’t seem to make no head way, hard ly;
so Tom says:

“I know how to fix it. We got to have a rock for the coat of arms and
mournful inscripti ons, and we can kill two birds with that same rock.
There’s a ga udy big grindstone down at the mi ll, and we’ll smouch it,
and car ve the things on it, and file out the pens and the saw on it,
too.”

It warn’t no slouch of an idea ; and it warn’t no slouch of a
grindstone nu ther ; but we allowed we’d tackle it. It warn’t quite
midnight yet, so we cleared out for the mi ll, leaving Jim at work. We
sm ou ched the grind stone, and set out to roll her home, but it was a
most nation tough job . Some times, do what we could, we couldn’t keep
her from falling over, and she come mighty near m ashing us every time.
Tom said she was going to get one of us, sure, before we got through.
We got her half- way; and then we was plumb played out, and most
drownded with swe at. We see it warn’t no use; we got to go and fetch
Jim. So he raised up his bed and slid the chain off of the bed- leg,
and wra pt it round and round his neck, and we crawled out through our
hole and down there, and Jim and me laid into that grindstone and
walked her along like nothing; and Tom super inten ded. He could
out- super in tend any boy I ever see. He knowed how to do everything.

Our hole was pretty big, but it warn’t big enough to get the
grindstone through ; but Jim he took the pick and soon made it big
enough. Then Tom marked out them things on it with the nail, and set
Jim to work on them, with the na il for a chi sel and an iron bol t from
the rub bage in the lean-to for a ha mm er, and told him to work till the
rest of his candle quit on him, and then he could go to bed, and hide
the grindstone under his straw tick and sleep on it. Then we helped
him fix his chain back on the bed- leg, and was ready for bed
ourselves. But Tom thought of something, and says:

“You got any spiders in here, Jim?”

“No, sah, thanks to goodness I ha in ’t, Mars Tom.”

“All right, we’ll get you some .”

“But bless you, honey, I doan’ want n one. I’s afeard un um. I jis’
’s soon have rattle snakes ar oun ’.”

Tom thought a minute or two, and says:

“It’s a good idea. And I reckon it’s been done. It must ’a’ been
don e; it stands to reason. Yes, it’s a pri me good idea. Where could
you keep it?”

“Keep what, Mars Tom?”

“Why, a rattle sna ke.”

“D e goodness gracious alive, Mars Tom ! Why, if dey was a rattlesnake
to come in heah I’d take en bust right out tho o dat log wall, I would,
wid my head.”

“Why, Jim, you wouldn’t be afraid of it after a little. You could ta me
it.”

“T ame it!”

“Yes — easy enough. Every animal is grateful for kindness and pe tt ing,
and they wouldn’t think of hur ting a person that pe ts them. Any book
will tell you that. You tr y— that’s all I as k; just try for two or
three days. Why, you can get him so in a little while that he’ll love
you; and sleep with you; and won’t stay away from you a minute; and
will let you wra p him round your neck and put his head in your mou th.”

“P lea se, Tom — doan’ talk so! I can’t stan ’ it! He’d let me
shove his head in my mou f — fer a fav or, hain’t it? I lay he’d wait a
pow ’ ful long time ’ fo’ I ast him. En mo’ en d at, I doan’ want him
to sleep wid me.”

“ Jim, don’t act so foolish . A prisoner’s got to have some kind of a
d umb pe t, and if a rattlesnake hain’t ever been tri ed, why, there’s
more glor y to be gained in your being the first to ever try it than
any other way you could ever think of to save your life.”

“Why, Mars Tom, I doan’ want no sich glor y. S na ke take ’n bite Jim’s
chin off, den whah is de glor y? No, sah, I doan’ want no sich
do in ’s.”

“Blame it, can’t you tr y? I only want you to tr y— you needn’t keep
it up if it don’t wor k.”

“But de trouble all done ef de snake bite me while I’s a- tr yin’ him.
Mars Tom, I’s will in’ to tackle mos’ anything ’at ain’t on reasonable,
but ef you en Huck fet ches a rattlesnake in heah for me to ta me, I’s
gwyne to leave, dat’s shor e.”

“Well, then, let it go, let it go, if you’re so bull -headed about it.
We can get you some gar ter- snakes, and you can tie some buttons on
their tail s, and let on they’re rattle snakes, and I reckon that ’ll
have to do.”

“I k’n stan ’ de m, Mars Tom, but blame’ ’f I couldn’ get along wid out
um, I tell you dat . I never knowed b’fo’ ’twas so much bother and
trouble to be a prison er.”

“Well, it always is when it’s done right. You got any rats around
here?”

“No, sah, I hain’t se ed none.”

“Well, we’ll get you some rat s.”

“Why, Mars Tom, I doan’ want no rats. Dey’s de da d bla me dest cre tur s
to ’ st ur b a body, en rust le roun’ over ’ im , en bite his feet, when
he’s tr yin’ to sleep, I ever see. No, sah, gimme g ’ yar ter- snakes, ’f
I’s got to have ’m, but doan’ gimme no rat s; I ha in’ got no use f’r
um, ska sel y.”

“But, Jim, you got to have ’em — they all do. So don’t make no more
fuss about it. P ri son ers ain’t ever without rats. There ain’t no
instance of it. And they train them, and pet them, and learn them
tri cks, and they get to be as soci able as fli es. But you got to play
music to them. You got anything to play music on?”

“I ain’ got nuffn but a co ase comb en a piece o’ paper, en a
ju i ce- harp ; but I reck’n dey wouldn’ take no stock in a ju i ce- harp .”

“Y es they would. They don’t care what kind of music ’ti s. A
jew s- harp ’s plenty good enough for a rat. All anim als like mus ic —in a
prison they do te on it. Spe ci ally, painful mus ic ; and you can’t get no
other kind out of a jew ’s- har p. It always interests them; they come
out to see what’s the matter with you. Yes, you’re all right; you’re
fixed very well. You want to set on your bed nights before you go to
sleep, and early in the morn ings, and play your jew ’s- harp ; play ’ The
L ast L ink is Bro ken ’ —that’s the thing that ’ll scoop a rat quick er ’n
anything else; and when you’ve played about two minutes you’ll see all
the rat s, and the snakes, and spiders and things begin to feel wor ried
about you, and come. And they’ll just fairly swarm over you, and have
a noble good time.”

“Yes, dey will, I reck ’n, Mars Tom, but what k ine er time is Jim
ha vin ’? B lest if I kin see de pin t. But I’ll do it ef I got to. I
reck’n I better keep de anim als satisfied, en not have no trouble in
de house.”

Tom waited to think it over, and see if there wasn’t nothing else; and
pretty soon he says:

“Oh, there’s one thing I forgo t. Could you raise a flow er here, do you
reck on?”

“I doan’ know but maybe I could, Mars Tom ; but it’s tol able dark in
hea h, en I ain’ got no use f’r no flow er, no how, en she’d be a pow ’ ful
sight o’ trouble .”

“Well, you try it, anyway. Some other prisoners has done it.”

“One er dem big cat - tail - look in’ mull en- st al ks would grow in hea h,
Mars Tom, I reck ’n, but she wouldn’t be wu th half de trouble she’d
co ss.”

“Don’t you believe it. We’ll fetch you a little one, and you plan t it
in the corner over there, and raise it. And don’t call it mull en, call
it P it chi o la —that’s its right name when it’s in a pri son. And you
want to water it with your tear s.”

“Why, I got plenty spring water, Mars Tom.”

“You don’t want spring water; you want to water it with your te ars.
It’s the way they always do.”

“Why, Mars Tom, I lay I kin raise one er dem mull en- st al ks tw y ste wid
spring water whi les another man’s a start ’n one wid tear s.”

“That ain’t the idea. You got to do it with tear s.”

“S he’ll die on my han ’s, Mars Tom, she sho ly will ; kase I doan’
ska sely ever cr y.”

So Tom was stum ped. But he studied it over, and then said Jim would
have to worry along the best he could with an oni on. He promised he
would go to the nigger cabins and drop one, private, in Jim’s
coffe e- po t, in the morning. Jim said he would “ jis’ ’s soon have
tobac ker in his coffe e ”; and found so much fault with it, and with the
work and bother of raising the mull en, and jew ’s- har ping the rat s, and
pe tting and fl at tering up the snakes and spiders and things, on top of
all the other work he had to do on pen s, and inscripti ons, and
jour n als, and things, which made it more trouble and worry and
responsi bility to be a prisoner than anything he ever under too k, that
Tom most lost all pati ence with him; and said he was just load ened
down with more ga u di er chanc es than a prisoner ever had in the world
to make a name for himself, and yet he didn’t know enough to
ap preci ate them, and they was just about wa sted on him. So Jim he was
sorry, and said he wouldn’t be have so no more, and then me and Tom
shoved for bed.




CHAPTER XXX IX


In the morning we went up to the village and bought a wi re rat- trap
and fetched it down, and un stopped the best rat- hole, and in about an
hour we had fifteen of the bu lli est kind of on es; and then we took it
and put it in a safe place under Aunt Sall y’s bed. But while we was
gone for spiders little Th om as Frank l in B en jam in J e ffer son Elexander
Phelps found it there, and opened the door of it to see if the rats
would come out, and they did; and Aunt Sally she come in, and when we
got back she was a-standing on top of the bed raising C ain , and the
rats was doing what they could to keep off the dull times for her. So
she took and du sted us both with the hick ry, and we was as much as two
hours cat ching another fifteen or six teen, drat that medd le some cu b,
and they warn’t the like li est, nu ther, because the first haul was the
pick of the flo ck. I never see a like lier lot of rats than what that
first haul was.

We got a splendid stock of sor ted spi der s, and bu gs, and fro gs, and
cat er pill ars, and one thing or another ; and we like to got a hor ne t’s
ne st, but we didn’t. The family was at home. We didn’t give it right
up, but stayed with them as long as we coul d; because we allowed we’d
tire them out or they’d got to tire us out, and they done it. Then we
got all y cum pain and rubbed on the places, and was pretty near all
right again, but couldn’t set down conveni ent. And so we went for the
snakes, and grabbed a couple of dozen gar ters and house - snakes, and
put them in a bag , and put it in our room, and by that time it was
supper - time, and a rattling good honest day ’s work : and hungr y?— oh,
no, I reckon not ! And there warn’t a ble ssed snake up there when we
went back — we didn’t half tie the sa ck, and they worked out some how,
and left. But it didn’t matter much, because they was still on the
premises somewher es. So we judged we could get some of them again. No,
there warn’t no real scar city of snakes about the house for a
considerable spe ll. You’d see them dri pping from the raf ters and
places every now and then; and they generly landed in your pl ate, or
down the back of your neck, and most of the time where you didn’t want
them. Well, they was handsome and stri ped, and there warn’t no harm in
a million of them; but that never made no difference to Aunt Sally;
she desp ised snakes, be the bre ed what they might, and she couldn’t
stand them no way you could fix it; and every time one of them flo pped
down on her, it didn’t make no difference what she was do ing, she
would just lay that work down and light out. I never see such a woman.
And you could hear her whoop to Jer ich o . You couldn’t get her to take
a-holt of one of them with the tong s. And if she turned over and found
one in bed she would scra m ble out and lift a howl that you would think
the house was a fire. She disturbed the old man so that he said he
could most wish there hadn’t ever been no snakes creat ed. Why, after
every last snake had been gone clear out of the house for as much as a
week Aunt Sally warn’t over it ye t; she warn’t near over it; when she
was setting thinking about something you could touch her on the back
of her neck with a feather and she would jump right out of her
stock ings. It was very curi ous. But Tom said all women was just so. He
said they was made that way for some reason or other.

We got a li cking every time one of our snakes come in her way, and she
allowed these lick ings warn’t nothing to what she would do if we ever
loaded up the place again with them. I didn’t mind the lick ings,
because they didn’t amount to nothing; but I minded the trouble we had
to lay in another lot. But we got them laid in, and all the other
things; and you never see a cabin as bli th es ome as Jim’s was when
they’d all swarm out for music and go for him. Jim didn’t like the
spi der s, and the spiders didn’t like Jim; and so they’d lay for him,
and make it mighty warm for him. And he said that between the rats and
the snakes and the grindstone there warn’t no room in bed for him,
ska sel y; and when there was, a body couldn’t sleep, it was so li vel y,
and it was always li vel y, he said, because they never all slept at
one time, but took turn about, so when the snakes was asleep the rats
was on de ck, and when the rats turned in the snakes come on watch, so
he always had one gang under him, in his way, and t’other gang having
a circus over him, and if he got up to hunt a new place the spiders
would take a chance at him as he crossed over. He said if he ever got
out this time he wouldn’t ever be a prisoner again, not for a sa lar y.

Well, by the end of three weeks everything was in pretty good sha pe.
The shirt was sent in early, in a pie, and every time a rat bit Jim he
would get up and write a line in his journal whilst the ink was fresh ;
the pens was made, the inscri p tions and so on was all car ved on the
grind st one; the bed-leg was sawed in two, and we had et up the
saw du st, and it give us a most ama zing stoma ch- a ch e. We reckoned we
was all going to di e, but didn’t. It was the most un di g esti ble saw dust
I ever see; and Tom said the same. But as I was saying, we’d got all
the work done now, at la st; and we was all pretty much fagged out,
too, but mainly Jim. The old man had wrote a couple of times to the
plant ation below Orleans to come and get their runaway nigger, but
hadn’t got no answer, because there warn’t no such plant ation ; so he
allowed he would adverti se Jim in the St. Louis and New Orleans
paper s; and when he mentioned the St. Louis ones it give me the cold
shiver s, and I see we hadn’t no time to lo se. So Tom said, now for the
nonnamous letters.

“What’s them?” I says.

“W ar nings to the people that something is up. Sometimes it’s done one
way, sometimes another. But there’s always somebody sp ying around that
gives notice to the gover nor of the cast le. When Louis X VI. was going
to light out of the T oo l er ies a servant- girl done it. It’s a very good
way, and so is the nonnamous letters. We’ll use them both . And it’s
usual for the prisoner’s mother to change clothes with him, and she
sta ys in, and he sli des out in her clothes. We’ll do that, too.”

“But looky here, Tom, what do we want to warn anybody for that
some thing’s up? Let them find it out for themsel ves —it’s their
look out.”

“Yes, I know; but you can’t depend on them. It’s the way they’ve acted
from the very star t— left us to do everything. They’re so confi ding
and mull et -headed they don’t take notice of nothing at all. So if we
don’t give them notice there won’t be nobody nor nothing to
interfere with us, and so after all our hard work and trouble this
esca pe ’ll go off perfectly fl at ; won’t amount to noth ing— won’t be
nothing to it.”

“Well, as for me, Tom, that’s the way I’d like .”

“Sh uck s!” he says, and looked disgu sted. So I says:

“But I ain’t going to make no compla in t. Any way that suits you suits
me. What you going to do about the servant- girl ?”

“You’ll be her. You slide in, in the middle of the night, and hook
that yaller girl’s fro ck .”

“Why, Tom, that ’ll make trouble next morning; because, of course, she
prob ’ bly hain’t got any but that one.”

“I know; but you don’t want it but fifteen minutes, to carry the
nonnamous letter and shove it under the front door.”

“All right, then, I’ll do it; but I could carry it just as handy in my
own to g s.”

“You wouldn’t look like a servant- girl then, would you?”

“No, but there won’t be nobody to see what I look like, any way.”

“That ain’t got nothing to do with it. The thing for us to do is just
to do our dut y, and not worry about whether anybody sees us do it
or not. Hain’t you got no princi ple at all?”

“All right, I ain’t saying nothing; I’m the servant- girl. Who ’s Jim’s
mother ?”

“I’m his mother. I’ll hook a gown from Aunt Sall y.”

“Well, then, you’ll have to stay in the cabin when me and Jim lea ves.”

“Not much. I’ll stuff Jim’s clothes full of straw and lay it on his
bed to represent his mother in disgui se, and Jim ’ll take the nigger
woman’s gown off of me and wear it, and we’ll all ev ade together. When
a prisoner of style escap es it’s called an evas i on. It’s always called
so when a king escap es, f ’r instan ce. And the same with a king’s son ;
it don’t make no difference whether he’s a natural one or an unnatural
one.”

So Tom he wrote the nonnamous letter, and I sm ou ched the yaller
w en ch ’s fro ck that night, and put it on, and shoved it under the front
door, the way Tom told me to. It said:

Be war e. T r oub le is bre w ing. Keep a sharp look out.
UN K NO WN F RI EN D.

Next night we stuck a pict ure, which Tom drawed in bloo d, of a sk ull
and cros s b ones on the front door; and next night another one of a
coffin on the back door. I never see a family in such a swe at. They
couldn’t ’a’ been worse scared if the place had ’a’ been full of
gho sts laying for them behind everything and under the be ds and
shiver ing through the air. If a door bang ed, Aunt Sally she jumped and
said “ ou ch!” if anything fe ll, she jumped and said “ ou ch!” if you
happened to touch her, when she warn’t noti cing, she done the sa me;
she couldn’t face no way and be satisfied, because she allowed there
was something behind her every time —so she was always a- whir ling
around sudden, and saying “ ou ch ,” and before she’d got two- thir ds
around she’d whir l back again, and say it again; and she was afraid to
go to bed, but she dasn’t set up. So the thing was working very well,
Tom said; he said he never see a thing work more satisfactor y. He said
it showed it was done right.

So he said, now for the grand bul ge ! So the very next morning at the
streak of daw n we got another letter ready, and was wondering what we
better do with it, because we heard them say at supper they was going
to have a nigger on watch at both doors all night. Tom he went down
the lightning-rod to sp y around; and the nigger at the back door was
asleep, and he stuck it in the back of his neck and come back. This
letter said:

Don’t bet ray me, I wish to be your friend. There is a des pr ate gang
of cut thro ats from over in the Indian T err itor y going to steal your
runaway nigger to-night, and they have been trying to scare you so as
you will stay in the house and not bother them. I am one of the gang,
but have got reli gg ion and wish to quit it and lead an honest life
again, and will bet ray the he li sh des ig n. They will snea k down from
nor th ard s, along the fence, at midnight exac t, with a false key, and
go in the nigger’s cabin to get him. I am to be off a piece and blow a
tin hor n if I see any dang er; but stead of that I will B A like a she ep
soon as they get in and not blow at all; then whilst they are getting
his chains loose, you slip there and lock them in, and can kill them
at your le as ure. Don’t do anything but just the way I am telling you;
if you do they will suspicion something and raise whoo p- jam bor ee hoo . I
do not wish any reward but to know I have done the right thing.

UN K NO WN F RI EN D.




CHAPTER XL


We was feeling pretty good after breakfast, and took my canoe and went
over the river a- fish ing, with a lunch, and had a good time, and took
a look at the raft and found her all right, and got home late to
supper, and found them in such a sweat and worry they didn’t know
which end they was standing on, and made us go right off to bed the
minute we was done supper, and wouldn’t tell us what the trouble was,
and never let on a word about the new letter, but didn’t need to,
because we knowed as much about it as anybody did, and as soon as we
was half up-stairs and her back was turned we slid for the cellar
cub board and loaded up a good lunch and took it up to our room and
went to bed, and got up about half past ele ven, and Tom put on Aunt
Sall y’s dress that he stole and was going to start with the lunch, but
says:

“W here’s the butter ?”

“I laid out a hunk of it,” I says, “ on a piece of a corn-p one.”

“Well, you left it laid out, then —it ain’t here.”

“We can get along without it,” I says.

“We can get along with it, too ,” he says; “ just you slide down
cellar and fetch it. And then mo sey right down the lightning-rod and
come along. I’ll go and stuff the straw into Jim’s clothes to
represent his mother in disgui se, and be ready to b a like a she ep
and shove soon as you get there.”

So out he went, and down cellar went I. The hunk of but ter, big as a
person’s fi st, was where I had left it, so I took up the slab of
corn-p one with it on, and blowed out my light, and started up-stairs
very steal th y, and got up to the main floor all right, but here comes
Aunt Sally with a candle, and I clapped the truck in my hat, and
clapped my hat on my head, and the next second she see me; and she
says:

“You been down cellar ?”

“Yes ’m .”

“What you been doing down there?”

“Noth ’n .”

“Noth ’n !”

“No’ m .”

“Well, then, what possessed you to go down there this time of night?”

“I don’t know ’m .”

“You don’t know ? Don’t answer me that way. Tom, I want to know what
you been doing down there.”

“I hain’t been doing a single thing, Aunt Sally, I hope to gracious if
I have.”

I reckoned she’d let me go now, and as a gener l thing she woul d; but I
s’pose there was so many strange things going on she was just in a
sweat about every little thing that warn’t yard - stick straight ; so she
says, very deci de d:

“You just mar ch into that sett ing-room and stay there till I come. You
been up to something you no business to, and I lay I’ll find out what
it is before I’m done with you.”

So she went away as I opened the door and walked into the
sett ing- room. My, but there was a crowd there ! F if teen farm ers, and
every one of them had a gun. I was most powerful sick, and sl un k to a
chair and set down. They was setting around, some of them talking a
little, in a low voice, and all of them fidge ty and uneas y, but trying
to look like they warn ’t; but I knowed they was, because they was
always taking off their hat s, and putting them on, and scrat ching
their heads, and changing their se at s, and fum bling with their
butt ons. I warn’t easy myself, but I didn’t take my hat off, all the
same.

I did wish Aunt Sally would come, and get done with me, and lick me,
if she wanted to, and let me get away and tell Tom how we’d over done
this thing, and what a th under ing hor ne t’s nest we’d got ourselves
in to, so we could stop fooling around straight off, and clear out with
Jim before these ri ps got out of pati ence and come for us.

At last she come and begun to ask me questions, but I couldn’t
answer them stra ight, I didn’t know which end of me was up; because
these men was in such a fi d get now that some was wanting to start
right now and lay for them desper ado es, and saying it warn’t but a
few minutes to mid night; and others was trying to get them to hold on
and wait for the sheep - sign al; and here was Aun ty pe gging away at the
questions, and me a- shaking all over and ready to sin k down in my
tracks I was that scar ed; and the place getting ho t ter and ho t ter, and
the butter beginning to me lt and run down my neck and behind my ear s;
and pretty soon, when one of them says, “I’m for going and getting
in the cabin first and right now, and cat ching them when they
com e,” I most dro p pe d; and a streak of butter come a- tri ck ling down my
fore head, and Aunt Sally she see it, and turns white as a sheet, and
says:

“For the land’s sake, what is the matter with the chil d? He’s got
the brain- f ever as shore as you’re born, and they’re oo zing out!”

And everybody runs to see, and she snat ches off my hat, and out comes
the bread and what was left of the but ter, and she grabbed me, and
hugged me, and says:

“Oh, what a turn you did give me! and how glad and grateful I am it
ain’t no wor se; for luck ’s against us, and it never ra ins but it
p our s, and when I see that truck I thought we’d lost you, for I knowed
by the col or and all it was just like your brains would be if — D ear,
dear, wh y d ’n t you tell me that was what you’d been down there for,
I wouldn’t ’a’ car ed. Now cl er out to bed, and don’t lemme see no
more of you till morn ing !”

I was up-stairs in a second, and down the lightning-rod in another
one, and shin ning through the dark for the lean- to. I couldn’t hardly
get my words out, I was so anxi ou s; but I told Tom as quick as I could
we must jump for it now, and not a minute to lo se —the house full of
men, yonder, with gun s!

His eyes just bla z ed; and he says:

“No !— is that so? Ain’t it bull y! Why, Huck, if it was to do over
again, I bet I could fetch two hundre d! If we could put it off ti ll —”

“H ur ry ! hurry !” I says. “W here’s Jim?”

“R ight at your elb ow ; if you reach out your arm you can touch him.
He’s dressed, and every thing’s ready. Now we’ll slide out and give the
sheep - sign al.”

But then we heard the tra mp of men coming to the door, and heard them
begin to fum ble with the pad lock, and heard a man say:

“I told you we’d be too so on; they haven’t com e— the door is locked.
Here, I’ll lock some of you into the cabin, and you lay for ’em in the
dark and kill ’em when they come; and the rest sc atter around a piece,
and listen if you can hear ’em com ing.”

So in they come, but couldn’t see us in the dark, and most tro d on us
whilst we was hust ling to get under the bed. But we got under all
right, and out through the hole, swift but sof t— Jim first, me next,
and Tom last, which was according to Tom’s order s. Now we was in the
lean- to, and heard tramp ings close by outside. So we crept to the
door, and Tom stopped us there and put his eye to the crac k, but
couldn’t make out nothing, it was so dar k; and whispered and said he
would listen for the steps to get further, and when he n ud ged us Jim
must gli de out first, and him last. So he set his ear to the crack and
listened, and listened, and listened, and the steps a- scra ping around
out there all the time; and at last he n ud ged us, and we slid out, and
stooped down, not brea thing, and not making the least noi se, and
slipped steal thy towards the fence in In ju n fi le, and got to it all
right, and me and Jim over it; but Tom’s britches catched fast on a
spl in ter on the top ra il, and then he hear the steps coming, so he had
to pull loose, which sna pped the spl in ter and made a noi se; and as he
dropped in our tracks and started somebody sings out:

“Who ’s that? An sw er, or I’ll shoo t !”

But we didn’t answer ; we just un fur led our heels and shov ed. Then
there was a rus h, and a bang , bang , bang! and the bull ets fairly
whi z zed around us ! We heard them sing out:

“Here they ar e! They’ve broke for the river ! After ’em, boys, and turn
loose the dog s!”

So here they come, full til t. We could hear them because they wore
boots and yell ed, but we didn’t wear no boots and didn’t ye ll. We was
in the path to the mill ; and when they got pretty close onto us we
dodged into the bus h and let them go by, and then dropped in behind
them. They ’d had all the dogs shut up, so they wouldn’t scare off the
robber s; but by this time somebody had let them loose, and here they
come, making powwow enough for a mill ion ; but they was our dog s; so we
stopped in our tracks till they catched up; and when they see it
warn’t nobody but us, and no excit ement to offer them, they only just
said how dy, and tore right ahead towards the shouting and cl atter ing;
and then we up- ste am again, and whi z zed along after them till we was
nearly to the mi ll, and then struck up through the bus h to where my
canoe was ti ed, and hop ped in and pulled for dear life towards the
middle of the river, but didn’t make no more noise than we was
obleeged to. Then we struck out, easy and comfortable, for the island
where my raft was; and we could hear them yelling and bar king at each
other all up and down the bank, till we was so far away the sounds got
dim and died out. And when we stepped onto the raft I says:

“Now, old Jim, you’re a free man again, and I bet you won’t ever be
a slave no more.”

“E n a mighty good job it wu z , too, Huck. It ’uz planned beautiful, en
it ’uz done beauti ful ; en dey ain’t nobody kin git up a plan dat’s
mo’ mixed up en splendid den what dat one wu z .”

We was all glad as we could be, but Tom was the gla dd est of all
because he had a bullet in the calf of his leg.

When me and Jim heard that we didn’t feel as br ash as what we did
before. It was hur ting him considerable, and ble ed ing; so we laid him
in the wigwam and tore up one of the duke’s shir ts for to band age him,
but he says:

“G imme the rag s; I can do it myself. Don’t stop now; don’t fool around
here, and the evas ion booming along so hand some ; man the sweep s, and
set her loo se! Bo ys, we done it ele gan t !— ’ deed we did. I wish we’d
’a’ had the handling of Louis X VI ., there wouldn’t ’a’ been no ‘ S on of
S ain t Lou is, as cend to heaven !’ wrote down in his bi ogra ph y; no,
sir, we’d ’a’ whoo ped him over the bor der —that’s what we’d ’a’ done
with him —and done it just as slick as nothing at all, too. M an the
sweep s— man the sweep s!”

But me and Jim was consul ting —and thinking. And after we’d thought a
minute, I says:

“Sa y it, Jim.”

So he says:

“Well, den, dis is de way it look to me, Huck. E f it wuz him dat ’uz
bein’ s ot free, en one er de boys wuz to git shot, would he say, ’ Go
on en save me, ne m mine ’bout a doctor f’r to save dis one ’? Is dat
like Mars Tom Sawyer ? Would he say dat ? You bet he wouldn ’t! Well,
den, is Jim gy w ne to say it? No, sah —I doan’ budge a step out’n dis
place ’d out a doctor ; not if it’s forty year !”

I knowed he was white in side, and I reckoned he’d say what he did
say —so it was all right now, and I told Tom I was a-going for a
do ctor. He raised considerable row about it, but me and Jim stuck to
it and wouldn’t bu dge; so he was for crawling out and setting the raft
loose him self ; but we wouldn’t let him. Then he give us a piece of his
mind, but it didn’t do no good.

So when he sees me getting the canoe ready, he says:

“Well, then, if you’re bound to go, I’ll tell you the way to do when
you get to the village. Sh ut the door and bl ind fold the doctor tight
and fast, and make him swear to be silent as the grave, and put a
pur se full of gold in his hand, and then take and lead him all around
the back alle ys and everywher es in the dark, and then fetch him here
in the canoe, in a round about way amongst the island s, and search him
and take his chal k away from him, and don’t give it back to him till
you get him back to the village, or else he will chal k this raft so he
can find it again. It’s the way they all do.”

So I said I would, and left, and Jim was to hide in the woods when he
see the doctor coming till he was gone again.




CHAPTER XL I


The doctor was an old man; a very ni ce, kind -looking old man when I
got him up. I told him me and my brother was over on Span ish I sl and
hunting yesterday afternoon, and camp ed on a piece of a raft we found,
and about midnight he must ’a’ ki cked his gun in his dream s, for it
went off and shot him in the leg, and we wanted him to go over there
and fix it and not say nothing about it, nor let anybody know, because
we wanted to come home this evening and surprise the fol ks.

“Who is your fol k s?” he says.

“The Phelp ses, down yonder .”

“O h,” he says. And after a minute, he says:

“How ’d you say he got sho t?”

“He had a dream ,” I says, “and it shot him.”

“S ing ular dream ,” he says.

So he lit up his lantern, and got his saddle- bag s, and we started. But
when he see the canoe he didn’t like the look of her —said she was big
enough for one, but didn’t look pretty safe for two. I says:

“Oh, you needn’t be afe ard, sir, she carried the three of us easy
enough.”

“What thre e?”

“Why, me and Sid, and — and —and the gun s; that’s what I mean .”

“O h,” he says.

But he put his foot on the gun nel and ro cked her, and shook his head,
and said he reckoned he’d look around for a bigger one. But they was
all locked and cha in ed; so he took my canoe, and said for me to wait
till he come back, or I could hunt around further, or maybe I better
go down home and get them ready for the surprise if I wanted to. But I
said I didn ’t; so I told him just how to find the raft, and then he
started.

I struck an idea pretty so on. I says to myself, spos ’n he can’t fix
that leg just in three sha kes of a sheep ’s tail , as the saying is ?
spos ’n it takes him three or four day s? What are we going to do ?— lay
around there till he lets the cat out of the bag ? No, sir; I know what
I’ll do. I’ll wait, and when he comes back if he says he’s got to go
any more I’ll get down there, too, if I swi m ; and we’ll take and tie
him, and keep him, and shove out down the river; and when Tom’s done
with him we’ll give him what it’s wor th, or all we go t, and then let
him get ashore.

So then I crept into a lumber- pile to get some sleep ; and next time I
waked up the sun was away up over my head ! I shot out and went for the
doctor ’s house, but they told me he’d gone away in the night some time
or other, and warn’t back yet. Well, thinks I, that looks powerful bad
for Tom, and I’ll dig out for the island right off. So away I shov ed,
and turned the corner, and nearly ra mmed my head into Uncle Silas ’s
stoma ch ! He says:

“Why, Tom ! Where you been all this time, you rascal ?”

“I hain’t been now her es,” I says, “ only just hunting for the runaway
nigger — me and Sid .”

“Why, where ever did you go ?” he says. “Your aun t’s been mighty
uneas y.”

“She need n ’t,” I says, “because we was all right. We followed the men
and the dogs, but they ou tru n us, and we lost them; but we thought we
heard them on the water, so we got a canoe and took out after them and
crossed over, but couldn’t find nothing of them; so we cru ised along
up- shore till we got kind of tired and beat out; and tied up the canoe
and went to sleep, and never waked up till about an hour ago ; then we
paddled over here to hear the new s, and Sid ’s at the po st- office to
see what he can hear , and I’m a- bran ching out to get something to eat
for us, and then we’re going hom e.”

So then we went to the po st- office to get “S id ”; but just as I
suspici oned, he warn’t there; so the old man he got a letter out of
the office, and we waited awhile longer, but Sid didn’t come; so the
old man said, come along, let Sid foot it home, or canoe it, when he
got done fooling around —but we would rid e. I couldn’t get him to let
me stay and wait for Sid ; and he said there warn’t no use in it, and I
must come along, and let Aunt Sally see we was all right.

When we got home Aunt Sally was that glad to see me she laughed and
cried both , and hugged me, and give me one of them lick ings of her n
that don’t amount to sh ucks, and said she’d serve Sid the same when he
come.

And the place was pl um full of farm ers and farm er s’ wi ves, to din ner ;
and such another cl ack a body never heard. Old Mrs. Hotch kiss was the
wor st; her tongue was a-going all the time. She says:

“Well, Sister Phel ps, I’ve ransacked that-air cabin over, an’ I
b’lieve the nigger was craz y. I says to Sister D am re ll — didn’t I,
Sister D am re ll ?— s’I, he’s craz y, s’ I— them ’s the very words I said.
You all hear n me : he’s craz y, s’I; everything shows it, s’I. Look at
that-air grind stone, s’I; want to tell me ’t any cre tu r ’ t’s in his
right mind ’s a-goin’ to scrabble all them cra zy things onto a
grind st one ? s’I. Here sich ’n’ sich a person busted his hear t; ’n’
here so ’n’ so pe gged along for thirty-seven year, ’n’ all
that — nat cher l son o’ Louis some body, ’n’ sich ever last ’n rubbag e.
He’s plumb craz y, s’I; it’s what I says in the f ust place, it’s what I
says in the middle, ’n’ it’s what I says last ’n’ all the time —the
nigger’s craz y— cra zy ’s Ne bo k ood nee z er, s’ I.”

“ An ’ look at that-air ladder made out’n rags, Sister Hotch kis s,” says
old Mrs. D am re ll ; “what in the name o’ goodness could he ever want
of —”

“The very words I was a-say in’ no longer ago th ’n this minute to
Sister U t ter back, ’n’ she ’ll tell you so herself. Sh - she, look at
that-air rag ladder, sh- she ; ’n’ s’I, yes, look at it, s’ I— what
could he ’a’ wanted of it, s’I. Sh - she, Sister Hotch kis s, sh- she —”

“But how in the n ation ’d they ever git that grindstone in there,
anyway ? ’n’ who dug that-air hole ? ’n’ who —”

“My very words, Brer P en ro d! I was a-say in ’— pass that-air sa s s er o’
m’ las ses, won’t ye ? —I was a-say in’ to Sister Dun lap, jist this
minute, how did they git that grindstone in there? s’I. Wi thout
help, mind you — ’ thout help ! Th ar ’s where ’ti s. Don’t tell me,
s’I; there wuz help, s’I; ’n’ ther’ wuz a plenty help, too, s’I;
ther ’s ben a dozen a- help in’ that nigger, ’n’ I lay I’d skin every
last nigger on this place but I’d find out who done it, s’I;
’n’ more over, s’ I —”

“A dozen says you !— forty couldn’t ’a’ done everything that’s been
done. Look at them case-kni fe saw s and things, how te di ous they’ve
been ma de; look at that bed-leg sawed off with ’m, a week ’s work for
six men : look at that nigger made out’n straw on the bed; and look
at —”

“You may well say it, Brer H ight ow er ! It’s jist as I was a-say in’ to
Brer Phel ps, his own self. S ’ e, what do you think of it, Sister
Hotch kis s? s’ e. Think o’ what, Brer Phelp s? s’I. Think o’ that bed-leg
sawed off that a way ? s’ e? Think of it? s’I. I lay it never sawed
itself off, s’ I— somebody sawed it, s’I; that’s my opinion, take
it or leave it, it mayn’t be no ’ coun t, s’I, but sich as ’t is, it’s
my opinion, s’I, ’n’ if anybody k’n start a better one, s’I, let him
do it, s’I, that’s all. I says to Sister Dun lap, s’ I —”

“Why, dog my cat s, they must ’a’ ben a house full o’ niggers in there
every night for four weeks to ’a’ done all that work, Sister Phelp s.
Look at that shir t— every last in ch of it ki vered over with secret
A fri can writ ’n done with bloo d! M ust ’a’ ben a raft uv ’m at it right
along, all the time, a most. Why, I’d give two dollars to have it read
to me; ’n’ as for the niggers that wrote it, I ’ low I’d take ’n’ l ash
’m t’ ll —”

“P e ople to help him, Bro ther Mar ple s! Well, I reckon you’d think
so if you’d ’a’ been in this house for a while back. Why, they’ve
stole everything they could lay their hands on —and we a- watching all
the time, mind you. They stole that shirt right off o’ the lin e! and
as for that sheet they made the rag ladder out of, ther’ ain’t no
telling how many times they didn’t steal that; and fl our, and
candles, and candle sti cks, and spo ons, and the old warm ing- pan, and
most a thousand things that I dis remember now, and my new calico
dres s; and me and Silas and my Sid and Tom on the constant watch day
and night, as I was a- telling you, and not a one of us could catch
hide nor hair nor sight nor sound of them; and here at the last
minute, l o and beh old you, they sli des right in under our no ses and
fools us, and not only fools us but the In ju n T err itor y robbers too,
and actuly gets away with that nigger safe and sound, and that with
sixteen men and twenty- two dogs right on their very heels at that very
time ! I tell you, it just bang s anything I ever heard of. Why,
sper its couldn’t ’a’ done better and been no smar ter. And I reckon
they must ’a’ been sper it s— because, because, you know our dogs,
and ther’ ain’t no better ; well, them dogs never even got on the
track of ’m on ce ! You explain that to me if you can !— any of
you!”

“Well, it does beat —”

“L aw s alive, I never —”

“So help me, I wouldn’t ’a’ be —”

“H ou se- thiev es as well as —”

“Goo dn ess grac ious sa kes, I’d ’a’ ben afeard to live in sich a —”

“’ F ra id to live !— why, I was that scared I dasn’t hardly go to bed,
or get up, or lay down, or set down, Sister R id ge way. Why, they’d
steal the ver y— why, goodness sa kes, you can guess what kind of a
flu ster I was in by the time midnight come last night. I hope to
gracious if I warn’t afraid they’d steal some o’ the family ! I was
just to that pass I didn’t have no reasoning fac ul ties no more. It
looks foolish enough now, in the day time; but I says to myself,
there’s my two poor boys asleep, ’ way up-stairs in that lonesome room,
and I decl are to goodness I was that uneasy ’t I cre p’ up there and
locked ’em in ! I did. And anybody would. Be cau se, you know, when you
get scared that way, and it keeps running on, and getting worse and
worse all the time, and your w its gets to add ling, and you get to
doing all sorts o’ wild things, and by and by you think to yourself,
spos ’n I was a boy, and was away up there, and the door ain’t locked,
and you —” She stopped, looking kind of wonder ing, and then she turned
her head around slow, and when her eye lit on me —I got up and took a
wal k.

Says I to myself, I can explain better how we come to not be in that
room this morning if I go out to one side and study over it a little.
So I done it. But I dasn’t go fur , or she’d ’a’ sent for me. And when
it was late in the day the people all went, and then I come in and
told her the noise and shooting waked up me and “S id ,” and the door
was locked, and we wanted to see the fun , so we went down the
lightning-rod, and both of us got hurt a little, and we didn’t never
want to try that no more. And then I went on and told her all what I
told Uncle Silas befor e; and then she said she’d forgive us, and maybe
it was all right enough anyway, and about what a body might expect of
boys, for all boys was a pretty har um - scar um lot as fur as she could
see; and so, as long as no harm hadn’t come of it, she judged she
better put in her time being grateful we was alive and well and she
had us still, stead of fre tting over what was past and done. So then
she kissed me, and pat ted me on the head, and dropped into a kind of a
br own - stud y; and pretty soon jumps up, and says:

“Why, law sa mer c y, it’s most night, and Sid not come ye t! What has
become of that bo y?”

I see my chance; so I ski ps up and says:

“I’ll run right up to town and get him ,” I says.

“No you won ’t,” she says. “You’ll stay right wher ’ you ar e; one’s
enough to be lost at a time. If he ain’t here to supper, your uncle
’ll go .”

Well, he warn’t there to supper ; so right after supper uncle went.

He come back about ten a little bit uneas y; hadn’t run across Tom’s
track. Aunt Sally was a good deal uneas y; but Uncle Silas he said
there warn’t no occas ion to be — boys will be boys, he said, and you’ll
see this one turn up in the morning all sound and right. So she had to
be satisfied. But she said she’d set up for him awhile anyway, and
keep a light burning so he could see it.

And then when I went up to bed she come up with me and fetched her
candle, and tucked me in, and m oth ered me so good I felt mean, and
like I couldn’t look her in the fac e; and she set down on the bed and
talked with me a long time, and said what a splendid boy Sid was, and
didn’t seem to want to ever stop talking about him; and kept asking me
every now and then if I reckoned he could ’a’ got lo st, or hurt, or
maybe drownded, and might be laying at this minute somewheres
suffer ing or dead, and she not by him to help him, and so the tears
would dri p down silent, and I would tell her that Sid was all right,
and would be home in the morning, sure ; and she would squee ze my hand,
or maybe kiss me, and tell me to say it again, and keep on saying it,
because it done her good, and she was in so much trouble. And when she
was going away she looked down in my eyes so steady and gent le, and
says:

“The door ain’t going to be locked, Tom, and there’s the window and
the ro d; but you’ll be good, won’t you? And you won’t go ? For my
sa ke.”

Law s knows I wanted to go bad enough to see about Tom, and was all
inten ding to go ; but after that I wouldn’t ’a’ went, not for king dom s.

But she was on my mind and Tom was on my mind, so I slept very
rest less. And twice I went down the ro d away in the night, and slipped
around front, and see her setting there by her candle in the window
with her eyes towards the road and the tears in them; and I wished I
could do something for her, but I couldn ’t, only to swear that I
wouldn’t never do nothing to gri eve her any more. And the third time I
waked up at daw n, and slid down, and she was there yet, and her candle
was most out, and her old gray head was resting on her hand, and she
was asleep.




CHAPTER X LI I


The old man was up-town again before breakfast, but couldn’t get no
track of Tom ; and both of them set at the table thinking, and not
saying nothing, and looking mourn ful, and their coffee getting cold,
and not eating anything. And by and by the old man says:

“Did I give you the letter ?”

“What letter ?”

“The one I got yesterday out of the po st- offi ce.”

“No, you didn’t give me no letter .”

“Well, I must ’a’ forgot it.”

So he rummaged his pockets, and then went off somewheres where he had
laid it down, and fetched it, and give it to her. She says:

“Why, it’s from St. Peter sbur g —it’s from S is.”

I allowed another walk would do me good; but I couldn’t st ir. But
before she could break it open she dropped it and run —for she see
something. And so did I. It was Tom Sawyer on a mat tre ss; and that old
doctor ; and Jim, in her calico dress, with his hands tied behind
him; and a lot of people. I hid the letter behind the first thing that
come handy, and rus he d. She flung herself at Tom, cry ing, and says:

“Oh, he’s dead, he’s dead, I know he’s dead !”

And Tom he turned his head a little, and muttered something or other,
which showed he warn’t in his right min d; then she flung up her hands,
and says:

“He’s alive, thank God! And that’s enough !” and she snatched a kiss of
him, and flew for the house to get the bed ready, and sc at tering
orders right and left at the niggers and everybody else, as fast as
her tongue could go, every jump of the way.

I followed the men to see what they was going to do with Jim; and the
old doctor and Uncle Silas followed after Tom into the house. The men
was very hu ff y, and some of them wanted to hang Jim for an example to
all the other niggers around there, so they wouldn’t be trying to run
away like Jim done, and making such a raft of trouble, and keeping a
whole family scared most to death for days and nights. But the others
said, don’t do it, it wouldn’t answer at all; he ain’t our nigger, and
his owner would turn up and make us pay for him, sure. So that coo led
them down a little, because the people that’s always the most anxious
for to hang a nigger that hain’t done just right is always the very
ones that ain’t the most anxious to pay for him when they’ve got their
satisfaction out of him.

They cussed Jim consider ble, though, and give him a cu ff or two side
the head once in a while, but Jim never said nothing, and he never let
on to know me, and they took him to the same cabin, and put his own
clothes on him, and chained him again, and not to no bed-leg this
time, but to a big sta ple drove into the bottom log, and chained his
hands, too, and both leg s, and said he warn’t to have nothing but
bread and water to eat after this till his owner come, or he was sold
at auction because he didn’t come in a certain length of time, and
filled up our hole, and said a couple of farm ers with guns must stand
watch around about the cabin every night, and a bull dog tied to the
door in the day time; and about this time they was through with the job
and was ta per ing off with a kind of gener l good- by cussing, and then
the old doctor comes and takes a look, and says:

“Don’t be no rough er on him than you’re obleeged to, because he ain’t
a bad nigger. When I got to where I found the boy I see I couldn’t cut
the bullet out without some help, and he warn’t in no condition for me
to leave to go and get help ; and he got a little worse and a little
wor se, and after a long time he went out of his head, and wouldn’t let
me come a- nigh him any more, and said if I chal ked his raft he’d kill
me, and no end of wild foolishness like that, and I see I couldn’t do
anything at all with him; so I says, I got to have help somehow ; and
the minute I says it out craw ls this nigger from somewheres and says
he’ll help, and he done it, too, and done it very well. Of course I
judged he must be a runaway nigger, and there I was ! and there I had
to stick right straight along all the rest of the day and all night.
It was a fix , I tell you! I had a couple of pati ents with the chill s,
and of course I’d of liked to run up to town and see them, but I
das n ’t, because the nigger might get away, and then I’d be to bla me;
and yet never a skiff come close enough for me to ha il. So there I had
to stick plumb until daylight this morning; and I never see a nigger
that was a better n uss or faith ful er, and yet he was ris king his
freed om to do it, and was all tired out, too, and I see plain enough
he’d been worked main hard lately. I liked the nigger for that; I tell
you, gentlemen, a nigger like that is worth a thousand dollar s—and
kind treat ment, too. I had everything I nee ded, and the boy was doing
as well there as he would ’a’ done at hom e— better, maybe, because it
was so quiet ; but there I was, with both of ’m on my hands, and
there I had to stick till about daw n this morning; then some men in a
skiff come by, and as good luck would have it the nigger was setting
by the pallet with his head pro pped on his knees sound asleep ; so I
motioned them in quiet, and they slipped up on him and grabbed him and
tied him before he knowed what he was about, and we never had no
trouble. And the boy being in a kind of a fli ghty sleep, too, we
mu ffled the oars and hitched the raft on, and t owed her over very nice
and quiet, and the nigger never made the least row nor said a word
from the start. He ain’t no bad nigger, gentlemen ; that’s what I think
about him.”

Some body says:

“Well, it sounds very good, doctor, I’m obleeged to say .”

Then the others softened up a little, too, and I was mighty thank ful
to that old doctor for doing Jim that good tur n; and I was glad it was
according to my judgment of him, too; because I thought he had a good
heart in him and was a good man the first time I see him. Then they
all agreed that Jim had acted very well, and was deser ving to have
some notice took of it, and re ward. So every one of them promi sed,
right out and hear ty, that they wouldn’t cus s him no more.

Then they come out and locked him up. I hoped they was going to say he
could have one or two of the chains took off, because they was rotten
heavy, or could have meat and gre ens with his bread and water; but
they didn’t think of it, and I reckoned it warn’t best for me to mi x
in, but I judged I’d get the doctor ’s yar n to Aunt Sally somehow or
other as soon as I’d got through the break ers that was laying just
ahead of me— explan ations, I mean, of how I forgot to mention about
Sid being shot when I was telling how him and me put in that dr at ted
night padd ling around hunting the runaway nigger.

But I had plenty time. Aunt Sally she stuck to the si ck- room all day
and all night, and every time I see Uncle Silas mo oning around I
dodged him.

Next morning I heard Tom was a good deal better, and they said Aunt
Sally was gone to get a na p. So I sli ps to the si ck- room, and if I
found him a wake I reckoned we could put up a yar n for the family that
would wash . But he was sleep ing, and sleeping very peac e ful, too; and
pale, not fire - faced the way he was when he come. So I set down and
laid for him to wa ke. In about half an hour Aunt Sally comes gliding
in, and there I was, up a stump again ! She motioned me to be still,
and set down by me, and begun to whisper, and said we could all be
joy ful now, because all the symp tom s was first- rate, and he’d been
sleeping like that for ever so long, and looking better and peac e ful er
all the time, and ten to one he’d wake up in his right mind.

So we set there watch ing, and by and by he stir s a bit, and opened his
eyes very natur al, and takes a look, and says:

“Hell o !— why, I’m at hom e! How ’s that? W here’s the raf t?”

“It’s all right,” I says.

“And Jim?”

“The sa me,” I says, but couldn’t say it pretty br ash . But he never
noticed, but says:

“Goo d! S pl en di d! Now we’re all right and safe ! Did you tell Aun t y?”

I was going to say yes; but she chi pped in and says:

“A bout what, Sid ?”

“Why, about the way the whole thing was done.”

“What whole thing ?”

“Why, the whole thing. There ain’t but one; how we set the runaway
nigger fre e— me and Tom.”

“Good land! S et the run — What is the child talking ab out ! D ear,
dear, out of his head again !”

“No, I ain’t out of my HEAD ; I know all what I’m talking about. We
did set him fre e— me and Tom . We laid out to do it, and we done
it. And we done it ele gan t, too.” He’d got a start, and she never
che cked him up, just set and stared and star ed, and let him clip
along, and I see it warn’t no use for me to put in. “Why, Aun ty, it
cost us a power of work — weeks of it— hours and hours, every night,
whilst you was all asleep. And we had to steal candles, and the sheet,
and the shirt, and your dress, and spo ons, and tin plat es, and
case-kni ves, and the warm ing- pan, and the grind stone, and fl our, and
just no end of things, and you can’t think what work it was to make
the saw s, and pen s, and inscripti ons, and one thing or another, and
you can’t think half the fun it was. And we had to make up the
pictures of coff ins and things, and nonnamous letters from the
robber s, and get up and down the lightning-rod, and dig the hole into
the cabin, and make the rope ladder and send it in cooked up in a pie,
and send in spoons and things to work with in your apron pocket —”

“M er cy sak es !”

“ —and lo ad up the cabin with rats and snakes and so on, for company
for Jim; and then you kept Tom here so long with the butter in his hat
that you come near spi ling the whole business, because the men come
before we was out of the cabin, and we had to rus h, and they heard us
and let drive at us, and I got my shar e, and we dodged out of the path
and let them go by, and when the dogs come they warn’t interested in
us, but went for the most noi se, and we got our canoe, and made for
the raft, and was all safe, and Jim was a free man, and we done it all
by ourselves, and wasn’t it bull y, Aun ty !”

“Well, I never heard the li kes of it in all my born day s! So it was
you, you little rapscallions, that’s been making all this trouble,
and turned everybod y’s w its clean inside out and scared us all most to
death. I’ve as good a notion as ever I had in my life to take it out
o’ you this very minute. To think, here I’ve been, night after night,
a —you just get well once, you young s camp , and I lay I’ll t an the
Old Har ry out o’ both o’ ye !”

But Tom, he was so proud and joy ful, he just couldn’t hold in, and
his tongue just went it— she a- chi pping in, and sp itting fire all
along, and both of them going it at once, like a cat con venti on; and
she says:

“Well, you get all the en joy ment you can out of it now, for mind I
tell you if I catch you medd ling with him again —”

“M ed d ling with who ?” Tom says, dropping his smile and looking
surprised.

“Wi th who ? Why, the runaway nigger, of course. Who ’d you reck on?”

Tom looks at me very grave, and says:

“ Tom, didn’t you just tell me he was all right ? H as n’t he got away ?”

“H im ?” says Aunt Sally; “the runaway nigger ? ’ De ed he ha sn ’t.
They’ve got him back, safe and sound, and he’s in that cabin again, on
bread and water, and loaded down with cha ins, till he’s claim ed or
sol d!”

Tom rose square up in bed, with his eye ho t, and his nostrils opening
and shut ting like gi ll s, and sings out to me :

“They hain’t no right to shut him up! Sh ove ! —and don’t you lose a
minute. Tur n him loo se! he ain’t no sla ve; he’s as free as any cre tu r
that walks this earth !”

“What does the child mean?”

“I mean every word I say, Aunt Sally, and if somebody don’t go,
I’ll go. I’ve knowed him all his life, and so has Tom, there. Old
Miss Watson died two months ago, and she was ashamed she ever was
going to sell him down the river, and said so; and she set him free
in her will .”

“Then what on earth did you want to set him free for, seeing he was
already fre e?”

“Well, that is a question, I must say ; and just like wom en! Why, I
wanted the adventure of it; and I’d ’a’ wa ded ne ck- deep in blood
to— goodness alive, Aunt Poll y!”

If she warn’t standing right there, just inside the door, looking as
sweet and cont ented as an ang el half full of pie, I wish I may never !

Aunt Sally jumped for her, and most hugged the head off of her, and
cried over her, and I found a good enough place for me under the bed,
for it was getting pretty sul try for us, seemed to me. And I peeped
out, and in a little while Tom’s Aunt Polly shook herself loose and
stood there looking across at Tom over her spectac le s— kind of
gr inding him into the ear th, you know. And then she says:

“Yes, you better turn y ’r head away —I would if I was you, Tom.”

“Oh, de ary me!” says Aunt Sally; “is he changed so? Why, that ain’t
Tom, it’s Sid ; Tom ’s— Tom ’s— why, where is Tom ? He was here a minute
ago.”

“You mean wher e’s Huck Fin n —that’s what you mean ! I reckon I hain’t
raised such a sca mp as my Tom all these years not to know him when I
see him. That would be a pretty how d y- do. Come out from under that
bed, Huck Fin n.”

So I done it. But not feeling br ash .

Aunt Sally she was one of the mix ed- up est -looking persons I ever
see — except one, and that was Uncle Sil as, when he come in and they
told it all to him. It kind of made him drunk, as you may say, and he
didn’t know nothing at all the rest of the day, and prea ched a
pra y er- meeting ser m on that night that gave him a rattling rup ut ation,
because the ol dest man in the world couldn’t ’a’ understood it. So
Tom’s Aunt Polly, she told all about who I was, and what ; and I had to
up and tell how I was in such a tight place that when Mrs. Phelps took
me for Tom Sawyer — she chi pped in and says, “Oh, go on and call me
Aunt Sally, I’m used to it now, and ’ tain t no need to chang e ” —that
when Aunt Sally took me for Tom Sawyer I had to stand it— there warn’t
no other way, and I knowed he wouldn’t mind, because it would be nuts
for him, being a myster y, and he’d make an adventure out of it, and be
perfectly satisfied. And so it turned out, and he let on to be Sid,
and made things as soft as he could for me.

And his Aunt Polly she said Tom was right about old Miss Watson
setting Jim free in her will ; and so, sure enough, Tom Sawyer had gone
and took all that trouble and bother to set a free nigger fre e! and I
couldn’t ever understand before, until that minute and that talk, how
he could help a body set a nigger free with his br ing ing- up.

Well, Aunt Polly she said that when Aunt Sally wrote to her that Tom
and Sid had come all right and safe, she says to her self :

“Look at that, now! I might have expected it, letting him go off that
way without anybody to watch him. So now I got to go and tra pse all
the way down the river, eleven hundred mile, and find out what that
cre e tur ’s up to this time, as long as I couldn’t seem to get any
answer out of you about it.”

“Why, I never heard nothing from you,” says Aunt Sally.

“Well, I wonder ! Why, I wrote you twice to ask you what you could mean
by Sid being here.”

“Well, I never got ’em. S is.”

Aunt Polly she turns around slow and sever e, and says:

“You , Tom !”

“Well — what?” he says, kind of pe tti sh .

“Don’t you what me, you imp ud ent thing— hand out them letter s.”

“What letter s?”

“ The m letters. I be b ound, if I have to take a-holt of you I’ ll —”

“ They’re in the trun k. There, now. And they’re just the same as they
was when I got them out of the offi ce. I hain’t looked into them, I
hain’t touched them. But I knowed they’d make trouble, and I thought
if you warn’t in no hurry, I’ d —”

“Well, you do need skin ning, there ain’t no mistake about it. And I
wrote another one to tell you I was coming; and I s’pose he —”

“No, it come yester day; I hain’t read it yet, but it’s all right,
I’ve got that one.”

I wanted to offer to bet two dollars she ha dn ’t, but I reckoned maybe
it was just as safe to not to. So I never said nothing.




CHAPTER THE LA S T


The first time I catched Tom private I asked him what was his idea,
time of the evas ion ?— what it was he’d planned to do if the evas ion
worked all right and he managed to set a nigger free that was already
free befor e? And he said, what he had planned in his head from the
start, if we got Jim out all safe, was for us to run him down the
river on the raft, and have adventures plumb to the mouth of the
river, and then tell him about his being free, and take him back up
home on a steamboat, in style, and pay him for his lost time, and
write word ahead and get out all the niggers around, and have them
walt z him into town with a tor ch light proc ession and a br as s- band, and
then he would be a her o, and so would w e. But I reckoned it was about
as well the way it was.

We had Jim out of the chains in no time, and when Aunt Polly and Uncle
Silas and Aunt Sally found out how good he helped the doctor nur se
Tom, they made a heap of fuss over him, and fixed him up pri me, and
give him all he wanted to eat, and a good time, and nothing to do. And
we had him up to the si ck- room, and had a high tal k; and Tom give Jim
forty dollars for being prisoner for us so patient, and doing it up so
good, and Jim was pleased most to death, and busted out, and says:

“D a h, now, Huck, what I tell you?— what I tell you up dah on Jack son
I slan ’? I tole you I got a hairy b reas ’, en what’s de sign un it; en I
tole you I ben rich wun st, en gw ine ter to be rich ag’ in; en it’s
come tru e; en heah she is ! Da h, now! doan’ talk to me— signs is
sign s, mine I tell you; en I knowed jis’ ’s well ’at I ’uz gw ine ter
be rich ag’in as I’s a- stannin’ heah dis minute !”

And then Tom he talked along and talked along, and says, le’s all
three slide out of here one of these nights and get an outf it, and go
for howling adventures amongst the Inj un s, over in the terr itor y, for
a couple of weeks or two ; and I says, all right, that suits me, but I
ain’t got no money for to buy the outf it, and I reckon I couldn’t get
none from home, because it’s likely pap’s been back before now, and
got it all away from Judge Thatcher and drunk it up.

“No, he ha in ’t,” Tom says; “it’s all there yet— six thousand dollars
and more; and your pap hain’t ever been back since. Ha dn’t when I come
away, any how .”

Jim says, kind of solem n :

“He ain’t a-com in’ back no mo ’, Huck .”

I says:

“Why, Jim?”

“N em mine why, Huck —but he ain’t com in’ back no mo ’.”

But I kept at him; so at last he says:

“Do an’ you ’ member de house dat was flo at ’n down de river, en dey wuz
a man in da h, ki vered up, en I went in en un ki vered him and didn’ let
you come in ? Well, den, you kin git yo’ money when you wants it, kase
dat wuz him.”

Tom’s most well now, and got his bullet around his neck on a
watch - guard for a watch, and is always seeing what time it is, and so
there ain’t nothing more to write about, and I am rotten glad of it,
because if I’d ’a’ knowed what a trouble it was to make a book I
wouldn’t ’a’ tackled it, and ain’t a-going to no more. But I reckon I
got to light out for the terr itor y ahead of the rest, because Aunt
Sally she’s going to ado pt me and si vili ze me, and I can’t stand it. I
been there before.


THE END






*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE ADVENTURES OF HUCKLEBERRY FINN ( TOM SAWY ER ' S CO MR ADE ) ***




Up dated editions will replace the previous one —the old editions will
be ren a med.

Cre ating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation ( and you !) can copy and distribute it in the United
States without permission and without paying copyright
royal ties. Spe cial ru les, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg™ electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBER G ™
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as cre ation
of derivative works, re port s, performan ces and resear ch. Project
Gutenberg eBooks may be modi fied and printed and given away —you may
do practically AN Y TH ING in the United States with eBooks not protected
by U.S. copyright law. Re distribution is subject to the trademark
license, especially comm er cial re distribu tion.


STAR T : FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE

P LE A SE REA D THIS BE F OR E YOU DISTRIBUT E OR U SE THIS W ORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase “Project
Gutenberg ” ), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg™ License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/ licen se.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Re distributing Project Gutenberg™
electronic works

1. A . By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg™
electronic work, you indic ate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
( trademar k / copy right ) agreement. If you do not agree to ab ide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in your
possessi on. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg™ electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person
or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1. B . “Project Gutenberg” is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg™ electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1. C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg™ electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg™
electronic works. See paragraph 1. E below.

1. C . The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ( “the
Foundation ” or P G LA F ), owns a com pi l ation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. N early all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is un protected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distribut ing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are re moved. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg™
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg™ name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg™ License when
you share it without charge with others.

1. D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also gover n
what you can do with this work. Copy right laws in most coun tries are
in a constant state of chang e. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in add ition to the terms of this
agreement before down load ing, copying, displa ying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg™ work. The Foundation makes no
represent ations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country other than the United States.

1.E . Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg :

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg™ License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg™ work ( any work
on which the phrase “Project Gutenberg” appear s, or with which the
phrase “Project Gutenberg” is associ at ed ) is acc essed, displa yed,
perfor med, vie wed, copied or distribu te d:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and most
other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online
at www.gutenberg.org. If you
are not located in the United States, you will have to check the laws
of the country where you are located before using this eBook.

1.E. 2. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is
deri ved from tex ts not protected by U.S. copyright law ( does not
contain a notice indicat ing that it is posted with permission of the
copyright hol der ), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or char g es. If you are
re distributing or providing access to a work with the phrase “Project
Gutenberg” associated with or appe aring on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg™
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E. 3. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright hol der, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms im posed by the copyright hol der. A dd iti onal terms
will be lin ked to the Project Gutenberg™ License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E. 4. Do not un link or de ta ch or remove the full Project Gutenberg™
License terms from this work, or any fi les con taining a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg™ .

1.E. 5. Do not copy, displa y, perform , distribute or re distribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sent ence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg™ License.

1.E. 6. You may conver t to and distribute this work in any b in ary,
com pres sed, marked up, non proprietary or proprietary form, including
any word proc es sing or hy per text form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg™ work in a format
other than “Plain Vanilla ASCII ” or other format used in the official
ver sion posted on the official Project Gutenberg™ website
( www.gutenberg.org ), you mu st, at no additional co st, fee or expense
to the us er, provide a copy, a means of ex por ting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original “Plain
Vanilla ASCII ” or other form. Any alter n ate format must inclu de the
full Project Gutenberg™ License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E. 7. Do not charge a fee for access to, view ing, displa ying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg™ works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reason able fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg™ electronic works
provided that :

• You pay a royal ty fee of 20 % of the g ross prof its you der ive from
the use of Project Gutenberg™ works calcul ated using the method
you already use to calcul ate your applicable ta x es. The fee is owed
to the owner of the Project Gutenberg™ trademark, but he has
agreed to don ate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Found ation. Royalty payments must be paid
within 6 0 days following each date on which you pre pare (or are
leg ally required to prepar e ) your peri o di c tax return s. Royalty
payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
Section 4 , “In formation about donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Found ation.”

• You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who noti fi es
you in writing (or by e- ma il ) within 30 days of receipt that s / he
does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg™
License. You must requir e such a user to return or destroy all
copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and dis continue
all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg™
works.

• You provi de, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
receipt of the work.

• You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
distribution of Project Gutenberg™ works.


1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg™ electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
the Project Gutenberg™ trademark. Con t act the Foundation as set
forth in Section 3 below.

1.F .

1.F. 1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and emplo ye es ex pend considerable
effort to identi f y, do copyright re search on, tran scribe and proof read
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg™ collec tion. Des p ite these ef fort s, Project Gutenberg™
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stor ed, may
contain “D e fe ct s,” such as, but not limited to, in comp lete, in accur ate
or cor rup t dat a, tran scri ption err ors, a copyright or other
intellectual property in fring ement, a defective or da maged dis k or
other medium, a computer vir us, or computer co des that da ma ge or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F. 2. LIMITED WARRAN TY, DI SC LA IM ER OF DAMAGES - Except for the “R ight
of Re placement or R ef un d ” described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg™ trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg™ electronic work under this agreement, discla im all
li ability to you for damag es, costs and expenses, including legal
fe es. YOU AGREE THAT YOU H A VE NO RE M EDI ES FOR NE G LI G EN CE , STRI CT
LIAB ILI TY, BREACH OF WARRAN TY OR BREACH OF CON TRA CT EX CE P T TH O SE
PRO VI D ED IN P AR AG RA PH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE F OU N DA TION , THE
T R ADE MARK O WN ER , AND ANY DISTRIBUT OR UN D ER THIS AGRE E MENT WI LL NOT B E
LIAB LE TO YOU FOR A CT U AL, DIRECT, IN DIRECT, CON SE QU EN TI AL, P UN I TI VE OR
INC I D ENT AL DAMAGES E V EN I F YOU G IV E NO TIC E OF THE PO SSI B ILITY OF S U CH
DAMAG E .

1.F.3. LIMITED RI GH T OF RE P LA CE MENT OR RE F UN D - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of recei ving it, you can
receive a refund of the money ( if any ) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from . If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may ele ct to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electr onica lly, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportun ity to receive the work electr oni cally in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defe cti ve, you may dem and a refund in writing
without further opportun ities to fix the problem.

1.F. 4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you ‘ A S - I S ’, WI TH NO
O TH ER WARRANTIES OF ANY K IN D, EX P RE SS OR IM P LI E D, INC L U D ING B UT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF M ER CHA N T AB ILITY OR F IT NE SS FOR ANY P UR PO SE .

1.F. 5. Some states do not allow disclaim ers of certain imp lied
war ran ties or the excl usion or limitation of certain ty pes of
damag es. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
viol ates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be inter pre ted to make the ma x im um disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The inv ali d ity or
un en force ability of any provi sion of this agreement shall not vo id the
remaining provi si ons.

1.F. 6. IN DE M N IT Y - You agree to inde m ni fy and hold the Foundation, the
trademark own er, any agent or emplo ye e of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
produ cti on, promo tion and distribution of Project Gutenberg™
electronic works, harm less from all li abil ity, costs and expenses,
including legal fe es, that ar ise directly or indire ctly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur : ( a ) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg™ work, ( b ) alter ation, modi fic ation, or
additi ons or de le tions to any Project Gutenberg™ work, and (c ) any
De fect you cau se.

Section 2. Information about the Mis sion of Project Gutenberg™

Project Gutenberg™ is sy non y mous with the free distribution of
electronic works in for mat s readable by the widest vari ety of
compu ters including ob so lete, old, middle- aged and new compu ter s. It
exist s because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

V ol unte ers and fin an cial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are cr iti cal to reaching Project Gutenberg™ ’s
go als and en sur ing that the Project Gutenberg™ collection will
remain freely available for gener ations to come. In 2 00 1 , the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and per man ent future for Project Gutenberg™ and future
gener ations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sec tions 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org.

Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non - prof it
5 0 1 (c ) ( 3 ) educ ational cor por ation organ ized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and gran ted tax exempt status by the Inter nal
R even ue Ser vi ce. The Foundation’s E IN or federal tax identi fication
number is 6 4 - 6 22 15 4 1. Con tributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deducti ble to the full ex tent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your stat e’s law s.

The Foundation’s business office is located at 80 9 Nor th 15 00 W est,
S al t L ake City, UT 8 4 11 6 , ( 80 1 ) 5 9 6 - 188 7. E mail contact links and up
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation’s website
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/ contact

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg™ depen ds upon and cannot survi ve without widespread
public support and donations to carry out its mission of
incre as ing the number of public domain and licen sed works that can be
freely distributed in mach ine- readable form acc essi ble by the widest
ar ray of equip ment including out dated equipment. M any small donations
( $ 1 to $ 5 ,00 0 ) are particularly important to main taining tax exempt
status with the I R S.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regul ating
char ities and char itable donations in all 5 0 states of the United
States. Com pli ance requirements are not uni form and it takes a
considerable effor t, much paper work and many fees to meet and keep up
with these require ment s. We do not solicit donations in lo c ations
where we have not received written confir mation of compli ance. To S END
D ON A TIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular state
visit www.gutenberg.org/donate.

While we cannot and do not solicit con tributions from states where we
have not met the solic itation require ments, we know of no pro hi b ition
against accep ting un solic ited donations from don ors in such states who
approach us with off ers to donate.

Inter national donations are grate fully accep ted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treat ment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff .

P lease check the Project Gutenberg web p ages for current don ation
methods and addres ses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including che cks, online payments and credit card don ations. To
don ate, please visit : www.gutenberg.org/donate.

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg™ electronic works

Pro fess or Mi cha el S. Har t was the origin at or of the Project
Gutenberg™ concept of a libr ary of electronic works that could be
freely sh ared with any one. For forty years, he produ ced and
distributed Project Gutenberg™ eBooks with only a loose ne t work of
volunte er suppor t.

Project Gutenberg™ eBooks are often created from several printed
editi ons, all of which are confir med as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is inclu ded. Th us, we do not
necess ari ly keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
editi on.

Most people start at our website which has the main P G search
fac il it y : www.gutenberg.org.

This website includ es information about Project Gutenberg™ ,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBoo ks, and how to
sub scribe to our e mail news letter to hear about new eBoo ks.

The Project Gutenberg eBook of The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes

This ebook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this ebook or online
at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States,
you will have to check the laws of the country where you are located
before using this eBook.

T it le : The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes

Au thor : Arthur Con an Do y le

R ele ase dat e: Mar ch 1 , 1 9 9 9 [ eBook # 1 6 6 1 ]
Most rec ently up dat ed : O c to ber 1 0, 20 2 3

L angu ag e: English

Cre dit s: an an on y mous Project Gutenberg volunte er and Jo se Men en de z


*** STAR T OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLM ES ***




The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes

by Arthur Con an Do y le


Con t ents

I. A Scand al in Bohemia
II. The Red- He aded League
III. A C ase of I d entity
IV. The Boscombe Valley M y ster y
V. The F ive Or ange Pi ps
VI. The M an with the Twi sted Li p
VII. The Adventure of the Bl ue Car bun cle
VIII. The Adventure of the Spe ck led B and
IX. The Adventure of the En g ine er’s Th umb
X . The Adventure of the N ob le Ba chel or
X I. The Adventure of the Ber y l Coron et
X II. The Adventure of the Copper Bee ches




I. A SC AN D AL IN BO HE M I A


I.

To Sherlock Holmes she is always the woman. I have seldom heard him
mention her under any other name. In his eyes she ec lip ses and
pre d omin ates the whole of her se x . It was not that he felt any e motion
a kin to love for Irene Adl er. All e moti ons, and that one particul ar ly,
were ab horr ent to his cold, preci se but admir ably bal anced mind. He
was, I take it, the most perfect reasoning and observing machine that
the world has seen, but as a lover he would have placed himself in a
false position. He never spoke of the sof ter passi ons, save with a gi be
and a sne er. They were admir able things for the obser ver — excellent for
drawing the veil from men’s moti ves and acti ons. But for the trained
reason er to ad mit such intr usions into his own delicate and fin ely
ad ju sted temper am ent was to introduce a di str acting factor which might
throw a doubt upon all his ment al resul ts. Gr it in a sens iti ve
in str um ent, or a crack in one of his own high- power len ses, would not
be more distur bing than a strong e motion in a nature such as hi s. And
yet there was but one woman to him, and that woman was the late Irene
Adler, of du bi ous and questi onable memory.

I had seen little of Holmes lately. My marriage had drifted us away
from each other. My own complete happ in ess, and the hom e- centr ed
interests which rise up around the man who first finds himself master
of his own establi sh ment, were sufficient to absor b all my attention,
while Holmes, who loa thed every form of society with his whole Bohemian
soul , remained in our lodgings in Baker Street, buried among his old
books, and alter nat ing from week to week between co ca ine and am b ition,
the dr ow sin ess of the drug, and the fierce energ y of his own keen
nature. He was still, as ever, deeply attracted by the study of crime,
and occup ied his immense fac ul ties and extraordinary powers of
observation in following out those clu es, and clearing up those
myster ies which had been aband oned as hop e less by the official police.
From time to time I heard some vague account of his do ing s: of his
sum m ons to O des s a in the case of the T re po ff murder, of his clearing up
of the singular tragedy of the At kin son brothers at T rin com a le e, and
finally of the mission which he had accompli shed so deli cat ely and
success fully for the re igning family of H oll an d. B eyond these signs of
his acti v ity, however, which I merely sh ared with all the rea ders of
the da ily press, I knew little of my form er friend and companion.

One night —it was on the tw enti e th of Mar ch, 188 8 —I was returning from a
journey to a pati ent ( for I had now returned to ci vi l practi ce ), when
my way led me through Baker Street. As I passed the well- remembered
door, which must always be associated in my mind with my woo ing, and
with the dark incidents of the St udy in S car let, I was seized with a
keen desire to see Holmes again, and to know how he was emplo ying his
extraordinary power s. His rooms were brilli antly l it, and, even as I
looked up, I saw his tall, spare figure pass twice in a dark sil hou et te
against the blin d. He was pac ing the room swif tly, eager ly, with his
head sunk upon his chest and his hands clas ped behind him. To me, who
knew his every m ood and hab it, his att itude and manner told their own
story. He was at work again. He had ris en out of his dru g- created
drea ms and was hot upon the sc ent of some new problem. I rang the bell
and was shown up to the chamber which had former ly been in part my own.

His manner was not e ff usi ve. It seldom was; but he was gla d, I think,
to see me. With hardly a word spo ken, but with a kindly ey e, he waved
me to an arm chair, threw across his case of cig ars, and indi cated a
spirit case and a gas o gen e in the corner. Then he stood before the fire
and looked me over in his singular introspe ctive fashi on.

“W ed lock suits you,” he remarked. “I think, Watson, that you have put
on seven and a half p ounds since I saw you.”

“S even !” I answered.

“Indeed, I should have thought a little more. Just a tri f le more, I
fancy, Watson. And in practice again, I obser ve. You did not tell me
that you inten ded to go into har nes s.”

“Then, how do you know ?”

“I see it, I deduce it. How do I know that you have been getting
yourself very wet lat ely, and that you have a most cl um sy and care less
servant girl ?”

“My dear Holmes,” said I, “this is too much. You would certainly have
been bur ned, had you lived a few cent u ries ago. It is true that I had a
country walk on Th ur s day and came home in a dreadful m ess, but as I
have changed my clothes I can’t imagine how you deduce it. As to Mary
Jane, she is in cor ri gi ble, and my wife has given her notice, but there,
again, I fa il to see how you work it out.”

He chuckled to himself and rubbed his long, nervous hands together.

“It is simp lic ity it self ,” said he; “my eyes tell me that on the inside
of your left sho e, just where the fire light strikes it, the leather is
scor ed by six almost par all el cut s. Ob vi ously they have been caused by
someone who has very careles sly scra ped round the ed ges of the so le in
order to remove cru sted mud from it. H ence, you see, my double
deduction that you had been out in vi le weather, and that you had a
particularly ma li gn ant boot- s litt ing spec im en of the London sla ve y. As
to your practi ce, if a gentleman walks into my rooms sme lling of
i o do form, with a black mark of n it rate of silver upon his right
forefing er, and a bul ge on the right side of his top- hat to show where
he has secre ted his ste tho sc op e, I must be dull, indeed, if I do not
pr on ounce him to be an active member of the medical professi on.”

I could not help laughing at the e ase with which he explained his
proc ess of deducti on. “When I hear you give your reason s,” I remarked,
“the thing always appears to me to be so ridi cul ously simple that I
could easily do it myself, though at each succ essive instance of your
reasoning I am b aff led until you explain your proc ess. And yet I
believe that my eyes are as good as your s.”

“Quite so,” he answered, ligh ting a cigaret te, and throwing himself
down into an arm chair. “You see, but you do not obser ve. The
distin ction is clear. For example, you have frequently seen the steps
which lead up from the hall to this room.”

“F requ ent ly.”

“How of ten ?”

“Well, some hundreds of tim es.”

“Then how many are there?”

“How man y? I don’t know.”

“Quite so! You have not observed. And yet you have seen. That is just
my point. Now, I know that there are seventeen steps, because I have
both seen and observed. By the way, since you are interested in these
little problem s, and since you are good enough to chroni cle one or two
of my trifling experi en ces, you may be interested in this .” He threw
over a sheet of thick, p ink - tinted note paper which had been lying open
upon the table. “It came by the last post ,” said he. “Re ad it al ou d.”

The note was un dat ed, and without either signature or address.

“There will call upon you to-night, at a quarter to eight o’clo ck ,” it
said, “a gentleman who des ire s to consult you upon a matter of the very
deepest moment. Your recent servi ces to one of the royal houses of
Eu rope have shown that you are one who may safely be trusted with
matters which are of an importance which can hardly be ex ag g er ated.
This account of you we have from all quarters recei ved. B e in your
chamber then at that hour, and do not take it a miss if your visitor
wear a mas k.”

“This is indeed a myster y,” I remarked. “What do you imagine that it
mean s?”

“I have no dat a yet. It is a capital mistake to theor ise before one has
data. In sensi bly one begins to twist facts to suit theor i es, instead of
theor ies to suit facts. But the note itself. What do you deduce from
it?”

I carefully examined the writing, and the paper upon which it was
writt en.

“The man who wrote it was presum ably well to do,” I remarked,
endeavouring to imitate my companion ’s proc es ses. “Su ch paper could not
be bought under half a cr own a pac ket. It is pecu li arly strong and
stiff .”

“P ec u li ar —that is the very word ,” said Holmes. “It is not an English
paper at all. H old it up to the light .”

I did so, and saw a large “E ” with a small “ g ,” a “P ,” and a large “G ”
with a small “ t ” w ov en into the tex ture of the paper.

“What do you make of that?” asked Holmes.

“The name of the ma ker, no doub t; or his monogra m, ra ther.”

“Not at all. The ‘ G ’ with the small ‘ t ’ stands for ‘ G e sell sc ha f t ,’
which is the German for ‘ Com p any .’ It is a custom ary con trac tion like
our ‘C o .’ ‘ P ,’ of course, stands for ‘ Pa pier .’ Now for the ‘ E g .’ Let us
glance at our Contin ental G a z et te er.” He took down a heavy brown volume
from his shel ves. “E gl ow, E gl on it z — here we are, E gri a. It is in a
Ger man - speaking countr y— in Bohemia, not far from Car l s ba d. ‘ R em ar k able
as being the scene of the death of W all en stein, and for its num er ous
glas s- factor ies and paper - mill s.’ Ha , ha , my boy, what do you make of
that?” His eyes spark led, and he sent up a great blue tri um phan t cloud
from his cigaret te.

“The paper was made in Bohemi a,” I said.

“Precisely. And the man who wrote the note is a Ger man. Do you note the
peculiar con stru ction of the sent ence — ‘ This account of you we have from
all quarters recei v ed .’ A Fren chman or R us si an could not have written
that. It is the German who is so un cour te ous to his ver b s. It only
remain s, therefore, to discover what is wanted by this German who
writ es upon Bohemian paper and pre f ers we aring a m ask to showing his
face. And here he comes, if I am not mista ken, to re solve all our
doub ts.”

As he spoke there was the sharp sound of horse s’ hoo f s and gr ating
wheels against the cur b, followed by a sharp pull at the bell. Holmes
whist led.

“A pa ir, by the s ound ,” said he. “Yes,” he continued, glancing out of
the window. “A nice little broug ham and a pair of beauti es. A hundred
and fifty guine as apiece. There’s money in this case, Watson, if there
is nothing else.”

“I think that I had better go, Holmes.”

“Not a bit, Do ctor. S ta y where you are. I am lost without my Bo swe ll.
And this promises to be interesting. It would be a pity to miss it.”

“But your cli ent —”

“Never mind him. I may want your help, and so may he. Here he com es.
S it down in that arm chair, Doctor, and give us your best atten ti on.”

A slow and heavy ste p, which had been heard upon the stairs and in the
passage, pa used immediately outside the door. Then there was a loud and
author it ative ta p.

“Come in !” said Holmes.

A man entered who could hardly have been less than six feet six inches
in he ight, with the chest and limbs of a H er cu les. His dress was rich
with a ri ch ness which would, in England, be looked upon as a kin to bad
ta st e. Hea v y band s of a stra k h an were sl ashed across the sleev es and
fron ts of his double- brea sted coat, while the deep blue cloak which was
thrown over his shoulders was lined with fla me- coloured sil k and
secur ed at the neck with a br oo ch which consi sted of a single fla ming
bery l. Boots which extended half way up his cal ves, and which were
tri mmed at the top s with rich brown fur , completed the impression of
bar bar ic op ul ence which was suggested by his whole appearance. He
carried a broad - brimmed hat in his hand, while he wore across the upper
part of his face, ex ten ding down past the chee k b ones, a black vi z ard
mas k, which he had apparently ad ju sted that very moment, for his hand
was still raised to it as he entered. From the lower part of the face
he appeared to be a man of strong character, with a thick, hanging lip,
and a long, straight chin suggestive of re solution pushed to the length
of ob stin ac y.

“You had my note ?” he asked with a deep har sh voice and a strongly
marked German acc ent. “I told you that I would call .” He looked from
one to the other of us, as if uncertain which to address.

“Pray take a se at ,” said Holmes. “This is my friend and colleag ue, Dr.
Watson, who is occasionally good enough to help me in my case s. Wh om
have I the honour to address?”

“You may address me as the Coun t V on K ram m, a Bohemian noble man. I
understand that this gentleman, your friend, is a man of honour and
discre tion, whom I may trust with a matter of the most extreme
importance. If not, I should much prefer to communicate with you
al one.”

I rose to go, but Holmes caught me by the wrist and pushed me back into
my chair. “It is both , or n one,” said he. “You may say before this
gentleman anything which you may say to me.”

The Coun t shrugged his broad shoulders. “Then I must beg in,” said he,
“by b inding you both to absolute secrecy for two year s; at the end of
that time the matter will be of no importance. At present it is not too
much to say that it is of such weight it may have an influence upon
Eu rope an hi stor y.”

“I promi se,” said Holmes.

“And I.”

“You will excuse this mas k ,” continued our strange visitor. “The au gust
person who emplo ys me wi shes his agent to be unknown to you, and I may
confess at once that the tit le by which I have just called myself is
not exactly my own.”

“I was aware of it,” said Holmes dr y ly.

“The circumstances are of great delicac y, and every precaution has to
be taken to qu en ch what might grow to be an immense scandal and
seriously comprom ise one of the re igning families of Eu rope. To speak
pla in ly, the matter imp li cat es the great House of Or m stein, hereditary
kings of Bohemi a.”

“I was also aware of that,” murmured Holmes, sett ling himself down in
his armchair and closing his eyes.

Our visitor glanced with some appar ent surprise at the langu id,
lounging figure of the man who had been no doubt de pi cted to him as the
most in ci sive reason er and most energetic agent in Eu rope. Holmes
slowly re opened his eyes and looked impati ently at his gigantic client.

“If your Majesty would con des cend to state your case ,” he remarked, “I
should be better able to advise you.”

The man sprang from his chair and paced up and down the room in
un contro llable agit ation. Then, with a gest ure of desper ation, he tore
the m ask from his face and hur led it upon the ground. “You are right,”
he cried; “I am the K ing. Why should I attempt to conceal it?”

“Why, inde ed?” murmured Holmes. “Your Majesty had not spoken before I
was aware that I was addres sing Wil hel m Go tt s re i ch S ig is mon d v on
Or m stein, Gr and Duke of C as sel - F el stein, and hereditary King of
Bohemi a.”

“But you can understand ,” said our strange visitor, sitting down once
more and passing his hand over his high white fore head, “you can
understand that I am not accustomed to doing such business in my own
per son. Yet the matter was so delicate that I could not confi de it to
an agent without putting myself in his pow er. I have come in co gni to
from P ra gue for the purpose of consul ting you.”

“Then, pray consul t,” said Holmes, shut ting his eyes once more.

“The facts are bri ef ly the se : Some five years ago, during a leng thy
visit to War saw, I made the acquaintance of the well-known adventure ss,
Irene Adl er. The name is no doubt familiar to you.”

“ Kindly look her up in my inde x, Doctor,” murmured Holmes without
opening his eyes. For many years he had ado p ted a system of do ck eting
all paragraphs concerning men and things, so that it was difficult to
name a subject or a person on which he could not at once furnish
in form ation. In this case I found her bi ogra phy sand wi ched in between
that of a He bre w rab bi and that of a staff - comm ander who had written a
monogra ph upon the deep - sea fish es.

“Let me see !” said Holmes. “H um! B or n in New Jer sey in the year 18 5 8 .
Con tr al to— hum ! L a S cal a, hum ! P ri ma don n a Im peri al O per a of War saw — y es!
Re tired from oper atic stag e— ha ! Li ving in London — quite so! Your
Majest y, as I understand, became ent ang led with this young per son,
wrote her some comprom ising letters, and is now desir ous of getting
those letters back.”

“Precisely so. But how —”

“Was there a secret marri ag e?”

“None.”

“No legal papers or cer ti fi cat es?”

“None.”

“Then I fa il to follow your Majest y. If this young person should
produce her letters for black ma iling or other purposes, how is she to
prove their au then ti c it y?”

“There is the writ ing.”

“P oo h, poo h! For g er y.”

“My private note- paper .”

“St ol en.”

“My own se al.”

“ Im it at ed.”

“My photograph.”

“B ough t.”

“We were both in the photograph.”

“Oh, dear ! That is very bad ! Your Majesty has indeed committed an
indi scre ti on.”

“I was ma d— in san e.”

“You have comprom ised yourself seri ou sl y.”

“I was only Cr own P rin ce then. I was youn g. I am but thirty now.”

“It must be recover ed.”

“We have tried and fai le d.”

“Your Majesty must pa y. It must be b ough t.”

“She will not sell .”

“St ol en, then.”

“F ive attempts have been ma de. Twice burgl ars in my pay ransacked her
house. Once we di ver ted her lu gg age when she travell ed. Twice she has
been way la i d. There has been no resul t.”

“No sign of it?”

“A b sol utely none.”

Holmes laughed. “It is quite a pretty little problem ,” said he.

“But a very serious one to me,” returned the King re pro a ch fully.

“ V er y, indeed. And what does she pro pose to do with the photograph?”

“To ruin me.”

“But how ?”

“I am about to be marri ed.”

“So I have he ard.”

“To C lo til de Loth man v on Saxe- Men ing en, second daughter of the King of
Scand in a vi a. You may know the stri ct princi p les of her family. She is
herself the very soul of delicac y. A shadow of a doubt as to my conduct
would bring the matter to an en d.”

“And Irene Adl er?”

“Th re at ens to send them the photograph . And she will do it. I know that
she will do it. You do not know her, but she has a soul of ste el . She
has the face of the most beautiful of women, and the mind of the most
re solute of men. R a ther than I should marry another woman, there are no
leng ths to which she would not go — none.”

“You are sure that she has not sent it ye t?”

“I am sure .”

“And wh y?”

“Because she has said that she would send it on the day when the
bet ro th al was public ly pro cla i med. That will be next Mon day.”

“Oh, then we have three days ye t,” said Holmes with a yaw n. “That is
very fortun ate, as I have one or two matters of importance to look into
just at pres ent. Your Majesty will, of course, stay in London for the
present ?”

“Certain ly. You will find me at the L ang ham under the name of the Coun t
V on K ra mm .”

“Then I shall drop you a line to let you know how we pro gre ss.”

“Pray do so. I shall be all anxi et y.”

“Then, as to mone y?”

“You have car te blan ch e.”

“A b sol ute ly?”

“I tell you that I would give one of the provin ces of my king dom to
have that photograph.”

“And for present expen se s?”

The King took a heavy cha mo is leather bag from under his cloak and laid
it on the table.

“There are three hundred p ounds in gold and seven hundred in not es,” he
said.

Holmes scri b bled a receipt upon a sheet of his note -book and handed it
to him.

“And Ma de mo i sell e’s address?” he asked.

“Is Briony Lodge, Serpentine Aven ue, St. Joh n’s W oo d.”

Holmes took a note of it. “One other questi on,” said he. “Was the
photograph a cab in et ?”

“It wa s.”

“Then, good- night, your Majest y, and I trust that we shall soon have
some good news for you. And good- night, Watson,” he ad ded, as the
wheels of the royal broug ham rolled down the street. “If you will be
good enough to call to-morrow afternoon at three o’clock I should like
to c hat this little matter over with you.”


II.

At three o’clock preci sely I was at Baker Street, but Holmes had not
yet retur ned. The land lady informed me that he had left the house
shortly after eight o’clock in the morning. I sat down beside the fire,
however, with the intention of a waiting him, how ever long he might be.
I was already deeply interested in his inquiry, for, though it was
sur rounded by none of the gri m and strange features which were
associated with the two cri mes which I have already recor ded, still,
the nature of the case and the ex al ted station of his client gave it a
character of its own. In de ed, a part from the nature of the
investigation which my friend had on hand, there was something in his
master ly grasp of a situ ation, and his ke en, in ci sive reason ing, which
made it a pleasure to me to study his system of work, and to follow the
quick, subtle methods by which he dis ent ang led the most inex tri c able
myster i es. So accustomed was I to his invari able succ ess that the very
possibility of his fa iling had ceased to enter into my head.

It was close upon four before the door opened, and a drun ken -looking
g room, ill- ke mp t and side- whisk er ed, with an in fla med face and
dis reput able clothes, walked into the room. A c custom ed as I was to my
friend’s ama zing powers in the use of disgui ses, I had to look three
times before I was certain that it was indeed he. With a no d he
vanished into the bedroom, whence he emerged in five minutes
t we ed- suited and respect able, as of old. P ut ting his hands into his
pockets, he stretched out his legs in front of the fire and laughed
hearti ly for some minutes.

“Well, rea ll y!” he cried, and then he choked and laughed again until he
was obliged to lie back, li mp and hel ple ss, in the chair.

“What is it?”

“It’s quite too funn y. I am sure you could never guess how I emplo yed
my morning, or what I ended by do ing.”

“I can’t imagine. I suppose that you have been watching the habit s, and
perhaps the house, of Miss Irene Adl er.”

“Quite so; but the sequ el was rather un usual. I will tell you, however.
I left the house a little after eight o’clock this morning in the
character of a g room out of work. There is a wonderful sympathy and
fre em as on ry among horse y men. B e one of them, and you will know all
that there is to know. I soon found Briony Lo dge. It is a bi j ou
vill a, with a garden at the back, but built out in front right up to
the road, two stor i es. C hu b b lock to the door. L ar ge sitting-room on
the right side, well furni she d, with long windows almost to the floor,
and those preposterous English window fast en ers which a child could
open. Be h ind there was nothing remark able, save that the passage window
could be reached from the top of the coa ch- house. I walked round it and
examined it closely from every point of view, but without no ting
anything else of interest.

“I then loun ged down the street and found, as I expec ted, that there
was a me ws in a lane which runs down by one wall of the garden. I l ent
the o st l ers a hand in rubbing down their hor ses, and received in
ex change tw op ence, a glass of half- and- half, two fi lls of sha g tobac co,
and as much information as I could desire about Miss Adler, to say
nothing of half a dozen other people in the neighbourhood in whom I was
not in the least interest ed, but whose bi ogra phi es I was compelled to
listen to.”

“And what of Irene Adl er?” I asked.

“Oh, she has turned all the men’s heads down in that par t. She is the
d ain ti est thing under a bonnet on this plan et. So say the
Serpent ine- me w s, to a man. She lives quiet ly, sings at concer ts, dri ves
out at five every day, and retur ns at seven sharp for dinner. S el dom
goes out at other times, except when she sing s. Has only one ma le
visitor, but a good deal of him. He is dark, handsome, and d ash ing,
never calls less than once a day, and often twi ce. He is a Mr. Godfrey
Nor ton, of the In ner T emp le. See the advant ages of a cabman as a
confid ant. They had driven him home a dozen times from Serpent ine- me w s,
and knew all about him. When I had listened to all they had to tell, I
began to walk up and down near Briony Lodge once more, and to think
over my plan of campaig n.

“This Godfrey Nor ton was evidently an important factor in the matter.
He was a lawy er. That s ounded omin ous. What was the rel ation between
them, and what the object of his repe ated visit s? Was she his client,
his friend, or his mistre s s? If the form er, she had probably
trans fer red the photograph to his keep ing. If the lat ter, it was less
likely. On the is sue of this question depen ded whether I should
continue my work at Briony Lodge, or turn my attention to the
gentleman’s cham bers in the T emp le. It was a delicate point, and it
wid ened the field of my inquir y. I fear that I bore you with these
detail s, but I have to let you see my little difficul ties, if you are
to understand the situ ation.”

“I am following you clo sel y,” I answered.

“I was still bal ancing the matter in my mind when a han som cab drove up
to Briony Lodge, and a gentleman sprang out. He was a remark ably
handsome man, dark, a quil ine, and mou sta ch ed— evidently the man of whom
I had heard. He appeared to be in a great hurry, shouted to the cabman
to wait, and br ushed past the maid who opened the door with the air of
a man who was thoroughly at home.

“He was in the house about half an hour, and I could catch glimp ses of
him in the windows of the sitting-room, pac ing up and down, talking
excit ed ly, and wa ving his arms. Of her I could see nothing. Pres ently
he emer g ed, looking even more fl ur ried than before. As he stepped up to
the cab, he pulled a gold watch from his pocket and looked at it
earne st ly, ‘ D ri ve like the devil ,’ he shouted, ‘ first to G ross &
Han ke y’s in Re gent Street, and then to the C hur ch of St. M oni c a in the
E dge w are Road. H al f a guinea if you do it in twenty minut es !’

“A way they went, and I was just wondering whether I should not do well
to follow them when up the lane came a neat little landau , the coa chman
with his coat only half- butt oned, and his tie under his ear, while all
the tag s of his har ness were sticking out of the buck les. It hadn’t
pulled up before she shot out of the hall door and into it. I only
caught a glimpse of her at the moment, but she was a lovely woman, with
a face that a man might die for.

“‘The C hur ch of St. M onica , John ,’ she cried, ‘and half a sovereign if
you reach it in twenty minut es.’

“This was quite too good to lo se, Watson. I was just bal ancing whether
I should run for it, or whether I should per ch behind her landau when a
cab came through the street. The d river looked twice at such a sha b by
f are, but I jumped in before he could objec t. ‘ The C hur ch of St.
M onica ,’ said I, ‘and half a sovereign if you reach it in twenty
minut es.’ It was twenty-five minutes to twel ve, and of course it was
clear enough what was in the win d.

“My cab by drove fa st. I don’t think I ever drove fast er, but the others
were there before us. The cab and the landau with their steam ing horses
were in front of the door when I arri ved. I paid the man and hurried
into the church. There was not a soul there save the two whom I had
followed and a sur pli ced clergy man, who seemed to be ex post ul ating with
them. They were all three standing in a k not in front of the al t ar. I
loun ged up the side a is le like any other id ler who has dropped into a
church. Suddenly, to my surprise, the three at the al tar faced round to
me, and Godfrey Nor ton came running as hard as he could towards me.

“‘ Thank God ,’ he cried. ‘ You ’ll do. C ome ! C ome !’

“‘What then?’ I asked.

“‘ Come, man, come, only three minutes, or it won’t be leg al .’

“I was half- dragged up to the al t ar, and before I knew where I was I
found myself mumbling respon ses which were whispered in my ear, and
v ou ching for things of which I knew nothing, and generally assi sting in
the secure t ying up of Irene Adler, sp inst er, to Godfrey Nor ton,
bachel or. It was all done in an instant, and there was the gentleman
than king me on the one side and the lady on the other, while the
clergyman be am ed on me in fron t. It was the most preposterous position
in which I ever found myself in my life, and it was the thought of it
that started me laughing just now. It seems that there had been some
in form ality about their license, that the clergyman absolutely refused
to marry them without a wit ness of some sort, and that my luck y
appearance saved the bridegroom from having to sa lly out into the
streets in search of a best man. The bri de gave me a sover eig n, and I
mean to wear it on my watch chain in memor y of the occasion .”

“This is a very un expected turn of affair s,” said I; “and what then?”

“Well, I found my plans very seriously men ac ed. It looked as if the
pair might take an immediate de part ure, and so necess itate very prompt
and energetic meas ures on my par t. At the church door, however, they
separ ated, he driving back to the T emp le, and she to her own house. ‘I
shall drive out in the park at five as usu al ,’ she said as she left
him. I heard no more. They drove away in different directi ons, and I
went off to make my own arrang em ent s.”

“Which ar e?”

“S ome cold be ef and a glass of be er,” he answered, r inging the bell. “I
have been too busy to think of foo d, and I am likely to be bus ier still
this evening. By the way, Doctor, I shall want your co- oper ation.”

“I shall be deli gh te d.”

“You don’t mind breaking the law ?”

“Not in the lea st.”

“Nor running a chance of arre st?”

“Not in a good cau se.”

“Oh, the cause is excell ent !”

“Then I am your man .”

“I was sure that I might rely on you.”

“But what is it you wish ?”

“When Mrs. Turner has brought in the tra y I will make it clear to you.
N ow,” he said as he turned hun gri ly on the simple f are that our
land lady had provi ded, “I must discuss it while I eat, for I have not
much time. It is nearly five now. In two hours we must be on the scene
of action. Miss Iren e, or Ma da me, ra ther, retur ns from her drive at
seven . We must be at Briony Lodge to meet her.”

“And what then?”

“You must leave that to me. I have already arrang ed what is to occur .
There is only one point on which I must insi st. You must not inter fer e,
come what ma y. You understand ?”

“I am to be ne u tr al ?”

“To do nothing what ever. There will probably be some small
un pleas an t ness. Do not join in it. It will end in my being conveyed
into the house. F our or five minutes afterwards the sitting-room window
will open. You are to station yourself close to that open window .”

“Yes.”

“You are to watch me, for I will be visible to you.”

“Yes.”

“And when I raise my hand — so —you will throw into the room what I give
you to thr ow, and will, at the same time, raise the cry of fire. You
quite follow me?”

“ En ti rel y.”

“It is nothing very formid able ,” he said, taking a long cigar - sha ped
roll from his pocket. “It is an ordinary pl umber ’s smoke- rock et, fitted
with a cap at either end to make it self- light ing. Your task is
confined to that. When you raise your cry of fire, it will be taken up
by quite a number of people. You may then walk to the end of the
street, and I will re join you in ten minutes. I hope that I have made
myself clear ?”

“I am to remain ne u tr al, to get near the window, to watch you, and at
the signal to throw in this objec t, then to raise the cry of fire, and
to wait you at the corner of the stre et.”

“Precisel y.”

“Then you may entirely rely on me.”

“That is excell ent. I think, perhaps, it is almost time that I pre pare
for the new ro le I have to pla y.”

He disappeared into his bedroom and returned in a few minutes in the
character of an amiable and simp le- minded N on con for mi st clergy man. His
broad black hat, his bagg y trousers, his white ti e, his sympa the tic
smi le, and general look of peering and ben ev ol ent curiosity were such
as Mr. John H are alone could have equ all ed. It was not merely that
Holmes changed his costum e. His expressi on, his manner, his very soul
seemed to v ary with every fresh part that he assu med. The stage lost a
fine ac t or, even as sc i ence lost an ac ute reason er, when he became a
speci ali st in crime.

It was a quarter past six when we left Baker Street, and it still
wanted ten minutes to the hour when we found ourselves in Serpentine
Aven ue. It was already d us k, and the lam ps were just being li ghted as
we paced up and down in front of Briony Lodge, waiting for the coming
of its occup ant. The house was just such as I had pic tured it from
Sherlock Holmes’ succ in ct descri pti on, but the lo cal ity appeared to be
less private than I expec ted. On the contrary, for a small street in a
quiet neighbourhood, it was remark ably anim ated. There was a group of
sha b bi ly dressed men smoking and laughing in a corner, a
sc is sor s- gr in der with his wheel , two guard s men who were fli r ting with a
nur se- girl, and several well- dressed young men who were lounging up and
down with cig ars in their mou ths.

“You see,” remarked Holmes, as we paced to and fr o in front of the
house, “this marriage rather simp li fi es matter s. The photograph becomes
a double- ed ged weapon now. The chanc es are that she would be as averse
to its being seen by Mr. Godfrey Nor ton, as our client is to its coming
to the eyes of his prin c ess. Now the question is, Where are we to find
the photograph?”

“Where, inde ed?”

“It is most un likely that she carries it about with her. It is cab in et
si ze. Too large for easy conce al ment about a woman’s dress. She knows
that the King is capable of having her way laid and sear ched. Two
attempts of the sort have already been ma de. We may take it, then, that
she does not carry it about with her.”

“Where, then?”

“H er banker or her lawy er. There is that double possib il ity. But I am
inclined to think nei ther. W om en are naturally secre ti ve, and they like
to do their own secret ing. Why should she hand it over to anyone el se?
She could trust her own gu ar di an shi p, but she could not tell what
indire ct or politi cal influence might be brought to bear upon a
business man. Besides, remember that she had re solved to use it within
a few days. It must be where she can lay her hands upon it. It must be
in her own house.”

“But it has twice been bur gle d.”

“P shaw ! They did not know how to loo k.”

“But how will you look ?”

“I will not loo k.”

“What then?”

“I will get her to show me.”

“But she will refu se.”

“She will not be able to. But I hear the rum ble of wheel s. It is her
carri age. Now carry out my orders to the letter .”

As he spoke the gle am of the side lights of a carriage came round the
cur ve of the a ven ue. It was a smart little landau which rattled up to
the door of Briony Lo dge. As it pulled up, one of the loaf ing men at
the corner dashed forward to open the door in the hope of ear ning a
cop per, but was elb owed away by another loaf er, who had rushed up with
the same inten tion. A fierce quarrel broke out, which was incre ased by
the two guard sm en, who took sides with one of the loun g ers, and by the
sc is sor s- grind er, who was equally hot upon the other side. A blow was
stru ck, and in an instant the lady, who had stepped from her carriage,
was the centre of a little k not of flushed and strugg ling men, who
struck sa vag ely at each other with their fists and sti ck s. Holmes
dashed into the crowd to protect the lad y; but, just as he reached her,
he gave a cry and dropped to the ground, with the blood running freely
down his face. At his fall the guard s men took to their heels in one
direction and the loun g ers in the other, while a number of better
dressed people, who had watched the sc uff le without taking part in it,
crowded in to help the lady and to attend to the injured man. Irene
Adler, as I will still call her, had hurried up the step s; but she
stood at the top with her super b figure out lined against the lights of
the ha ll, looking back into the street.

“Is the poor gentleman much hur t?” she asked.

“He is dead ,” cried several voic es.

“No, no, there’s life in him!” shouted another. “But he’ll be gone
before you can get him to ho spit al.”

“He’s a brave fell ow,” said a woman. “They would have had the lady’s
pur se and watch if it hadn’t been for him. They were a gang, and a
rough one, too. Ah, he’s breathing now.”

“He can’t lie in the street. May we bring him in, mar m ?”

“S ure ly. B ring him into the sitting- room. There is a comfortable sof a.
This way, plea se !”

S low ly and solem nly he was borne into Briony Lodge and laid out in the
principal room, while I still observed the proce ed ings from my post by
the window. The lam ps had been l it, but the blinds had not been draw n,
so that I could see Holmes as he lay upon the cou ch. I do not know
whether he was seized with comp unction at that moment for the part he
was pla ying, but I know that I never felt more hearti ly ashamed of
myself in my life than when I saw the beautiful creature against whom I
was con spir ing, or the grace and kind lin ess with which she waited upon
the injured man. And yet it would be the black est t rea ch ery to Holmes
to draw back now from the part which he had in trusted to me. I hardened
my heart, and took the smoke- rock et from under my ul ster. After all, I
thought, we are not inj uring her. We are but pre vent ing her from
inj uring another.

Holmes had sat up upon the cou ch, and I saw him motion like a man who
is in need of air. A maid rushed across and threw open the window. At
the same instant I saw him raise his hand and at the signal I tossed my
rock et into the room with a cry of “F ire !” The word was no sooner out
of my mouth than the whole crowd of spe ct at ors, well dressed and
ill — gentlemen, o st l ers, and servant maid s— joined in a general shrie k of
“F ire !” Thi ck clouds of smoke curled through the room and out at the
open window. I caught a glimpse of rushing figure s, and a moment later
the voice of Holmes from within assur ing them that it was a false
alarm. S li pping through the shouting crowd I made my way to the corner
of the street, and in ten minutes was re jo i ced to find my friend’s arm
in mine, and to get away from the scene of up ro ar. He walked swiftly
and in silence for some few minutes until we had turned down one of the
quiet streets which lead towards the E dge w are Road.

“You did it very nice ly, Doctor,” he remarked. “N othing could have been
better. It is all right.”

“You have the photograph?”

“I know where it is.”

“And how did you find out?”

“She showed me, as I told you she woul d.”

“I am still in the dark.”

“I do not wish to make a myster y,” said he, laughing. “The matter was
perfectly simp le. You , of course, saw that everyone in the street was
an accompli ce. They were all engaged for the evening.”

“I guessed as much.”

“Then, when the row broke out, I had a little mo ist red pain t in the
palm of my hand. I rushed forward, fell down, clapped my hand to my
face, and became a pit e ous spectac le. It is an old tri ck .”

“That also I could fa th om.”

“Then they carried me in. She was bound to have me in. What else could
she do? And into her sitting-room, which was the very room which I
suspe cted. It lay between that and her bedroom, and I was determined to
see whi ch. They laid me on a cou ch, I motioned for air, they were
compelled to open the window, and you had your chan ce.”

“How did that help you?”

“It was all- important. When a woman thinks that her house is on fire,
her instin ct is at once to rush to the thing which she valu es most. It
is a perfectly over power ing impul se, and I have more than once taken
advantage of it. In the case of the D ar l ington Su b st itu tion Scand al it
was of use to me, and also in the Ar n s worth C ast le business. A married
woman grab s at her bab y; an un married one rea ches for her jewel- box .
Now it was clear to me that our lady of to-day had nothing in the house
more precious to her than what we are in quest of. She would rush to
secure it. The al arm of fire was admir ably done. The smoke and shouting
were enough to shake nerves of ste el . She respon ded beauti fully. The
photograph is in a rec ess behind a sliding panel just above the right
bell-pu ll. She was there in an instant, and I caught a glimpse of it as
she half drew it out. When I cried out that it was a false alarm, she
re placed it, glanced at the rock et, rushed from the room, and I have
not seen her since. I ro se, and, making my ex cu ses, escaped from the
house. I hesit ated whether to attempt to secure the photograph at on ce;
but the coa chman had come in, and as he was watching me narr ow ly, it
seemed sa fer to wait. A little over- preci pit ance may ruin all.”

“And now?” I asked.

“Our quest is practically finishe d. I shall call with the King
to-morrow, and with you, if you care to come with us. We will be shown
into the sitting-room to wait for the lady, but it is probable that
when she comes she may find neither us nor the photograph . It might be
a satisfaction to his Majesty to re gain it with his own hands.”

“And when will you call ?”

“At eight in the morning. She will not be up, so that we shall have a
clear fiel d. Besides, we must be promp t, for this marriage may mean a
complete change in her life and habits. I must wi re to the King without
dela y.”

We had reached Baker Street and had stopped at the door. He was
sear ching his pockets for the key when someone passing said:

“Good- night, M ister Sherlock Holmes.”

There were several people on the pavement at the time, but the gre eting
appeared to come from a slim you th in an ul ster who had hurried by.

“I’ve heard that voice befor e,” said Holmes, staring down the dimly lit
street. “Now, I wonder who the de u ce that could have be en.”


III.

I slept at Baker Street that night, and we were engaged upon our to ast
and coffee in the morning when the King of Bohemia rushed into the
room.

“You have really got it!” he cried, gras ping Sherlock Holmes by either
shoulder and looking eager ly into his face.

“Not yet.”

“But you have hop es?”

“I have hop es.”

“Then, come. I am all impati ence to be gone.”

“We must have a cab .”

“No, my broug ham is wait ing.”

“Then that will simp li fy matter s.” We descen ded and started off once
more for Briony Lo dge.

“ Irene Adler is marri ed,” remarked Holmes.

“ Mar ri ed! When ?”

“Y ester day.”

“But to wh om ?”

“To an English lawyer named Nor t on.”

“But she could not love him.”

“I am in hop es that she do es.”

“And why in hop es?”

“Because it would spare your Majesty all fear of future anno y ance. If
the lady lo ves her husband, she does not love your Majest y. If she does
not love your Majest y, there is no reason why she should interfere with
your Majest y’s plan .”

“It is true. And yet— ! W ell ! I wish she had been of my own station !
What a que en she would have ma de !” He re la p sed into a moo dy silence,
which was not broken until we drew up in Serpentine Aven ue.

The door of Briony Lodge was open, and an elderly woman stood upon the
step s. She watched us with a sar don ic eye as we stepped from the
broug ha m.

“Mr. Sherlock Holmes, I believ e?” said she.

“I am Mr. Holmes,” answered my companion, looking at her with a
questioning and rather startled ga ze.

“Indeed! My mistre ss told me that you were likely to ca ll. She left
this morning with her husband by the 5 :15 train from Char ing C ross for
the Contin ent.”

“What !” Sherlock Holmes staggered back, white with cha gr in and
surprise. “Do you mean that she has left England ?”

“Never to retur n.”

“And the paper s?” asked the King ho ar sel y. “All is lo st.”

“We shall see.” He pushed past the servant and rushed into the
draw ing-room, followed by the King and myself. The furniture was
scattered about in every directi on, with dis man t led shel ves and open
draw ers, as if the lady had hurried ly ransacked them before her f light.
Holmes rushed at the bell-pu ll, tore back a small sliding shut ter, and,
plun ging in his hand, pulled out a photograph and a letter. The
photograph was of Irene Adler herself in evening dress, the letter was
super scri bed to “ Sherlock Holmes, E sq . To be left till called for .” My
friend tore it open, and we all three read it together. It was dated at
midnight of the prece ding night and ran in this way:

“M Y DEAR MR . SHERLOCK HOLM ES , — You really did it very well. You took
me in completely. Un ti l after the al arm of fire, I had not a
suspici on. But then, when I found how I had bet ra yed myself, I
began to think. I had been war ned against you months ago. I had
been told that, if the King emplo yed an ag ent, it would certainly
be you. And your address had been given me. Y et, with all this, you
made me reve al what you wanted to know. Even after I became
suspici ous, I found it hard to think evil of such a dear, kind old
clergy man. But, you know, I have been trained as an ac tre ss myself.
Ma le co stu me is nothing new to me. I often take advantage of the
freed om which it gi ves. I sent Joh n, the coa ch man, to watch you,
ran upstairs, got into my walking clothes, as I call them, and came
down just as you de par ted.

“Well, I followed you to your door, and so made sure that I was
really an object of interest to the celebrated Mr. Sherlock Holmes.
Then I, rather imp ru d ent ly, wished you good- night, and started for
the T em ple to see my husband.

“We both thought the best resour ce was flight, when pur sued by so
formidable an an tag oni st; so you will find the nest empty when you
call to-mor r ow. As to the photogra p h, your client may rest in
peac e. I love and am loved by a better man than he. The King may do
what he will without h ind r ance from one whom he has cru e lly
wrong ed. I keep it only to safe guard myself, and to preserve a
weapon which will always secure me from any steps which he might
take in the fut ure. I leave a photograph which he might care to
posse ss; and I rema in, dear Mr. Sherlock Holmes,


“Very tru ly yours,

“ I R EN E N OR T ON , n é e AD L ER .”


“What a woman —oh, what a woman !” cried the King of Bohemia, when we had
all three read this epi st le. “Did I not tell you how quick and re solute
she was ? Would she not have made an admir able que en ? Is it not a pity
that she was not on my level ?”

“From what I have seen of the lady, she seems, indeed, to be on a very
different level to your Majest y,” said Holmes col dly. “I am sorry that
I have not been able to bring your Majest y’s business to a more
success ful conclusion .”

“On the contrary, my dear sir,” cried the K ing; “ nothing could be more
success ful. I know that her word is in viol ate. The photograph is now as
safe as if it were in the fire .”

“I am glad to hear your Majesty say so.”

“I am immen sely inde b ted to you. Pray tell me in what way I can reward
you. This ring —” He slipped an emer a ld snake ring from his finger and
held it out upon the palm of his hand.

“Your Majesty has something which I should value even more high ly,”
said Holmes.

“You have but to name it.”

“This photograph !”

The King stared at him in ama z ement.

“ Iren e’s photograph !” he cried. “Certainly, if you wish it.”

“I thank your Majest y. Then there is no more to be done in the matter.
I have the honour to wish you a very good morning.” He bow ed, and,
turning away without observing the hand which the King had stretched
out to him, he set off in my company for his cham ber s.

And that was how a great scandal threatened to af fect the king dom of
Bohemia, and how the best plans of Mr. Sherlock Holmes were beaten by a
woman’s w it. He used to make mer ry over the cle ver ness of women, but I
have not heard him do it of late. And when he spea ks of Irene Adler, or
when he ref ers to her photogra p h, it is always under the hon our able
tit le of the woman.




II. THE RE D - HEAD ED LE AG U E


I had called upon my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, one day in the
a ut um n of last year and found him in deep conversation with a very
st out, fl or i d- faced, elderly gentleman with fi ery red hair. With an
apology for my intr usi on, I was about to with draw when Holmes pulled
me ab rup tly into the room and closed the door behind me.

“You could not possibly have come at a better time, my dear Watson,” he
said cor di all y.

“I was afraid that you were engag ed.”

“So I am. Very much so.”

“Then I can wait in the next room.”

“Not at all. This gentleman, Mr. Wilson, has been my partner and hel per
in many of my most success ful cases, and I have no doubt that he will
be of the ut most use to me in yours al so.”

The stout gentleman half rose from his chair and gave a bo b of
gre et ing, with a quick little questioning glance from his small
f at- en circ led eyes.

“T ry the se t te e,” said Holmes, re la p sing into his armchair and putting
his fing er tips together, as was his custom when in ju di cial moo ds. “I
know, my dear Watson, that you share my love of all that is bi z ar re and
outside the conven tions and hum dru m r out ine of every day life. You have
shown your reli sh for it by the enthusi as m which has promp ted you to
chroni cle, and, if you will excuse my saying so, somewhat to em be lli sh
so many of my own little adventure s.”

“Your cases have indeed been of the greatest interest to me,” I
observed.

“You will remember that I remarked the other day, just before we went
into the very simple problem presented by Miss Mary Sutherland, that
for strange effe cts and extraordinary comb in ations we must go to life
it self, which is always far more daring than any effort of the
imagin ation.”

“A pro position which I took the liber ty of doubt ing.”

“You did, Doctor, but none the less you must come round to my view, for
other wise I shall keep on piling fact upon fact on you until your
reason breaks down under them and ac knowle dg es me to be right. Now, Mr.
Jabez Wil son here has been good enough to call upon me this morning,
and to begin a narrative which promises to be one of the most singular
which I have listened to for some time. You have heard me remark that
the strang est and most uniqu e things are very often connected not with
the larger but with the small er cri m es, and occasion ally, indeed, where
there is room for doubt whether any positive crime has been commit ted.
As far as I have heard, it is impossible for me to say whether the
present case is an instance of crime or not, but the course of events
is certainly among the most singular that I have ever listened to.
P erha ps, Mr. Wilson, you would have the great kindness to recomm ence
your narrative. I ask you not merely because my friend Dr. Watson has
not heard the opening part but also because the peculiar nature of the
story makes me anxious to have every possible detail from your lip s. As
a rule, when I have heard some slight indic ation of the course of
events, I am able to guide myself by the thous ands of other similar
cases which occur to my memory. In the present instance I am forced to
ad mit that the facts are, to the best of my beli ef, uniqu e.”

The por tly client puff ed out his chest with an appearance of some
little pri de and pulled a dirty and wrink led newspaper from the inside
pocket of his great coat. As he glanced down the advertisement colum n,
with his head thrust forward and the paper fl attened out upon his kne e,
I took a good look at the man and endeav ou red, after the fashion of my
companion, to read the indic ations which might be presented by his
dress or appearance.

I did not gain very much, however, by my inspe cti on. Our visitor bore
every mark of being an average commonplace British trades man, obe se,
p om p ous, and slow. He wore rather bagg y grey she pherd ’s check trousers,
a not over- clean black frock-coat, un buttoned in the front, and a dr ab
waist coat with a heavy br as sy Al bert chain, and a square pier ced bit of
metal dang ling down as an or nam ent. A fra yed top- hat and a fad ed brown
over coat with a wrink led vel v et collar lay upon a chair beside him.
Al together, look as I would, there was nothing remarkable about the man
save his blazing red head, and the expression of extreme cha gr in and
dis cont ent upon his features.

Sherlock Holmes’ quick eye took in my occup ation, and he shook his head
with a smile as he noticed my questioning glan ces. “B eyond the obvious
facts that he has at some time done man u al lab our, that he takes snuff,
that he is a F re em as on, that he has been in Chin a, and that he has done
a considerable amount of writing lat ely, I can deduce nothing else.”

Mr. Jabez Wil son started up in his chair, with his forefing er upon the
paper, but his eyes upon my companion.

“H ow, in the name of good- fortun e, did you know all that, Mr. Holmes?”
he asked. “How did you know, for example, that I did man u al lab our.
It’s as true as go spe l, for I began as a ship ’s carpen ter .”

“Your hands, my dear sir. Your right hand is quite a size larger than
your left. You have worked with it, and the mus cle s are more
develo pe d.”

“Well, the snuff, then, and the F re em as on ry ?”

“I won’t in sult your intell ig ence by telling you how I read that,
especially as, rather against the stri ct ru les of your or der, you use
an ar c -and- comp ass brea st p in.”

“Ah, of course, I forgot that. But the writ ing?”

“What else can be indi cated by that right cu ff so very shiny for five
inch es, and the left one with the smoo th pat ch near the elb ow where you
rest it upon the des k ?”

“Well, but Chin a ?”

“The fish that you have tattooed immediately above your right wrist
could only have been done in Chin a. I have made a small study of tat too
marks and have even con tri but ed to the l iter at ure of the subject. That
trick of stain ing the fish es’ sca les of a delicate p ink is quite
peculiar to Chin a. Wh en, in add ition, I see a Chin ese co in hanging from
your watch - chain, the matter becomes even more simp le.”

Mr. Jabez Wil son laughed heavi ly. “Well, I never !” said he. “I thought
at first that you had done something cle ver, but I see that there was
nothing in it after all.”

“I begin to think, Watson,” said Holmes, “that I make a mistake in
expla in ing. ‘ O m ne ig no tu m pr o magni fi co ,’ you know, and my poor
little reput ation, such as it is, will suff er ship wreck if I am so
can did. C an you not find the advertise ment, Mr. Wilson ?”

“Yes, I have got it now,” he answered with his thick red finger plan ted
half way down the colum n. “Here it is. This is what began it all. You
just read it for yourself, sir.”

I took the paper from him and read as follow s:

“T O THE RE D - HEAD ED LE AG U E : On account of the be quest of the late
E z e ki ah H op kin s, of Le ban on, P en n sy l vani a, U. S . A ., there is now another
vacancy open which entit les a member of the League to a salary of £ 4 a
week for purely n omin al servi ces. All red-headed men who are sound in
body and mind and above the age of twenty- one years, are e li gi ble.
A pp ly in person on Mon day, at eleven o’clock, to Duncan Ross, at the
offices of the Leag ue, 7 P op e’s Cour t, F le et Street.”


“What on earth does this mean?” I ejacul ated after I had twice read
over the extraordinary announ ce ment.

Holmes chuckled and wri ggled in his chair, as was his habit when in
high spirit s. “It is a little off the beaten trac k, isn’t it?” said he.
“And now, Mr. Wilson, off you go at scratch and tell us all about
yourself, your househol d, and the effect which this advertisement had
upon your fortun es. You will first make a note, Doctor, of the paper
and the dat e.”

“It is The Mor ning Ch roni cle of A pri l 2 7, 189 0 . Just two months ago.”

“Very good. Now, Mr. Wilson ?”

“Well, it is just as I have been telling you, Mr. Sherlock Holmes,”
said Jabez Wilson, m op ping his fore head ; “I have a small pawnbro ker’s
business at Coburg Square, near the City. It’s not a very large affa ir,
and of late years it has not done more than just give me a liv ing. I
used to be able to keep two assistan ts, but now I only keep one; and I
would have a job to pay him but that he is willing to come for half
wag es so as to learn the business.”

“What is the name of this obli ging you th ?” asked Sherlock Holmes.

“His name is Vincent Spauld ing, and he’s not such a youth, ei ther. It’s
hard to say his age. I should not wish a smar ter assistan t, Mr. Holmes;
and I know very well that he could better himself and earn twice what I
am able to give him. But, after all, if he is satisfied, why should I
put ide as in his head ?”

“Why, indeed ? You seem most fortunate in having an employ é who comes
under the full mar ket pri ce. It is not a common experience among
employ ers in this age. I don’t know that your assistant is not as
remarkable as your advertise ment.”

“Oh, he has his faul ts, too ,” said Mr. Wilson. “Never was such a fellow
for photograph y. S na pping away with a ca mer a when he ought to be
impro ving his mind, and then di ving down into the cellar like a rabbit
into its hole to develo p his picture s. That is his main fault, but on
the whole he’s a good work er. There’s no vi ce in him.”

“He is still with you, I presume?”

“Yes, sir. He and a girl of four teen, who does a bit of simple coo king
and keeps the place clean —that’s all I have in the house, for I am a
widow er and never had any family. We live very quiet ly, sir, the three
of us; and we keep a roof over our heads and pay our deb ts, if we do
nothing more.

“The first thing that put us out was that advertisement. Spauld ing, he
came down into the office just this day eight wee ks, with this very
paper in his hand, and he says:

“‘I wish to the Lor d, Mr. Wilson, that I was a red-headed man .’

“‘ Why that ?’ I as ks.

“‘ Wh y ,’ says he, ‘ here’s another vacancy on the League of the
Red-headed M en. It’s worth quite a little fortune to any man who gets
it, and I understand that there are more vac anci es than there are men,
so that the tru ste es are at their wit s’ end what to do with the money.
If my hair would only change colour, here’s a nice little cri b all
ready for me to step in to .’

“‘Why, what is it, then?’ I asked. You see, Mr. Holmes, I am a very
sta y- at- home man, and as my business came to me instead of my having to
go to it, I was often weeks on end without putting my foot over the
door - mat . In that way I didn’t know much of what was going on outside,
and I was always glad of a bit of new s.

“‘ Have you never heard of the League of the Red-headed Men ?’ he asked
with his eyes open.

“‘ N ever .’

“‘Why, I wonder at that, for you are e li gi ble yourself for one of the
vac anci es.’

“‘And what are they wor th ?’ I asked.

“‘Oh, merely a couple of hundred a year, but the work is sli ght, and it
need not interfere very much with one’s other occup ation s.’

“Well, you can easily think that that made me pri ck up my ear s, for the
business has not been over good for some years, and an ex tr a couple of
hundred would have been very hand y.

“‘ Tell me all about it ,’ said I.

“‘W ell ,’ said he, showing me the advertise ment, ‘you can see for
yourself that the League has a vac anc y, and there is the address where
you should apply for particul ars. As far as I can make out, the League
was founded by an American mill ion ai re, E z e ki ah H op kin s, who was very
peculiar in his ways. He was himself red- headed, and he had a great
sympathy for all red-headed men ; so, when he died, it was found that he
had left his enormous fortune in the hands of tru ste es, with
instru ctions to apply the interest to the providing of easy ber ths to
men whose hair is of that colour. From all I hear it is splendid pay
and very little to do .’

“‘ B ut ,’ said I, ‘ there would be mi llions of red-headed men who would
ap pl y.’

“‘ Not so many as you might think ,’ he answered. ‘You see it is really
confined to London ers, and to gr own men. This American had started from
London when he was young, and he wanted to do the old town a good turn.
Then, again, I have heard it is no use your ap plying if your hair is
light red, or dark red, or anything but real bright, bla z ing, fi ery
red. Now, if you cared to ap ply, Mr. Wilson, you would just walk in;
but perhaps it would hardly be worth your while to put yourself out of
the way for the sake of a few hundred pound s.’

“Now, it is a fact, gentlemen, as you may see for yoursel ves, that my
hair is of a very full and rich tin t, so that it seemed to me that if
there was to be any compe t ition in the matter I stood as good a chance
as any man that I had ever me t. Vincent Spaulding seemed to know so
much about it that I thought he might prove use ful, so I just ordered
him to put up the shutters for the day and to come right away with me.
He was very willing to have a holi day, so we shut the business up and
started off for the address that was given us in the advertisement.

“I never hope to see such a sight as that again, Mr. Holmes. From
north, south, ea st, and west every man who had a shade of red in his
hair had tramp ed into the city to answer the advertisement. F le et
Street was choked with red-headed fol k, and P op e’s Court looked like a
co ster ’s orange barr ow. I should not have thought there were so many in
the whole country as were brought together by that single
advertisement. Every shade of colour they w er e— stra w, lem on, or ang e,
bri ck, I ri sh- se t ter, li ver, cla y; but, as Spaulding said, there were
not many who had the real vi v id fla me- coloured tin t. When I saw how
many were wait ing, I would have given it up in despair ; but Spaulding
would not hear of it. How he did it I could not imagine, but he pushed
and pulled and but ted until he got me through the crowd, and right up
to the steps which led to the offi ce. There was a double stream upon
the stair, some going up in hop e, and some coming back de jec ted; but we
we dged in as well as we could and soon found ourselves in the offi ce.”

“Your experience has been a most enter taining one,” remarked Holmes as
his client pa used and re fre shed his memor y with a huge pin ch of snuff .
“Pray continue your very interesting statem ent.”

“There was nothing in the office but a couple of wooden chairs and a
deal table, behind which sat a small man with a head that was even
re d der than mine. He said a few words to each can di date as he came up,
and then he always managed to find some fault in them which would
dis qu ali fy them. G et ting a vacancy did not seem to be such a very easy
matter, after all. However, when our turn came the little man was much
more fav our able to me than to any of the others, and he closed the door
as we entered, so that he might have a private word with us.

“‘ This is Mr. Jabez Wilson ,’ said my assistan t, ‘and he is willing to
fill a vacancy in the Leag u e.’

“‘And he is admir ably suited for it ,’ the other answered. ‘ He has every
require ment. I cannot recall when I have seen anything so fin e.’ He
took a step back ward, cocked his head on one side, and gazed at my hair
until I felt quite b ash ful. Then suddenly he plun ged forward, wr ung my
hand, and congratul ated me warm ly on my success.

“‘It would be in justice to hesit at e,’ said he. ‘You will, however, I am
sure, excuse me for taking an obvious precau tion .’ With that he seized
my hair in both his hands, and tugged until I ye lled with the pain .
‘There is water in your ey es,’ said he as he re le ased me. ‘I perceive
that all is as it should be. But we have to be care ful, for we have
twice been de cei ved by wi gs and once by pain t. I could tell you ta les
of co b bl er’s wax which would dis gust you with human nature .’ He stepped
over to the window and shouted through it at the top of his voice that
the vacancy was fi ll ed. A gro an of disap pointment came up from below,
and the folk all tr oo ped away in different dire ctions until there was
not a red- head to be seen except my own and that of the manag er.

“‘My na me,’ said he, ‘ is Mr. Duncan Ross, and I am myself one of the
pen si on ers upon the fun d left by our noble bene fac t or. Are you a
married man, Mr. Wilson ? Have you a family ?’

“I answered that I had not.

“His face fell immedi at ely.

“‘ De ar me !’ he said gravel y, ‘ that is very serious inde ed! I am sorry
to hear you say that. The fun d was, of course, for the pro p ag ation and
spread of the red- heads as well as for their ma inten ance. It is
exceedingly unfortunate that you should be a bachel or .’

“My face leng th ened at this, Mr. Holmes, for I thought that I was not
to have the vacancy after all; but after thinking it over for a few
minutes he said that it would be all right.

“‘ In the case of another ,’ said he, ‘ the objec tion might be fat al, but
we must stretch a point in favour of a man with such a head of hair as
your s. When shall you be able to enter upon your new du ti es ?’

“‘Well, it is a little awk ward, for I have a business al read y ,’ said I.

“‘Oh, never mind about that, Mr. Wilson !’ said Vincent Spauld ing. ‘I
should be able to look after that for you.’

“‘What would be the hour s?’ I asked.

“‘ T en to two .’

“Now a pawnbro ker’s business is mostly done of an evening, Mr. Holmes,
especially Th ur s day and Fri day evening, which is just before pa y- day;
so it would suit me very well to earn a little in the morn ings.
Besides, I knew that my assistant was a good man, and that he would see
to anything that turned up.

“‘That would suit me very well ,’ said I. ‘ And the pay ?’

“‘ Is £ 4 a week .’

“‘And the work ?’

“‘ Is purely n omin al .’

“‘What do you call purely n omin al ?’

“‘Well, you have to be in the office, or at least in the building, the
whole time. If you leave, you for fe it your whole position forever. The
will is very clear upon that point. You don’t comply with the
conditi ons if you budge from the office during that time .’

“‘ It’s only four hours a day, and I should not think of leav ing ,’ said
I.

“‘ No excuse will avail ,’ said Mr. Duncan Ro ss; ‘ neither sick ness nor
business nor anything else. There you must sta y, or you lose your
bill et .’

“‘And the work ?’

“‘ Is to copy out the Encyclopædia Br it an ni ca. There is the first
volume of it in that pres s. You must find your own ink, pen s, and
blo tt ing- paper, but we provide this table and chair. Will you be ready
to-morrow ?’

“‘C ertain ly ,’ I answered.

“‘ Then, good- by e, Mr. Jabez Wilson, and let me congratulate you once
more on the important position which you have been fortunate enough to
gain .’ He bowed me out of the room and I went home with my assistan t,
hardly knowing what to say or do, I was so pleased at my own good
fortun e.

“Well, I thought over the matter all day, and by evening I was in low
spirits again; for I had quite persu aded myself that the whole affair
must be some great ho ax or frau d, though what its object might be I
could not imagine. It seemed altogether past beli ef that anyone could
make such a will, or that they would pay such a sum for doing anything
so simple as copying out the Encyclopædia Br it an ni ca. Vincent
Spaulding did what he could to che er me up, but by bed time I had
reas oned myself out of the whole thing. However, in the morning I
determined to have a look at it any how, so I bought a pen n y bott le of
ink, and with a qui ll- pen, and seven sheets of fool sca p paper, I
started off for P op e’s Cour t.

“Well, to my surprise and de light, everything was as right as possible.
The table was set out ready for me, and Mr. Duncan Ross was there to
see that I got fairly to work. He started me off upon the letter A , and
then he left me; but he would drop in from time to time to see that all
was right with me. At two o’clock he ba de me good- day, complim ented me
upon the amount that I had writt en, and locked the door of the office
after me.

“This went on day after day, Mr. Holmes, and on Saturday the manager
came in and plan ked down four golden sover eig ns for my week ’s work. It
was the same next week, and the same the week after. Every morning I
was there at ten, and every afternoon I left at two. By de gre es Mr.
Duncan Ross took to coming in only once of a morning, and then, after a
time, he did not come in at all. Still, of course, I never dar ed to
leave the room for an instant, for I was not sure when he might come,
and the bill et was such a good one, and suited me so well, that I would
not ris k the loss of it.

“E ight weeks passed away like this, and I had written about Ab bo ts and
Ar ch ery and Arm our and Archi te cture and A tti ca , and hoped with
di li g ence that I might get on to the B ’s before very long. It cost me
something in fool sca p, and I had pretty nearly filled a shelf with my
writ ings. And then suddenly the whole business came to an en d.”

“To an en d?”

“Yes, sir. And no later than this morning. I went to my work as usual
at ten o’clock, but the door was shut and locked, with a little square
of car d board ha mmered on to the middle of the panel with a t ac k. Here
it is, and you can read for yourself.”

He held up a piece of white car d board about the size of a sheet of
note- paper. It read in this fashi on :

“ THE RE D - HEAD ED LE AG U E IS DI S S OL V E D. O c to ber 9 , 189 0.”


Sherlock Holmes and I sur veyed this cur t announ ce ment and the ru eful
face behind it, until the com ical side of the affair so complete ly
over top ped every other consideration that we both burst out into a ro ar
of laugh ter.

“I cannot see that there is anything very funn y,” cried our client,
fl ushing up to the roo ts of his fla ming head. “If you can do nothing
better than laugh at me, I can go el se wher e.”

“No, no ,” cried Holmes, shoving him back into the chair from which he
had half ri sen . “I really wouldn’t miss your case for the world. It is
most re fresh ingly un usual. But there is, if you will excuse my saying
so, something just a little funny about it. Pray what steps did you
take when you found the card upon the door ?”

“I was stagg er ed, sir. I did not know what to do. Then I called at the
offices round, but none of them seemed to know anything about it.
Fin ally, I went to the landlor d, who is an accoun t ant living on the
ground floor, and I asked him if he could tell me what had become of
the Red-headed Leag ue. He said that he had never heard of any such
body. Then I asked him who Mr. Duncan Ross was. He answered that the
name was new to him.

“‘W ell ,’ said I, ‘ the gentleman at No. 4 .’

“‘W hat, the red-headed man ?’

“‘ Y es.’

“‘O h ,’ said he, ‘ his name was William Mor ri s. He was a solic it or and
was using my room as a temp or ary conveni ence until his new premises
were ready. He moved out yesterday .’

“‘Where could I find him ?’

“‘Oh, at his new offi ces. He did tell me the address. Yes, 1 7 King
Ed ward Street, near St. Pa ul ’ s.’

“I started off, Mr. Holmes, but when I got to that address it was a
man u factor y of arti fi cial kne e- cap s, and no one in it had ever heard of
either Mr. William Mor ri s or Mr. Duncan Ro ss.”

“And what did you do then?” asked Holmes.

“I went home to Saxe-Coburg Square, and I took the advice of my
assistan t. But he could not help me in any way. He could only say that
if I waited I should hear by po st. But that was not quite good enough,
Mr. Holmes. I did not wish to lose such a place without a strugg le, so,
as I had heard that you were good enough to give advice to poor folk
who were in need of it, I came right away to you.”

“And you did very wi sel y,” said Holmes. “Your case is an exceedingly
remarkable one, and I shall be happy to look into it. From what you
have told me I think that it is possible that gra ver is su es hang from
it than might at first sight appear .”

“G ra ve enough !” said Mr. Jabez Wilson. “Why, I have lost four pound a
wee k.”

“As far as you are personally concer ne d,” remarked Holmes, “I do not
see that you have any griev ance against this extraordinary le ag ue. On
the contrary, you are, as I understand, richer by some £ 3 0, to say
nothing of the minute knowledge which you have gained on every subject
which comes under the letter A . You have lost nothing by them.”

“No, sir. But I want to find out about them, and who they are, and what
their object was in playing this pr ank —if it was a pr ank — upon me. It
was a pretty expensive joke for them, for it cost them two and thirty
pound s.”

“We shall endeav our to clear up these points for you. And, first, one
or two questions, Mr. Wilson. This assistant of yours who first called
your attention to the advertise ment — how long had he been with you?”

“A bout a month then.”

“How did he come?”

“In answer to an advertise ment.”

“Was he the only app li can t?”

“No, I had a doz en.”

“Why did you pick him?”

“Because he was handy and would come che ap .”

“At half wag es, in fac t.”

“Yes.”

“What is he like, this Vincent Spauld ing?”

“S ma ll, st out- buil t, very quick in his ways, no hair on his face,
though he’s not short of thir ty. Has a white spl ash of ac id upon his
fore head.”

Holmes sat up in his chair in considerable excit ement. “I thought as
mu ch ,” said he. “Have you ever observed that his ears are pier ced for
ear ring s?”

“Yes, sir. He told me that a gip sy had done it for him when he was a
lad .”

“H um !” said Holmes, sin king back in deep thought. “He is still with
you?”

“Oh, yes, sir; I have only just left him.”

“And has your business been atten ded to in your ab sen ce?”

“N othing to compla in of, sir. There’s never very much to do of a
morning.”

“That will do, Mr. Wilson. I shall be happy to give you an opinion upon
the subject in the course of a day or two. To - day is Satur day, and I
hope that by Monday we may come to a conclusion .”

“Well, Watson,” said Holmes when our visitor had left us, “what do you
make of it all?”

“I make nothing of it,” I answered fr ank ly. “It is a most mysterious
business.”

“As a ru le ,” said Holmes, “the more bi z ar re a thing is the less
mysterious it pro ves to be. It is your common place, feature less cri mes
which are really puzz ling, just as a commonplace face is the most
difficult to identi f y. But I must be prompt over this matter.”

“What are you going to do, then?” I asked.

“To smoke ,” he answered. “It is quite a three pipe problem, and I beg
that you won’t speak to me for fifty minut es.” He curled himself up in
his chair, with his thin knees drawn up to his haw k- like nose, and
there he sat with his eyes closed and his black clay pipe th ru sting out
like the bill of some strange bir d. I had come to the conclusion that
he had dropped asleep, and indeed was no dding myself, when he suddenly
sprang out of his chair with the gest ure of a man who has made up his
mind and put his pipe down upon the mantel piece.

“S ar as ate pla ys at the St. Jam es ’s H all this afterno on,” he remarked.
“What do you think, Watson ? Could your pati ents spare you for a few
hour s?”

“I have nothing to do to- day. My practice is never very absor b ing.”

“Then put on your hat and come. I am going through the City first, and
we can have some lunch on the way. I observe that there is a good deal
of German music on the pro gra m me, which is rather more to my ta ste than
I ta li an or Fren ch. It is introspe cti ve, and I want to introspe ct. Come
along !”

We travelled by the Un der ground as far as Al der s g at e; and a short walk
took us to Saxe-Coburg Square, the scene of the singular story which we
had listened to in the morning. It was a po ky, little, sha bb y- gen te el
place, where four lines of ding y two- stor ied bri ck houses looked out
into a small rai led- in en clo sure, where a lawn of wee dy grass and a few
cl um ps of fad ed la ure l bushes made a hard fight against a smoke- lad en
and un con genial at mo sp here. Three gi lt b all s and a brown board with
“ J AB E Z WI L S ON ” in white letters, upon a corner house, announced the
place where our red-headed client carried on his business. Sherlock
Holmes stopped in front of it with his head on one side and looked it
all over, with his eyes shining bright ly between p uck ered li ds. Then he
walked slowly up the street, and then down again to the corner, still
looking keenly at the house s. Fin ally he returned to the pawnbro ker ’s,
and, having thum ped vig or ously upon the pavement with his stick two or
three times, he went up to the door and kno ck ed. It was instantly
opened by a bright - looking, clean-sha ven young fellow, who asked him to
step in.

“Thank you,” said Holmes, “I only wished to ask you how you would go
from here to the S tr and .”

“T hi r d right, fourth lef t,” answered the assistant promp tly, closing
the door.

“S mar t fellow, that,” observed Holmes as we walked away. “He is, in my
judg ment, the fourth smar test man in London, and for daring I am not
sure that he has not a claim to be thir d. I have known something of him
befor e.”

“E vi d ent ly,” said I, “Mr. Wil son’s assistant coun ts for a good deal in
this mystery of the Red-headed Leag ue. I am sure that you inquir ed your
way merely in order that you might see him.”

“Not him.”

“What then?”

“The knees of his trouser s.”

“And what did you see ?”

“What I expected to see.”

“Why did you beat the pav em ent ?”

“My dear doctor, this is a time for observ ation, not for talk. We are
spi es in an enem y’s country. We know something of Saxe-Coburg S quar e.
Let us now ex pl ore the parts which lie behind it.”

The road in which we found ourselves as we turned round the corner from
the retired Saxe-Coburg Square presented as great a contrast to it as
the front of a picture does to the back. It was one of the main
ar ter ies which conveyed the tra ffi c of the City to the nor th and we st.
The road way was b locked with the immense stream of comm erce fl owing in
a double tide in ward and out ward, while the foot pa ths were black with
the hurrying swarm of pe de stri ans. It was difficult to reali se as we
looked at the line of fine shop s and stat ely business premises that
they really ab ut ted on the other side upon the fad ed and stag n ant
square which we had just qu it ted.

“Let me see,” said Holmes, standing at the corner and glancing along
the line, “I should like just to remember the order of the houses here.
It is a h ob by of mine to have an exact knowledge of London. There is
Mor tim er ’s, the tobac con i st, the little newspaper shop , the Coburg
bran ch of the City and Su bur b an B an k, the V e get ari an R est a ur ant, and
Mc F ar lan e’s carri ag e- building de po t. That carries us right on to the
other blo ck. And now, Doctor, we’ve done our work, so it’s time we had
some pla y. A sand wi ch and a cup of coffee, and then off to viol in- land,
where all is sweet ness and delicac y and harm ony, and there are no
red-headed cli ents to v ex us with their con un dr um s.”

My friend was an enthusi a stic m usi ci an, being himself not only a very
capable perform er but a com pos er of no ordinary mer it. All the
afternoon he sat in the stall s wrapped in the most perfect happ in ess,
gently wa ving his long, thin fingers in time to the mus ic, while his
gently smiling face and his langu id, drea my eyes were as un like those
of Holmes the sle u th- h ound, Holmes the rel ent less, keen - wit ted,
read y- handed criminal ag ent, as it was possible to con cei ve. In his
singular character the du al nature alter nat ely as ser ted it self, and his
extreme exac t ness and ast uten ess re pres en ted, as I have often thought,
the re action against the poe tic and con tem pl ative m ood which
occasionally pre d omin ated in him. The sw ing of his nature took him from
extreme langu or to dev ouring energ y; and, as I knew well, he was never
so tru ly formidable as when, for days on end, he had been lounging in
his armchair amid his impro vis ations and his black - letter editi ons.
Then it was that the l ust of the chase would suddenly come upon him,
and that his brilliant reasoning power would rise to the level of
in tu ition, until those who were un acquain ted with his methods would
look as k ance at him as on a man whose knowledge was not that of other
mor tal s. When I saw him that afternoon so en wrapped in the music at St.
Jam es ’s H all I felt that an evil time might be coming upon those whom
he had set himself to hunt down.

“You want to go home, no doubt, Doctor,” he remarked as we emer ge d.

“Yes, it would be as well.”

“And I have some business to do which will take some hour s. This
business at Coburg Square is seri ous.”

“Why seri ous ?”

“A considerable crime is in con tem pl ation. I have every reason to
believe that we shall be in time to stop it. But to-day being Saturday
rather compli cat es matter s. I shall want your help to-night .”

“At what time?”

“T en will be early enough.”

“I shall be at Baker Street at ten .”

“Very well. And, I say, Doctor, there may be some little dang er, so
kindly put your ar my revolver in your pocket .” He waved his hand,
turned on his heel , and disappeared in an instant among the crow d.

I trust that I am not more dense than my neighbour s, but I was always
op pressed with a sense of my own stup id ity in my deal ings with Sherlock
Holmes. Here I had heard what he had heard, I had seen what he had
seen, and yet from his words it was evident that he saw clearly not
only what had happened but what was about to happ en, while to me the
whole business was still conf used and gro t es qu e. As I drove home to my
house in K en sing ton I thought over it all, from the extraordinary story
of the red-headed cop ier of the Encyclopædia down to the visit to
Saxe-Coburg Square, and the omin ous words with which he had parted from
me. What was this no c tur nal exped ition, and why should I go ar me d?
Where were we going, and what were we to do? I had the h int from Holmes
that this smoo th- faced pawnbro ker’s assistant was a formidable man —a
man who might play a deep gam e. I tried to puzz le it out, but gave it
up in des pair and set the matter aside until night should bring an
explanation.

It was a quar ter- past nine when I started from home and made my way
across the Par k, and so through Ox ford Street to Baker Street. Two
hansom s were standing at the door, and as I entered the passage I heard
the sound of voic es from abov e. On entering his room, I found Holmes in
anim ated conversation with two men, one of whom I recognised as Peter
Jones, the official police ag ent, while the other was a long, thin,
sa d- faced man, with a very shiny hat and op pressi vely respectable
frock- coat.

“Ha! Our party is complete ,” said Holmes, butt oning up his pe a- jacket
and taking his heavy hunting crop from the rac k. “W at son, I think you
know Mr. Jones, of Scotland Y ard ? Let me introduce you to Mr.
Merryweather, who is to be our companion in to-night ’s adventure .”

“W e ’re hunting in cou p les again, Doctor, you see,” said Jones in his
consequ ential way. “Our friend here is a wonderful man for starting a
cha se. All he wants is an old dog to help him to do the running down.”

“I hope a wild goose may not prove to be the end of our cha se,”
observed Mr. Merryweather glo om il y.

“You may place considerable confidence in Mr. Holmes, sir,” said the
police agent lo f ti ly. “He has his own little metho ds, which are, if he
won’t mind my saying so, just a little too theor e tical and fanta sti c,
but he has the ma kings of a detective in him. It is not too much to say
that once or twi ce, as in that business of the S hol to mur der and the
A gr a treas ure, he has been more nearly correct than the official
for ce.”

“Oh, if you say so, Mr. Jones, it is all right,” said the stranger with
de fer ence. “S till, I confess that I miss my rub ber. It is the first
Saturday night for seven -and- twenty years that I have not had my
rub ber.”

“I think you will f ind ,” said Sherlock Holmes, “that you will play for
a higher sta ke to-night than you have ever done yet, and that the play
will be more excit ing. For you, Mr. Merryweather, the sta ke will be
some £ 3 0,00 0 ; and for you, Jones, it will be the man upon whom you
wish to lay your hands.”

“ John Cla y, the murder er, thi ef, sm as her, and for g er. He’s a young man,
Mr. Merryweather, but he is at the head of his professi on, and I would
rather have my br ac ele ts on him than on any criminal in London. He’s a
remarkable man, is young John Cla y. His grand father was a royal duke,
and he himself has been to E ton and Ox for d. His bra in is as cunning as
his fing ers, and though we meet signs of him at every tur n, we never
know where to find the man himself. He ’ll crack a cri b in Scotland one
week, and be raising money to build an or phan age in Cor n wall the nex t.
I’ve been on his track for years and have never set eyes on him yet.”

“I hope that I may have the pleasure of introdu cing you to-night. I’ve
had one or two little turns also with Mr. John Cla y, and I agree with
you that he is at the head of his profession. It is past ten, however,
and quite time that we started. If you two will take the first hansom ,
Watson and I will follow in the secon d.”

Sherlock Holmes was not very communic ative during the long drive and
lay back in the cab hum ming the tun es which he had heard in the
afterno on. We rattled through an end less lab y rin th of gas- lit streets
until we emerged into F arr ington Street.

“We are close there now,” my friend remarked. “This fellow Merryweather
is a bank dire ctor, and personally interested in the matter. I thought
it as well to have Jones with us al so. He is not a bad fellow, though
an absolute imbe ci le in his profession. He has one positive vir tu e. He
is as brave as a bull dog and as ten ac ious as a lo b ster if he gets his
c laws upon any one. Here we are, and they are waiting for us.”

We had reached the same crowded thorough f are in which we had found
ourselves in the morning. Our cab s were dis mis sed, and, following the
gu id ance of Mr. Merryweather, we passed down a narrow passage and
through a side door, which he opened for us. Wi thin there was a small
corrid or, which ended in a very massive iron g ate. This also was
opened, and led down a f light of winding stone steps, which ter min ated
at another formidable g ate. Mr. Merryweather stopped to light a
lantern, and then condu cted us down a dark, ear th- sme lling passage, and
so, after opening a third door, into a huge vaul t or cell ar, which was
piled all round with cr ates and massive box es.

“You are not very vul ner able from abov e,” Holmes remarked as he held up
the lantern and gazed about him.

“Nor from be low ,” said Mr. Merryweather, striking his stick upon the
fla gs which lined the floor. “Why, dear me, it sounds quite holl ow !” he
remarked, looking up in surprise.

“I must really ask you to be a little more quiet !” said Holmes
sever ely. “You have already im peri lled the whole succ ess of our
exped ition. Might I beg that you would have the goodness to sit down
upon one of those box es, and not to inter fer e?”

The solemn Mr. Merryweather per ched himself upon a cr ate, with a very
injured expression upon his face, while Holmes fell upon his knees upon
the floor and, with the lantern and a magni fying len s, began to examine
min utely the crac ks between the st ones. A few seconds suffi ced to
satis fy him, for he sprang to his feet again and put his glass in his
pocket.

“We have at least an hour before us ,” he remarked, “for they can hardly
take any steps until the good pawnbro ker is safely in bed. Then they
will not lose a minute, for the sooner they do their work the longer
time they will have for their escap e. We are at present, Doctor — as no
doubt you have di vin ed— in the cellar of the City bran ch of one of the
principal London ban ks. Mr. Merryweather is the chair man of dire ctors,
and he will explain to you that there are reasons why the more daring
crimin als of London should take a considerable interest in this cellar
at present .”

“It is our French gol d,” whispered the dire ctor. “We have had several
warn ings that an attempt might be made upon it.”

“Your French gol d?”

“Yes. We had occas ion some months ago to streng then our resour ces and
borrowed for that purpose 3 0,000 na po le ons from the B ank of Fran ce. It
has become known that we have never had occas ion to un pack the money,
and that it is still lying in our cellar. The cr ate upon which I sit
con tains 2 ,00 0 na po le ons packed between la y ers of lead fo il. Our
re serve of bull ion is much larger at present than is usually kept in a
single bran ch office, and the dire ctor s have had mis gi v ings upon the
subjec t.”

“Which were very well justi fi ed,” observed Holmes. “And now it is time
that we arrang ed our little plans. I expect that within an hour matters
will come to a head. In the mean time Mr. Merryweather, we must put the
scre en over that dark lanter n.”

“And sit in the dark ?”

“I am afraid so. I had brought a pack of cards in my pocket, and I
thought that, as we were a parti e car r é e, you might have your rub ber
after all. But I see that the enem y’s prepar ations have gone so far
that we cannot ris k the presence of a light. And, first of all, we must
choose our positi ons. These are daring men, and though we shall take
them at a disa d van t age, they may do us some harm unless we are care ful.
I shall stand behind this cr ate, and do you conceal yourselves behind
tho se. Then, when I flash a light upon them, close in swif t ly. If they
fire, Watson, have no comp unction about shooting them down.”

I placed my revol ver, cock ed, upon the top of the wooden case behind
which I cr ou ched. Holmes shot the slide across the front of his lantern
and left us in pitch darkn es s— such an absolute darkness as I have never
before experi ence d. The smell of hot metal remained to assure us that
the light was still there, ready to flash out at a moment ’s noti ce. To
me, with my nerves worked up to a pitch of expe ct anc y, there was
something de pressing and sub du ing in the sudden gloom, and in the cold
d ank air of the vaul t.

“They have but one re treat ,” whispered Holmes. “That is back through
the house into Saxe-Coburg S quar e. I hope that you have done what I
asked you, J ones ?”

“I have an inspector and two offi c ers waiting at the front door.”

“Then we have stopped all the ho les. And now we must be silent and
wa it.”

What a time it see me d! From compar ing notes afterwards it was but an
hour and a quar ter, yet it appeared to me that the night must have
almost gone, and the daw n be breaking above us. My limbs were weary and
sti ff, for I feared to change my positi on; yet my nerves were worked up
to the highest pitch of ten si on, and my hearing was so ac ute that I
could not only hear the gentle breathing of my companion s, but I could
distinguish the deep er, heavi er in- breath of the bul ky Jones from the
thin, sigh ing note of the bank dire ctor. From my position I could look
over the case in the direction of the floor. Sudd enly my eyes caught
the g lin t of a light.

At first it was but a lu rid spark upon the stone pav ement. Then it
leng th ened out until it became a yellow line, and then, without any
warning or sound, a g ash seemed to open and a hand appear ed, a white,
almost woman ly hand, which felt about in the centre of the little ar e a
of light. For a minute or more the hand, with its wri thing fing ers,
protr uded out of the floor. Then it was with drawn as suddenly as it
appear ed, and all was dark again save the single lu rid spark which
marked a ch ink between the st ones.

Its disappear ance, however, was but moment ary. With a ren d ing, tearing
sound, one of the broad, white stones turned over upon its side and
left a s quare, gaping hole, through which strea med the light of a
lantern. O ver the edge there peeped a clean- cu t, boy ish face, which
looked keenly about it, and then, with a hand on either side of the
a per t ure, drew itself shoulder - high and waist - high, until one kne e
rested upon the ed ge. In another instant he stood at the side of the
hole and was haul ing after him a companion, li the and small like
himself, with a pale face and a shock of very red hair.

“It’s all clear ,” he whisper ed. “Have you the chi sel and the bag s?
Great Sco tt ! J um p, Archi e, jum p, and I’ll sw ing for it!”

Sherlock Holmes had sprung out and seized the in tru der by the coll ar.
The other di ved down the hole, and I heard the sound of ren ding cloth
as Jones clutched at his skir ts. The light fl ashed upon the barrel of a
revol ver, but Holmes’ hunting crop came down on the man’s wrist, and
the pistol cl in ked upon the stone floor.

“It’s no use, John Cla y,” said Holmes bl and ly. “You have no chance at
all.”

“So I see,” the other answered with the ut most coo l ness. “I fancy that
my pal is all right, though I see you have got his coat- tail s.”

“There are three men waiting for him at the door ,” said Holmes.

“Oh, inde ed! You seem to have done the thing very completely. I must
compli ment you.”

“And I you,” Holmes answered. “Your red-headed idea was very new and
effe cti ve.”

“You’ll see your pal again present ly,” said J ones. “He’s quick er at
clim bing down holes than I am. Just hold out while I fix the der bi es.”

“I beg that you will not touch me with your fi l thy hand s,” remarked our
prisoner as the hand cu ffs cl attered upon his wri st s. “You may not be
aware that I have royal blood in my ve in s. Have the goodness, also,
when you address me always to say ‘ sir ’ and ‘ plea se .’”

“All right,” said Jones with a st are and a s nigger. “Well, would you
please, sir, mar ch upstairs, where we can get a cab to carry your
Hi gh ness to the police- station ?”

“That is better ,” said John C lay ser en ely. He made a sweep ing bow to
the three of us and walked quietly off in the cu sto dy of the dete cti ve.

“Re ally, Mr. Holmes,” said Mr. Merryweather as we followed them from
the cell ar, “I do not know how the bank can thank you or re pay you.
There is no doubt that you have dete cted and defe ated in the most
complete manner one of the most determined attempts at bank robbery
that have ever come within my experi en ce.”

“I have had one or two little scor es of my own to settle with Mr. John
Cla y,” said Holmes. “I have been at some small expense over this
matter, which I shall expect the bank to refun d, but beyond that I am
am ply re paid by having had an experience which is in many ways uniqu e,
and by hearing the very remarkable narrative of the Red-headed Leag u e.”

“You see, Watson,” he explained in the early hours of the morning as we
sat over a glass of whisky and so da in Baker Street, “it was perfectly
obvious from the first that the only possible object of this rather
fantastic business of the advertisement of the Leag ue, and the copying
of the Encyclopædi a, must be to get this not over -b right pawnbro ker
out of the way for a number of hours every day. It was a curious way of
manag ing it, but, really, it would be difficult to suggest a better.
The method was no doubt suggested to Cla y’s ingen ious mind by the
colour of his accompli ce ’s hair. The £ 4 a week was a l ure which must
draw him, and what was it to them, who were playing for thous and s? They
put in the advertise ment, one ro gue has the temp or ary office, the other
ro gue in c it es the man to apply for it, and together they manage to
secure his ab sence every morning in the week. From the time that I
heard of the assistant having come for half wag es, it was obvious to me
that he had some strong moti ve for secur ing the situ ation.”

“But how could you guess what the moti ve wa s?”

“H ad there been women in the house, I should have suspe cted a mere
vul gar in tri gu e. T hat, however, was out of the question. The man’s
business was a small one, and there was nothing in his house which
could account for such el ab or ate prepar ations, and such an expen d iture
as they were at. It mu st, then, be something out of the house. What
could it be? I thought of the assistan t’s f on dn ess for photograph y, and
his trick of vani shing into the cellar. The cellar ! There was the end
of this tangled clue. Then I made inquiries as to this mysterious
assistant and found that I had to deal with one of the coo lest and most
daring crimin als in London. He was doing something in the
cellar — something which took many hours a day for months on end. What
could it be, once mor e? I could think of nothing save that he was
running a tun nel to some other build ing.

“So far I had got when we went to visit the scene of action. I
surprised you by beating upon the pavement with my sti ck. I was
ascertain ing whether the cellar stretched out in front or behind. It
was not in fron t. Then I rang the bell, and, as I hop ed, the assistant
answered it. We have had some skir mi sh es, but we had never set eyes
upon each other before. I hardly looked at his face. His knees were
what I wished to see. You must yourself have remarked how wor n,
wrink led, and stained they w er e. They spoke of those hours of
bur row ing. The only remaining point was what they were bur r owing for. I
walked round the corner, saw the City and Su bur b an B ank ab ut ted on our
friend’s premi ses, and felt that I had solved my problem. When you
drove home after the concer t I called upon Scotland Y ard and upon the
chair man of the bank dire ctors, with the result that you have se en.”

“And how could you tell that they would make their attempt to-night?” I
asked.

“Well, when they closed their League offices that was a sign that they
cared no longer about Mr. Jabez Wil son’s pres ence —in other words, that
they had completed their tun ne l. But it was essential that they should
use it soon, as it might be discover ed, or the bull ion might be
re moved. Saturday would suit them better than any other day, as it
would give them two days for their escap e. For all these reasons I
expected them to come to-night .”

“You reas oned it out beauti full y,” I ex claim ed in un fe ig ned admir ation.
“It is so long a chain, and yet every link r ings tru e.”

“It saved me from en nu i ,” he answered, yaw n ing. “Alas ! I already feel
it closing in upon me. My life is spent in one long effort to esca pe
from the common places of exist ence. These little problems help me to do
so.”

“And you are a bene factor of the rac e,” said I.

He shrugged his shoulders. “Well, perhaps, after all, it is of some
little use ,” he remarked. “‘ L ’ hom me c ’ est ri en — l ’ œ u v re c ’ est t out ,’
as G u sta ve F la u bert wrote to George S and .”




III. A C A SE OF I D EN TI TY


“My dear fell ow,” said Sherlock Holmes as we sat on either side of the
fire in his lodgings at Baker Street, “ life is in fin it ely stranger than
anything which the mind of man could inv ent. We would not dare to
con ceive the things which are really mere common places of exist ence. If
we could fly out of that window hand in hand, h over over this great
c ity, gently remove the roof s, and pe ep in at the que er things which
are going on, the strange co incid en ces, the plan n ings, the
cross- purposes, the wonderful chains of events, working through
gener ations, and leading to the most ou tr é resul ts, it would make all
fi ction with its con venti on al ities and foreseen conclusions most sta le
and un prof it able.”

“And yet I am not convinced of it,” I answered. “The cases which come
to light in the papers are, as a rule, bald enough, and vul gar enough.
We have in our police repor ts reali s m pushed to its extreme lim it s, and
yet the result is, it must be conf essed, neither fascin ating nor
arti stic .”

“A certain sele ction and discre tion must be used in produ cing a
reali stic effe ct ,” remarked Holmes. “This is wanting in the police
repor t, where more stre ss is la id, perhaps, upon the plat itud es of the
magi str ate than upon the detail s, which to an obser ver contain the
v ital ess ence of the whole matter. D ep end upon it, there is nothing so
unnatural as the common place.”

I smiled and shook my head. “I can quite understand your thinking so,”
I said. “Of course, in your position of un official ad vis er and hel per
to everybody who is absolutely puzz led, through out three contin ents,
you are brought in contact with all that is strange and bi z arre . But
here ” —I picked up the morning paper from the ground — “ let us put it to a
practical te st. Here is the first heading upon which I come. ‘ A
husband’s cruel ty to his wife .’ There is half a column of prin t, but I
know without reading it that it is all perfectly familiar to me. There
is, of course, the other woman, the drink, the p ush, the blow, the
bru i se, the sympa the tic sister or land lady. The cru dest of writ ers
could invent nothing more cru de .”

“Indeed, your example is an unfortunate one for your ar gum ent ,” said
Holmes, taking the paper and glancing his eye down it. “This is the
Dun d as separ ation case, and, as it happen s, I was engaged in clearing
up some small points in connection with it. The husband was a
tee to tal er, there was no other woman, and the conduct compla ined of was
that he had drifted into the habit of winding up every meal by taking
out his false teeth and hur ling them at his wife, which, you will
all ow, is not an action likely to occur to the imagin ation of the
average stor y- tell er. Take a pin ch of snuff, Doctor, and ac knowledge
that I have scor ed over you in your exam ple .”

He held out his snuff box of old gold, with a great a me th y st in the
centre of the li d. Its splen d our was in such contrast to his homely
ways and simple life that I could not help comm ent ing upon it.

“A h,” said he, “I forgot that I had not seen you for some wee ks. It is
a little sou ven ir from the King of Bohemia in return for my assistance
in the case of the Irene Adler papers.”

“And the r ing?” I asked, glancing at a remarkable brilliant which
spark led upon his fing er.

“It was from the re igning family of H oll and, though the matter in which
I served them was of such delicac y that I cannot confi de it even to
you, who have been good enough to chroni cle one or two of my little
problem s.”

“And have you any on hand just now?” I asked with interest.

“S ome ten or twel ve, but none which present any feat ure of interest.
They are important, you understand, without being interesting. In de ed,
I have found that it is usually in un important matters that there is a
field for the observ ation, and for the quick anal ys is of cause and
effect which gives the char m to an investigation. The larger cri mes are
ap t to be the si m pl er, for the bigger the crime the more obvi ous, as a
rule, is the moti ve. In these cases, save for one rather in tri c ate
matter which has been referred to me from Mar se ill es, there is nothing
which pres ents any features of interest. It is possible, however, that
I may have something better before very many minutes are over, for this
is one of my cli ents, or I am much mista ken .”

He had ris en from his chair and was standing between the parted blinds
gazing down into the dull ne u tr al - tinted London street. Loo king over
his shoulder, I saw that on the pavement oppos ite there stood a large
woman with a heavy fur bo a round her neck, and a large cur ling red
feather in a broad - brimmed hat which was tilted in a co qu et ti sh Du ch ess
of D ev on shire fashion over her ear. From under this great pan op ly she
peeped up in a nerv ous, hesit ating fashion at our window s, while her
body o sc ill ated backward and forward, and her fingers fidge ted with her
g love butt ons. Suddenly, with a plun ge, as of the swi m mer who leaves
the bank, she hurried across the road, and we heard the sharp cl ang of
the bell.

“I have seen those symp tom s befor e,” said Holmes, throwing his
cigaret te into the fire. “O sc ill ation upon the pavement always means an
affair e de c œ ur . She would like advice, but is not sure that the
matter is not too delicate for communic ation. And yet even here we may
disc ri min ate. When a woman has been seriously wrong ed by a man she no
longer o sc ill at es, and the usual symp t om is a broken bell wi re. Here we
may take it that there is a love matter, but that the maid en is not so
much angry as perplex ed, or griev ed. But here she comes in person to
re solve our doub ts.”

As he spoke there was a ta p at the door, and the boy in buttons entered
to announ ce Miss Mary Sutherland, while the lady herself lo omed behind
his small black figure like a full - sa iled mer chan t- man behind a tin y
pi lot boat. Sherlock Holmes wel com ed her with the easy cour t es y for
which he was remark able, and, having closed the door and bowed her into
an arm chair, he looked her over in the minute and yet abstracted
fashion which was peculiar to him.

“Do you not f ind ,” he said, “that with your short sight it is a little
trying to do so much typewrit ing?”

“I did at fir st,” she answered, “but now I know where the letters are
without look ing.” Then, suddenly reali sing the full pur por t of his
words, she gave a violent start and looked up, with fear and
astonish ment upon her broad, good- hum oured face. “You ’ve heard about
me, Mr. Holmes,” she cried, “ else how could you know all that?”

“Never min d,” said Holmes, laughing; “it is my business to know things.
Perhaps I have trained myself to see what others over look. If not, why
should you come to consult me?”

“I came to you, sir, because I heard of you from Mrs. E there ge, whose
husband you found so easy when the police and everyone had given him up
for dead. Oh, Mr. Holmes, I wish you would do as much for me. I’m not
ri ch, but still I have a hundred a year in my own right, besides the
little that I make by the mach ine, and I would give it all to know what
has become of Mr. Hosmer Angel.”

“Why did you come away to consult me in such a hurry ?” asked Sherlock
Holmes, with his finger-tips together and his eyes to the ceiling.

A gain a startled look came over the somewhat vac u ous face of Miss Mary
Suther land. “Yes, I did ban g out of the house ,” she said, “for it made
me angry to see the easy way in which Mr. Windibank —that is, my
father — took it all. He would not go to the police, and he would not go
to you, and so at last, as he would do nothing and kept on saying that
there was no harm done, it made me mad, and I just on with my things
and came right away to you.”

“Your father ,” said Holmes, “ your stepfather, sure ly, since the name is
differ ent.”

“Yes, my step father. I call him father, though it sounds funn y, too,
for he is only five years and two months older than myself.”

“And your mother is ali ve?”

“Oh, yes, mother is alive and well. I wasn’t best plea sed, Mr. Holmes,
when she married again so soon after father’s death, and a man who was
nearly fifteen years younger than herself. F a ther was a plum ber in the
Tottenham Court Road, and he left a ti dy business behind him, which
mother carried on with Mr. H ard y, the for em an ; but when Mr. Windibank
came he made her sell the business, for he was very sup eri or, being a
travell er in win es. They got £ 4 7 00 for the good will and interest,
which wasn’t near as much as father could have got if he had been
ali ve.”

I had expected to see Sherlock Holmes impati ent under this ram bling and
in consequ ential narrati ve, but, on the contrary, he had listened with
the greatest con centr ation of attention.

“Your own little in com e,” he asked, “ does it come out of the business ?”

“Oh, no, sir. It is quite separate and was left me by my uncle N ed in
A uck land. It is in New Z e al and sto ck, paying 4 ½ per c ent. Two thousand
five hundred p ounds was the amoun t, but I can only touch the interest.”

“You interest me extre mel y,” said Holmes. “And since you draw so large
a sum as a hundred a year, with what you earn into the bar gain , you no
doubt travel a little and indul ge yourself in every way. I believe that
a single lady can get on very nice ly upon an in come of about £ 6 0.”

“I could do with much less than that, Mr. Holmes, but you understand
that as long as I live at home I don’t wish to be a bur den to them, and
so they have the use of the money just while I am staying with them. Of
course, that is only just for the time. Mr. Windibank draw s my interest
every quarter and pa ys it over to mother, and I find that I can do
pretty well with what I earn at typewrit ing. It br ings me tw op ence a
sheet, and I can often do from fifteen to twenty sheets in a day.”

“You have made your position very clear to me,” said Holmes. “This is
my friend, Dr. Watson, before whom you can speak as freely as before
myself. Kindly tell us now all about your connection with Mr. Hosmer
Angel.”

A flush stole over Miss Suther land’s face, and she picked nerv ously at
the fringe of her jac ket. “I met him first at the gas f it ter s’ b all ,”
she said. “They used to send father tick ets when he was alive, and then
afterwards they remembered us, and sent them to mother. Mr. Windibank
did not wish us to go. He never did wish us to go anywher e. He would
get quite mad if I wanted so much as to join a Sunday-school tre at. But
this time I was set on going, and I would go ; for what right had he to
pre vent ? He said the folk were not fit for us to know, when all
father’s friends were to be there. And he said that I had nothing fit
to we ar, when I had my pur ple pl ush that I had never so much as taken
out of the draw er. At last, when nothing else would do, he went off to
France upon the business of the firm, but we went, mother and I, with
Mr. H ard y, who used to be our for em an, and it was there I met Mr.
Hosmer Angel.”

“I suppo se,” said Holmes, “that when Mr. Windibank came back from
France he was very anno yed at your having gone to the b all.”

“Oh, well, he was very good about it. He laughed, I remember, and
shrugged his shoulders, and said there was no use den ying anything to a
woman, for she would have her way.”

“I see. Then at the gas f it ter s’ ball you me t, as I understand, a
gentleman called Mr. Hosmer Angel.”

“Yes, sir. I met him that night, and he called next day to ask if we
had got home all safe, and after that we met him —that is to say, Mr.
Holmes, I met him twice for wal ks, but after that father came back
again, and Mr. Hosmer Angel could not come to the house any more.”

“No ?”

“Well, you know father didn’t like anything of the sor t. He wouldn’t
have any visit ors if he could help it, and he used to say that a woman
should be happy in her own family circle . But then, as I used to say to
mother, a woman wants her own circle to begin with, and I had not got
mine yet.”

“But how about Mr. Hosmer Angel ? Did he make no attempt to see you?”

“Well, father was going off to France again in a week, and Hosmer wrote
and said that it would be sa fer and better not to see each other until
he had gone. We could write in the mean time, and he used to write every
day. I took the letters in in the morning, so there was no need for
father to know.”

“W ere you engaged to the gentleman at this time?”

“Oh, yes, Mr. Holmes. We were engaged after the first walk that we
too k. Hosm er — Mr. Angel — was a cas hi er in an office in Leadenhall
Stre et — and—”

“What offi ce?”

“That’s the worst of it, Mr. Holmes, I don’t know.”

“Where did he li ve, then?”

“He slept on the premi se s.”

“And you don’t know his address?”

“No — except that it was Leadenhall Street.”

“Where did you address your letters, then?”

“To the Leadenhall Street Po st O ffi ce, to be left till called for. He
said that if they were sent to the office he would be cha ff ed by all
the other cler ks about having letters from a lady, so I offered to
type write them, like he did his, but he wouldn’t have that, for he said
that when I wrote them they seemed to come from me, but when they were
type written he always felt that the machine had come between us. That
will just show you how fond he was of me, Mr. Holmes, and the little
things that he would think of.”

“It was most suggesti ve ,” said Holmes. “It has long been an a x i om of
mine that the little things are in fin it ely the most important. C an you
remember any other little things about Mr. Hosmer Angel ?”

“He was a very sh y man, Mr. Holmes. He would rather walk with me in the
evening than in the daylight, for he said that he ha ted to be
con spi cu ous. Very reti ring and gentle man ly he was. Even his voice was
gent le. He’d had the qu in sy and sw oll en gl ands when he was young, he
told me, and it had left him with a weak thro at, and a hesit at ing,
whisper ing fashion of speech. He was always well dressed, very neat and
pla in, but his eyes were wea k, just as mine are, and he wore tinted
glasses against the gl ar e.”

“Well, and what happened when Mr. Windibank, your stepfather, returned
to Fran ce?”

“Mr. Hosmer Angel came to the house again and pro posed that we should
marry before father came back. He was in dreadful ear nest and made me
swe ar, with my hands on the Testam ent, that whatever happened I would
always be true to him. M other said he was quite right to make me swe ar,
and that it was a sign of his passi on. M other was all in his favour
from the first and was even f on der of him than I was. Then, when they
talked of mar rying within the week, I began to ask about father ; but
they both said never to mind about father, but just to tell him
afterwar ds, and mother said she would make it all right with him. I
didn’t quite like that, Mr. Holmes. It seemed funny that I should ask
his leave, as he was only a few years older than me; but I didn’t want
to do anything on the sly, so I wrote to father at B or dea u x, where the
company has its French offi ces, but the letter came back to me on the
very morning of the wedd ing.”

“It missed him, then?”

“Yes, sir; for he had started to England just before it arri v ed.”

“Ha! that was un fortun ate. Your wedding was arrang ed, then, for the
Fri day. Was it to be in chur ch?”

“Yes, sir, but very quietly. It was to be at St. Sa vi our ’s, near K ing ’s
C ro ss, and we were to have breakfast afterwards at the St. P an cr as
Ho te l. Hosmer came for us in a hansom , but as there were two of us he
put us both into it and stepped himself into a four-wheel er, which
happened to be the only other cab in the street. We got to the church
first, and when the four-wheel er drove up we waited for him to step
out, but he never did, and when the cabman got down from the box and
looked there was no one there ! The cabman said that he could not
imagine what had become of him, for he had seen him get in with his own
eyes. That was last Fri day, Mr. Holmes, and I have never seen or heard
anything since then to throw any light upon what became of him.”

“It seems to me that you have been very sha me fully treat ed,” said
Holmes.

“Oh, no, sir! He was too good and kind to leave me so. Why, all the
morning he was saying to me that, whatever happened, I was to be tru e;
and that even if something quite unforeseen occurred to separate us, I
was always to remember that I was ple dged to him, and that he would
claim his ple dge sooner or lat er. It seemed strange talk for a
wedding- morning, but what has happened since gives a meaning to it.”

“M o st certainly it do es. Your own opinion is, then, that some
unforeseen cat ast rop he has occurred to him?”

“Yes, sir. I believe that he fore saw some dang er, or else he would not
have talked so. And then I think that what he fore saw happen ed.”

“But you have no notion as to what it could have be en ?”

“None.”

“One more question. How did your mother take the matter?”

“She was angry, and said that I was never to speak of the matter
again.”

“And your father ? Did you tell him?”

“Yes; and he seemed to think, with me, that something had happened, and
that I should hear of Hosmer again. As he said, what interest could
anyone have in bringing me to the doors of the church, and then leaving
me? Now, if he had borrowed my money, or if he had married me and got
my money settled on him, there might be some reason, but Hosmer was
very indepen dent about money and never would look at a shi lling of
mine. And yet, what could have happen ed ? And why could he not writ e?
Oh, it dri ves me half- mad to think of it, and I can’t sleep a wink at
night.” She pulled a little handkerchief out of her mu ff and began to
so b heavily into it.

“I shall glance into the case for you,” said Holmes, ris ing, “and I
have no doubt that we shall reach some definite result. Let the weight
of the matter rest upon me now, and do not let your mind d well upon it
fur ther. A bo ve all, try to let Mr. Hosmer Angel van ish from your
memory, as he has done from your life.”

“Then you don’t think I’ll see him again ?”

“I fear not.”

“Then what has happened to him?”

“You will leave that question in my hands. I should like an accur ate
description of him and any letters of his which you can spar e.”

“I adverti sed for him in last Satur day ’s Ch roni cle ,” said she. “Here
is the slip and here are four letters from him.”

“Thank you. And your address?”

“No. 3 1 L y on P l ac e, C am ber well.”

“Mr. Angel ’s address you never had, I understand. Where is your
father’s place of business ?”

“He travel s for W es th ouse & Mar bank, the great cl ar et im por ters of
F en church Street.”

“Thank you. You have made your statement very clear ly. You will leave
the papers here, and remember the advice which I have given you. Let
the whole incident be a se aled book, and do not allow it to af fect your
life.”

“You are very kind, Mr. Holmes, but I cannot do that. I shall be true
to Hosm er. He shall find me ready when he comes back.”

For all the preposterous hat and the vac u ous face, there was something
noble in the simple faith of our visitor which compelled our respe ct.
She laid her little bundle of papers upon the table and went her way,
with a promise to come again whenever she might be sum mone d.

Sherlock Holmes sat silent for a few minutes with his fing er tips still
pressed together, his legs stretched out in front of him, and his ga ze
dire cted up ward to the ceiling. Then he took down from the r ack the old
and o ily clay pipe, which was to him as a coun sell or, and, having lit
it, he leaned back in his chair, with the thick blue clou d- w rea ths
spinning up from him, and a look of in fin ite langu or in his face.

“Quite an interesting stud y, that maid en,” he observed. “I found her
more interesting than her little problem, which, by the way, is rather
a tr ite one. You will find par all el cases, if you consult my inde x, in
An do ver in ’ 7 7, and there was something of the sort at The H ag ue last
year. Old as is the idea, however, there were one or two details which
were new to me. But the maid en herself was most instru cti ve.”

“You appeared to read a good deal upon her which was quite in visible to
me,” I remarked.

“Not in visible but un noticed, Watson. You did not know where to look,
and so you missed all that was important. I can never bring you to
reali se the importance of sleev es, the suggesti ven ess of thum b - na ils,
or the great is su es that may hang from a boot- l ac e. Now, what did you
gather from that woman’s appear ance ? Des cri be it.”

“Well, she had a sl at e- col ou red, broad - brimmed straw hat, with a
feather of a brick ish red. Her jacket was black, with black be ad s se w n
upon it, and a fringe of little black j et or nam ents. Her dress was
br own, rather dar ker than coffee colour, with a little pur ple pl ush at
the neck and sleev es. Her glo ves were gre y ish and were worn through at
the right forefing er. Her boots I didn’t obser ve. She had small round,
hanging gold ear r ings, and a general air of being fairly well- to- do in
a vul g ar, comfortable, eas y- going way.”

Sherlock Holmes clapped his hands sof tly together and chuck led.

“’ P on my word, Watson, you are coming along wonder fully. You have
really done very well indeed. It is true that you have missed
everything of importan ce, but you have hit upon the metho d, and you
have a quick eye for colour. Never trust to general impressi ons, my
boy, but con centr ate yourself upon detail s. My first glance is always
at a woman’s sleev e. In a man it is perhaps better first to take the
kne e of the trouser . As you observe, this woman had pl ush upon her
sleev es, which is a most useful materi al for showing trac es. The double
line a little above the wrist, where the type wr iti st pres ses against
the table, was beauti fully defin ed. The se w ing- mach ine, of the hand
ty pe, leaves a similar mar k, but only on the left arm, and on the side
of it far th est from the thumb, instead of being right across the
broad est part, as this was. I then glanced at her face, and, observing
the din t of a pin ce- ne z at either side of her nose, I vent ured a remark
upon short sight and type writing, which seemed to surprise her.”

“It surprised me.”

“But, sure ly, it was obvious. I was then much surprised and interested
on glancing down to observe that, though the boots which she was
we aring were not un like each other, they were really odd on es; the one
having a sli ghtly de cor ated to e- ca p, and the other a plain one. One was
buttoned only in the two lower buttons out of five, and the other at
the first, thir d, and fif th. Now, when you see that a young lady,
other wise neat ly dressed, has come away from home with odd boots,
half- butt oned, it is no great deduction to say that she came away in a
hur r y.”

“And what el se?” I asked, keenly interest ed, as I always was, by my
friend’s in ci sive reason ing.

“I no ted, in pas sing, that she had written a note before leaving home
but after being fully dres sed. You observed that her right g love was
torn at the forefing er, but you did not apparently see that both g love
and finger were stained with vi o let in k. She had written in a hurry and
di pped her pen too deep . It must have been this morning, or the mark
would not remain clear upon the fing er. All this is am us ing, though
rather ele ment ary, but I must go back to business, Watson. Would you
mind reading me the adverti sed description of Mr. Hosmer Angel ?”

I held the little printed slip to the light. “ Mis sing ,” it said, “ on
the morning of the four te en th, a gentleman named Hosmer Angel . About
five f t. seven in. in he ight ; strongly buil t, sallow complex ion, black
hair, a little bald in the cent re, bush y, black side- whiskers and
mou sta ch e; tinted glas ses, slight in fir m ity of speech. Was dressed,
when last seen, in black frock- coat faced with sil k, black waist coat,
gold Al bert chain, and grey Har ri s t we ed trousers, with brown ga it ers
over ela stic - sid ed boo ts. K n own to have been emplo yed in an office in
Leadenhall Street. Anybody br ing ing,” & c, & c.

“That will do,” said Holmes. “As to the letter s,” he continued,
glancing over them, “ they are very common place. Ab sol utely no clue in
them to Mr. Angel , save that he qu o t es Bal z ac once. There is one
remarkable point, however, which will no doubt strike you.”

“They are type writt en,” I remarked.

“Not only that, but the signature is type writt en. Look at the neat
little ‘ Hosmer Angel ’ at the bott om. There is a dat e, you see, but no
super scri ption except Leadenhall Street, which is rather vag ue. The
point about the signature is very suggesti ve —in fact, we may call it
concl usi ve.”

“Of what?”

“My dear fellow, is it possible you do not see how strongly it bears
upon the case ?”

“I cannot say that I do unless it were that he wished to be able to
deny his signature if an action for brea ch of promise were inst it ute d.”

“No, that was not the point. However, I shall write two letters, which
should settle the matter. One is to a firm in the City, the other is to
the young lady’s stepfather, Mr. Windibank, asking him whether he could
meet us here at six o’clock to-morrow evening. It is just as well that
we should do business with the ma le relati ves. And now, Doctor, we can
do nothing until the answ ers to those letters come, so we may put our
little problem upon the shelf for the inter im .”

I had had so many reasons to believe in my friend’s subtle powers of
reasoning and extraordinary energ y in action that I felt that he must
have some solid grounds for the assured and easy de mean our with which
he treated the singular mystery which he had been called upon to
fa th om. Once only had I known him to fa il, in the case of the King of
Bohemia and of the Irene Adler photograph ; but when I looked back to
the we ir d business of the S ig n of F our, and the extraordinary
circumstances connected with the St udy in S car let, I felt that it would
be a strange tang le indeed which he could not un ra vel .

I left him then, still puff ing at his black clay pipe, with the
conviction that when I came again on the next evening I would find that
he held in his hands all the clu es which would lead up to the id entity
of the disappe aring bridegroom of Miss Mary Suther land.

A professional case of great grav ity was engag ing my own attention at
the time, and the whole of next day I was busy at the bed side of the
suffer er. It was not until close upon six o’clock that I found myself
free and was able to spring into a han som and drive to Baker Street,
half afraid that I might be too late to assi st at the d é n ou ement of
the little myster y. I found Sherlock Holmes alone, however, half
asleep, with his long, thin form curled up in the rec es ses of his
arm chair. A formidable ar ray of bott les and te st- tu be s, with the
pun gent clean ly smell of hy dro ch lor ic ac id, told me that he had spent
his day in the chemical work which was so dear to him.

“Well, have you solved it?” I asked as I entered.

“Yes. It was the bi sul pha te of bar y ta .”

“No, no, the myster y!” I cried.

“Oh, that ! I thought of the sa lt that I have been working upon. There
was never any mystery in the matter, though, as I said yesterday, some
of the details are of interest. The only draw back is that there is no
law , I fear, that can touch the scoundrel .”

“Who was he, then, and what was his object in deser ting Miss
Suther land ?”

The question was hardly out of my mouth, and Holmes had not yet opened
his lips to re ply, when we heard a heavy foot fall in the passage and a
ta p at the door.

“This is the girl’s stepfather, Mr. James Windibank ,” said Holmes. “He
has written to me to say that he would be here at six . Come in !”

The man who entered was a st ur dy, middle- si zed fellow, some thirty
years of age, clean-sha ven, and sa ll ow- skin ned, with a bl and,
in sin u ating manner, and a pair of wonder fully sharp and pen e tr ating
grey eyes. He shot a questioning glance at each of us, placed his shiny
top- hat upon the sideboard, and with a slight bow sid led down into the
near est chair.

“Good- evening, Mr. James Windibank ,” said Holmes. “I think that this
type written letter is from you, in which you made an appointment with
me for six o’clo ck ?”

“Yes, sir. I am afraid that I am a little late, but I am not quite my
own ma st er, you know. I am sorry that Miss Suther land has trou bled you
about this little matter, for I think it is far better not to wash
linen of the sort in public . It was quite against my wi shes that she
ca me, but she is a very excit able, impul sive girl, as you may have
noticed, and she is not easily cont rolled when she has made up her mind
on a point. Of course, I did not mind you so much, as you are not
connected with the official police, but it is not pleasant to have a
family misfortune like this no ised ab road. Besides, it is a use less
expen se, for how could you possibly find this Hosmer Angel ?”

“On the contr ar y,” said Holmes quiet ly; “I have every reason to believe
that I will succeed in discovering Mr. Hosmer Angel.”

Mr. Windibank gave a violent start and dropped his glo ves. “I am
deli ghted to hear it,” he said.

“It is a curious thing,” remarked Holmes, “that a typewrit er has really
quite as much individu ality as a man’s hand writ ing. Unless they are
quite new , no two of them write exactly ali ke. Some letters get more
worn than others, and some wear only on one side. Now, you remark in
this note of yours, Mr. Windibank, that in every case there is some
little sl ur ring over of the ‘ e,’ and a slight defect in the tail of the
‘ r .’ There are fourteen other characteri stic s, but those are the more
obvi ous.”

“We do all our correspon dence with this machine at the office, and no
doubt it is a little wor n ,” our visitor answered, glancing keenly at
Holmes with his bright little eyes.

“And now I will show you what is really a very interesting stud y, Mr.
Windibank ,” Holmes continu ed. “I think of writing another little
monogra ph some of these days on the typewrit er and its rel ation to
crime. It is a subject to which I have devoted some little attention. I
have here four letters which pur por t to come from the missing man. They
are all type writt en. In each case, not only are the ‘ e ’ s’ sl ur red and
the ‘ r ’ s’ ta ill ess, but you will observe, if you care to use my
magni fying len s, that the fourteen other characteri stic s to which I
have all uded are there as well.”

Mr. Windibank sprang out of his chair and picked up his ha t. “I cannot
waste time over this sort of fantastic talk, Mr. Holmes,” he said. “If
you can catch the man, catch him, and let me know when you have done
it.”

“Certain ly,” said Holmes, stepping over and turning the key in the
door. “I let you know, then, that I have caught him!”

“What! wher e?” shouted Mr. Windibank, turning white to his lips and
glancing about him like a rat in a tra p.

“Oh, it won’t do — really it won ’t,” said Holmes su a vel y. “There is no
possible getting out of it, Mr. Windi bank. It is quite too tran spar ent,
and it was a very bad compli ment when you said that it was impossible
for me to solve so simple a question. That’s right ! S it down and let us
talk it over.”

Our visitor coll ap sed into a chair, with a g ha stly face and a gl it ter
of moist ure on his br ow. “ I t— it’s not acti on able ,” he stam mer ed.

“I am very much afraid that it is not. But between ourselves,
Windibank, it was as cru el and sel fish and hear t less a trick in a pe tty
way as ever came before me. Now, let me just run over the course of
events, and you will con tra dict me if I go wrong .”

The man sat hu ddled up in his chair, with his head sunk upon his
breast, like one who is utterly cr us he d. Holmes stuck his feet up on
the corner of the mantel piece and, leaning back with his hands in his
pockets, began talking, rather to himself, as it see med, than to us.

“The man married a woman very much older than himself for her mone y,”
said he, “and he en jo yed the use of the money of the daughter as long
as she lived with them. It was a considerable su m, for people in their
positi on, and the loss of it would have made a serious difference. It
was worth an effort to preserve it. The daughter was of a good, amiable
dispos ition, but affe ction ate and warm - hearted in her ways, so that it
was evident that with her fair personal advant ag es, and her little
in come, she would not be allowed to remain single long. Now her
marriage would mean, of course, the loss of a hundred a year, so what
does her stepfather do to prevent it? He takes the obvious course of
keeping her at home and for bi dding her to seek the company of people of
her own age. But soon he found that that would not answer forever. She
became re sti ve, insi sted upon her right s, and finally announced her
positive intention of going to a certain b all. What does her clever
stepfather do then? He con cei ves an idea more cred itable to his head
than to his heart. With the con ni vance and assistance of his wife he
disgu ised himself, covered those keen eyes with tinted glas ses, m asked
the face with a mou stac he and a pair of bush y whisk ers, sunk that clear
voice into an in sin u ating whisper, and doub ly secure on account of the
girl’s short sight, he appears as Mr. Hosmer Angel , and keeps off other
lo vers by making love him self.”

“It was only a joke at fir st,” groan ed our visitor. “We never thought
that she would have been so carried away.”

“Very likely not. How ever that may be, the young lady was very
deci de dly carried away, and, having quite made up her mind that her
stepfather was in Fran ce, the suspicion of t rea ch ery never for an
instant entered her mind. She was fl attered by the gentleman’s
atten ti ons, and the effect was incre ased by the loudly ex pressed
admir ation of her mother. Then Mr. Angel began to ca ll, for it was
obvious that the matter should be pushed as far as it would go if a
real effect were to be produ ce d. There were meet ings, and an
engag ement, which would finally secure the girl’s affe ctions from
turning towards anyone else. But the de ce ption could not be kept up
forever. These pre tended journe ys to France were rather cum br ous. The
thing to do was clearly to bring the business to an end in such a
dra m atic manner that it would leave a per man ent impression upon the
young lady’s mind and prevent her from looking upon any other suit or
for some time to come. H ence those v ows of fi del ity exac ted upon a
Testam ent, and hence also the all usions to a possibility of something
happen ing on the very morning of the wedding. James Windibank wished
Miss Suther land to be so bound to Hosmer Angel , and so uncertain as to
his f ate, that for ten years to come, at any rate, she would not listen
to another man. As far as the church door he brought her, and then, as
he could go no far ther, he conveni ently vanished away by the old trick
of stepping in at one door of a four-wheel er and out at the other. I
think that was the chain of events, Mr. Windibank !”

Our visitor had recovered something of his assur ance while Holmes had
been talking, and he rose from his chair now with a cold sne er upon his
pale face.

“It may be so, or it may not, Mr. Holmes,” said he, “but if you are so
very sharp you ought to be sharp enough to know that it is you who are
breaking the law now, and not me. I have done nothing acti onable from
the first, but as long as you keep that door locked you lay yourself
open to an action for as sa ul t and ill eg al con stra in t.”

“The law cannot, as you say, touch you,” said Holmes, un locking and
throwing open the door, “ yet there never was a man who deser ved
p uni sh ment more. If the young lady has a brother or a friend, he ought
to lay a whip across your shoulders. By J ov e!” he continued, fl ushing
up at the sight of the bitter sne er upon the man’s face, “it is not
part of my du ties to my client, but here’s a hunting crop handy, and I
think I shall just treat myself to —” He took two swift steps to the
whi p, but before he could grasp it there was a wild cl atter of steps
upon the stairs, the heavy hall door bang ed, and from the window we
could see Mr. James Windibank running at the top of his spe ed down the
road.

“There’s a col d- bloo ded scoundrel !” said Holmes, laugh ing, as he threw
himself down into his chair once more. “That fellow will rise from
crime to crime until he does something very bad, and en ds on a gall ows.
The case has, in some respect s, been not entirely devo id of interest.”

“I cannot now entirely see all the steps of your reason ing,” I
remarked.

“Well, of course it was obvious from the first that this Mr. Hosmer
Angel must have some strong object for his curious condu ct, and it was
equally clear that the only man who really prof ited by the incid ent, as
far as we could see, was the step father. Then the fact that the two men
were never together, but that the one always appeared when the other
was away, was suggesti ve. So were the tinted spectac les and the curious
voice, which both hin ted at a disgui se, as did the bush y whisk ers. My
suspicions were all confir med by his peculiar action in type writing his
sig nature, which, of course, infer red that his hand writing was so
familiar to her that she would recognise even the small est sa mp le of
it. You see all these is ol ated facts, together with many min or ones,
all pointed in the same directi on.”

“And how did you ver i fy them?”

“Ha ving once spotted my man, it was easy to get cor ro bor ation. I knew
the firm for which this man wor ked. Having taken the printed
descri p tion. I e li min ated everything from it which could be the result
of a disgui se —the whisk ers, the glas ses, the voice, and I sent it to
the firm, with a requ est that they would in form me whether it answered
to the description of any of their travell ers. I had already noticed
the pecu li ar ities of the typewrit er, and I wrote to the man himself at
his business address asking him if he would come here. As I expec ted,
his re ply was type written and reve aled the same trivial but
characteri stic defe cts. The same post brought me a letter from
W es th ouse & Mar bank, of F en church Street, to say that the description
talli ed in every respe ct with that of their employ é , James Windi bank.
V o il à t out!”

“And Miss Suther land ?”

“If I tell her she will not believe me. You may remember the old
P er si an saying, ‘There is danger for him who ta ke th the ti ger cu b, and
danger also for who so snat ches a del usion from a woman .’ There is as
much sense in Ha fi z as in Hor ac e, and as much knowledge of the worl d.”




IV. THE BO SC O M B E V AL LE Y M Y ST ER Y


We were seated at breakfast one morning, my wife and I, when the maid
brought in a telegra m. It was from Sherlock Holmes and ran in this way:

“Have you a couple of days to spar e? Have just been wi red for from the
west of England in connection with Boscombe Valley traged y. S hall be
glad if you will come with me. A ir and sc ener y perfe ct. Lea ve
Paddington by the 11 :15 .”

“What do you say, dear ?” said my wife, looking across at me. “Will you
go ?”

“I really don’t know what to say. I have a fairly long list at
present .”

“Oh, An stru ther would do your work for you. You have been looking a
little pale lately. I think that the change would do you good, and you
are always so interested in Mr. Sherlock Holmes’ case s.”

“I should be ungrateful if I were not, seeing what I gained through one
of them ,” I answered. “But if I am to go, I must pack at once, for I
have only half an hour .”

My experience of camp life in Af gh an ist an had at least had the effect
of making me a prompt and ready travell er. My wants were few and
simp le, so that in less than the time stated I was in a cab with my
v ali se, rattling away to Paddington St ation. Sherlock Holmes was pac ing
up and down the plat form, his tall, ga unt figure made even ga un ter and
tall er by his long grey travell ing- cloak and clo se- f itting cloth cap .

“It is really very good of you to come, Watson,” said he. “It makes a
considerable difference to me, having someone with me on whom I can
thoroughly re ly. L oc al aid is always either wor th less or else bi as sed.
If you will keep the two corner seats I shall get the tick et s.”

We had the carriage to ourselves save for an immense lit ter of papers
which Holmes had brought with him. Am ong these he rummaged and read,
with inter val s of note- taking and of me dit ation, until we were past
Reading. Then he suddenly rolled them all into a gigantic ball and
tossed them up onto the rac k.

“Have you heard anything of the case ?” he asked.

“Not a word. I have not seen a paper for some day s.”

“The London press has not had very full accoun ts. I have just been
looking through all the recent papers in order to master the
particul ars. It seems, from what I ga ther, to be one of those simple
cases which are so extremely difficul t.”

“That sounds a little par ado x ic al.”

“But it is prof ound ly true. S ing ul ar ity is almost invari ably a clue.
The more feature less and commonplace a crime is, the more difficult it
is to bring it home. In this case, however, they have establi shed a
very serious case against the son of the murdered man .”

“It is a murder, then?”

“Well, it is conjec tured to be so. I shall take nothing for gran ted
until I have the opportun ity of looking personally into it. I will
explain the state of things to you, as far as I have been able to
understand it, in a very few words.

“ Boscombe Valley is a country distri ct not very far from Ross, in
Here for d shi re. The largest landed propriet or in that part is a Mr. John
Turner, who made his money in Australi a and returned some years ago to
the old country. One of the f arms which he hel d, that of Hatherley, was
let to Mr. Char les McCarthy, who was also an ex - Australi an. The men had
known each other in the col oni es, so that it was not unnatural that
when they came to settle down they should do so as near each other as
possible. Turner was apparently the richer man, so McCarthy became his
ten ant but still remain ed, it seems, upon terms of perfect equ al ity, as
they were frequently together. McCarthy had one son, a lad of ei gh teen,
and Turner had an only daughter of the same age, but neither of them
had wi ves liv ing. They appear to have avo ided the society of the
neighbour ing English families and to have led retired li ves, though
both the McCarth ys were fond of spor t and were frequently seen at the
rac e- meet ings of the neighbourhoo d. McCarthy kept two servan t s—a man
and a girl. Turner had a considerable househol d, some half- dozen at the
lea st. That is as much as I have been able to gather about the
famili es. Now for the facts.

“On Jun e 3 r d, that is, on Monday last, McCarthy left his house at
Hatherley about three in the afternoon and walked down to the Boscombe
Pool, which is a small la ke formed by the spreading out of the stream
which runs down the Boscombe V alle y. He had been out with his
ser v ing- man in the morning at Ross, and he had told the man that he
must hurry, as he had an appointment of importance to keep at thre e.
From that appointment he never came back ali ve.

“From Hatherley F arm house to the Boscombe P ool is a quarter of a mile,
and two people saw him as he passed over this ground. One was an old
woman, whose name is not menti oned, and the other was William C row der,
a game- keeper in the emplo y of Mr. Turner. Both these wit nes ses de pose
that Mr. McCarthy was walking alone. The game- keeper ad ds that within a
few minutes of his seeing Mr. McCarthy pass he had seen his son, Mr.
James McCarthy, going the same way with a gun under his arm. To the
best of his beli ef, the father was actually in sight at the time, and
the son was following him. He thought no more of the matter until he
heard in the evening of the tragedy that had occurred.

“The two McCarth ys were seen after the time when William C row der, the
game- keeper, lost sight of them. The Boscombe P ool is thick ly woo ded
round, with just a fringe of grass and of ree ds round the ed ge. A girl
of four teen, P ati ence Mor an, who is the daughter of the lodge- keeper of
the Boscombe Valley estate, was in one of the woods picking flow ers.
She states that while she was there she saw, at the border of the wood
and close by the la ke, Mr. McCarthy and his son, and that they appeared
to be having a violent quarre l. She heard Mr. McCarthy the el der using
very strong langu age to his son, and she saw the latter raise up his
hand as if to strike his father. She was so frightened by their
violence that she ran away and told her mother when she reached home
that she had left the two McCarth ys quarre lling near Boscombe Pool, and
that she was afraid that they were going to fi ght. She had hardly said
the words when young Mr. McCarthy came running up to the lo dge to say
that he had found his father dead in the woo d, and to ask for the help
of the lodge- kee per. He was much excited, without either his gun or his
hat, and his right hand and sle eve were observed to be stained with
fresh bloo d. On following him they found the dead body stretched out
upon the grass beside the poo l. The head had been beaten in by repe ated
blows of some heavy and blunt weap on. The inju ries were such as might
very well have been inf lic ted by the but t- end of his son’s gun, which
was found lying on the grass within a few pac es of the body. Un der
these circumstances the young man was instantly arre st ed, and a ver dict
of ‘ wil ful murder ’ having been returned at the in quest on T u es day, he
was on Wednes day brought before the magi str ates at Ross, who have
referred the case to the next Assizes. Those are the main facts of the
case as they came out before the coroner and the police- cour t.”

“I could hardly imagine a more dam ning case ,” I remarked. “If ever
circumstan tial evidence pointed to a criminal it does so here.”

“C ir c umstan tial evidence is a very tri ck y thing,” answered Holmes
thought fully. “It may seem to point very straight to one thing, but if
you shi ft your own point of view a little, you may find it pointing in
an equally un comprom ising manner to something entirely different. It
must be conf essed, however, that the case looks exceedingly grave
against the young man, and it is very possible that he is indeed the
cul pr it. There are several people in the neighbourhood, however, and
among them Miss Turner, the daughter of the neighbour ing land own er, who
believe in his innoc ence, and who have retained Lestrade, whom you may
recollec t in connection with the St udy in S car let, to work out the case
in his interest. Lestrade, being rather puzz led, has referred the case
to me, and hence it is that two middle- aged gentlemen are flying
we st ward at fifty miles an hour instead of quietly di gest ing their
breakfa sts at hom e.”

“I am afra id ,” said I, “that the facts are so obvious that you will
find little credit to be gained out of this case.”

“There is nothing more de ce pti ve than an obvious fac t,” he answered,
laughing. “B es ides, we may chance to hit upon some other obvious facts
which may have been by no means obvious to Mr. Lestra de. You know me
too well to think that I am bo ast ing when I say that I shall either
con firm or destroy his theory by means which he is quite in capable of
emplo ying, or even of understand ing. To take the first example to hand,
I very clearly perceive that in your bedroom the window is upon the
right - hand side, and yet I question whether Mr. Lestrade would have
no ted even so self- evident a thing as that.”

“How on earth —”

“My dear fellow, I know you well. I know the mil itary neat ness which
characteri ses you. You s have every morning, and in this seas on you
s have by the sun light ; but since your sha ving is less and less complete
as we get farther back on the left side, until it becomes positi vely
slo ven ly as we get round the angle of the jaw , it is sure ly very clear
that that side is less ill um in ated than the other. I could not imagine
a man of your hab its looking at himself in an equ al light and being
satisfied with such a result. I only qu o te this as a trivial example of
observation and infer ence. Th ere in lies my m é ti er, and it is just
possible that it may be of some service in the investigation which lies
before us. There are one or two min or points which were brought out in
the in qu est, and which are worth consider ing.”

“What are they?”

“It appears that his ar rest did not take place at once, but after the
return to Hatherley F arm. On the inspector of constab ul ary in forming
him that he was a prisoner, he remarked that he was not surprised to
hear it, and that it was no more than his deser ts. This observation of
his had the natural effect of re moving any traces of doubt which might
have remained in the minds of the coron er’s jur y.”

“It was a conf essi on,” I ejacul ated.

“No, for it was followed by a prote station of innocen ce.”

“C om ing on the top of such a dam ning series of events, it was at least
a most suspici ous remark .”

“On the contr ar y,” said Holmes, “it is the bright est ri ft which I can
at present see in the clou ds. How ever innocent he might be, he could
not be such an absolute imbe ci le as not to see that the circumstances
were very black against him. Had he appeared surprised at his own
arre st, or fe ig ned indi g nation at it, I should have looked upon it as
high ly suspici ous, because such surprise or anger would not be natural
under the circumstan ces, and yet might appear to be the best po lic y to
a sch em ing man. His fr ank accep t ance of the situation marks him as
either an innocent man, or else as a man of considerable self- re stra int
and fir m ness. As to his remark about his deser ts, it was also not
unnatural if you consider that he stood beside the dead body of his
father, and that there is no doubt that he had that very day so far
forgo tten his fi li al duty as to band y words with him, and ev en,
according to the little girl whose evidence is so important, to raise
his hand as if to strike him. The self- re pro ach and contr ition which
are displa yed in his remark appear to me to be the signs of a heal thy
mind rather than of a guil ty one.”

I shook my head. “M any men have been hang ed on far sli gh ter evid ence ,”
I remarked.

“So they ha ve. And many men have been wrong fully hang ed.”

“What is the young man’s own account of the matter?”

“It is, I am afra id, not very en cou raging to his suppor ters, though
there are one or two points in it which are suggesti ve. You will find
it here, and may read it for yourself.”

He picked out from his bundle a copy of the local Here for d shire paper,
and having turned down the sheet he pointed out the paragraph in which
the unfortunate young man had given his own statement of what had
occurred. I settled myself down in the corner of the carriage and read
it very care fully. It ran in this way:

“Mr. James McCarthy, the only son of the de ce a sed, was then called and
gave evidence as follow s: ‘I had been away from home for three days at
Bristol , and had only just returned upon the morning of last Mon day,
the 3 r d. My father was ab sent from home at the time of my arri v al, and
I was informed by the maid that he had driven over to Ross with John
Cob b, the g room. Shor tly after my return I heard the wheels of his trap
in the yard, and, looking out of my window, I saw him get out and walk
rapidly out of the yard, though I was not aware in which direction he
was go ing. I then took my gun and st rolled out in the direction of the
Boscombe Pool, with the intention of visit ing the rabbit war r en which
is upon the other side. On my way I saw William C row der, the
game- keeper, as he had stated in his evid ence; but he is mistaken in
thinking that I was following my father. I had no idea that he was in
front of me. When about a hundred yards from the pool I heard a cry of
“C ooee !” which was a usual signal between my father and myself. I then
hurried forward, and found him standing by the poo l. He appeared to be
much surprised at seeing me and asked me rather rough ly what I was
doing there. A conversation en sued which led to high words and almost
to bl ows, for my father was a man of a very violent temper . S ee ing that
his passion was be coming un gover n able, I left him and returned towards
Hatherley F arm. I had not gone more than 15 0 yards, however, when I
heard a hideous out cry behind me, which caused me to run back again. I
found my father ex pir ing upon the ground, with his head terribly
inj ure d. I dropped my gun and held him in my arms, but he almost
instantly ex pi red. I kn el t beside him for some minutes, and then made
my way to Mr. Turner ’s lodge- keeper, his house being the near est, to
ask for assistan ce. I saw no one near my father when I returned, and I
have no idea how he came by his inju ries. He was not a pop ular man,
being somewhat cold and for bi dding in his manner s, but he had, as far
as I know, no active en emi es. I know nothing further of the matter .’

“The Coroner: Did your father make any statement to you before he di ed ?

“Witness: He mum bled a few words, but I could only catch some allusion
to a rat.

“The Coroner: What did you understand by that?

“Witness: It conveyed no meaning to me. I thought that he was
deliri ous.

“The Coroner: What was the point upon which you and your father had
this fin al quarrel ?

“Witness: I should prefer not to answ er.

“The Coroner: I am afraid that I must press it.

“Witness: It is really impossible for me to tell you. I can assure you
that it has nothing to do with the sad tragedy which follow ed.

“The Coroner: That is for the court to de cid e. I need not point out to
you that your refu sa l to answer will pre ju di ce your case considerably
in any future proce ed ings which may ari se.

“Witness: I must still refu se.

“The Coroner: I understand that the cry of ‘Cooee ’ was a common signal
between you and your father ?

“Witness: It was.

“The Coroner: How was it, then, that he uttered it before he saw you,
and before he even knew that you had returned from Bristol ?

“Wit ness ( with considerable conf usion ) : I do not know.

“A J ur y man : Did you see nothing which ar ou sed your suspicions when you
returned on hearing the cry and found your father fat ally inj ure d?

“Witness: Nothing definit e.

“The Coroner: What do you mean?

“Witness: I was so disturbed and excited as I rushed out into the open,
that I could think of nothing except of my father. Yet I have a vague
impression that as I ran forward something lay upon the ground to the
left of me. It seemed to me to be something grey in colour, a coat of
some sort, or a p laid perhap s. When I rose from my father I looked
round for it, but it was gone.

“‘ Do you mean that it disappeared before you went for help ?’

“‘Yes, it was gone .’

“‘You cannot say what it was ?’

“‘No, I had a feeling something was there .’

“‘ How far from the bod y?’

“‘ A dozen yards or so.’

“‘And how far from the edge of the wood ?’

“‘ About the sa me .’

“‘Then if it was removed it was while you were within a dozen yards of
it ?’

“‘Yes, but with my back towards it.’

“This concl uded the examination of the wit nes s.”

“I see,” said I as I glanced down the colum n, “that the coroner in his
concl uding remarks was rather sev ere upon young McCarthy. He calls
attention, and with reason, to the discre p ancy about his father having
sign all ed to him before seeing him, also to his refu sa l to give details
of his conversation with his father, and his singular account of his
father’s dying words. They are all, as he remar ks, very much against
the son .”

Holmes laughed sof tly to himself and stretched himself out upon the
cus hi oned se at. “ Both you and the coroner have been at some pain s,”
said he, “to single out the very strong est points in the young man’s
fav our. Don’t you see that you alter nat ely give him credit for having
too much imagin ation and too litt le ? Too little, if he could not invent
a cause of quarrel which would give him the sympathy of the jur y; too
much, if he ev ol ved from his own inner conscious ness anything so
ou tr é as a dying reference to a rat , and the incident of the
vani shing clo th. No, sir, I shall approach this case from the point of
view that what this young man says is true, and we shall see whi ther
that hypothes is will lead us. And now here is my pocket Pe tr ar ch, and
not another word shall I say of this case until we are on the scene of
action. We lunch at S win don , and I see that we shall be there in twenty
minut es.”

It was nearly four o’clock when we at last, after passing through the
beautiful S trou d V alle y, and over the broad gle am ing S ever n, found
ourselves at the pretty little country- town of Ro ss. A lean ,
fer re t- like man, fur tive and sl y- looking, was waiting for us upon the
plat form. In spite of the light brown du st coat and leather- le gg ings
which he wore in de fer ence to his ru stic sur round ings, I had no
difficulty in recogni sing Lestrade, of Scotland Y ard. With him we drove
to the Here ford Ar ms where a room had already been engaged for us.

“I have ordered a carri ag e,” said Lestrade as we sat over a cup of te a.
“I knew your energetic nature, and that you would not be happy until
you had been on the scene of the crime.”

“It was very nice and complim ent ary of you,” Holmes answered. “It is
entirely a question of bar om et ric pres sure .”

Lestrade looked start led. “I do not quite follow ,” he said.

“How is the glas s? Tw ent y- n ine, I see. No win d, and not a cloud in the
sk y. I have a case ful of cigaret t es here which need smo king, and the
sofa is very much sup eri or to the usual country hotel ab omin ation. I do
not think that it is probable that I shall use the carriage to-night .”

Lestrade laughed indul gent ly. “You have, no doubt, already formed your
conclusions from the news paper s,” he said. “The case is as plain as a
pi ke staff , and the more one goes into it the pla in er it be com es. Still,
of course, one can’t ref use a lady, and such a very positive one, too.
She has heard of you, and would have your opinion, though I repe at ed ly
told her that there was nothing which you could do which I had not
already done. Why, bless my soul ! here is her carriage at the door.”

He had hardly spoken before there rushed into the room one of the most
lovely young women that I have ever seen in my life. Her vi o let eyes
shin ing, her lips par ted, a p ink flush upon her cheeks, all thought of
her natural re serve lost in her over power ing excit ement and concer n.

“Oh, Mr. Sherlock Holmes!” she cried, glancing from one to the other of
us, and finally, with a woman’s quick in tu ition, fast ening upon my
companion, “I am so glad that you have come. I have driven down to tell
you so. I know that James didn’t do it. I know it, and I want you to
start upon your work knowing it, too. Never let yourself doubt upon
that point. We have known each other since we were little children, and
I know his faul ts as no one else does; but he is too ten der- hearted to
hurt a fl y. Such a charge is absur d to anyone who really knows him.”

“I hope we may clear him, Miss Turner ,” said Sherlock Holmes. “You may
rely upon my doing all that I can.”

“But you have read the evid ence. You have formed some conclusion ? Do
you not see some loo pho le, some f law ? Do you not yourself think that he
is innocent ?”

“I think that it is very prob able.”

“Th ere, now!” she cried, throwing back her head and looking de fi antly
at Lestra de. “You hear ! He gives me hop es.”

Lestrade shrugged his shoulders. “I am afraid that my colleag ue has
been a little quick in forming his conclusion s,” he said.

“But he is right. O h! I know that he is right. James never did it. And
about his quarrel with his father, I am sure that the reason why he
would not speak about it to the coroner was because I was concerned in
it.”

“In what way ?” asked Holmes.

“It is no time for me to hide anything. James and his father had many
disa gre em ents about me. Mr. McCarthy was very anxious that there should
be a marriage between us. James and I have always loved each other as
brother and sister ; but of course he is young and has seen very little
of life yet, and — and —well, he naturally did not wish to do anything
like that yet. So there were quarrel s, and this, I am sure, was one of
them.”

“And your father?” asked Holmes. “Was he in favour of such a un ion ?”

“No, he was averse to it al so. No one but Mr. McCarthy was in favour of
it.” A quick bl ush passed over her fresh young face as Holmes shot one
of his ke en, questioning glan ces at her.

“Thank you for this in form ation ,” said he. “ May I see your father if I
call to-morrow ?”

“I am afraid the doctor won’t allow it.”

“The doctor ?”

“Yes, have you not he ard ? Poor father has never been strong for years
back, but this has broken him down completely. He has taken to his bed,
and Dr. Will ows says that he is a wreck and that his nervous system is
shat ter ed. Mr. McCarthy was the only man alive who had known dad in the
old days in Victori a.”

“Ha! In Victori a ! That is importan t.”

“Yes, at the min es.”

“Quite so; at the gol d- min es, wher e, as I understand, Mr. Turner made
his money.”

“Yes, certain ly.”

“Thank you, Miss Turner. You have been of materi al assistance to me.”

“You will tell me if you have any news to-mor r ow. No doubt you will go
to the prison to see Jam es. Oh, if you do, Mr. Holmes, do tell him that
I know him to be innocent .”

“I will, Miss Turner .”

“I must go home now, for dad is very i ll, and he mis ses me so if I
leave him. Good- by e, and God help you in your underta king.” She hurried
from the room as impul si vely as she had entered, and we heard the
wheels of her carriage rattle off down the street.

“I am ashamed of you, Holmes,” said Lestrade with dign ity after a few
minut es’ sil ence. “Why should you raise up hop es which you are bound to
disappoint ? I am not over- ten der of heart, but I call it cruel .”

“I think that I see my way to clearing James McCarth y,” said Holmes.
“Have you an order to see him in prison ?”

“Yes, but only for you and me.”

“Then I shall re consider my re solution about going out. We have still
time to take a train to Here ford and see him to-night?”

“A mp le.”

“Then let us do so. Watson, I fear that you will find it very slow, but
I shall only be away a couple of hour s.”

I walked down to the station with them, and then wandered through the
streets of the little town, finally returning to the hotel, where I lay
upon the sofa and tried to interest myself in a yell ow- backed nov el .
The pun y pl ot of the story was so thin, however, when compar ed to the
deep mystery through which we were g rop ing, and I found my attention
wand er so continually from the action to the fact, that I at last flung
it across the room and gave myself up entirely to a consideration of
the events of the day. S up posing that this unhappy young man’s story
were absolutely true, then what he lli sh thing, what absolutely
unforeseen and extraordinary cal am ity could have occurred between the
time when he parted from his father, and the moment when, drawn back by
his screa m s, he rushed into the gla de ? It was something terrible and
dead ly. What could it be? Might not the nature of the inju ries reve al
something to my medical instin ct s? I rang the bell and called for the
week ly county paper, which con tained a ver b ati m account of the in qu est .
In the surge on ’s de position it was stated that the po ster i or third of
the left par i et al b one and the left half of the oc ci pit al b one had been
shattered by a heavy blow from a blunt weap on. I marked the sp ot upon
my own head. C le arly such a blow must have been struck from behind.
That was to some ex tent in favour of the ac cu sed, as when seen
quarre lling he was face to face with his father. Still, it did not go
for very much, for the older man might have turned his back before the
blow fe ll. Still, it might be worth while to call Holmes’ attention to
it. Then there was the peculiar dying reference to a rat. What could
that mean? It could not be deliri um. A man dying from a sudden blow
does not comm only become deliri ous. No, it was more likely to be an
attempt to explain how he met his f ate. But what could it indicat e? I
c ud ge lled my brains to find some possible explanation. And then the
incident of the grey cloth seen by young McCarthy. If that were true
the murder er must have dropped some part of his dress, presum ably his
over coat, in his flight, and must have had the har di hood to return and
to carry it away at the instant when the son was kne eling with his back
turned not a dozen pac es off. What a ti s sue of myster ies and
im probabil ities the whole thing was ! I did not wonder at Lestrade ’s
opinion, and yet I had so much faith in Sherlock Holmes’ in sight that I
could not lose hope as long as every fresh fact seemed to streng then
his conviction of young McCarth y’s innocen ce.

It was late before Sherlock Holmes retur ned. He came back alone, for
Lestrade was staying in lodgings in the town.

“The glass still keeps very high ,” he remarked as he sat down. “It is
of importance that it should not rain before we are able to go over the
ground. On the other hand, a man should be at his very best and keenest
for such nice work as that, and I did not wish to do it when fagged by
a long journe y. I have seen young McCarth y.”

“And what did you learn from him?”

“Noth ing.”

“C ould he throw no light ?”

“None at all. I was inclined to think at one time that he knew who had
done it and was scre ening him or her, but I am convinced now that he is
as puzzled as everyone else. He is not a very qui ck- w itted youth,
though com ely to look at and, I should think, sound at hear t.”

“I cannot admir e his ta ste ,” I remarked, “if it is indeed a fact that
he was averse to a marriage with so charming a young lady as this Miss
Turner .”

“Ah, there by hang s a rather painful ta le. This fellow is ma d ly,
in san ely, in love with her, but some two years ago, when he was only a
la d, and before he really knew her, for she had been away five years at
a board ing- school, what does the idi ot do but get into the clut ches of
a bar maid in Bristol and marry her at a regi str y offi ce ? No one knows a
word of the matter, but you can imagine how ma dd ening it must be to him
to be up bra ided for not doing what he would give his very eyes to do,
but what he knows to be absolutely im possible. It was she er fr en zy of
this sort which made him throw his hands up into the air when his
father, at their last inter view, was go ad ing him on to pro pose to Miss
Turner. On the other hand, he had no means of suppor ting himself, and
his father, who was by all accounts a very hard man, would have thrown
him over utterly had he known the truth. It was with his bar maid wife
that he had spent the last three days in Bristol , and his father did
not know where he was. Mark that point. It is of importance. G ood has
come out of ev il, however, for the bar maid, finding from the papers
that he is in serious trouble and likely to be hang ed, has thrown him
over utterly and has written to him to say that she has a husband
already in the Ber mu da Do ck yard, so that there is really no tie between
them. I think that that bit of news has con sol ed young McCarthy for all
that he has suffer ed.”

“But if he is innocent, who has done it?”

“Ah! who ? I would call your attention very particularly to two poin ts.
One is that the murdered man had an appointment with someone at the
poo l, and that the someone could not have been his son, for his son was
away, and he did not know when he would retur n. The second is that the
murdered man was heard to cry ‘Cooee!’ before he knew that his son had
retur ned. Those are the cru cial points upon which the case depen ds. And
now let us talk about George Mer e di th, if you please, and we shall
leave all min or matters until to-morrow .”

There was no rain, as Holmes had for et old, and the morning broke bright
and clou d less. At nine o’clock Lestrade called for us with the
carriage, and we set off for Hatherley Farm and the Boscombe Poo l.

“There is serious news this morn ing,” Lestrade observed. “It is said
that Mr. Turner, of the Ha ll, is so ill that his life is despair ed of.”

“A n elderly man, I presume?” said Holmes.

“A bout six t y; but his con st itu tion has been shattered by his life
ab road, and he has been in fa iling heal th for some time. This business
has had a very bad effect upon him. He was an old friend of McCarth y ’s,
and, I may ad d, a great bene factor to him, for I have learned that he
gave him Hatherley Farm r ent fre e.”

“Indeed! That is interest ing,” said Holmes.

“Oh, y es! In a hundred other ways he has helped him. Everybody about
here spea ks of his kindness to him.”

“Re all y! Does it not strike you as a little singular that this
McCarthy, who appears to have had little of his own, and to have been
under such obli g ations to Turner, should still talk of mar rying his son
to Turner ’s daugh ter, who is, presum ab ly, he ire ss to the estate, and
that in such a very cock sure manner, as if it were merely a case of a
pro po sa l and all else would follow ? It is the more strange, since we
know that Turner himself was averse to the idea. The daughter told us
as much. Do you not deduce something from that?”

“We have got to the dedu ctions and the infer en c es,” said Lestrade,
win king at me. “I find it hard enough to tackle facts, Holmes, without
flying away after theor ies and fanci es.”

“You are right,” said Holmes de mu rel y; “you do find it very hard to
tackle the fac ts.”

“ Any how, I have grasped one fact which you seem to find it difficult to
get hold of ,” re plied Lestrade with some warm th.

“And that is —”

“That McCarthy sen i or met his death from McCarthy j uni or and that all
theor ies to the contr ary are the mer est moon shin e.”

“Well, moon sh ine is a bri gh ter thing than fog ,” said Holmes, laughing.
“But I am very much mistaken if this is not Hatherley Farm upon the
lef t.”

“Yes, that is it.” It was a wi des prea d, comfort ab le- looking building,
two- stor i ed, sl at e- roo fe d, with great yellow blot ches of li ch en upon
the grey wall s. The drawn blinds and the smoke less chim ne ys, however,
gave it a stri ck en look, as though the weight of this horror still lay
heavy upon it. We called at the door, when the maid, at Holmes’
request, showed us the boots which her master wore at the time of his
death, and also a pair of the son ’s, though not the pair which he had
then had. Having meas ured these very carefully from seven or eight
different poin ts, Holmes desir ed to be led to the cour t- yard, from
which we all followed the winding track which led to Boscombe Poo l.

Sherlock Holmes was trans formed when he was hot upon such a sc ent as
this. M en who had only known the quiet thin ker and logi ci an of Baker
Street would have failed to recognise him. His face flushed and
dar ken ed. His br ows were drawn into two hard black lin es, while his
eyes shone out from beneath them with a ste ely gl it ter. His face was
bent down ward, his shoulders bow ed, his lips com pres sed, and the ve ins
stood out like whi p cord in his long, sin e w y ne ck. His nostrils seemed
to di late with a purely animal l ust for the cha se, and his mind was so
absolutely con centr ated upon the matter before him that a question or
remark fell un he eded upon his ear s, or, at the mo st, only pro vo ked a
quick, impati ent snar l in re pl y. S wi f tly and sil ently he made his way
along the track which ran through the me ad ows, and so by way of the
woods to the Boscombe Poo l. It was da mp, mar sh y ground, as is all that
distri ct, and there were marks of many feet, both upon the path and
amid the short grass which b ounded it on either side. Sometimes Holmes
would hurry on, sometimes stop dead, and once he made quite a little
de t our into the me ad ow. Lestrade and I walked behind him, the detective
in different and con temp tu ous, while I watched my friend with the
interest which sprang from the conviction that every one of his acti ons
was dire cted towards a definite end.

The Boscombe Pool, which is a little re ed- gir t sheet of water some
fifty yards acro ss, is situ ated at the b ound ary between the Hatherley
Farm and the private park of the weal thy Mr. Turner. A bo ve the woods
which lined it upon the farther side we could see the red, j ut ting
pin n ac les which marked the site of the rich land own er’s d well ing. On
the Hatherley side of the pool the woods grew very thick, and there was
a narrow be lt of so dden grass twenty pac es across between the edge of
the trees and the ree ds which lined the la ke. Lestrade showed us the
exact sp ot at which the body had been found, and, indeed, so mo ist was
the ground, that I could plainly see the traces which had been left by
the fall of the stri ck en man. To Holmes, as I could see by his eager
face and peering eyes, very many other things were to be read upon the
tra m pled gras s. He ran round, like a dog who is picking up a sc ent, and
then turned upon my companion.

“What did you go into the pool for?” he asked.

“I fished about with a ra ke. I thought there might be some weapon or
other trac e. But how on earth —”

“Oh, tu t, tut ! I have no time ! That left foot of yours with its in ward
twist is all over the place. A mo le could trace it, and there it
van is hes among the re ed s. Oh, how simple it would all have been had I
been here before they came like a her d of bu ff al o and wall owed all over
it. Here is where the party with the lodge- keeper ca me, and they have
covered all tracks for six or eight feet round the body. But here are
three separate tracks of the same fe et.” He drew out a lens and lay
down upon his water proof to have a better view, talking all the time
rather to himself than to us. “Th ese are young McCarth y’s fe et. Twice
he was wal king, and once he ran swif tly, so that the so les are deeply
marked and the heels hardly visi ble. That bears out his story. He ran
when he saw his father on the ground. Then here are the father’s feet
as he paced up and down. What is this, then? It is the but t- end of the
gun as the son stood listening. And this ? Ha , ha ! What have we her e?
T i p to es! tipto es! Square, too, quite unusual boo t s! They come, they go,
they come again— of course that was for the cloa k. Now where did they
come from?” He ran up and down, sometimes lo sing, sometimes finding the
track until we were well within the edge of the wood and under the
shadow of a great bee ch, the largest tree in the neighbourhoo d. Holmes
traced his way to the farther side of this and lay down once more upon
his face with a little cry of satisfac tion. For a long time he remained
there, turning over the leaves and dried sti cks, ga thering up what
seemed to me to be dust into an envelope and examining with his lens
not only the ground but even the bark of the tree as far as he could
reach. A j agged stone was lying among the mo ss, and this also he
carefully examined and re tain ed. Then he followed a pa th way through the
wood until he came to the high road, where all traces were lost.

“It has been a case of considerable interest ,” he remarked, returning
to his natural manner. “I fancy that this grey house on the right must
be the lodg e. I think that I will go in and have a word with Mor an, and
perhaps write a little note. Having done that, we may drive back to our
lun che on. You may walk to the cab, and I shall be with you present ly.”

It was about ten minutes before we reg ain ed our cab and drove back into
Ross, Holmes still carrying with him the stone which he had picked up
in the woo d.

“This may interest you, Lestrade ,” he remarked, holding it out. “The
mur der was done with it.”

“I see no mar k s.”

“There are none.”

“How do you know, then?”

“The grass was gr owing under it. It had only lain there a few days.
There was no sign of a place whence it had been ta k en. It correspon ds
with the inju ries. There is no sign of any other weap on.”

“And the murder er?”

“Is a tall man, left- han ded, lim ps with the right leg, we ars
thi ck- sol ed shoo ting- boots and a grey cloa k, smo kes Indian cig ars, u ses
a cigar - hol der, and carries a blunt pen -kni fe in his pocket. There are
several other indic ations, but these may be enough to aid us in our
sear ch.”

Lestrade laughed. “I am afraid that I am still a s ce pti c ,” he said.
“ The or ies are all very well, but we have to deal with a hard -headed
British jur y.”

“N ous ver r on s,” answered Holmes cal m ly. “You work your own metho d,
and I shall work mine. I shall be busy this afternoon, and shall
probably return to London by the evening tra in.”

“And leave your case un finishe d?”

“No, finishe d.”

“But the myster y?”

“It is sol v ed.”

“Who was the crimin al, then?”

“The gentleman I descri be.”

“But who is he?”

“S urely it would not be difficult to find out. This is not such a
pop ul ous neighbourhoo d.”

Lestrade shrugged his shoulders. “I am a practical man,” he said, “and
I really cannot under take to go about the country looking for a
left- handed gentleman with a game leg. I should become the
laugh ing- stock of Scotland Y ard.”

“All right,” said Holmes quietly. “I have given you the chance. Here
are your lodg ings. Good- by e. I shall drop you a line before I lea ve.”

Having left Lestrade at his rooms, we drove to our hotel, where we
found lunch upon the table. Holmes was silent and buried in thought
with a pain ed expression upon his face, as one who finds himself in a
perplex ing position.

“Look here, Watson,” he said when the cloth was cleared “ just sit down
in this chair and let me prea ch to you for a little. I don’t know quite
what to do, and I should value your advi ce. L ight a cigar and let me
ex pound .”

“Pray do so.”

“Well, now, in consider ing this case there are two points about young
McCarth y’s narrative which struck us both instan tly, although they
impressed me in his favour and you against him. One was the fact that
his father shoul d, according to his accoun t, cry ‘Cooee!’ before seeing
him. The other was his singular dying reference to a rat. He mum bled
several words, you understand, but that was all that caught the son’s
ear. Now from this double point our re search must comm ence, and we will
begin it by presum ing that what the lad says is absolutely tru e.”

“What of this ‘Cooee!’ then?”

“Well, obvi ously it could not have been meant for the son. The son, as
far as he knew, was in Bristol . It was mere chance that he was within
ear shot. The ‘Cooee!’ was meant to at trac t the attention of whoever it
was that he had the appointment with. But ‘Cooee ’ is a distinctly
Australi an cry, and one which is used between Australi ans. There is a
strong presu mp tion that the person whom McCarthy expected to meet him
at Boscombe P ool was someone who had been in Australi a.”

“What of the rat , then?”

Sherlock Holmes took a folded paper from his pocket and fl attened it
out on the table. “This is a ma p of the Col ony of Victori a,” he said.
“I wi red to Bristol for it last night.” He put his hand over part of
the ma p. “What do you read ?”

“A RA T ,” I rea d.

“And now?” He raised his hand.

“B AL L AR AT .”

“Quite so. That was the word the man ut ter ed, and of which his son only
caught the last two sy ll able s. He was trying to utter the name of his
murder er. So and so, of Ballar at.”

“It is wonder ful !” I ex cla i med.

“It is obvious. And now, you see, I had narr owed the field down
consider ab ly. The possession of a grey garm ent was a third point which,
gran ting the son’s statement to be correct, was a certainty. We have
come now out of mere vag u eness to the definite conce ption of an
Australi an from Ballarat with a grey cloa k.”

“Certainly.”

“And one who was at home in the distri ct, for the pool can only be
approached by the farm or by the estate, where strang ers could hardly
wand er.”

“Quite so.”

“Then comes our exped ition of to- day. By an examination of the ground I
gained the trifling details which I gave to that imbe ci le Lestrade, as
to the person ality of the crimin al.”

“But how did you gain them?”

“You know my metho d. It is founded upon the observation of tri fle s.”

“His he ight I know that you might rough ly judge from the length of his
stri de. His boots, too, might be told from their trac es.”

“Yes, they were peculiar boo ts.”

“But his la men ess ?”

“The impression of his right foot was always less distinct than his
left. He put less weight upon it. Wh y? Because he lim pe d— he was la me.”

“But his left- han de dn es s.”

“You were yourself struck by the nature of the inj ury as recor ded by
the surge on at the in qu est . The blow was struck from immediately
behind, and yet was upon the left side. Now, how can that be unless it
were by a left- handed man? He had stood behind that tree during the
inter view between the father and son. He had even smoked there. I found
the ash of a cig ar, which my special knowledge of tobacco ashes en ables
me to pr on ounce as an Indian cig ar. I have, as you know, devoted some
attention to this, and written a little monogra ph on the ashes of 1 4 0
different vari e ties of pipe, cig ar, and cigaret te tobacco. Having found
the ash, I then looked round and discovered the stump among the mo ss
where he had tossed it. It was an Indian cig ar, of the vari ety which
are rolled in Ro t ter dam .”

“And the cigar - hol der ?”

“I could see that the end had not been in his mou th. Th ere fore he used
a hol der. The ti p had been cut off, not b itten off, but the cut was not
a clean one, so I deduced a blunt pen -kni fe .”

“Holmes,” I said, “you have drawn a net round this man from which he
cannot escap e, and you have saved an innocent human life as tru ly as if
you had cut the cord which was hanging him. I see the direction in
which all this poin ts. The cul pr it is —”

“Mr. John Turner ,” cried the hotel wait er, opening the door of our
sitting-room, and us her ing in a visitor.

The man who entered was a strange and impressi ve figu re. His slow,
li mp ing step and bowed shoulders gave the appearance of de cre pit ud e,
and yet his hard, deep - lin ed, cra gg y feature s, and his enormous limbs
showed that he was possessed of unusual strength of body and of
character. His tangled be ard, grizzled hair, and out stand ing, drooping
eyebr ows comb ined to give an air of dign ity and power to his
appear ance, but his face was of an ash en white, while his lips and the
cor n ers of his nostrils were ting ed with a shade of blu e. It was clear
to me at a glance that he was in the grip of some deadly and ch r onic
disea se.

“Pray sit down on the sof a,” said Holmes gent ly. “You had my note ?”

“Yes, the lodge- keeper brought it up. You said that you wished to see
me here to avo id scand al.”

“I thought people would talk if I went to the H all.”

“And why did you wish to see me?” He looked across at my companion with
des pair in his weary eyes, as though his question was already answered.

“Yes,” said Holmes, answer ing the look rather than the words. “It is
so. I know all about McCarth y.”

The old man sank his face in his hands. “God help me!” he cried. “But I
would not have let the young man come to harm. I give you my word that
I would have spoken out if it went against him at the Assiz es.”

“I am glad to hear you say so,” said Holmes gravely.

“I would have spoken now had it not been for my dear girl. It would
break her hear t— it will break her heart when she hears that I am
arre st ed.”

“It may not come to that,” said Holmes.

“What ?”

“I am no official ag ent. I understand that it was your daughter who
required my presence here, and I am acting in her interest s. Young
McCarthy must be got off, how ever .”

“I am a dying man,” said old Turner. “I have had dia bet es for years. My
doctor says it is a question whether I shall live a mon th. Yet I would
rather die under my own roof than in a ga ol .”

Holmes rose and sat down at the table with his pen in his hand and a
bundle of paper before him. “Just tell us the tru th ,” he said. “I shall
j ot down the facts. You will sign it, and Watson here can wit ness it.
Then I could produce your conf ession at the last extre m ity to save
young McCarthy. I promise you that I shall not use it unless it is
absolutely nee de d.”

“It’s as well ,” said the old man; “it’s a question whether I shall live
to the Assiz es, so it matters little to me, but I should wish to spare
Alice the sho ck. And now I will make the thing clear to you; it has
been a long time in the ac ting, but will not take me long to tell.

“You didn’t know this dead man, McCarthy. He was a devil in car nat e. I
tell you that. God keep you out of the clut ches of such a man as he.
His grip has been upon me these twenty years, and he has bla sted my
life. I’ll tell you first how I came to be in his pow er.

“It was in the early ’ 6 0 ’s at the di gg ings. I was a young chap then,
ho t- bloo ded and reck less, ready to turn my hand at any thing; I got
among bad companion s, took to drink, had no luck with my claim , took to
the bus h, and in a word became what you would call over here a high way
robber . There were six of us, and we had a wild, free life of it,
sticking up a station from time to time, or stopping the wag ons on the
road to the di gg ings. Bl ack Jack of Ballarat was the name I went un der,
and our party is still remembered in the col ony as the Ballarat Gang .

“One day a gold con vo y came down from Ballarat to M el bour n e, and we lay
in wait for it and att ac ked it. There were six tr oo per s and six of us,
so it was a close thing, but we emp tied four of their sadd les at the
first vo lle y. Three of our boys were killed, however, before we got the
swa g. I put my pistol to the head of the wag on- d river, who was this
very man McCarthy. I wish to the Lord that I had shot him then, but I
sp ared him, though I saw his wicked little eyes fixed on my face, as
though to remember every feat ure. We got away with the gold, became
weal thy men, and made our way over to England without being suspe cted.
There I parted from my old p als and determined to settle down to a
quiet and respectable life. I bought this estate, which chan ced to be
in the marke t, and I set myself to do a little good with my money, to
make up for the way in which I had ear ned it. I married, too, and
though my wife died young she left me my dear little Ali ce. Even when
she was just a bab y her we e hand seemed to lead me down the right path
as nothing else had ever done. In a word, I turned over a new leaf and
did my best to make up for the pa st. All was going well when McCarthy
laid his grip upon me.

“I had gone up to town about an invest ment, and I met him in Re gent
Street with hardly a coat to his back or a boot to his foot.

“‘ Here we are, Jack ,’ says he, tou ching me on the arm ; ‘ we’ll be as
good as a family to you. There’s two of us, me and my son, and you can
have the keeping of us. If you don ’t —it’s a fin e, law - ab id ing country
is England, and there’s always a police man within ha il .’

“Well, down they came to the west country, there was no shaking them
off, and there they have lived r ent free on my best land ever since.
There was no rest for me, no peac e, no for get ful nes s; turn where I
would, there was his c un ning, gr inning face at my elb ow. It grew worse
as Alice grew up, for he soon saw I was more afraid of her knowing my
past than of the police. W hat ever he wanted he must have, and whatever
it was I gave him without question, land, money, houses, until at last
he asked a thing which I could not gi ve. He asked for Ali ce.

“His son, you see, had gr own up, and so had my girl, and as I was known
to be in weak heal th, it seemed a fine stro ke to him that his lad
should step into the whole proper ty. But there I was fir m. I would not
have his cur sed stock mixed with min e; not that I had any dis like to
the la d, but his blood was in him, and that was enough. I stood fir m.
McCarthy threat en ed. I bra ved him to do his wor st. We were to meet at
the pool mid way between our houses to talk it over.

“When I went down there I found him talking with his son, so I smoked a
cigar and waited behind a tree until he should be alone. But as I
listened to his talk all that was black and bitter in me seemed to come
up per most. He was ur ging his son to marry my daughter with as little
regard for what she might think as if she were a sl ut from off the
street s. It drove me mad to think that I and all that I held most dear
should be in the power of such a man as this. Could I not sna p the
bon d? I was already a dying and a desper ate man. Th ough clear of mind
and fairly strong of lim b, I knew that my own fate was sea led. But my
memor y and my girl ! Both could be saved if I could but silence that
foul tong ue. I did it, Mr. Holmes. I would do it again. De ep ly as I
have sin ned, I have led a life of mar ty r dom to at one for it. But that
my girl should be ent ang led in the same mes hes which held me was more
than I could suff er. I struck him down with no more comp unction than if
he had been some foul and ven om ous bea st. His cry brought back his son ;
but I had gained the cover of the woo d, though I was forced to go back
to fetch the cloak which I had dropped in my f light. That is the true
story, gentlemen, of all that occur re d.”

“Well, it is not for me to judge you,” said Holmes as the old man
signed the statement which had been drawn out. “I pray that we may
never be exposed to such a temp t ation.”

“I pray not, sir. And what do you in tend to do?”

“In view of your heal th, nothing. You are yourself aware that you will
soon have to answer for your deed at a higher court than the Assizes. I
will keep your conf essi on, and if McCarthy is con dem ned I shall be
forced to use it. If not, it shall never be seen by mor tal eye ; and
your secret, whether you be alive or dead, shall be safe with us.”

“F ar e well, then,” said the old man solem n ly. “Your own death bed s, when
they come, will be the easier for the thought of the pe ace which you
have given to min e.” To t tering and shaking in all his gi ant fra me, he
stum bled slowly from the room.

“God help us !” said Holmes after a long sil ence. “Why does fate play
such tri cks with poor, help less wor m s? I never hear of such a case as
this that I do not think of Ba x ter ’s words, and say, ‘ There, but for
the grace of God, goes Sherlock Holmes .’”

James McCarthy was acqu itted at the Assiz es on the strength of a number
of objections which had been drawn out by Holmes and submitted to the
def ending coun sel . Old Turner lived for seven months after our
inter view, but he is now dead ; and there is every pro spe ct that the son
and daughter may come to live ha ppi ly together in ignor ance of the
black cloud which re sts upon their pa st.




V. THE F IV E OR AN G E P I P S


When I glance over my notes and records of the Sherlock Holmes cases
between the years ’8 2 and ’ 9 0, I am faced by so many which present
strange and interesting features that it is no easy matter to know
which to choose and which to lea ve. S ome, however, have already gained
public ity through the papers, and others have not offered a field for
those peculiar qual ities which my friend possessed in so high a de gre e,
and which it is the object of these papers to ill ustr ate. S ome, too,
have b aff led his anal y tical ski ll, and would be, as narrati ves,
beg in nings without an end ing, while others have been but parti ally
cleared up, and have their explan ations founded rather upon conjecture
and sur mi se than on that absolute logi cal proof which was so dear to
him. There is, however, one of these last which was so remarkable in
its details and so start ling in its results that I am temp ted to give
some account of it in spite of the fact that there are points in
connection with it which never have been, and probably never will be,
entirely cleared up.

The year ’8 7 furnished us with a long series of cases of greater or
less interest, of which I re tain the recor ds. Am ong my head ings under
this one twelve months I find an account of the adventure of the
Par ad ol C ha m ber, of the A mat e ur Men di can t So ci et y, who held a lu x u ri ous
club in the lower vaul t of a furniture war e house, of the facts
connected with the loss of the British bar qu e Sop h y An der son, of the
singular adventures of the Gri ce P at er sons in the island of U f fa , and
finally of the C am ber well pois oning case. In the lat ter, as may be
remem ber ed, Sherlock Holmes was able, by winding up the dead man’s
watch, to prove that it had been wound up two hours before, and that
therefor e the de ceased had gone to bed within that time —a deduction
which was of the greatest importance in clearing up the case. All these
I may s ketch out at some future dat e, but none of them present such
singular features as the strange train of circumstances which I have
now taken up my pen to descri be.

It was in the latter days of S ep tem ber, and the equ in oc tial ga les had
set in with exceptional viol ence. All day the wind had screamed and the
rain had beaten against the window s, so that even here in the heart of
gre at, hand - made London we were forced to raise our minds for the
instant from the r out ine of life and to recognise the presence of those
great ele ment al for ces which shrie k at man kind through the bars of his
ci vili s ation, like un ta med be ast s in a ca ge. As evening drew in, the
storm grew higher and lou der, and the wind cried and so b bed like a
child in the chim ne y. Sherlock Holmes sat moo dily at one side of the
fire place cross- inde x ing his records of crime, while I at the other was
deep in one of C lar k R us sell ’s fine se a- stor ies until the howl of the
ga le from without seemed to bl end with the tex t, and the spl ash of the
rain to leng then out into the long swa sh of the sea wa ves. My wife was
on a visit to her mother ’s, and for a few days I was a d well er once
more in my old quarters at Baker Street.

“Why,” said I, glancing up at my companion, “that was sure ly the bell.
Who could come to-night ? Some friend of yours, perhap s?”

“Ex cept yourself I have n one,” he answered. “I do not en cou rage
visit or s.”

“A client, then?”

“If so, it is a serious case. Nothing less would bring a man out on
such a day and at such an hour. But I take it that it is more likely to
be some cr ony of the land lady ’s.”

Sherlock Holmes was wrong in his conjec t ure, however, for there came a
step in the passage and a tapping at the door. He stretched out his
long arm to turn the lamp away from himself and towards the vac ant
chair upon which a newcom er must s it.

“Come in !” said he.

The man who entered was young, some two -and- twenty at the outside,
well- g room ed and tri mly cla d, with something of re fin ement and delicac y
in his bear ing. The strea ming um bre ll a which he held in his hand, and
his long shining water proof told of the fierce weather through which he
had come. He looked about him anxi ously in the gl are of the lamp, and I
could see that his face was pale and his eyes heavy, like those of a
man who is weigh ed down with some great anxi et y.

“I owe you an apolog y,” he said, raising his golden pin ce- ne z to his
eyes. “I trust that I am not intr ud ing. I fear that I have brought some
traces of the storm and rain into your snu g cham ber.”

“G ive me your coat and um bre ll a,” said Holmes. “They may rest here on
the hook and will be dry present ly. You have come up from the
sou th- we st, I see.”

“Yes, from Horsha m .”

“That clay and chal k mix ture which I see upon your to e ca ps is quite
distin cti ve.”

“I have come for advi ce.”

“That is easily go t.”

“And help .”

“That is not always so easy.”

“I have heard of you, Mr. Holmes. I heard from Maj or P ren der g ast how
you saved him in the T an ker ville C lu b scand al.”

“Ah, of course. He was wrong fully acc used of che ating at car d s.”

“He said that you could solve any thing.”

“He said too much.”

“That you are never beat en.”

“I have been beaten four tim es— three times by men, and once by a
woman .”

“But what is that compar ed with the number of your succes se s?”

“It is true that I have been generally success ful.”

“Then you may be so with me.”

“I beg that you will draw your chair up to the fire and favour me with
some details as to your case.”

“It is no ordinary one.”

“None of those which come to me are. I am the last court of appe al.”

“And yet I question, sir, whe ther, in all your experience, you have
ever listened to a more mysterious and inex p licable chain of events
than those which have happened in my own fami ly.”

“You fill me with interest ,” said Holmes. “Pray give us the essential
facts from the comm ence ment, and I can afterwards question you as to
those details which seem to me to be most importan t.”

The young man pulled his chair up and pushed his wet feet out towards
the bla ze.

“My name,” said he, “is John Opensha w, but my own affairs have, as far
as I can understand, little to do with this awful business. It is a
hereditary matter ; so in order to give you an idea of the facts, I must
go back to the comm ence ment of the affa ir.

“You must know that my grand father had two son s— my uncle Eli as and my
father Jo se ph . My father had a small factor y at Cov entr y, which he
en lar ged at the time of the in ven tion of bi cy cl ing. He was a pat en te e
of the Openshaw un break able ti re, and his business met with such
succ ess that he was able to sell it and to re tire upon a handsome
compe ten ce.

“My uncle Eli as emi gr ated to America when he was a young man and became
a plan ter in Flor i da , where he was reported to have done very well. At
the time of the w ar he f ought in Jackson’s arm y, and afterwards under
Hoo d, where he rose to be a colone l. When Le e laid down his arms my
uncle returned to his plantation, where he remained for three or four
years. About 18 6 9 or 18 7 0 he came back to Eu rope and took a small
est ate in Sus se x, near Horsha m. He had made a very considerable fortune
in the States, and his reason for leaving them was his aver sion to the
ne gro es, and his dis like of the R ep u bli can po lic y in ex ten ding the
fran chi se to them. He was a singular man, fierce and qui ck- temper ed,
very f oul - mou thed when he was angry, and of a most reti ring
dispos ition. During all the years that he lived at Horsham, I doubt if
ever he set foot in the town. He had a garden and two or three fields
round his house, and there he would take his exer ci se, though very
often for weeks on end he would never leave his room. He drank a great
deal of brandy and smoked very heavi ly, but he would see no society and
did not want any friends, not even his own bro ther.

“He didn’t mind me; in fact, he took a fancy to me, for at the time
when he saw me first I was a young ster of twelve or so. This would be
in the year 18 7 8 , after he had been eight or nine years in England. He
begged my father to let me live with him and he was very kind to me in
his way. When he was so ber he used to be fond of playing back gam m on and
dra ugh ts with me, and he would make me his represent ative both with the
servants and with the trades people, so that by the time that I was
sixteen I was quite master of the house. I kept all the ke ys and could
go where I liked and do what I like d, so long as I did not disturb him
in his priv ac y. There was one singular excepti on, however, for he had a
single room, a lumber- room up among the at ti c s, which was invari ably
locked, and which he would never per mit either me or anyone else to
en ter. With a bo y’s curiosity I have peeped through the ke y hole, but I
was never able to see more than such a collection of old trun ks and
bund les as would be expected in such a room.

“One day —it was in Mar ch, 188 3 —a letter with a for eign stam p lay upon
the table in front of the colone l ’s pl ate. It was not a common thing
for him to receive letters, for his bills were all paid in ready money,
and he had no friends of any sor t. ‘ From Indi a !’ said he as he took it
up, ‘ Pondicher ry post mar k ! What can this be ?’ Open ing it hurried ly, out
there jumped five little dried orange pi ps, which p attered down upon
his pl ate. I began to laugh at this, but the laugh was struck from my
lips at the sight of his face. His lip had fall en, his eyes were
protr ud ing, his skin the colour of put ty, and he gl ared at the envelope
which he still held in his trembling hand, ‘ K. K. K . !’ he shrie ked, and
then, ‘ My God, my God, my sin s have over taken me !’

“‘What is it, uncle ?’ I cried.

“‘ Dea th ,’ said he, and rising from the table he retired to his room,
leaving me pal pit ating with horr or. I took up the envelope and saw
scrawled in red ink upon the inner fla p, just above the g um, the letter
K three times repe ated. There was nothing else save the five dried
pip s. What could be the reason of his over power ing terr or ? I left the
breakfast- table, and as I ascen ded the sta ir I met him coming down with
an old rusty key, which must have belonged to the at ti c, in one hand,
and a small brass bo x, like a cas h bo x, in the other.

“‘ They may do what they like, but I’ll che ck mate them still ,’ said he
with an oa th. ‘ Tell Mary that I shall want a fire in my room to-day,
and send down to For d ha m, the Horsha m lawy er .’

“I did as he order ed, and when the lawyer arrived I was asked to step
up to the room. The fire was burning bright ly, and in the gr ate there
was a m ass of black, flu ffy ash es, as of burned paper, while the brass
box stood open and empty beside it. As I glanced at the box I noticed,
with a start, that upon the lid was printed the tre ble K which I had
read in the morning upon the envelo pe.

“‘I wish you, John ,’ said my uncle, ‘ to wit ness my will. I leave my
estate, with all its advant ages and all its disa d van tag es, to my
bro ther, your father, whence it will, no doubt, des cend to you. If you
can en joy it in peac e, well and goo d! If you find you cannot, take my
advice, my boy, and leave it to your dead liest enem y. I am sorry to
give you such a two- ed ged thing, but I can’t say what turn things are
going to ta ke. Kindly sign the paper where Mr. For d ham shows you.’

“I signed the paper as dire c ted, and the lawyer took it away with him.
The singular incident made, as you may think, the deepest impression
upon me, and I pon dered over it and turned it every way in my mind
without being able to make anything of it. Yet I could not shake off
the vague feeling of d read which it left behind, though the sen sation
grew less keen as the weeks passed and nothing happened to disturb the
usual r out ine of our li ves. I could see a change in my uncle, however.
He drank more than ever, and he was less inclined for any sort of
societ y. Most of his time he would spend in his room, with the door
locked upon the in side, but sometimes he would emer ge in a sort of
drunken fr en zy and would burst out of the house and tear about the
garden with a revolver in his hand, screaming out that he was afraid of
no man, and that he was not to be coo ped up, like a she ep in a pen, by
man or devil . When these hot f its were over, however, he would rush
tum ul tu ously in at the door and lock and bar it behind him, like a man
who can bra z en it out no longer against the terror which lies at the
roo ts of his soul. At such times I have seen his face, even on a cold
day, g listen with moist ure, as though it were new raised from a bas in.

“Well, to come to an end of the matter, Mr. Holmes, and not to ab use
your pati ence, there came a night when he made one of those drunken
sa ll ies from which he never came back. We found him, when we went to
search for him, face down ward in a little gre en- sc um med poo l, which lay
at the foot of the garden. There was no sign of any viol ence, and the
water was but two feet deep , so that the jur y, having regard to his
known eccent ric ity, brought in a ver dict of ‘ suici de .’ But I, who knew
how he win ced from the very thought of death, had much a do to persuade
myself that he had gone out of his way to meet it. The matter pas sed,
however, and my father entered into possession of the estate, and of
some £ 1 4 ,00 0, which lay to his credit at the ban k.”

“One moment ,” Holmes inter po sed, “ your statement is, I fore see, one of
the most remarkable to which I have ever listened. Let me have the date
of the re ce ption by your uncle of the letter, and the date of his
sup posed suici de .”

“The letter arrived on Mar ch 1 0, 188 3. His death was seven weeks lat er,
upon the night of May 2 n d.”

“Thank you. Pray proce ed.”

“When my father took over the Horsha m proper ty, he, at my request, made
a careful examination of the at ti c, which had been always locked up. We
found the brass box there, although its cont ents had been destro ye d. On
the inside of the cover was a paper la be l, with the initials of K. K.
K. repe ated upon it, and ‘ L et ters, memor and a, recei p ts, and a regi ster ’
written benea th. The se, we presu me, indi cated the nature of the papers
which had been destro yed by Colonel Opensha w . For the rest, there was
nothing of much importance in the at tic save a great many scattered
papers and note- books bearing upon my uncle’s life in America. Some of
them were of the w ar time and showed that he had done his duty well and
had borne the reput e of a brave soldi er. O ther s were of a date during
the re con stru ction of the Southern stat es, and were mostly concerned
with politi c s, for he had evidently taken a strong part in op posing the
carpet- bag politi ci ans who had been sent down from the Nor th.

“Well, it was the beginning of ’8 4 when my father came to live at
Horsham, and all went as well as possible with us until the Janu ary of
’8 5. On the fourth day after the new year I heard my father give a
sharp cry of surprise as we sat together at the breakfast- table. There
he was, sitting with a newly opened envelope in one hand and five dried
orange pips in the out stretched palm of the other one. He had always
laughed at what he called my co ck- and- bu ll story about the colone l, but
he looked very scared and puzzled now that the same thing had come upon
himself.

“‘Why, what on earth does this mean, John ?’ he stam mer ed.

“My heart had turned to lea d. ‘ It is K. K. K . ,’ said I.

“He looked inside the envelo pe. ‘ So it is ,’ he cried. ‘ Here are the
very letters. But what is this written above them ?’

“‘ Put the papers on the sundi al ,’ I read, peep ing over his shoulder.

“‘What paper s? What sundi al ?’ he asked.

“‘The sundi al in the garden. There is no other ,’ said I; ‘but the
papers must be those that are destro ye d.’

“‘ Poo h !’ said he, gri pping hard at his cou ra ge. ‘ We are in a ci vili sed
land here, and we can’t have tom fool ery of this kind. Where does the
thing come from ?’

“‘ From Dunde e,’ I answered, glancing at the post mark.

“‘ Some preposterous practical jo ke ,’ said he. ‘ What have I to do with
sundi als and paper s? I shall take no notice of such non sen se.’

“‘I should certainly speak to the police ,’ I said.

“‘And be laughed at for my pain s. Nothing of the sor t .’

“‘Then let me do so ?’

“‘No, I for b id you. I won’t have a fuss made about such non sen se.’

“It was in v ain to ar gue with him, for he was a very ob stin ate man. I
went about, however, with a heart which was full of fore bod ings.

“On the third day after the coming of the letter my father went from
home to visit an old friend of his, Maj or F ree body, who is in command
of one of the for ts upon P or t s down H ill . I was glad that he should go,
for it seemed to me that he was farther from danger when he was away
from home. In that, however, I was in err or. Up on the second day of his
ab sence I received a telegram from the ma j or, impl or ing me to come at
once. My father had fallen over one of the deep chal k- p its which ab ound
in the neighbourhood, and was lying sen se less, with a shattered sk u ll.
I hurried to him, but he passed away without having ever recovered his
conscious ness. He had, as it appear s, been returning from F ar e ham in
the twi light, and as the country was unknown to him, and the chal k- p it
un fence d, the jur y had no hes itation in bringing in a ver dict of ‘ death
from accid ental cau se s.’ Car e fully as I examined every fact connected
with his death, I was unable to find anything which could suggest the
idea of murder . There were no signs of viol ence, no foot mar ks, no
robber y, no record of strang ers having been seen upon the road s. And
yet I need not tell you that my mind was far from at ea se, and that I
was well- nigh certain that some foul pl ot had been w ov en round him.

“In this sinister way I came into my in her it ance. You will ask me why I
did not dispo se of it? I answer, because I was well convinced that our
troubles were in some way depen dent upon an incident in my uncle’s
life, and that the danger would be as pressing in one house as in
another.

“It was in Janu ary, ’8 5 , that my poor father met his end, and two years
and eight months have ela p sed since then. During that time I have lived
ha ppi ly at Horsham, and I had begun to hope that this cur se had passed
away from the family, and that it had ended with the last gener ation. I
had begun to take comfor t too soon, how ever ; yesterday morning the blow
fell in the very shape in which it had come upon my father .”

The young man took from his waist coat a crum pled envelo pe, and turning
to the table he shook out upon it five little dried orange pip s.

“This is the envelo pe ,” he continu ed. “The post mark is London — ea stern
di visi on. Wi thin are the very words which were upon my father’s last
messa ge : ‘ K. K. K . ’; and then ‘ Put the papers on the sundi al .’”

“What have you don e?” asked Holmes.

“Noth ing.”

“Noth ing?”

“To tell the tru th ” —he sank his face into his thin, white hand s— “I have
felt hel ple ss. I have felt like one of those poor rab b its when the
snake is wri thing towards it. I seem to be in the grasp of some
re sist less, inex or able ev il, which no fores ight and no precau tions can
guard again st.”

“T ut ! tut !” cried Sherlock Holmes. “You must ac t, man, or you are lost.
Nothing but energ y can save you. This is no time for despair .”

“I have seen the poli ce.”

“A h !”

“But they listened to my story with a smi le. I am convinced that the
inspector has formed the opinion that the letters are all practical
jo kes, and that the dea ths of my relations were really accid ents, as
the jur y stat ed, and were not to be connected with the warn ing s.”

Holmes shook his cl enched hands in the air. “In cre di ble imbe c il it y!” he
cried.

“They have, however, allowed me a police man, who may remain in the
house with me.”

“Has he come with you to-night?”

“No. His orders were to stay in the house.”

A gain Holmes ra ved in the air.

“Why did you come to me?” he said, “ and, above all, why did you not
come at on ce?”

“I did not know. It was only to-day that I spoke to Maj or P ren der g ast
about my troubles and was ad vis ed by him to come to you.”

“It is really two days since you had the letter. We should have acted
before this. You have no further evid ence, I suppo se, than that which
you have placed before us — no suggestive detail which might help us ?”

“There is one thing,” said John Opensha w . He rummaged in his coat
pocket, and, drawing out a piece of discol ou red, blu e- tinted paper, he
laid it out upon the table. “I have some remem bran ce ,” said he, “that
on the day when my uncle burned the papers I observed that the small,
un burned mar g ins which lay amid the ashes were of this particular
colour. I found this single sheet upon the floor of his room, and I am
inclined to think that it may be one of the papers which has, perhaps,
fl uttered out from among the others, and in that way has escaped
de stru cti on. B eyond the mention of pi ps, I do not see that it hel ps us
much. I think myself that it is a page from some private di ary. The
writing is undoubtedly my uncle ’s.”

Holmes moved the lamp, and we both bent over the sheet of paper, which
showed by its ra gged edge that it had indeed been torn from a boo k. It
was headed, “ Mar ch, 18 6 9 ,” and beneath were the following en ig m ati cal
noti c es :

“ 4 th. Hudson ca me. Sa me old plat form.

“ 7 th. S et the pips on Mc C au le y, Par a more, and John S wain of St.
Au gu stin e.

“ 9 th. Mc C au le y clear ed.

“ 1 0 th. John S wain clear ed.

“ 12 th. V is ited Par a more. All well.”

“Thank you!” said Holmes, fol ding up the paper and returning it to our
visitor. “And now you must on no account lose another instan t. We
cannot spare time even to discuss what you have told me. You must get
home instantly and ac t.”

“What shall I do?”

“There is but one thing to do. It must be done at once. You must put
this piece of paper which you have shown us into the brass box which
you have descri bed. You must also put in a note to say that all the
other papers were burned by your uncle, and that this is the only one
which remain s. You must as ser t that in such words as will carry
conviction with them. Having done this, you must at once put the box
out upon the sundi al, as dire cted. Do you understand ?”

“ En ti rel y.”

“Do not think of re ven ge, or anything of the sort, at pres ent. I think
that we may gain that by means of the law ; but we have our web to
wea ve, while the irs is already w ov en. The first consideration is to
remove the pressing danger which threat ens you. The second is to clear
up the mystery and to pun ish the guil ty parti es.”

“I thank you,” said the young man, rising and pulling on his over coat.
“You have given me fresh life and hop e. I shall certainly do as you
advi se.”

“Do not lose an instan t. And, above all, take care of yourself in the
mean while, for I do not think that there can be a doubt that you are
threatened by a very real and im min ent danger. How do you go back ?”

“By train from Water loo .”

“It is not yet nin e. The streets will be crow ded, so I trust that you
may be in safet y. And yet you cannot guard yourself too clo sel y.”

“I am ar me d.”

“That is well. To - mor row I shall set to work upon your case.”

“I shall see you at Horsham, then?”

“No, your secret lies in London. It is there that I shall seek it.”

“Then I shall call upon you in a day, or in two days, with news as to
the box and the papers. I shall take your advice in every particul ar.”
He shook hands with us and took his lea ve. O ut side the wind still
screamed and the rain spl ashed and p attered against the windows. This
strange, wild story seemed to have come to us from amid the mad
ele ment s— bl own in upon us like a sheet of se a- we ed in a ga le —and now to
have been re absor bed by them once more.

Sherlock Holmes sat for some time in silence, with his head sunk
forward and his eyes bent upon the red gl ow of the fire. Then he lit
his pipe, and leaning back in his chair he watched the blue smoke- r ings
as they chased each other up to the ceiling.

“I think, Watson,” he remarked at last, “that of all our cases we have
had none more fantastic than this .”

“Sa ve, perhaps, the S ig n of Four .”

“Well, yes. Sa ve, perhaps, that. And yet this John Openshaw seems to me
to be walking amid even greater per ils than did the S hol to s.”

“But have you,” I asked, “ formed any definite conce ption as to what
these per ils ar e?”

“There can be no question as to their nature ,” he answered.

“Then what are they ? Who is this K. K. K ., and why does he pur sue this
unhappy fami ly?”

Sherlock Holmes closed his eyes and placed his elb ows upon the arms of
his chair, with his finger-tips together. “The ide al reason er,” he
remarked, “ would, when he had once been shown a single fact in all its
bear ings, deduce from it not only all the chain of events which led up
to it but also all the results which would follow from it. As C u vi er
could corre ctly descri be a whole animal by the con tem pl ation of a
single b one, so the obser ver who has thoroughly understood one link in
a series of incidents should be able to accur ately state all the other
ones, both before and after. We have not yet grasped the results which
the reason alone can at tain to. Pro ble ms may be solved in the study
which have b aff led all those who have s ought a solution by the aid of
their sen ses. To carry the art, however, to its highest pit ch, it is
necessary that the reason er should be able to u ti li se all the facts
which have come to his knowle dge; and this in itself imp li es, as you
will readily see, a possession of all knowle dge, which, even in these
days of free educ ation and en cyclopædi as, is a somewhat r are
accomplish ment. It is not so im possible, however, that a man should
posse ss all knowledge which is likely to be useful to him in his work,
and this I have endeavoured in my case to do. If I remember right ly,
you on one occas ion, in the early days of our friend shi p, def ined my
lim its in a very preci se fashi on.”

“Yes,” I answered, laughing. “It was a singular do cum ent. Phi lo s op h y,
a str on om y, and politi c s were marked at z er o, I remem ber. Bo t any
vari able, ge olog y pro found as reg ards the mud- stains from any regi on
within fifty miles of town, chemi str y eccent ri c, an at om y un sy st em ati c,
sens ational l iter at ure and crime records uniqu e, viol in- pla yer, box er,
s word s man, law yer, and self- pois on er by co ca ine and tobacco. Th o se, I
think, were the main points of my anal ysi s.”

Holmes gr in ned at the last it em . “Well,” he said, “I say now, as I said
then, that a man should keep his little brain- at tic sto cked with all
the furniture that he is likely to use, and the rest he can put away in
the lumber- room of his libr ary, where he can get it if he wants it.
Now, for such a case as the one which has been submitted to us
to-night, we need certainly to mu ster all our resour ces. Kindly hand me
down the letter K of the American Encyclopædia which stands upon the
shelf beside you. Thank you. Now let us consider the situation and see
what may be deduced from it. In the first place, we may start with a
strong presu mp tion that Colonel Openshaw had some very strong reason
for leaving America. M en at his time of life do not change all their
hab its and ex change will ingly the charming clim ate of Flor id a for the
lonely life of an English provin cial town. His extreme love of sol itude
in England suggest s the idea that he was in fear of someone or
something, so we may assu me as a working hypothes is that it was fear of
someone or something which drove him from America. As to what it was he
fe ar ed, we can only deduce that by consider ing the formidable letters
which were received by himself and his succes sor s. Did you remark the
post marks of those letter s?”

“The first was from Pondicher ry, the second from Dunde e, and the third
from London .”

“From E ast London. What do you deduce from that?”

“They are all se ap or ts. That the writ er was on board of a ship .”

“Excell ent. We have already a clue. There can be no doubt that the
probabil it y— the strong probabil it y— is that the writ er was on board of a
ship. And now let us consider another point. In the case of
Pondicher ry, seven weeks ela p sed between the thre at and its ful fi l ment,
in Dunde e it was only some three or four days. Does that suggest
any thing ?”

“A greater distance to travel .”

“But the letter had also a greater distance to com e.”

“Then I do not see the point.”

“There is at least a presu mp tion that the ves sel in which the man or
men are is a sail ing- ship. It looks as if they always send their
singular warning or to ken before them when starting upon their missi on.
You see how quickly the deed followed the sign when it came from
Dunde e. If they had come from Pondicher ry in a steam er they would have
arrived almost as soon as their letter. But, as a matter of fact, seven
weeks ela p sed. I think that those seven weeks re presented the
difference between the ma il- boat which brought the letter and the
sailing ves sel which brought the writ er.”

“It is possible.”

“ More than that. It is prob able. And now you see the deadly ur gen cy of
this new case, and why I ur ged young Openshaw to cau tion. The blow has
always fallen at the end of the time which it would take the sen ders to
travel the distan ce. But this one comes from London, and therefor e we
cannot count upon dela y.”

“Good God !” I cried. “What can it mean, this rel ent less per secu ti on?”

“The papers which Openshaw carried are obvi ously of v ital importance to
the person or persons in the sail ing- ship. I think that it is quite
clear that there must be more than one of them. A single man could not
have carried out two dea ths in such a way as to de ceive a coron er’s
jur y. There must have been several in it, and they must have been men
of resour ce and determin ation. The ir papers they mean to have, be the
holder of them who it ma y. In this way you see K. K. K. ce a ses to be
the initials of an individual and becomes the bad ge of a societ y.”

“But of what societ y?”

“Have you never —” said Sherlock Holmes, bending forward and sin king his
voi ce— “ have you never heard of the K u K lu x K lan ?”

“I never have.”

Holmes turned over the leaves of the book upon his kne e. “Here it is,”
said he present ly :

“‘ K u K lu x K lan . A name deri ved from the fanci ful resem bl ance to the
sound produ ced by co cking a ri f le. This terrible secret society was
formed by some ex - Con feder ate soldi ers in the Southern states after the
C i vi l W ar, and it rapidly formed local branches in different parts of
the country, not ably in T en nes see, Lou i si an a, the Car ol in as, Geor gi a,
and Flor i da . Its power was used for politi cal purposes, princi pa lly for
the terr or ising of the ne gr o vo ters and the murder ing and driving from
the country of those who were op posed to its view s. Its out rag es were
usually prece ded by a warning sent to the marked man in some fantastic
but generally recognised sha pe —a sp ri g of oa k- leaves in some par ts,
mel on see ds or orange pips in others. On recei ving this the vi cti m
might either op enly ab j ure his form er ways, or might fly from the
country. If he bra ved the matter out, death would un fa il ingly come upon
him, and usually in some strange and unforeseen manner. So perfect was
the organ is ation of the societ y, and so sy st em atic its metho ds, that
there is hardly a case upon record where any man succeeded in bra ving
it with imp un ity, or in which any of its out rag es were traced home to
the perpe tr at or s. For some years the organ is ation fl ou ri shed in spite
of the efforts of the United States gover n ment and of the better
clas ses of the commun ity in the Sou th. E vent u ally, in the year 18 6 9 ,
the mov ement rather suddenly coll ap sed, although there have been
spor a di c out breaks of the same sort since that dat e.’

“You will obser ve ,” said Holmes, laying down the vol um e, “that the
sudden breaking up of the society was co incident with the disappearance
of Openshaw from America with their papers. It may well have been cause
and effe ct. It is no wonder that he and his family have some of the
more im plac able spirits upon their track. You can understand that this
regi ster and di ary may implic ate some of the first men in the Sou th,
and that there may be many who will not sleep easy at night until it is
recover ed.”

“Then the page we have se en —”

“Is such as we might expec t. It ran , if I remember right, ‘ sent the
pips to A , B , and C ’ —that is, sent the societ y’s warning to them. Then
there are succ essive ent ries that A and B clear ed, or left the country,
and finally that C was visit ed, with, I fear, a sinister result for C .
Well, I think, Doctor, that we may let some light into this dark place,
and I believe that the only chance young Openshaw has in the mean time
is to do what I have told him. There is nothing more to be said or to
be done to-night, so hand me over my viol in and let us try to forget
for half an hour the miserable weather and the still more miserable
ways of our fellow men .”

It had cleared in the morning, and the sun was shining with a sub du ed
bright ness through the dim veil which hang s over the great c ity.
Sherlock Holmes was already at breakfast when I came down.

“You will excuse me for not waiting for you,” said he; “I have, I
fore see, a very busy day before me in looking into this case of young
Opensha w ’s.”

“What steps will you ta ke ?” I asked.

“It will very much depend upon the results of my first inqui ries. I may
have to go down to Horsham, after all.”

“You will not go there fir st?”

“No, I shall commence with the City. Just ring the bell and the maid
will bring up your coffe e.”

As I wait ed, I li fted the un opened newspaper from the table and glanced
my eye over it. It rested upon a heading which sent a chill to my
heart.

“Holmes,” I cried, “you are too lat e.”

“A h !” said he, laying down his c up, “I feared as much. How was it
don e?” He spoke cal m ly, but I could see that he was deeply moved.

“My eye caught the name of Opensha w, and the heading ‘ T rage dy Ne ar
Waterloo Bri dge .’ Here is the accoun t :

“‘ Between nine and ten last night Po li ce- Con stable C oo k, of the H
Di visi on, on duty near Waterloo Bri dge, heard a cry for help and a
spl ash in the water. The night, however, was extremely dark and storm y,
so that, in spite of the help of several pas ser s- by, it was quite
impossible to effect a re sc ue. The alarm, however, was gi ven, and, by
the aid of the water- police, the body was eventually recover ed. It
pro ved to be that of a young gentleman whose name, as it appears from
an envelope which was found in his pocket, was John Opensha w, and whose
resid ence is near Horsha m. It is conjec tured that he may have been
hurrying down to catch the last train from Waterloo St ation, and that
in his ha ste and the extreme darkness he missed his path and walked
over the edge of one of the small land ing- places for river steambo at s.
The body ex hi b ited no traces of viol ence, and there can be no doubt
that the de ceased had been the vi cti m of an unfortunate accid ent, which
should have the effect of calling the attention of the authorities to
the condition of the river side land ing- stag es .’”

We sat in silence for some minutes, Holmes more de pressed and shaken
than I had ever seen him.

“That hur ts my pri de, Watson,” he said at last. “It is a pe tty feel ing,
no doubt, but it hur ts my pri de. It becomes a personal matter with me
now, and, if God sen ds me heal th, I shall set my hand upon this gang .
That he should come to me for help, and that I should send him away to
his death — !” He sprang from his chair and paced about the room in
un contro llable agit ation, with a flush upon his sallow cheeks and a
nervous clas ping and un clas ping of his long thin hands.

“They must be cunning devil s,” he ex claim ed at last. “How could they
have de co yed him down there? The Em bank ment is not on the dire ct line
to the st ation. The bri dge, no doubt, was too crow ded, even on such a
night, for their purpo se. Well, Watson, we shall see who will w in in
the long run. I am going out now!”

“To the poli ce?”

“No; I shall be my own police. When I have sp un the web they may take
the fli es, but not befor e.”

All day I was engaged in my professional work, and it was late in the
evening before I returned to Baker Street. Sherlock Holmes had not come
back yet. It was nearly ten o’clock before he entered, looking pale and
wor n. He walked up to the sideboard, and tearing a piece from the loa f
he dev oured it vor ac i ou sly, wash ing it down with a long drau ght of
water.

“You are hungr y,” I remarked.

“ Star v ing. It had escaped my memory. I have had nothing since
breakfast.”

“Noth ing?”

“Not a bit e. I had no time to think of it.”

“And how have you succe e de d?”

“Well .”

“You have a clu e?”

“I have them in the ho llow of my hand. Young Openshaw shall not long
remain un a ven ge d. Why, Watson, let us put their own dev i li sh trade - mark
upon them. It is well thought of !”

“What do you mean?”

He took an orange from the cup board, and tearing it to pieces he
squee zed out the pips upon the table. Of these he took five and thrust
them into an envelo pe. On the inside of the fla p he wrote “S . H. for J .
O .” Then he se aled it and ad dressed it to “C ap tain James Cal h oun ,
Bar qu e Lone St ar, Savanna h, Geor gi a.”

“That will a wait him when he en ters port ,” said he, chuck ling. “It may
give him a sleep less night. He will find it as sure a pre cur s or of his
fate as Openshaw did before him.”

“And who is this Cap tain Cal h oun ?”

“The lead er of the gang . I shall have the others, but he first.”

“How did you trace it, then?”

He took a large sheet of paper from his pocket, all covered with dat es
and nam es.

“I have spent the whole day ,” said he, “ over L lo y d’s regi st ers and
fi les of the old papers, following the future care er of every ves sel
which touched at Pondicher ry in Janu ary and F e bru ary in ’8 3. There were
thirty- six shi ps of fair ton n age which were reported there during those
months. Of the se, one, the Lone St ar, instantly attracted my
attention, since, although it was reported as having cleared from
London, the name is that which is given to one of the states of the
U ni on.”

“T ex as, I think.”

“I was not and am not sure whi ch ; but I knew that the ship must have an
American orig in.”

“What then?”

“I sear ched the Dunde e recor ds, and when I found that the bar qu e Lone
St ar was there in Janu ary, ’8 5 , my suspicion became a certainty. I
then inquir ed as to the ves sel s which lay at present in the por t of
London .”

“Yes ?”

“The Lone St ar had arrived here last week. I went down to the Al bert
Do ck and found that she had been taken down the river by the early tide
this morning, home ward bound to Savanna h . I wi red to Graves end and
learned that she had passed some time ago, and as the wind is ea ster ly
I have no doubt that she is now past the G ood w ins and not very far from
the Is le of Wi ght .”

“What will you do, then?”

“Oh, I have my hand upon him. He and the two mat es, are as I lear n, the
only nati ve- born Ameri can s in the ship. The others are Fin ns and
Ger man s. I know, also, that they were all three away from the ship last
night. I had it from the st ev ed ore who has been load ing their car go. By
the time that their sail ing- ship rea ches Savanna h the ma il- boat will
have carried this letter, and the c able will have informed the police
of Savanna h that these three gentlemen are bad ly wanted here upon a
charge of murder .”

There is ever a f law , however, in the best laid of human plan s, and the
murder ers of John Openshaw were never to receive the orange pips which
would show them that another, as cunning and as re solute as themsel ves,
was upon their track. Very long and very sev ere were the equ in oc tial
ga les that year. We waited long for news of the Lone St ar of
Savanna h, but none ever reached us. We did at last hear that somewhere
far out in the At lan tic a shattered ster n- post of a boat was seen
swinging in the tr ough of a wa ve, with the letters “L . S .” car ved upon
it, and that is all which we shall ever know of the fate of the Lone
St ar.




VI. THE M AN WI TH THE T WI ST ED LI P


Is a Whitney, brother of the late Eli as Whitney, D . D ., P rin ci pal of the
The olo gi cal C oll e ge of St. George ’s, was much ad di cted to opi um. The
habit grew upon him, as I understand, from some foolish f rea k when he
was at coll e ge ; for having read De Qu in ce y’s description of his drea ms
and sens ations, he had dr enched his tobacco with la ud an um in an attempt
to produce the same effe cts. He found, as so many more have done, that
the practice is easier to at tain than to get rid of, and for many years
he continued to be a slave to the drug, an object of m ing led horror and
pity to his friends and relati ves. I can see him now, with yell ow,
pa sty face, drooping li ds, and p in- point p up ils, all hu ddled in a
chair, the wreck and ruin of a noble man.

One night —it was in Jun e, ’8 9 —there came a ring to my bell, about the
hour when a man gives his first yaw n and glan ces at the clo ck. I sat up
in my chair, and my wife laid her need le- work down in her lap and made
a little face of disappoint ment.

“A pati ent !” said she. “You’ll have to go out.”

I groan ed, for I was newly come back from a weary day.

We heard the door open, a few hurried words, and then quick steps upon
the lin o le um. Our own door flew open, and a lady, clad in some
dark - coloured stuff, with a black veil, entered the room.

“You will excuse my calling so lat e,” she beg an, and then, suddenly
lo sing her self- contro l, she ran forward, threw her arms about my
wife’s neck, and so b bed upon her shoulder. “Oh, I’m in such trouble !”
she cried; “I do so want a little help .”

“Why,” said my wife, pulling up her veil, “it is K ate Whitne y. How you
startled me, K at e! I had not an idea who you were when you came in.”

“I didn’t know what to do, so I came straight to you.” That was always
the way. F ol k who were in grief came to my wife like birds to a
ligh th ou se.

“It was very sweet of you to come. Now, you must have some w ine and
water, and sit here comfort ably and tell us all about it. O r should you
rather that I sent James off to bed ?”

“Oh, no, no ! I want the doctor ’s advice and help, too. It’s about I sa .
He has not been home for two days. I am so frightened about him!”

It was not the first time that she had spoken to us of her husband’s
trouble, to me as a doctor, to my wife as an old friend and school
companion. We soo thed and comfor ted her by such words as we could fin d.
Did she know where her husband was ? Was it possible that we could bring
him back to her ?

It seems that it was. She had the su rest information that of late he
had, when the fit was on him, made use of an opium den in the far th est
east of the City. Hi ther to his orgies had always been confined to one
day, and he had come back, tw it ching and shat ter ed, in the evening. But
now the spell had been upon him eight -and- forty hours, and he lay
there, doubt less among the dre gs of the do cks, breathing in the poison
or sleeping off the effe cts. There he was to be found, she was sure of
it, at the B ar of G old, in U pper Swandam Lan e. But what was she to do?
How could she, a young and tim id woman, make her way into such a place
and pl uck her husband out from among the ru ffi ans who sur rounded him ?

There was the case, and of course there was but one way out of it.
Might I not escor t her to this place? And then, as a second thought,
why should she come at all ? I was Is a Whitne y’s medical ad vis er, and as
such I had influence over him. I could manage it better if I were
alone. I promised her on my word that I would send him home in a cab
within two hours if he were indeed at the address which she had given
me. And so in ten minutes I had left my armchair and che ery
sitting-room behind me, and was spe ed ing ea st ward in a han som on a
strange err and, as it seemed to me at the time, though the future only
could show how strange it was to be.

But there was no great difficulty in the first stage of my advent ure.
U pper Swandam Lan e is a vi le alley l ur king behind the high whar ves
which line the nor th side of the river to the east of London Bri dge.
Between a slo p- sh op and a g in- shop , approached by a steep f light of
steps leading down to a black gap like the mouth of a ca ve, I found the
den of which I was in sear ch. Or der ing my cab to wait, I passed down
the steps, worn ho llow in the centre by the ce a seless t read of drunken
fe et ; and by the light of a fli ck ering o il- lamp above the door I found
the lat ch and made my way into a long, low room, thick and heavy with
the brown opium smoke, and ter rac ed with wooden ber ths, like the
fore cast le of an emi gr ant ship.

Th rough the glo om one could dimly catch a glimpse of bodi es lying in
strange fantastic po ses, bowed shoulders, bent knees, heads thrown
back, and ch ins pointing up ward, with here and there a dark,
l ack - lu str e eye turned upon the newcom er. Out of the black shad ows
there gli mmered little red circle s of light, now bright, now fain t, as
the burning poison wa x ed or wan ed in the bow ls of the metal pip es. The
most lay silent, but some muttered to themsel ves, and others talked
together in a strange, low, mono ton ous voice, their conversation coming
in gus h es, and then suddenly tail ing off into silence, each mumbling
out his own thoughts and paying little he ed to the words of his
neighbour . At the farther end was a small bra z ier of burning char co al,
beside which on a three- legged wooden st ool there sat a tall, thin old
man, with his ja w resting upon his two fi st s, and his elb ows upon his
knees, staring into the fire.

As I entered, a sallow M al a y atten dant had hurried up with a pipe for
me and a supply of the drug, be ck oning me to an empty ber th.

“Thank you. I have not come to sta y,” said I. “There is a friend of
mine here, Mr. Is a Whitney, and I wish to speak with him.”

There was a mov ement and an ex cla mation from my right, and peering
through the gloom, I saw Whitney, pale, ha gg ard, and un ke mp t, staring
out at me.

“My God! It’s Watson,” said he. He was in a pitiable state of re acti on,
with every ner ve in a tw it ter. “I say, Watson, what o’clock is it?”

“N early ele ven .”

“Of what day ?”

“Of Fri day, Jun e 1 9 th.”

“Good heaven s! I thought it was Wednes day. It is Wednes day. What d ’you
want to fright en a chap for?” He sank his face onto his arms and began
to so b in a high tre ble ke y.

“I tell you that it is Fri day, man. Your wife has been waiting this two
days for you. You should be ashamed of yourself !”

“So I am. But you’ve got mix ed, Watson, for I have only been here a few
hours, three pip es, four pip es —I forget how man y. But I’ll go home with
you. I wouldn’t fright en K at e— poor little K ate. Give me your hand ! Have
you a cab ?”

“Yes, I have one wait ing.”

“Then I shall go in it. But I must owe something. F ind what I ow e,
Watson. I am all off colour. I can do nothing for myself.”

I walked down the narrow passage between the double row of sle e per s,
holding my breath to keep out the vi le, stup ef ying fum es of the drug,
and looking about for the manag er. As I passed the tall man who sat by
the bra z ier I felt a sudden pl uck at my skir t, and a low voice
whispered, “W al k past me, and then look back at me.” The words fell
quite distinctly upon my ear. I glanced down. They could only have come
from the old man at my side, and yet he sat now as absor bed as ever,
very thin, very wrink led, bent with age, an opium pipe dang ling down
from between his knees, as though it had dropped in she er las situ de
from his fing ers. I took two steps forward and looked back. It took all
my self- contro l to prevent me from breaking out into a cry of
astonishment. He had turned his back so that none could see him but I.
His form had filled out, his wrink les were gone, the dull eyes had
reg ain ed their fire, and there, sitting by the fire and gr inning at my
surprise, was none other than Sherlock Holmes. He made a slight motion
to me to approach him, and instan tly, as he turned his face half round
to the company once more, sub sid ed into a do d der ing, loo se- li pped
sen il ity.

“ Holmes!” I whispered, “what on earth are you doing in this den ?”

“As low as you can ,” he answer ed; “I have excellent ears. If you would
have the great kindness to get rid of that so tti sh friend of yours I
should be exceedingly glad to have a little talk with you.”

“I have a cab out side.”

“Then pray send him home in it. You may safely trust him, for he
appears to be too li mp to get into any mi sc hi ef . I should recomm end you
also to send a note by the cabman to your wife to say that you have
thrown in your lot with me. If you will wait outside, I shall be with
you in five minut es.”

It was difficult to ref use any of Sherlock Holmes’ requ est s, for they
were always so exceedingly definit e, and put forward with such a quiet
air of master y. I fel t, however, that when Whit ney was once confined in
the cab my mission was practically accompli she d; and for the rest, I
could not wish anything better than to be associated with my friend in
one of those singular adventures which were the nor m al condition of his
exist ence. In a few minutes I had written my note, paid Whitne y’s bi ll,
led him out to the cab, and seen him driven through the darkness. In a
very short time a de cre p it figure had emerged from the opium den, and I
was walking down the street with Sherlock Holmes. For two streets he
sh uff led along with a bent back and an uncertain foot. Then, glancing
quickly round, he straightened himself out and burst into a hearty fit
of laugh ter.

“I suppo se, Watson,” said he, “that you imagine that I have ad ded
opi um - smoking to co ca ine in jec ti ons, and all the other little
wea kn es ses on which you have fav oured me with your medical view s.”

“I was certainly surprised to find you there.”

“But not more so than I to find you.”

“I came to find a frien d.”

“And I to find an enem y.”

“A n enem y?”

“Yes; one of my natural en emi es, or, shall I say, my natural pre y.
Bri e fl y, Watson, I am in the mid st of a very remarkable inquiry, and I
have hoped to find a clue in the in co her ent ram bl ings of these so ts, as
I have done before now. Had I been recognised in that den my life would
not have been worth an hour ’s pur cha se; for I have used it before now
for my own purposes, and the ras cally Lascar who runs it has s worn to
have ven ge ance upon me. There is a tra p- door at the back of that
building, near the corner of Pa ul ’s Wh ar f, which could tell some
strange ta les of what has passed through it upon the moon less night s.”

“What! You do not mean bodi es?”

“A y, bodi es, Watson. We should be rich men if we had £ 1000 for every
poor devil who has been done to death in that d en. It is the vi lest
murder - trap on the whole river side, and I fear that Neville St. Clair
has entered it never to leave it more. But our trap should be here.” He
put his two forefing ers between his teeth and whist led shri ll y— a signal
which was answered by a similar whistle from the distan ce, followed
shortly by the rattle of wheels and the cl ink of horse s’ hoo f s.

“Now, Watson,” said Holmes, as a tall dog-cart dashed up through the
gloom, throwing out two golden tun ne ls of yellow light from its side
lanter n s. “You’ll come with me, won’t you?”

“If I can be of use .”

“Oh, a tru sty com ra de is always of use; and a chroni cl er still more so.
My room at The C ed ars is a double- be dded one.”

“The C ed ar s?”

“Yes; that is Mr. St. Clair ’s house. I am staying there while I conduct
the inquir y.”

“Where is it, then?”

“N ear Le e, in K ent. We have a seven - mile drive before us.”

“But I am all in the dark.”

“Of course you are. You ’ll know all about it present ly. Jump up here.
All right, Joh n; we shall not need you. Here’s half a cr own. Look out
for me to-morrow, about ele ven. Give her her head. So long, then !”

He fli cked the horse with his whi p, and we dashed away through the
end less succ ession of sombre and deserted street s, which wid ened
gradu ally, until we were flying across a broad bal u stra ded bri dge, with
the mur ky river fl owing slu gg i sh ly beneath us. B eyond lay another dull
wilder ness of bri cks and mor t ar, its silence broken only by the heavy,
regular foot fall of the police man, or the song s and shou ts of some
bel ated party of reve ll ers. A dull wr ack was drifting slowly across the
sky, and a st ar or two twink led dimly here and there through the ri fts
of the clou ds. Holmes drove in silence, with his head sunk upon his
breast, and the air of a man who is lost in thought, while I sat beside
him, curious to learn what this new quest might be which seemed to tax
his powers so sor ely, and yet afraid to break in upon the current of
his though ts. We had driven several miles, and were beginning to get to
the fringe of the be lt of su bur b an vill as, when he shook himself,
shrugged his shoulders, and lit up his pipe with the air of a man who
has satisfied himself that he is acting for the best.

“You have a grand gi ft of silence, Watson,” said he. “It makes you
quite inv al u able as a companion. ’ P on my word, it is a great thing for
me to have someone to talk to, for my own thoughts are not
over- pleas ant. I was wondering what I should say to this dear little
woman to-night when she me ets me at the door.”

“You forget that I know nothing about it.”

“I shall just have time to tell you the facts of the case before we get
to Le e. It seems absur dly simp le, and yet, somehow I can get nothing to
go upon. There’s plenty of th read, no doubt, but I can’t get the end of
it into my hand. Now, I’ll state the case clearly and con ci sely to you,
Watson, and maybe you can see a spark where all is dark to me.”

“ Pro ce ed, then.”

“S ome years ago — to be definit e, in Ma y, 188 4 —there came to Le e a
gentleman, Neville St. Clair by name, who appeared to have plenty of
money. He took a large vill a, laid out the grounds very nice ly, and
lived generally in good style. By de gre es he made friends in the
neighbourhood, and in 188 7 he married the daughter of a local bre w er,
by whom he now has two childr en. He had no occup ation, but was
interested in several compan ies and went into town as a ru le in the
morning, returning by the 5 : 1 4 from C ann on Street every night. Mr. St.
Clair is now thirty-seven years of age, is a man of temper ate habit s, a
good husband, a very affe ction ate father, and a man who is pop ular with
all who know him. I may ad d that his whole deb ts at the present moment,
as far as we have been able to as certain, amount to £ 8 8 1 0 s ., while
he has £ 22 0 standing to his credit in the Cap ital and Coun ties B an k.
There is no reason, therefore, to think that money troubles have been
weigh ing upon his mind.

“L ast Monday Mr. Neville St. Clair went into town rather ear lier than
usual, remar king before he started that he had two important
commissi ons to perform , and that he would bring his little boy home a
box of brick s. Now, by the mer est chance, his wife received a telegram
upon this same Mon day, very shortly after his de part ure, to the effect
that a small par ce l of considerable value which she had been expecting
was waiting for her at the offices of the A ber de en S hi pping Com pan y.
Now, if you are well up in your London, you will know that the office
of the company is in F res no Street, which branches out of U pper Swandam
Lane, where you found me to-night. Mrs. St. Clair had her lunch,
started for the City, did some shop p ing, proce eded to the company ’s
office, got her pac ke t, and found herself at exactly 4 : 3 5 walking
through Swandam Lan e on her way back to the st ation. Have you followed
me so far ?”

“It is very clear .”

“If you remember, Monday was an exceedingly hot day, and Mrs. St. Clair
walked slow ly, glancing about in the hope of seeing a cab, as she did
not like the neighbourhood in which she found herself. While she was
walking in this way down Swandam Lane, she suddenly heard an
ejacul ation or cry, and was struck cold to see her husband looking down
at her and, as it seemed to her, be ck oning to her from a secon d- floor
window. The window was open, and she distinctly saw his face, which she
descri be s as being terribly agit ated. He waved his hands fran ti cally to
her, and then vanished from the window so suddenly that it seemed to
her that he had been pl ucked back by some ir resi sti ble force from
behind. One singular point which struck her quick fe min ine eye was that
although he wore some dark coat, such as he had started to town in, he
had on neither collar nor ne ck ti e.

“C on vin ced that something was a miss with him, she rushed down the
step s— for the house was none other than the opium den in which you
found me to-night —and running through the front room she attemp ted to
as cend the stairs which led to the first floor. At the foot of the
stairs, however, she met this Lascar scoundre l of whom I have spo ken,
who thrust her back and, a ided by a D an e, who ac ts as assistant there,
pushed her out into the street. F i lled with the most ma dd ening doubts
and fe ars, she rushed down the lane and, by r are good- fortun e, met in
F res no Street a number of constab les with an inspector, all on their
way to their be at. The inspector and two men ac compani ed her back, and
in spite of the continued resi stan ce of the propriet or, they made their
way to the room in which Mr. St. Clair had last been seen. There was no
sign of him there. In fact, in the whole of that floor there was no one
to be found save a crippled wre t ch of hideous as pe ct, wh o, it seems,
made his home there. Both he and the Lascar st out ly swore that no one
else had been in the front room during the afterno on. So determined was
their den ial that the inspector was stagg er ed, and had almost come to
believe that Mrs. St. Clair had been del uded when, with a cry, she
sprang at a small deal box which lay upon the table and tore the lid
from it. Out there fell a cas ca de of childr en’s brick s. It was the to y
which he had promised to bring home.

“This discover y, and the evident conf usion which the cripple show ed,
made the inspector reali se that the matter was seri ous. The rooms were
carefully examin ed, and results all pointed to an ab omin able crime. The
front room was plainly furnished as a sitting-room and led into a small
bedroom, which looked out upon the back of one of the whar ves. Between
the whar f and the bedroom window is a narrow stri p, which is dry at low
tide but is covered at high tide with at least four and a half feet of
water. The bedroom window was a broad one and opened from below. On
examination traces of blood were to be seen upon the window si ll, and
several scattered drops were visible upon the wooden floor of the
bed room. Th r ust away behind a curtain in the front room were all the
clothes of Mr. Neville St. Clair, with the exce ption of his coat. His
boots, his so cks, his hat, and his watch — all were there. There were no
signs of violence upon any of these garm ents, and there were no other
traces of Mr. Neville St. Cla ir. Out of the window he must apparently
have gone for no other ex it could be discover ed, and the omin ous
blood stains upon the sill gave little promise that he could save
himself by swi mm ing, for the tide was at its very highest at the moment
of the traged y.

“And now as to the villain s who seemed to be immediately implic ated in
the matter. The Lascar was known to be a man of the vi lest an te ce d ents,
but as, by Mrs. St. Clair ’s story, he was known to have been at the
foot of the sta ir within a very few seconds of her husband’s appearance
at the window, he could hardly have been more than an acc es sor y to the
crime. His de fence was one of absolute ignor ance, and he prote sted that
he had no knowledge as to the do ings of Hugh Bo one, his lodg er, and
that he could not account in any way for the presence of the missing
gentleman’s clothes.

“So much for the Lascar manag er. Now for the sinister cripple who lives
upon the second floor of the opium den, and who was certainly the last
human being whose eyes rested upon Neville St. Cla ir. His name is Hugh
Bo one, and his hideous face is one which is familiar to every man who
goes much to the City. He is a professional begg ar, though in order to
avo id the police regul ations he pre ten ds to a small trade in wax
v est as . Some little distance down Th read needle Street, upon the
left-hand side, there is, as you may have remarked, a small angle in
the wall. Here it is that this creature takes his da ily se at,
cross- legged with his tin y stock of matches on his lap, and as he is a
pit e ous spectac le a small rain of char ity descen ds into the greasy
leather cap which lies upon the pavement beside him. I have watched the
fellow more than once before ever I thought of making his professional
acquaint ance, and I have been surprised at the har v est which he has
rea ped in a short time. His appear ance, you see, is so remarkable that
no one can pass him without observing him. A shock of orange hair, a
pale face dis fig ured by a horrible sc ar, which, by its con trac tion, has
turned up the ou ter edge of his upper lip, a bull dog chin, and a pair
of very pen e tr ating dark eyes, which present a singular contrast to the
colour of his hair, all mark him out from amid the common crowd of
men di can ts and so, too, does his w it, for he is ever ready with a re ply
to any piece of cha ff which may be thrown at him by the pas ser s- by.
This is the man whom we now learn to have been the lodg er at the opium
den, and to have been the last man to see the gentleman of whom we are
in qu est .”

“But a cripp le !” said I. “What could he have done sing le- handed against
a man in the pri me of life ?”

“He is a cripple in the sense that he walks with a li mp ; but in other
respe cts he appears to be a powerful and well- nur tured man. S urely your
medical experience would tell you, Watson, that wea kn ess in one limb is
often comp en s ated for by exceptional strength in the other s.”

“Pray continue your narrati ve.”

“Mrs. St. Clair had fainted at the sight of the blood upon the window,
and she was escor ted home in a cab by the police, as her presence could
be of no help to them in their investig ations. Inspector Bar ton, who
had charge of the case, made a very careful examination of the
premi ses, but without finding anything which threw any light upon the
matter. One mistake had been made in not arre sting Bo one instan tly, as
he was allowed some few minutes during which he might have communic ated
with his friend the Lascar , but this fault was soon re medi ed, and he
was seized and sear ched, without anything being found which could
in crimin ate him. There were, it is true, some bloo d- stains upon his
right shir t- sleev e, but he pointed to his r ing- fing er, which had been
cut near the nail, and explained that the ble ed ing came from there,
ad ding that he had been to the window not long before, and that the
stains which had been observed there came doubt less from the same
sour ce. He denied str en u ously having ever seen Mr. Neville St. Clair
and swore that the presence of the clothes in his room was as much a
mystery to him as to the police. As to Mrs. St. Clair ’s as ser tion that
she had actually seen her husband at the window, he decl ared that she
must have been either mad or dream ing. He was re mov ed, loudly
prote st ing, to the police- st ation, while the inspector remained upon
the premises in the hope that the e bbing tide might afford some fresh
clue.

“And it did, though they hardly found upon the mud- bank what they had
feared to fin d. It was Neville St. Clair ’s coat, and not Neville St.
Clair, which lay un covered as the tide re ce ded. And what do you think
they found in the pocket s?”

“I cannot imagine.”

“No, I don’t think you would gu ess. Every pocket stuff ed with penni es
and half- penni es— 4 2 1 penni es and 2 7 0 half- penni es. It was no wonder
that it had not been swept away by the ti de. But a human body is a
different matter. There is a fierce ed dy between the whar f and the
house. It seemed likely enough that the wei ghted coat had remained when
the stri pped body had been sucked away into the river .”

“But I understand that all the other clothes were found in the room.
Would the body be dressed in a coat al one ?”

“No, sir, but the facts might be met speci ously enough. S up pose that
this man Bo one had thrust Neville St. Clair through the window, there
is no human eye which could have seen the de ed. What would he do then?
It would of course instantly strike him that he must get rid of the
tell - ta le garm ents. He would se i ze the coat, then, and be in the act of
throwing it out, when it would occur to him that it would swim and not
sin k. He has little time, for he has heard the sc uff le down stairs when
the wife tried to force her way up, and perhaps he has already heard
from his Lascar confeder ate that the police are hurrying up the street.
There is not an instant to be lost. He rus hes to some secret ho ard,
where he has acc um ul ated the fr u its of his begg ary, and he stu ffs all
the co ins upon which he can lay his hands into the pockets to make sure
of the co at’s sin king. He throws it out, and would have done the same
with the other garm ents had not he heard the rush of steps below, and
only just had time to close the window when the police appear ed.”

“It certainly sounds fe as i ble .”

“Well, we will take it as a working hypothes is for want of a better.
Bo one, as I have told you, was arrested and taken to the st ation, but
it could not be shown that there had ever before been anything against
him. He had for years been known as a professional begg ar, but his life
appeared to have been a very quiet and innocent one. There the matter
stands at present, and the questions which have to be sol v ed— what
Neville St. Clair was doing in the opium den, what happened to him when
there, where is he now, and what Hugh Bo one had to do with his
disappear an ce— are all as far from a solution as ever. I confess that I
cannot recall any case within my experience which looked at the first
glance so simple and yet which presented such difficul ti es.”

While Sherlock Holmes had been detail ing this singular series of
events, we had been whir ling through the out skir ts of the great town
until the last stra gg ling houses had been left behind, and we rattled
along with a country he dge upon either side of us. Just as he fin ished,
however, we drove through two scattered villag es, where a few lights
still gli mmered in the windows.

“We are on the out skir ts of Le e,” said my companion. “We have touched
on three English coun ties in our short drive, starting in Mi dd le se x,
passing over an angle of Surre y, and ending in K ent. See that light
among the tre es? That is The C ed ars, and beside that lamp s its a woman
whose anxious ears have al ready, I have little doubt, caught the cl ink
of our horse ’s fe et.”

“But why are you not condu cting the case from Baker Stre et ?” I asked.

“Because there are many inquiries which must be made out here. Mrs. St.
Clair has most kindly put two rooms at my dispo sa l, and you may rest
assured that she will have nothing but a wel come for my friend and
colleag ue. I ha te to meet her, Watson, when I have no news of her
husband. Here we are. Who a, there, who a !”

We had pulled up in front of a large vill a which stood within its own
ground s. A stab le- boy had run out to the horse ’s head, and spr inging
down, I followed Holmes up the small, winding gravel - drive which led to
the house. As we approa ched, the door flew open, and a little bl on de
woman stood in the open ing, clad in some sort of light m ous sel ine de
so i e, with a touch of flu ffy p ink chi ff on at her neck and wri st s. She
stood with her figure out lined against the f loo d of light, one hand
upon the door, one half- raised in her eager ness, her body sli ghtly
b ent, her head and face pro tru ded, with eager eyes and parted lips, a
standing question.

“Well ?” she cried, “ well ?” And then, seeing that there were two of us,
she gave a cry of hope which sank into a gro an as she saw that my
companion shook his head and shrugged his shoulders.

“No good new s?”

“None.”

“No bad ?”

“No.”

“Thank God for that. But come in. You must be we ary, for you have had a
long day.”

“This is my friend, Dr. Watson. He has been of most v ital use to me in
several of my cases, and a luck y chance has made it possible for me to
bring him out and associ ate him with this investig ation.”

“I am deli ghted to see you,” said she, pressing my hand warm ly. “You
will, I am sure, forgive anything that may be wanting in our
arrang em ents, when you consider the blow which has come so suddenly
upon us.”

“My dear madam ,” said I, “I am an old campaig ner, and if I were not I
can very well see that no apology is nee ded. If I can be of any
assistan ce, either to you or to my friend here, I shall be indeed
happ y.”

“Now, Mr. Sherlock Holmes,” said the lady as we entered a well- lit
din ing-room, upon the table of which a cold supper had been laid out,
“I should very much like to ask you one or two plain questions, to
which I beg that you will give a plain answer .”

“Certainly, madam .”

“Do not trouble about my feel ings. I am not hy ster ic al, nor given to
fain t ing. I simply wish to hear your re al, real opinion .”

“ Up on what point ?”

“In your heart of hear ts, do you think that Neville is ali ve?”

Sherlock Holmes seemed to be em barr as sed by the question. “ Frank ly,
now!” she repe ated, standing upon the ru g and looking keenly down at
him as he leaned back in a bas ke t- chair.

“ Frank ly, then, madam, I do not.”

“You think that he is dead ?”

“I do.”

“M ur der ed?”

“I don’t say that. P erha p s.”

“And on what day did he meet his death ?”

“On Mon day.”

“Then perhaps, Mr. Holmes, you will be good enough to explain how it is
that I have received a letter from him to- day.”

Sherlock Holmes sprang out of his chair as if he had been g al vani sed.

“What !” he ro ar ed.

“Yes, to- day.” She stood smiling, holding up a little slip of paper in
the air.

“ May I see it?”

“Certainly.”

He snatched it from her in his eager ness, and smoo thing it out upon the
table he drew over the lamp and examined it in t ent ly. I had left my
chair and was gazing at it over his shoulder. The envelope was a very
coarse one and was stam ped with the Graves end post mark and with the
date of that very day, or rather of the day before, for it was
considerably after mid night.

“C o arse writ ing,” murmured Holmes. “S urely this is not your husband’s
writing, madam .”

“No, but the en clo sure is.”

“I perceive also that whoever ad dressed the envelope had to go and
inquire as to the addres s.”

“How can you tell that?”

“The name, you see, is in perfectly black ink, which has dried itself.
The rest is of the gre y ish colour, which shows that blo tt ing- paper has
been use d. If it had been written straight off, and then blot ted, none
would be of a deep black shad e. This man has written the name, and
there has then been a pa use before he wrote the addres s, which can only
mean that he was not familiar with it. It is, of course, a tri f le, but
there is nothing so important as tri fle s. Let us now see the letter.
Ha! there has been an en clo sure here !”

“Yes, there was a ring. His sig ne t- r ing.”

“And you are sure that this is your husband’s hand ?”

“One of his hands.”

“O ne ?”

“His hand when he wrote hurried ly. It is very un like his usual writing,
and yet I know it well.”

“‘ D ear est do not be frighten ed. All will come well. There is a huge
er ror which it may take some little time to re cti f y. W a it in
pati ence . — NE VI L LE .’ W r itten in pencil upon the fl y- leaf of a book,
oc ta v o si ze, no water- mark. H um! Po sted to-day in Graves end by a man
with a dirty thum b . Ha! And the fla p has been gum med, if I am not very
much in err or, by a person who had been che wing tobacco. And you have
no doubt that it is your husband’s hand, madam ?”

“N one. Neville wrote those word s.”

“And they were posted to-day at Graves end. Well, Mrs. St. Clair, the
clouds light en, though I should not vent ure to say that the danger is
over.”

“But he must be alive, Mr. Holmes.”

“ Unless this is a clever for g ery to put us on the wrong sc ent. The
ring, after all, pro ves nothing. It may have been taken from him.”

“No, no; it is, it is his very own writ ing !”

“Very well. It ma y, however, have been written on Monday and only
posted to- day.”

“That is possible.”

“If so, much may have happened bet we en.”

“Oh, you must not disc ou rage me, Mr. Holmes. I know that all is well
with him. There is so keen a sympathy between us that I should know if
evil came upon him. On the very day that I saw him last he cut himself
in the bedroom, and yet I in the dining-room rushed upstairs instantly
with the ut most certain ty that something had happened. Do you think
that I would respon d to such a tri f le and yet be ignorant of his
death ?”

“I have seen too much not to know that the impression of a woman may be
more valuable than the conclusion of an anal y tical reason er. And in
this letter you certainly have a very strong piece of evidence to
cor ro bor ate your view . But if your husband is alive and able to write
letters, why should he remain away from you?”

“I cannot imagine. It is un think able.”

“And on Monday he made no remarks before leaving you?”

“No.”

“And you were surprised to see him in Swandam Lan e?”

“Very much so.”

“Was the window open ?”

“Yes.”

“Then he might have called to you?”

“He might .”

“He on ly, as I understand, gave an in arti cul ate cr y?”

“Yes.”

“A call for help, you though t?”

“Yes. He waved his hands.”

“But it might have been a cry of surprise. A st oni sh ment at the
un expected sight of you might cause him to throw up his hand s?”

“It is possible.”

“And you thought he was pulled back ?”

“He disappeared so sudd en ly.”

“He might have lea ped back. You did not see anyone else in the room ?”

“No, but this horrible man conf essed to having been there, and the
Lascar was at the foot of the stair s.”

“Quite so. Your husband, as far as you could see, had his ordinary
clothes on?”

“But without his collar or ti e. I distinctly saw his bare thro at.”

“H ad he ever spoken of Swandam Lan e?”

“N ever .”

“H ad he ever showed any signs of having taken opi um ?”

“N ever .”

“Thank you, Mrs. St. Cla ir. Those are the principal points about which
I wished to be absolutely clear. We shall now have a little supper and
then reti re, for we may have a very busy day to-morrow .”

A large and comfortable double- be dded room had been placed at our
dispo sa l, and I was quickly between the she et s, for I was weary after
my night of advent ure. Sherlock Holmes was a man, however, wh o, when he
had an un solved problem upon his mind, would go for days, and even for
a week, without rest, turning it over, re arr anging his facts, looking
at it from every point of view until he had either fa th omed it or
convinced himself that his dat a were in suffici ent. It was soon evident
to me that he was now prepar ing for an all- night sitt ing. He took off
his coat and waist coat, put on a large blue dressing-gown, and then
wandered about the room collec ting pill ows from his bed and cus hi ons
from the sofa and arm chair s. With these he con stru cted a sort of
E a stern di van , upon which he per ched himself cross- le gg ed, with an
ounce of sha g tobacco and a box of matches laid out in front of him. In
the dim light of the lamp I saw him sitting there, an old bri ar pipe
between his lips, his eyes fixed vac antly upon the corner of the
ceil ing, the blue smoke cur ling up from him, silent, moti on less, with
the light shining upon his strong - set a quil ine features. So he sat as I
dropped off to sleep, and so he sat when a sudden ejacul ation caused me
to wake up, and I found the summer sun shining into the apart ment. The
pipe was still between his lips, the smoke still curled up ward, and the
room was full of a dense tobacco ha ze, but nothing remained of the heap
of sha g which I had seen upon the previous night.

“A wa ke, Watson?” he asked.

“Yes.”

“G ame for a morning dri ve?”

“Certainly.”

“Then dress. No one is stirring yet, but I know where the stab le- boy
sleep s, and we shall soon have the trap out.” He chuckled to himself as
he spoke, his eyes twink led, and he seemed a different man to the
sombre thin ker of the previous night.

As I dressed I glanced at my wat ch. It was no wonder that no one was
stir ring. It was twenty-five minutes past four . I had hardly finished
when Holmes returned with the news that the boy was putting in the
hor se.

“I want to test a little theory of min e,” said he, pulling on his
boo ts. “I think, Watson, that you are now standing in the presence of
one of the most absolute fools in Eu rope. I deser ve to be ki cked from
here to Char ing C ro ss. But I think I have the key of the affair now.”

“And where is it?” I asked, smiling.

“In the ba th room ,” he answered. “Oh, yes, I am not jo king ,” he
continued, seeing my look of incre dul ity. “I have just been there, and
I have taken it out, and I have got it in this G lad stone bag . Come on,
my boy, and we shall see whether it will not fit the lock .”

We made our way down stairs as quietly as possible, and out into the
bright morning sun shin e. In the road stood our horse and tra p, with the
half- clad stab le- boy waiting at the head. We both sprang in, and away
we dashed down the London Road. A few country car ts were stir ring,
bearing in ve get ables to the me tro poli s, but the lines of vill as on
either side were as silent and life less as some city in a drea m.

“It has been in some points a singular case ,” said Holmes, fli cking the
horse on into a gall op . “I confess that I have been as blind as a mo le,
but it is better to learn wi s dom late than never to learn it at all.”

In town the ear liest ri ser s were just beginning to look sle epi ly from
their windows as we drove through the streets of the Surre y side.
P as sing down the Waterloo Bri dge Ro ad we crossed over the river, and
d ashing up W ell ington Street wheel ed shar ply to the right and found
ourselves in B ow Street. Sherlock Holmes was well known to the for ce,
and the two constab les at the door sal ut ed him. One of them held the
horse ’s head while the other led us in.

“Who is on dut y?” asked Holmes.

“In spector Bradstreet, sir.”

“Ah, Bradstreet, how are you?” A tall, stout official had come down the
st one- fla gged passage, in a pe a ked cap and fro gged jac ket. “I wish to
have a quiet word with you, Brad stre et.”

“Certainly, Mr. Holmes. Ste p into my room here.”

It was a small, offi ce- like room, with a huge ledg er upon the table,
and a tele ph one pro jec ting from the wall. The inspector sat down at his
des k.

“What can I do for you, Mr. Holmes?”

“I called about that begg ar man, Bo one —the one who was charged with
being concerned in the disappearance of Mr. Neville St. Clair, of Le e.”

“Yes. He was brought up and re m and ed for further inqui ri es.”

“So I heard. You have him here?”

“In the cell s.”

“Is he quiet ?”

“Oh, he gives no trouble. But he is a dirty scoundrel .”

“D ir t y?”

“Yes, it is all we can do to make him wash his hands, and his face is
as black as a tin ker ’ s. Well, when once his case has been sett led, he
will have a regular prison ba th; and I think, if you saw him, you would
agree with me that he needed it.”

“I should like to see him very much.”

“W ould you? That is easily done. Come this way. You can leave your
bag .”

“No, I think that I’ll take it.”

“Very good. Come this way, if you plea se.” He led us down a passage,
opened a barred door, passed down a winding stair, and brought us to a
whitewashed corridor with a line of doors on each side.

“The third on the right is hi s,” said the inspector. “Here it is !” He
quietly shot back a panel in the upper part of the door and glanced
through.

“He is asleep ,” said he. “You can see him very well.”

We both put our eyes to the grat ing. The prisoner lay with his face
towards us, in a very deep sleep, breathing slowly and heavi ly. He was
a middle- si zed man, co ar sely clad as became his call ing, with a
coloured shirt protruding through the r ent in his t attered coat. He
was, as the inspector had said, extremely dirty, but the gri me which
covered his face could not conceal its re pul sive ug lin ess. A broad
whe al from an old scar ran right across it from eye to chin, and by its
con trac tion had turned up one side of the upper lip, so that three
teeth were exposed in a perpe tual snar l. A shock of very bright red
hair grew low over his eyes and fore head.

“He’s a beaut y, isn’t he?” said the inspector.

“He certainly nee ds a wash ,” remarked Holmes. “I had an idea that he
might, and I took the liber ty of bringing the too ls with me.” He opened
the G lad stone bag as he spoke, and took out, to my astonishment, a very
large ba th- spong e.

“H e! he ! You are a funny one,” chuckled the inspector.

“Now, if you will have the great goodness to open that door very
quiet ly, we will soon make him cut a much more respectable figure .”

“Well, I don’t know why not ,” said the inspector. “He do es n’t look a
credit to the B ow Street cell s, does he?” He slipped his key into the
lock, and we all very quietly entered the ce ll. The sleep er half
tur ned, and then settled down once more into a deep sl umber . Holmes
stooped to the water- ju g, moist ened his spong e, and then rubbed it
twice vig or ously across and down the prisoner’s face.

“Let me introduce you,” he shouted, “to Mr. Neville St. Clair, of Le e,
in the county of K ent.”

Never in my life have I seen such a sight. The man’s face pe eled off
under the spong e like the bark from a tre e. Gone was the coarse brown
tin t! G one, too, was the hor rid scar which had se am ed it acro ss, and
the twisted lip which had given the re pul sive sne er to the fac e! A
tw itch brought away the tangled red hair, and there, sitting up in his
bed, was a pale, sa d- faced, re fin ed- looking man, black - hair ed and
smoo th- skin ned, rubbing his eyes and staring about him with sleepy
be wilder ment. Then suddenly reali sing the ex po sure, he broke into a
scream and threw himself down with his face to the pill ow.

“Gre at heavens!” cried the inspector, “it is, indeed, the missing man.
I know him from the photograph.”

The prisoner turned with the reck less air of a man who aband ons himself
to his de stin y. “B e it so,” said he. “And pray what am I charged with?”

“Wi th making away with Mr. Neville St . — Oh, come, you can’t be charged
with that unless they make a case of attemp ted suici de of it,” said the
inspector with a gr in. “Well, I have been twenty- seven years in the
for ce, but this really takes the ca ke.”

“If I am Mr. Neville St. Clair, then it is obvious that no crime has
been commit ted, and that, therefore, I am ill eg ally de tain ed.”

“No crime, but a very great er ror has been commit te d,” said Holmes.
“You would have done better to have trusted your wife .”

“It was not the wife ; it was the childr en,” groan ed the prison er. “God
help me, I would not have them ashamed of their father. My God! What an
ex po sure ! What can I do?”

Sherlock Holmes sat down beside him on the cou ch and pat ted him kindly
on the shoulder.

“If you leave it to a court of law to clear the matter up ,” said he,
“ of course you can hardly avo id public ity. On the other hand, if you
convin ce the police authorities that there is no possible case against
you, I do not know that there is any reason that the details should
find their way into the papers. Inspector Bradstreet would, I am sure,
make notes upon anything which you might tell us and sub mit it to the
pro per author iti es. The case would then never go into court at all.”

“God bless you!” cried the prisoner passi on at ely. “I would have end ured
imprison ment, a y, even ex ec u tion, rather than have left my miserable
secret as a family bl ot to my childr en.

“You are the first who have ever heard my story. My father was a
school master in C he ster fiel d, where I received an excellent educ ation.
I travelled in my youth, took to the st age, and finally became a
repor ter on an evening paper in London. One day my ed it or wished to
have a series of article s upon begging in the me tro poli s, and I
volunte ered to supply them. There was the point from which all my
adventures started. It was only by trying begging as an am at e ur that I
could get the facts upon which to b ase my article s. When an ac tor I
had, of course, learned all the secre ts of making up, and had been
fa mous in the gre en- room for my sk ill . I took advantage now of my
at tain ment s. I painted my face, and to make myself as pitiable as
possible I made a good scar and fixed one side of my lip in a twist by
the aid of a small slip of fle sh- coloured pla ster. Then with a red head
of hair, and an appro pri ate dress, I took my station in the business
part of the c ity, o st en si bly as a mat ch- sell er but really as a begg ar.
For seven hours I plied my tra de, and when I returned home in the
evening I found to my surprise that I had received no less than 2 6 s.
4 d.

“I wrote my article s and thought little more of the matter unti l, some
time lat er, I backed a bill for a friend and had a wr it served upon me
for £ 2 5. I was at my wit’s end where to get the money, but a sudden
idea came to me. I begged a fort night ’s grace from the cred it or, asked
for a holi day from my employ ers, and spent the time in begging in the
City under my disgui se. In ten days I had the money and had paid the
deb t.

“Well, you can imagine how hard it was to settle down to ar du ous work
at £ 2 a week when I knew that I could earn as much in a day by
sme aring my face with a little pain t, laying my cap on the ground, and
sitting still. It was a long fight between my pri de and the money, but
the dollars w on at last, and I threw up repor ting and sat day after day
in the corner which I had first cho s en, in spir ing pity by my g ha stly
face and fi lling my pockets with cop per s. On ly one man knew my secre t.
He was the keeper of a low den in which I used to lo dge in Swandam
Lane, where I could every morning emer ge as a squ ali d begg ar and in the
even ings trans form myself into a well- dressed man about town. This
fellow, a Lascar , was well paid by me for his rooms, so that I knew
that my secret was safe in his possessi on.

“Well, very soon I found that I was sa ving considerable su ms of money.
I do not mean that any begg ar in the streets of London could earn £ 7 00
a year —which is less than my average ta king s— but I had exceptional
advant ages in my power of making up, and also in a fac ility of
re par te e, which impro ved by practice and made me quite a recognised
character in the City. All day a stream of penni es, vari ed by sil ver,
poured in upon me, and it was a very bad day in which I failed to take
£ 2.

“As I grew richer I grew more am b iti ous, took a house in the country,
and eventually married, without anyone having a suspicion as to my real
occup ation. My dear wife knew that I had business in the City. She
little knew what.

“L ast Monday I had finished for the day and was dres sing in my room
above the opium den when I looked out of my window and saw, to my
horror and astonishment, that my wife was standing in the street, with
her eyes fixed full upon me. I gave a cry of surprise, threw up my arms
to cover my face, and, rushing to my confid ant, the Lascar , ent re ated
him to prevent anyone from coming up to me. I heard her voice
down stairs, but I knew that she could not ascen d. S wi f tly I threw off
my clothes, pulled on those of a begg ar, and put on my pi g ments and
wi g. Even a wife’s eyes could not pi erce so complete a disgui se. But
then it occurred to me that there might be a search in the room, and
that the clothes might bet ray me. I threw open the window, re opening by
my violence a small cut which I had inf lic ted upon myself in the
bedroom that morning. Then I seized my coat, which was wei ghted by the
cop per s which I had just trans fer red to it from the leather bag in
which I carried my ta king s. I hur led it out of the window, and it
disappeared into the T ha m es. The other clothes would have follow ed, but
at that moment there was a rush of constab les up the stair, and a few
minutes after I found, ra ther, I conf ess, to my reli ef, that instead of
being identi fied as Mr. Neville St. Clair, I was arrested as his
murder er.

“I do not know that there is anything else for me to expla in. I was
determined to preserve my disgu ise as long as possible, and hence my
pre fer ence for a dirty face. K now ing that my wife would be terribly
anxi ous, I slipped off my ring and confi ded it to the Lascar at a
moment when no con stable was watching me, together with a hurried
scra w l, telling her that she had no cause to fe ar.”

“That note only reached her yesterday ,” said Holmes.

“Good God! What a week she must have sp ent !”

“The police have watched this Lascar ,” said Inspector Bradstreet, “and
I can quite understand that he might find it difficult to post a letter
un observed. Pro b ably he handed it to some sail or custom er of his, who
forgot all about it for some day s.”

“That was it,” said Holmes, no dding appro v ing ly; “I have no doubt of
it. But have you never been pro sec ut ed for begg ing?”

“M any times; but what was a fine to me?”

“It must stop here, how ever ,” said Brad street. “If the police are to
hus h this thing up, there must be no more of Hugh Bo one.”

“I have s worn it by the most solemn oa ths which a man can ta ke.”

“In that case I think that it is probable that no further steps may be
ta k en. But if you are found again, then all must come out. I am sure,
Mr. Holmes, that we are very much inde b ted to you for having cleared
the matter up. I wish I knew how you reach your resul ts.”

“I reached this one,” said my friend, “by sitting upon five pill ows and
con sum ing an ounce of sha g. I think, Watson, that if we drive to Baker
Street we shall just be in time for breakfast.”




VII. THE ADVENTURE OF THE B L U E C AR B UN C LE


I had called upon my friend Sherlock Holmes upon the second morning
after Christm as, with the intention of wish ing him the complim ents of
the seas on. He was lounging upon the sofa in a pur ple dressing-gown, a
pi pe - r ack within his reach upon the right, and a pile of crum pled
morning papers, evidently newly stu died, near at hand. Bes ide the cou ch
was a wooden chair, and on the angle of the back hung a very see dy and
dis reput able hard - felt hat, much the worse for we ar, and crac ked in
several places. A lens and a force ps lying upon the seat of the chair
suggested that the hat had been sus pen ded in this manner for the
purpose of examin ation.

“You are engag ed,” said I; “ perhaps I interrup t you.”

“Not at all. I am glad to have a friend with whom I can discuss my
resul ts. The matter is a perfectly trivial one ” —he jerked his thumb in
the direction of the old hat — “but there are points in connection with
it which are not entirely devo id of interest and even of instru cti on.”

I seated myself in his armchair and warmed my hands before his
cr ack ling fire, for a sharp fro st had set in, and the windows were
thick with the ice cry st als. “I suppo se,” I remarked, “ that, homely as
it loo ks, this thing has some deadly story lin ked on to it— that it is
the clue which will guide you in the solution of some mystery and the
p uni sh ment of some crime.”

“No, no. No cri me,” said Sherlock Holmes, laughing. “Only one of those
whim si cal little incidents which will happen when you have four million
human be ings all jo st ling each other within the sp ace of a few square
mi les. Am id the action and re action of so dense a swarm of hum an ity,
every possible comb in ation of events may be expected to take place, and
many a little problem will be presented which may be striking and
bi z ar re without being crimin al. We have already had experience of
su ch.”

“So much so,” I remarked, “that of the last six cases which I have
ad ded to my not es, three have been entirely free of any legal crime.”

“Precisely. You all u de to my attempt to re cover the Irene Adler papers,
to the singular case of Miss Mary Sutherland, and to the adventure of
the man with the twisted li p. Well, I have no doubt that this small
matter will fall into the same innocent cat eg or y. You know Peterson,
the commission ai re ?”

“Yes.”

“It is to him that this tro phy belong s.”

“It is his hat .”

“No, no, he found it. Its owner is un kn own. I beg that you will look
upon it not as a b attered bill y co ck but as an intellectual problem.
And, first, as to how it came here. It arrived upon Christmas morning,
in company with a good fat goose, which is, I have no doubt, ro ast ing
at this moment in front of Peter son’s fire. The facts are the se : about
four o’clock on Christmas morning, Peterson, wh o, as you know, is a
very honest fellow, was returning from some small jo lli fication and was
making his way home ward down Tottenham Court Road. In front of him he
saw, in the gas light, a talli sh man, walking with a slight stagg er, and
carrying a white goose sl ung over his shoulder. As he reached the
corner of G oo dge Street, a row broke out between this stranger and a
little k not of rough s. One of the latter knocked off the man’s hat, on
which he raised his stick to def end himself and, swinging it over his
head, smashed the sh op window behind him. Peter son had rushed forward
to protect the stranger from his as sail an ts; but the man, sho cked at
having broken the window, and seeing an offi ci al -looking person in
uni form rushing towards him, dropped his goose, took to his heel s, and
vanished amid the lab y rin th of small streets which lie at the back of
Tottenham Court Road. The rough s had also fled at the appearance of
Peterson, so that he was left in possession of the field of batt le, and
also of the spo ils of vi ctor y in the shape of this b attered hat and a
most un im peac ha ble Christmas goo se.”

“Which sure ly he re stor ed to their own er?”

“My dear fellow, there lies the problem. It is true that ‘ For Mrs.
Henry Baker ’ was printed upon a small card which was tied to the bir d’s
left leg, and it is also true that the initials ‘ H. B .’ are le gi ble
upon the lining of this hat, but as there are some thous ands of Baker s,
and some hundreds of Henry Ba k ers in this city of our s, it is not easy
to re store lost property to any one of them.”

“What, then, did Peter son do?”

“He brought round both hat and goose to me on Christmas morning,
knowing that even the small est problems are of interest to me. The
goose we retained until this morning, when there were signs that, in
spite of the slight fro st, it would be well that it should be eat en
without un necessary dela y. Its fin der has carried it off, therefore, to
ful fi l the ul timate de stin y of a goose, while I continue to re tain the
hat of the unknown gentleman who lost his Christmas din ner .”

“Did he not advertise ?”

“No.”

“Then, what clue could you have as to his id entit y?”

“Only as much as we can dedu ce.”

“From his hat ?”

“Precisel y.”

“But you are jo king. What can you gather from this old b attered fel t?”

“Here is my len s. You know my metho ds. What can you gather yourself as
to the individu ality of the man who has worn this article ?”

I took the t attered object in my hands and turned it over rather
ru e fully. It was a very ordinary black hat of the usual round sha pe,
hard and much the worse for we ar. The lining had been of red sil k, but
was a good deal discol ou red. There was no ma ker’s na me; but, as Holmes
had remarked, the initials “H . B .” were scrawled upon one side. It was
pier ced in the bri m for a hat- secur er, but the ela stic was missing. For
the rest, it was crac ked, exceedingly du st y, and spotted in several
places, although there seemed to have been some attempt to hide the
discol oured pat ches by sme aring them with in k.

“I can see noth ing,” said I, hand ing it back to my friend.

“On the contrary, Watson, you can see everything. You fa il, however, to
reason from what you see. You are too tim id in drawing your
infer en c es.”

“Then, pray tell me what it is that you can in fer from this hat ?”

He picked it up and gazed at it in the peculiar introspe ctive fashion
which was characteri stic of him. “It is perhaps less suggestive than it
might have be en,” he remarked, “and yet there are a few infer ences
which are very distin ct, and a few others which represent at least a
strong bal ance of probabil ity. That the man was high ly intellectual is
of course obvious upon the face of it, and also that he was fairly
well- to- do within the last three years, although he has now fallen upon
evil days. He had fores ight, but has less now than former ly, pointing
to a moral re tro gre ssi on, which, when taken with the decl ine of his
fortun es, seems to indic ate some evil influ ence, probably drink, at
work upon him. This may account also for the obvious fact that his wife
has ceased to love him.”

“My dear Holmes!”

“He has, however, retained some de g ree of self- respect ,” he continued,
dis regard ing my re mon str ance. “He is a man who leads a se d ent ary life,
goes out little, is out of train ing enti re ly, is middle- ag ed, has
grizzled hair which he has had cut within the last few days, and which
he an o in ts with li me- crea m. These are the more pat ent facts which are
to be deduced from his ha t. Al so, by the way, that it is extremely
im probable that he has gas laid on in his house.”

“You are certainly jo king, Holmes.”

“Not in the lea st. Is it possible that even now, when I give you these
resul ts, you are unable to see how they are at tain ed?”

“I have no doubt that I am very stup id, but I must confess that I am
unable to follow you. For example, how did you deduce that this man was
intellec tu al ?”

For answer Holmes clapped the hat upon his head. It came right over the
forehead and settled upon the bri dge of his no se. “It is a question of
cu bi c cap ac it y,” said he; “a man with so large a bra in must have
something in it.”

“The decl ine of his fortun es, then?”

“This hat is three years old. These flat bri ms curled at the edge came
in then. It is a hat of the very best qual ity. Look at the band of
ri b bed sil k and the excellent lin ing. If this man could afford to buy
so expensive a hat three years ago, and has had no hat since, then he
has as sure dly gone down in the worl d.”

“Well, that is clear enough, certain ly. But how about the fores ight and
the moral re tro gre ssi on?”

Sherlock Holmes laughed. “Here is the fores ight ,” said he putting his
finger upon the little disc and loo p of the hat- secur er. “They are
never sold upon hat s. If this man ordered one, it is a sign of a
certain amount of fores ight, since he went out of his way to take this
precaution against the win d. But since we see that he has broken the
ela stic and has not trou bled to replace it, it is obvious that he has
less fores ight now than former ly, which is a distinct proof of a
wea ken ing nature. On the other hand, he has endeavoured to conceal some
of these stains upon the felt by da u bing them with ink, which is a sign
that he has not entirely lost his self- respect .”

“Your reasoning is certainly pla usi ble .”

“The further poin ts, that he is middle- ag ed, that his hair is grizz led,
that it has been rec ently cu t, and that he u ses li me- crea m, are all to
be gathered from a close examination of the lower part of the lin ing.
The lens disc lo ses a large number of hair - en ds, clean cut by the
sc is sor s of the bar ber. They all appear to be ad hes i ve, and there is a
distinct od our of li me- crea m. This du st, you will observe, is not the
gr itt y, grey dust of the street but the flu ffy brown dust of the house,
showing that it has been hung up in doors most of the time, while the
marks of moist ure upon the inside are proof positive that the we ar er
per spir ed very fre ely, and could therefore, hardly be in the best of
train ing.”

“But his wife —you said that she had ceased to love him.”

“This hat has not been br ushed for wee ks. When I see you, my dear
Watson, with a week ’s acc um ul ation of dust upon your hat, and when your
wife all ows you to go out in such a stat e, I shall fear that you also
have been unfortunate enough to lose your wife’s affe cti on.”

“But he might be a bachel or.”

“N a y, he was bringing home the goose as a peac e- off ering to his wife.
Re member the card upon the bir d’s leg .”

“You have an answer to everything. But how on earth do you deduce that
the gas is not laid on in his house ?”

“One ta llow stain , or even two, might come by chance; but when I see no
less than five, I think that there can be little doubt that the
individual must be brought into frequ ent contact with burning
tall ow — walks upstairs at night probably with his hat in one hand and a
g uttering candle in the other. Any how, he never got tall ow- stains from
a gas- j et. Are you satisfi ed?”

“Well, it is very ingen ious ,” said I, laughing; “but since, as you said
just now, there has been no crime commit ted, and no harm done save the
loss of a goose, all this seems to be rather a waste of energ y.”

Sherlock Holmes had opened his mouth to re ply, when the door flew open,
and Peterson, the commission ai re, rushed into the apart ment with
flushed cheeks and the face of a man who is da zed with astonishment.

“The goose, Mr. Holmes ! The goose, sir !” he gasped.

“E h ? What of it, then? Has it returned to life and fla pped off through
the kitchen window ?” Holmes twisted himself round upon the sofa to get
a fair er view of the man’s excited face.

“S e e here, sir! See what my wife found in its cro p !” He held out his
hand and displa yed upon the centre of the palm a brilli antly
sc in ti ll ating blue stone, rather small er than a be an in si ze, but of
such pur ity and radi ance that it twink led like an ele ct ric point in the
dark ho llow of his hand.

Sherlock Holmes sat up with a whist le. “By J ov e, Peter son !” said he,
“this is treas ure tro ve indeed. I suppose you know what you have go t?”

“A di am on d, sir ? A precious st one. It cut s into glass as though it were
put t y.”

“It’s more than a precious st one. It is the precious st one.”

“Not the Countess of Mor car ’s blue carbun cle !” I ejacul ated.

“Precisely so. I ought to know its size and sha pe, seeing that I have
read the advertisement about it in The T im es every day lately. It is
absolutely uniqu e, and its value can only be conjec t ure d, but the
reward offered of £ 1000 is certainly not within a tw enti e th part of
the mar ket pri ce.”

“A thousand pound s! Great Lord of mer cy !” The commission air e plum ped
down into a chair and stared from one to the other of us.

“That is the reward, and I have reason to know that there are
sen tim ental consider ations in the back ground which would in du ce the
Countess to part with half her fortune if she could but re cover the
gem .”

“It was lo st, if I remember ari ght, at the Ho tel Co sm op olit an ,” I
remarked.

“Precisely so, on De ce m ber 22 n d, just five days ago. John Horner, a
plum ber, was acc used of having abstracted it from the lady’s
jewel- case. The evidence against him was so strong that the case has
been referred to the Assizes. I have some account of the matter here, I
believ e.” He rummaged amid his news papers, glancing over the dat es,
until at last he smoo thed one out, d ou bled it over, and read the
following paragraph :

“H o tel Co sm op olit an J e we l Rob ber y. John Horner, 2 6 , plum ber, was
brought up upon the charge of having upon the 22 n d inst ., abstracted
from the jewel- case of the Countess of Mor car the valuable ge m known as
the blue carbun cle . James Ry der, up per - atten dant at the hotel, gave his
evidence to the effect that he had shown Horner up to the dress ing-room
of the Countess of Mor car upon the day of the robbery in order that he
might sol der the second bar of the gr ate, which was loo se. He had
remained with Horner some little time, but had finally been called
away. On retur ning, he found that Horner had disappear ed, that the
bureau had been forced open, and that the small mor oc co cas ket in
which, as it afterwards tran spi red, the Countess was accustomed to keep
her jewe l, was lying empty upon the dressing- table. Ryder instantly
gave the alarm, and Horner was arrested the same even ing; but the stone
could not be found either upon his person or in his rooms. Ca ther ine
C usa ck, maid to the Count ess, de posed to having heard Ry der ’s cry of
dis may on discovering the robber y, and to having rushed into the room,
where she found matters as described by the last wit ness. Inspector
Bradstreet, B di visi on, gave evidence as to the ar rest of Horner, who
strugg led fran ti ca lly, and prote sted his innoc ence in the strong est
ter m s. E vi dence of a previous conviction for robbery having been given
against the prisoner, the magi str ate refused to deal sum mar ily with the
off ence, but referred it to the Assizes. Horner, who had shown signs of
inten se e motion during the proce ed ings, fainted away at the conclusion
and was carried out of cour t.”

“H um! So much for the police- cour t,” said Holmes thought fully, tossing
aside the paper. “The question for us now to solve is the sequ ence of
events leading from a ri fled jewel- case at one end to the crop of a
goose in Tottenham Court Ro ad at the other. You see, Watson, our little
dedu ctions have suddenly assu med a much more important and less
innocent as pe ct. Here is the st one; the stone came from the goose, and
the goose came from Mr. Henry Baker, the gentleman with the bad hat and
all the other characteri stic s with which I have bor ed you. So now we
must set ourselves very seriously to finding this gentleman and
ascertain ing what part he has played in this little myster y. To do
this, we must try the simp lest means first, and these lie undoubtedly
in an advertisement in all the evening papers. If this fa il, I shall
have re course to other metho d s.”

“What will you say ?”

“G ive me a pencil and that slip of paper. Now, then : ‘ F ound at the
corner of G oo dge Street, a goose and a black felt ha t. Mr. Henry Baker
can have the same by ap plying at 6 : 30 this evening at 22 1 B , Baker
Stre et .’ That is clear and con ci se.”

“ V er y. But will he see it?”

“Well, he is sure to keep an eye on the papers, since, to a poor man,
the loss was a heavy one. He was clearly so scared by his mis chance in
breaking the window and by the approach of Peter son that he thought of
nothing but flight, but since then he must have bit terly regre tted the
impul se which caused him to drop his bir d. Then, again, the
introdu ction of his name will cause him to see it, for everyone who
knows him will dire ct his attention to it. Here you are, Peterson, run
down to the adverti sing agency and have this put in the evening
papers.”

“In which, sir ?”

“Oh, in the G lo be, St ar, P all Ma ll, St. Jam es ’s G a z et te,
E ven ing Ne w s, St and ard, E ch o, and any others that occur to you.”

“Very well, sir. And this st one ?”

“Ah, yes, I shall keep the st one. Thank you. And, I say, Peterson, just
buy a goose on your way back and leave it here with me, for we must
have one to give to this gentleman in place of the one which your
family is now dev our ing.”

When the commission air e had gone, Holmes took up the stone and held it
against the light. “It’s a bon n y thing,” said he. “Just see how it
g lin ts and spark les. Of course it is a nu cle us and fo cus of crime.
Every good stone is. They are the devil ’s pet ba it s. In the larger and
older jewe ls every fac et may stand for a bloo dy de ed. This stone is not
yet twenty years old. It was found in the banks of the A mo y R i ver in
sou thern Chin a and is remarkable in having every characteri stic of the
carbun cle, save that it is blue in shade instead of ru by red. In spite
of its youth, it has already a sinister hi story. There have been two
murder s, a v it ri ol - thr ow ing, a sui cid e, and several robber ies brought
about for the sake of this forty- gra in weight of cry stall ised char co al.
Who would think that so pretty a to y would be a pur vey or to the gall ows
and the prison ? I’ll lock it up in my strong box now and drop a line to
the Countess to say that we have it.”

“Do you think that this man Horner is innocent ?”

“I cannot tell.”

“Well, then, do you imagine that this other one, Henry Baker, had
anything to do with the matter?”

“It is, I think, much more likely that Henry Baker is an absolutely
innocent man, who had no idea that the bird which he was carrying was
of considerably more value than if it were made of solid gol d. T hat,
however, I shall determine by a very simple test if we have an answer
to our advertise ment.”

“And you can do nothing until then?”

“Noth ing.”

“In that case I shall continue my professional r ound. But I shall come
back in the evening at the hour you have menti oned, for I should like
to see the solution of so tangled a business.”

“Very glad to see you. I d ine at seven . There is a wood co ck, I believ e.
By the way, in view of recent occur ren ces, perhaps I ought to ask Mrs.
Hudson to examine its cro p .”

I had been dela yed at a case, and it was a little after half-past six
when I found myself in Baker Street once more. As I approached the
house I saw a tall man in a Scot ch bonnet with a coat which was
buttoned up to his chin waiting outside in the bright se mi circle which
was thrown from the fan light. Just as I arrived the door was opened,
and we were shown up together to Holmes’ room.

“Mr. Henry Baker, I believ e,” said he, rising from his armchair and
gre eting his visitor with the easy air of gen i ality which he could so
readily assu me. “Pray take this chair by the fire, Mr. Ba k er. It is a
cold night, and I observe that your cir cul ation is more a da p ted for
summer than for w inter . Ah, Watson, you have just come at the right
time. Is that your hat, Mr. Baker ?”

“Yes, sir, that is undoubtedly my hat .”

He was a large man with rounded shoulders, a massive head, and a broad,
intell ig ent face, slo ping down to a pointed be ard of grizzled br own. A
touch of red in nose and cheeks, with a slight trem or of his extended
hand, re called Holmes’ sur mi se as to his habits. His rusty black
frock- coat was buttoned right up in front, with the collar turned up,
and his lan k wri sts protr uded from his sleev es without a sign of cu ff
or shir t. He spoke in a slow stac ca to fashion, choo sing his words with
care, and gave the impression generally of a man of learning and
letters who had had ill- usa ge at the hands of fortun e.

“We have retained these things for some day s,” said Holmes, “because we
expected to see an advertisement from you giving your address. I am at
a loss to know now why you did not advertise .”

Our visitor gave a rather sha me faced laugh . “S hill ings have not been so
pl enti ful with me as they once w er e,” he remarked. “I had no doubt that
the gang of rough s who as sa ul ted me had carried off both my hat and the
bir d. I did not care to spend more money in a hop e less attempt at
recover ing them.”

“Very natur all y. By the way, about the bird, we were compelled to eat
it.”

“To eat it!” Our visitor half rose from his chair in his excit ement.

“Yes, it would have been of no use to anyone had we not done so. But I
presume that this other goose upon the sideboard, which is about the
same weight and perfectly fresh , will answer your purpose equally
well ?”

“Oh, certain ly, certain ly,” answered Mr. Baker with a si gh of reli ef .

“Of course, we still have the fea ther s, leg s, cro p, and so on of your
own bird, so if you wish —”

The man burst into a hearty laugh . “They might be useful to me as
re lic s of my adventure ,” said he, “but beyond that I can hardly see
what use the dis jec t a mem br a of my late acquaintance are going to be
to me. No, sir, I think that, with your per mission, I will conf ine my
atten tions to the excellent bird which I perceive upon the side board .”

Sherlock Holmes glanced shar ply across at me with a slight shru g of his
shoulders.

“There is your hat, then, and there your bir d,” said he. “By the way,
would it bore you to tell me where you got the other one from ? I am
somewhat of a fow l fanci er, and I have seldom seen a better gr own
goo se.”

“Certainly, sir,” said Baker, who had ris en and tucked his newly gained
property under his arm. “There are a few of us who frequ ent the Al ph a
In n, near the M use um — we are to be found in the M use um itself during the
day, you understand. This year our good ho st, Windi g ate by name,
inst it ut ed a goose clu b, by which, on consideration of some few pence
every week, we were each to receive a bird at Christ mas . My pence were
du ly pa id, and the rest is familiar to you. I am much inde b ted to you,
sir, for a Scot ch bonnet is fitted neither to my years nor my grav it y.”
With a com ical p om pos ity of manner he bowed solem nly to both of us and
st rode off upon his way.

“So much for Mr. Henry Baker ,” said Holmes when he had closed the door
behind him. “It is quite certain that he knows nothing whatever about
the matter. Are you hungry, Watson?”

“Not particul ar ly.”

“Then I suggest that we turn our dinner into a supper and follow up
this clue while it is still ho t.”

“By all mean s.”

It was a bitter night, so we drew on our ul st ers and wrapped crav ats
about our thro at s. O ut side, the stars were shining col dly in a
clou d less sky, and the breath of the pas ser s- by ble w out into smoke
like so many pistol sho ts. Our foot fa lls rang out cri sp ly and loudly as
we swung through the doctor s’ quar ter, W im po le Street, Har le y Street,
and so through W ig more Street into Ox ford Street. In a quarter of an
hour we were in B lo om sbur y at the Al ph a In n, which is a small
public - house at the corner of one of the streets which runs down into
Hol bor n. Holmes pushed open the door of the private bar and ordered two
glasses of be er from the ru dd y- faced, white- ap r oned landlor d.

“Your be er should be excellent if it is as good as your gee se,” said
he.

“My gee se !” The man seemed surprised.

“Yes. I was speaking only half an hour ago to Mr. Henry Baker, who was
a member of your goose clu b .”

“Ah! yes, I see. But you see, sir, them ’s not our gee se.”

“Indeed! Who se, then?”

“Well, I got the two dozen from a salesman in Cov ent G ard en.”

“Inde ed ? I know some of them. Which was it?”

“B reckinri dge is his na me.”

“Ah! I don’t know him. Well, here’s your good heal th landlor d, and
pro sper ity to your house. Good- night.”

“Now for Mr. Breckinri dge ,” he continued, butt oning up his coat as we
came out into the fro sty air. “Re mem ber, Watson that though we have so
homely a thing as a goose at one end of this chain, we have at the
other a man who will certainly get seven year s’ pen al ser v itude unless
we can establi sh his innocen ce. It is possible that our inquiry may but
con firm his guil t; but, in any case, we have a line of investigation
which has been missed by the police, and which a singular chance has
placed in our hands. Let us follow it out to the bitter end. F ac es to
the south, then, and quick mar ch!”

We passed across Hol born, down En de ll Street, and so through a z ig z a g
of sl um s to Cov ent G ard en Mar ket. One of the largest stall s bore the
name of Breckinri dge upon it, and the propriet or a horse y- looking man,
with a sharp face and tri m side- whiskers was hel ping a boy to put up
the shut ter s.

“Good- evening. It’s a cold night ,” said Holmes.

The salesman nodded and shot a questioning glance at my companion.

“S old out of gee se, I see,” continued Holmes, pointing at the bare
slab s of mar ble.

“Let you have five hundred to-morrow morning.”

“That’s no good.”

“Well, there are some on the st all with the gas- fl ar e.”

“Ah, but I was recomm ended to you.”

“Who b y?”

“The landlor d of the Alpha .”

“Oh, yes; I sent him a couple of doz en.”

“F ine birds they were, too. Now where did you get them from?”

To my surprise the question pro vo ked a burst of anger from the
sales man.

“Now, then, mi ster ,” said he, with his head cocked and his arms a k im bo ,
“what are you driving at ? Le t’s have it stra ight, now.”

“It is straight enough. I should like to know who sold you the geese
which you sup plied to the Alpha .”

“W ell then, I shan ’t tell you. So now!”

“Oh, it is a matter of no importan ce; but I don’t know why you should
be so warm over such a tri fle .”

“W arm ! You’d be as war m, maybe, if you were as pe stered as I am. When I
pay good money for a good arti cle there should be an end of the
business; but it’s ‘ Where are the gee se ?’ and ‘ Who did you sell the
geese to ?’ and ‘ What will you take for the gee se ?’ One would think they
were the only geese in the world, to hear the fuss that is made over
them.”

“Well, I have no connection with any other people who have been making
inqui ri es,” said Holmes careles sly. “If you won’t tell us the bet is
off, that is all. But I’m always ready to back my opinion on a matter
of fow l s, and I have a fi ver on it that the bird I ate is country
bre d.”

“Well, then, you’ve lost your fi ver, for it’s town bre d,” sna pped the
sales man.

“It’s nothing of the kind .”

“I say it is.”

“I don’t believe it.”

“D ’you think you know more about fow ls than I, who have hand led them
ever since I was a ni pper ? I tell you, all those birds that went to the
Al ph a were town bre d.”

“You’ll never persuade me to believe that.”

“Will you be t, then?”

“It’s merely taking your money, for I know that I am right. But I’ll
have a sovereign on with you, just to te ach you not to be ob stin at e.”

The salesman chuckled gri m ly. “B ring me the books, Bill ,” said he.

The small boy brought round a small thin volume and a great
greas y- backed one, laying them out together beneath the hanging la mp .

“Now then, Mr. Co ck sure ,” said the sales man, “I thought that I was out
of gee se, but before I fin ish you’ll find that there is still one left
in my shop . You see this little book ?”

“Well ?”

“That’s the list of the folk from whom I bu y. D ’you see ? Well, then,
here on this page are the country fol k, and the num bers after their
names are where their accounts are in the big ledg er. Now, then ! You
see this other page in red ink ? Well, that is a list of my town
sup pli ers. Now, look at that third name. Just read it out to me.”

“Mrs. Oakshott, 11 7, Brixton Ro ad — 2 4 9 ,” read Holmes.

“Quite so. Now turn that up in the ledg er.”

Holmes turned to the page indicat ed. “Here you are, ‘ Mrs. Oakshott,
11 7, Brixton Road, eg g and p oul try sup pli er .’”

“Now, then, what’s the last entr y?”

“‘ De ce m ber 22 n d. Tw ent y- four geese at 7 s. 6 d .’”

“Quite so. There you are. And undernea th ?”

“‘ S old to Mr. Windi g ate of the Alpha , at 12 s .’”

“What have you to say now?”

Sherlock Holmes looked deeply cha gr in ed. He drew a sovereign from his
pocket and threw it down upon the slab , turning away with the air of a
man whose dis gust is too deep for words. A few yards off he stopped
under a la mp - post and laughed in the hear ty, noi seless fashion which
was peculiar to him.

“When you see a man with whiskers of that cut and the ‘ P ink ’ un ’
protruding out of his pocket, you can always draw him by a bet ,” said
he. “I dar e say that if I had put £ 100 down in front of him, that man
would not have given me such complete information as was drawn from him
by the idea that he was doing me on a wag er. Well, Watson, we are, I
fancy, ne aring the end of our qu est, and the only point which rema ins
to be determined is whether we should go on to this Mrs. Oakshot t
to-night, or whether we should re serve it for to-mor r ow. It is clear
from what that sur ly fellow said that there are others besides
ourselves who are anxious about the matter, and I shoul d —”

His remarks were suddenly cut short by a loud hu b bu b which broke out
from the st all which we had just left. Tur ning round we saw a little
rat- faced fellow standing in the centre of the circle of yellow light
which was thrown by the swinging lamp, while Breckinri dge, the
sales man, fra med in the door of his sta ll, was shaking his fists
fi er ce ly at the cr inging figu re.

“I’ve had enough of you and your gee se,” he shou ted. “I wish you were
all at the devil together. If you come pe ster ing me any more with your
si lly talk I’ll set the dog at you. You bring Mrs. Oakshot t here and
I’ll answer her, but what have you to do with it? Did I buy the geese
off you?”

“No; but one of them was mine all the sa me,” wh ined the little man.

“Well, then, ask Mrs. Oakshot t for it.”

“She told me to ask you.”

“Well, you can ask the King of P roo si a, for all I car e. I’ve had enough
of it. G et out of this !” He rushed fi er ce ly forward, and the inquir er
f litt ed away into the darkness.

“Ha! this may save us a visit to Brixton Ro ad ,” whispered Holmes. “Come
with me, and we will see what is to be made of this fell ow .” St riding
through the scattered kno ts of people who loun ged round the fl aring
stall s, my companion spee dily over took the little man and touched him
upon the shoulder. He sprang round, and I could see in the gas- light
that every v esti ge of colour had been driven from his face.

“Who are you, then? What do you wan t?” he asked in a qu aver ing voi ce.

“You will excuse me,” said Holmes bl and ly, “but I could not help
over hearing the questions which you put to the salesman just now. I
think that I could be of assistance to you.”

“You ? Who are you? How could you know anything of the matter?”

“My name is Sherlock Holmes. It is my business to know what other
people don’t know.”

“But you can know nothing of this?”

“Ex c use me, I know everything of it. You are endeavouring to trace some
geese which were sold by Mrs. Oakshott, of Brixton Road, to a salesman
named Breckinri dge, by him in turn to Mr. Windi g ate, of the Alpha , and
by him to his clu b, of which Mr. Henry Baker is a mem ber.”

“Oh, sir, you are the very man whom I have long ed to meet ,” cried the
little fellow with out stretched hands and qui ver ing fing ers. “I can
hardly explain to you how interested I am in this matter.”

Sherlock Holmes ha iled a four-wheel er which was pas sing. “In that case
we had better discuss it in a co sy room rather than in this wind - swept
marke t- plac e,” said he. “But pray tell me, before we go far ther, who it
is that I have the pleasure of assi st ing.”

The man hesit ated for an instan t. “My name is John Robin son ,” he
answered with a side long glan ce.

“No, no; the real name,” said Holmes sweet ly. “It is always awk ward
doing business with an ali as.”

A flush sprang to the white cheeks of the strang er. “W ell then,” said
he, “my real name is James Ry der .”

“Precisely so. He ad atten dant at the Ho tel Co sm op olit an. Pray step into
the cab, and I shall soon be able to tell you everything which you
would wish to know.”

The little man stood glancing from one to the other of us with
half- frighten ed, half- hop eful eyes, as one who is not sure whether he
is on the ver ge of a wind fall or of a cat ast rop he. Then he stepped into
the cab, and in half an hour we were back in the sitting-room at Baker
Street. Nothing had been said during our drive, but the high, thin
breathing of our new companion, and the clasp ings and un clasp ings of
his hands, spoke of the nervous ten sion within him.

“Here we ar e!” said Holmes che eri ly as we fi led into the room. “The
fire looks very seas onable in this weather. You look cold, Mr. Ry der.
Pray take the bas ke t- chair. I will just put on my slipper s before we
settle this little matter of your s. Now, then ! You want to know what
became of those gee se?”

“Yes, sir.”

“O r ra ther, I fancy, of that goo se. It was one bird, I imagine in which
you were interest ed— white, with a black bar across the tail .”

Ryder qui vered with e mo tion. “Oh, sir,” he cried, “ can you tell me
where it went to?”

“It came here.”

“H er e?”

“Yes, and a most remarkable bird it pro ved. I don’t wonder that you
should take an interest in it. It laid an eg g after it was dead —the
bon ni est, bright est little blue eg g that ever was seen. I have it here
in my mu se um .”

Our visitor staggered to his feet and clutched the mantel piece with his
right hand. Holmes unlocked his strong - box and held up the blue
carbun cle, which shone out like a star , with a cold, brilli ant,
man y- pointed radi ance. Ryder stood gl aring with a drawn face, uncertain
whether to claim or to dis own it.

“The ga me ’s up, Ry der ,” said Holmes quietly. “Hold up, man, or you’ll
be into the fire ! Give him an arm back into his chair, Watson. He’s not
got blood enough to go in for fel ony with imp un ity. Give him a d ash of
brand y. S o! Now he looks a little more hum an. What a shri mp it is, to
be sure !”

For a moment he had staggered and nearly fall en, but the brandy brought
a ting e of colour into his cheeks, and he sat staring with frightened
eyes at his acc us er.

“I have almost every link in my hands, and all the proof s which I could
possibly ne ed, so there is little which you need tell me. Still, that
little may as well be cleared up to make the case comp let e. You had
heard, Ry der, of this blue stone of the Countess of Mor car ’ s?”

“It was Ca ther ine C u sack who told me of it,” said he in a cr ack ling
voi ce.

“I see — her lady ship ’s wait ing- ma i d. Well, the temp t ation of sudden
weal th so easily ac quir ed was too much for you, as it has been for
better men before you; but you were not very sc rup ul ous in the means
you use d. It seems to me, Ry der, that there is the making of a very
pretty vill ain in you. You knew that this man Horner, the plum ber, had
been concerned in some such matter before, and that suspicion would
rest the more readily upon him. What did you do, then? You made some
small job in my lady’s room —you and your confeder ate C usa ck —and you
managed that he should be the man sent for. Then, when he had left, you
ri fled the jewel- case, raised the alarm, and had this unfortunate man
arre sted. You then —”

Ryder threw himself down suddenly upon the ru g and clutched at my
companion ’s knees. “For Go d’s sake, have mer cy !” he shrie ked. “Th ink of
my father ! Of my mother ! It would break their hear ts. I never went
wrong befor e! I never will again. I swear it. I’ll swear it on a Bi ble.
Oh, don’t bring it into cour t! For Christ ’s sake, don ’t !”

“G et back into your chair !” said Holmes ster n ly. “It is very well to
cr ing e and crawl now, but you thought little enough of this poor Horner
in the do ck for a crime of which he knew nothing.”

“I will fl y, Mr. Holmes. I will leave the country, sir. Then the charge
against him will break down.”

“H um! We will talk about that. And now let us hear a true account of
the next ac t. How came the stone into the goose, and how came the goose
into the open mar ket ? Tell us the truth, for there lies your only hope
of safet y.”

Ryder passed his tongue over his par ched lip s. “I will tell you it just
as it happened, sir,” said he. “When Horner had been arre st ed, it
seemed to me that it would be best for me to get away with the stone at
once, for I did not know at what moment the police might not take it
into their heads to search me and my room. There was no place about the
hotel where it would be safe. I went out, as if on some commissi on, and
I made for my sister’s house. She had married a man named Oakshott, and
lived in Brixton Road, where she f attened fow ls for the mar ket. All the
way there every man I met seemed to me to be a police man or a
dete cti ve; and, for all that it was a cold night, the sweat was p ouring
down my face before I came to the Brixton Road. My sister asked me what
was the matter, and why I was so pa le; but I told her that I had been
up set by the jewe l robbery at the hote l. Then I went into the back yard
and smoked a pipe and wondered what it would be best to do.

“I had a friend once called Ma ud sle y, who went to the bad, and has just
been ser ving his time in P ent on vill e. One day he had met me, and fell
into talk about the ways of thiev es, and how they could get rid of what
they sto le. I knew that he would be true to me, for I knew one or two
things about him; so I made up my mind to go right on to K il bur n, where
he li ved, and take him into my confid ence. He would show me how to turn
the stone into money. But how to get to him in safet y? I thought of the
ag oni es I had gone through in coming from the hote l. I might at any
moment be seized and sear ched, and there would be the stone in my
waist coat pocket. I was leaning against the wall at the time and
looking at the geese which were wa dd ling about round my feet, and
suddenly an idea came into my head which showed me how I could beat the
best detective that ever li ved.

“My sister had told me some weeks before that I might have the pick of
her geese for a Christmas present, and I knew that she was always as
good as her word. I would take my goose now, and in it I would carry my
stone to K il bur n. There was a little shed in the yard, and behind this
I drove one of the bir d s—a fine big one, white, with a barred tail . I
caught it, and pr ying its bill open, I thrust the stone down its throat
as far as my finger could reach. The bird gave a g ul p, and I felt the
stone pass along its gu llet and down into its cro p. But the creature
fla pped and strugg led, and out came my sister to know what was the
matter. As I turned to speak to her the br ute broke loose and fl uttered
off among the others.

“‘W hat ever were you doing with that bird, Jem ?’ says she.

“‘W ell ,’ said I, ‘you said you’d give me one for Christm as, and I was
feeling which was the fat te st .’

“‘O h ,’ says she, ‘ we’ve set yours aside for you — Jem ’s bird, we call it.
It’s the big white one over yon der. There’s twenty- six of them, which
makes one for you, and one for us, and two dozen for the mar ket .’

“‘ Thank you, M ag gi e,’ says I; ‘but if it is all the same to you, I’d
rather have that one I was handling just now .’

“‘The other is a good three pound heavi er ,’ said she, ‘and we f attened
it ex pres sly for you.’

“‘ Never mind. I’ll have the other, and I’ll take it now ,’ said I.

“‘Oh, just as you like ,’ said she, a little hu f fe d. ‘ Which is it you
wan t, then?’

“‘That white one with the barred tail , right in the middle of the
flo ck .’

“‘Oh, very well. K ill it and take it with you.’

“Well, I did what she said, Mr. Holmes, and I carried the bird all the
way to K il bur n. I told my pal what I had done, for he was a man that it
was easy to tell a thing like that to. He laughed until he cho ked, and
we got a knife and opened the goo se. My heart turned to water, for
there was no sign of the stone, and I knew that some terrible mistake
had occurred. I left the bird, rushed back to my sister ’s, and hurried
into the back y ard. There was not a bird to be seen there.

“‘Where are they all, M ag gi e ?’ I cried.

“‘ Gone to the deal er ’s, Jem .’

“‘ Which deal er ’ s?’

“‘ Breckinri dge, of Cov ent G ard en .’

“‘ But was there another with a barred tail ?’ I asked, ‘ the same as the
one I cho se ?’

“‘Yes, Jem ; there were two bar red- tail ed ones, and I could never tell
them apart .’

“Well, then, of course I saw it all, and I ran off as hard as my feet
would carry me to this man Breckinri dge; but he had sold the lot at
once, and not one word would he tell me as to where they had gone. You
heard him yourselves to-night. Well, he has always answered me like
that. My sister thinks that I am going ma d. Sometimes I think that I am
myself. And now —and now I am myself a brand ed thi ef, without ever
having touched the weal th for which I sold my character. God help me!
God help me!” He burst into convul sive so bb ing, with his face buried in
his hands.

There was a long silence, broken only by his heavy breathing and by the
meas ured tapping of Sherlock Holmes’ finger-tips upon the edge of the
table. Then my friend rose and threw open the door.

“G et out!” said he.

“What, sir! Oh, Hea ven bless you!”

“No more words. G et out!”

And no more words were nee ded. There was a rus h, a cl atter upon the
stairs, the ban g of a door, and the cris p rattle of running foot fa lls
from the street.

“A f ter all, Watson,” said Holmes, reaching up his hand for his clay
pipe, “I am not retained by the police to supply their de fi ci en ci es. If
Horner were in danger it would be another thing; but this fellow will
not appear against him, and the case must coll ap se. I suppose that I am
comm ut ing a fel ony, but it is just possible that I am sa ving a soul.
This fellow will not go wrong again; he is too terribly frighten ed.
S end him to ga ol now, and you make him a ga ol - bird for life. Besides,
it is the seas on of for gi ven ess. Ch ance has put in our way a most
singular and whim si cal problem, and its solution is its own re ward. If
you will have the goodness to touch the bell, Doctor, we will begin
another investig ation, in which, also a bird will be the chi ef
feature .”




VIII. THE ADVENTURE OF THE S P EC KLE D B AND


On glancing over my notes of the sev enty odd cases in which I have
during the last eight years studied the methods of my friend Sherlock
Holmes, I find many tra gi c, some com ic, a large number merely strange,
but none common place; for, working as he did rather for the love of his
ar t than for the ac quire ment of weal th, he refused to associ ate himself
with any investigation which did not tend towards the un usual, and even
the fanta stic . Of all these vari ed cases, however, I cannot recall any
which presented more singular features than that which was associated
with the well-known Surre y family of the Roylot ts of Stoke Mor an. The
events in question occurred in the early days of my associ ation with
Holmes, when we were sharing rooms as bachel ors in Baker Street. It is
possible that I might have placed them upon record before, but a
promise of secrecy was made at the time, from which I have only been
fre ed during the last month by the unti mely death of the lady to whom
the ple dge was gi ven. It is perhaps as well that the facts should now
come to light, for I have reasons to know that there are widespread
rum ours as to the death of Dr. Grimesby Roylott which tend to make the
matter even more terrible than the truth.

It was early in A pri l in the year ’8 3 that I woke one morning to find
Sherlock Holmes stand ing, fully dressed, by the side of my bed. He was
a late ris er, as a rule, and as the clock on the mantel piece showed me
that it was only a quar ter- past se ven, I blin ked up at him in some
surprise, and perhaps just a little res ent ment, for I was myself
regular in my habits.

“Very sorry to knock you up, Watson,” said he, “but it’s the common lot
this morning. Mrs. Hudson has been knocked up, she re tor ted upon me,
and I on you.”

“What is it, then —a fire ?”

“No; a client. It seems that a young lady has arrived in a considerable
state of excit ement, who insi sts upon seeing me. She is waiting now in
the sitting- room. Now, when young ladies wand er about the me tro pol is at
this hour of the morning, and knock sleepy people up out of their bed s,
I presume that it is something very pressing which they have to
comm uni cat e. Sh ould it prove to be an interesting case, you would, I am
sure, wish to follow it from the out se t. I thought, at any rate, that I
should call you and give you the chan ce.”

“My dear fellow, I would not miss it for any thing.”

I had no keen er pleasure than in following Holmes in his professional
investig ations, and in admir ing the rap id deducti ons, as swift as
in tu iti ons, and yet always founded on a logi cal bas is with which he
un ra ve lled the problems which were submitted to him. I rapidly threw on
my clothes and was ready in a few minutes to ac company my friend down
to the sitting- room. A lady dressed in black and heavily ve i led, who
had been sitting in the window, rose as we entered.

“Good- morning, madam ,” said Holmes cheer il y. “My name is Sherlock
Holmes. This is my intimate friend and associ ate, Dr. Watson, before
whom you can speak as freely as before myself. Ha! I am glad to see
that Mrs. Hudson has had the good sense to light the fire. Pray draw up
to it, and I shall order you a cup of hot coffee, for I observe that
you are shiver ing.”

“It is not cold which makes me shiver ,” said the woman in a low voice,
changing her seat as requ est ed.

“What, then?”

“It is fear, Mr. Holmes. It is terr or.” She raised her veil as she
spoke, and we could see that she was indeed in a pitiable state of
agit ation, her face all drawn and gre y, with rest less frightened eyes,
like those of some hunted anim al. Her features and figure were those of
a woman of thir ty, but her hair was shot with pre mat ure gre y, and her
expression was weary and ha gg ard. Sherlock Holmes ran her over with one
of his quick, all- com pre h en sive glan ces.

“You must not fe ar ,” said he soo thing ly, bending forward and pat ting
her fore arm. “We shall soon set matters right, I have no doub t. You
have come in by train this morning, I see.”

“You know me, then?”

“No, but I observe the second half of a return tick et in the palm of
your left glo ve. You must have started early, and yet you had a good
drive in a dog- car t, along heavy road s, before you reached the
st ation.”

The lady gave a violent start and stared in be wilder ment at my
companion.

“There is no myster y, my dear madam ,” said he, smiling. “The left arm
of your jacket is sp attered with mud in no less than seven places. The
marks are perfectly fresh . There is no ve hi cle save a dog-cart which
throws up mud in that way, and then only when you sit on the left-hand
side of the d river .”

“What ever your reasons may be, you are perfectly corre ct ,” said she. “I
started from home before si x, reached Leather head at twenty pa st, and
came in by the first train to Water loo . S ir, I can stand this strain no
long er; I shall go mad if it continu es. I have no one to turn to— none,
save only one, who car es for me, and he, poor fellow, can be of little
ai d. I have heard of you, Mr. Holmes; I have heard of you from Mrs.
F ar in to sh, whom you helped in the hour of her sor e ne ed. It was from
her that I had your address. Oh, sir, do you not think that you could
help me, too, and at least throw a little light through the dense
darkness which sur r ounds me? At present it is out of my power to reward
you for your servi ces, but in a month or six weeks I shall be married,
with the contro l of my own in come, and then at least you shall not find
me un grate ful.”

Holmes turned to his des k and, un locking it, drew out a small
case - book, which he consul ted.

“F ar in to sh ,” said he. “A h yes, I recall the case ; it was concerned with
an op al ti ar a. I think it was before your time, Watson. I can only say,
madam, that I shall be happy to devo te the same care to your case as I
did to that of your friend. As to reward, my profession is its own
re war d; but you are at liber ty to def ray whatever expen ses I may be put
to, at the time which suits you best. And now I beg that you will lay
before us everything that may help us in forming an opinion upon the
matter.”

“Alas !” re plied our visitor, “the very horror of my situation lies in
the fact that my fe ars are so vag ue, and my suspicions depend so
entirely upon small poin ts, which might seem trivial to another, that
even he to whom of all others I have a right to look for help and
advice looks upon all that I tell him about it as the fanci es of a
nervous woman. He does not say so, but I can read it from his soothing
answ ers and aver ted eyes. But I have heard, Mr. Holmes, that you can
see deeply into the man if old wickedness of the human heart. You may
advise me how to walk amid the dang ers which en comp ass me.”

“I am all attention, madam .”

“My name is Hel en Stoner, and I am living with my stepfather, who is
the last survi v or of one of the ol dest Sax on families in England, the
Roylot ts of Stoke Mor an, on the we stern border of Surre y.”

Holmes nodded his head. “The name is familiar to me,” said he.

“The family was at one time among the ri chest in England, and the
est ates extended over the bor ders into Berk shire in the north, and
Hamp shire in the we st. In the last cent ur y, however, four succ essive
he irs were of a dis solute and wa ste ful dispos ition, and the family ruin
was eventually completed by a gam bl er in the days of the Re gen c y.
Nothing was left save a few ac re s of ground, and the
two- hundre d- year - old house, which is itself cr ushed under a heavy
mor t g age. The last squir e dragged out his exist ence there, living the
horrible life of an aristo cr atic pa up er; but his only son, my
stepfather, seeing that he must a da pt himself to the new conditi ons,
ob tained an advance from a relati ve, which en ab led him to take a
medical de g ree and went out to Cal cut ta , wher e, by his professional
skill and his force of character, he establi shed a large practi ce. In a
fit of ang er, however, caused by some robber ies which had been
perpe tr ated in the house, he beat his n ative but ler to death and
narr ow ly escaped a capital sent ence. As it was, he suffer ed a long ter m
of imprison ment and afterwards returned to England a mor ose and
disap pointed man.

“When Dr. Roylott was in Indi a he married my mother, Mrs. Stoner, the
young widow of Maj or- General Stoner, of the B eng al Ar ti ll er y. My sister
Juli a and I were tw ins, and we were only two years old at the time of
my mother ’s re- marriage. She had a considerable sum of mone y— not less
than £ 1000 a year —and this she be qu ea thed to Dr. Roylott entirely
while we resid ed with him, with a provi sion that a certain an nu al sum
should be allowed to each of us in the event of our marriage. Shor tly
after our return to England my mother di ed— she was killed eight years
ago in a rail way accid ent near Cre w e. Dr. Roylott then aband oned his
attempts to establi sh himself in practice in London and took us to live
with him in the old ance str al house at Stoke Mor an. The money which my
mother had left was enough for all our wan ts, and there seemed to be no
ob stac le to our happ in ess.

“But a terrible change came over our stepfather about this time.
In stead of making friends and ex changing vis its with our neighbour s,
who had at first been over jo yed to see a Roylott of Stoke Moran back in
the old family se at, he shut himself up in his house and seldom came
out save to indul ge in fer o ci ous quarre ls with whoever might cross his
pa th. Vi ol ence of temp er approaching to man i a has been hereditary in
the men of the family, and in my step father’s case it had, I believe,
been inten si fied by his long resid ence in the tro pic s. A series of
disgrac eful bra w ls took place, two of which ended in the police- cour t,
until at last he became the terror of the village, and the folks would
fly at his approa ch, for he is a man of immense streng th, and
absolutely un contro llable in his ang er.

“L ast week he hur led the local black smi th over a par ap et into a stream,
and it was only by paying over all the money which I could gather
together that I was able to aver t another public ex po sure. He had no
friends at all save the wandering gipsi es, and he would give these
vag ab on ds leave to en camp upon the few ac re s of bra m ble - covered land
which represent the family estate, and would accept in return the
ho spit ality of their t ents, wandering away with them sometimes for
weeks on end. He has a passion also for Indian anim als, which are sent
over to him by a correspon d ent, and he has at this moment a cheetah and
a babo on, which wand er freely over his grounds and are feared by the
villag ers almost as much as their ma ster.

“You can imagine from what I say that my poor sister Juli a and I had no
great pleasure in our li ves. No servant would stay with us, and for a
long time we did all the work of the house. She was but thirty at the
time of her death, and yet her hair had already begun to whi ten, even
as mine ha s.”

“Your sister is dead, then?”

“She died just two years ago, and it is of her death that I wish to
speak to you. You can understand that, living the life which I have
descri bed, we were little likely to see anyone of our own age and
position. We had, however, an aun t, my mother ’s maid en sist er, Miss
H on or i a West pha il, who lives near H arr ow, and we were occasionally
allowed to pay short vis its at this lady’s house. Juli a went there at
Christmas two years ago, and met there a half- pay ma j or of mar in es, to
whom she became engag ed. My stepfather learned of the engag ement when
my sister returned and offered no objec tion to the marri ag e; but within
a fort night of the day which had been fixed for the wedd ing, the
terrible event occurred which has de pri ved me of my only companion .”

Sherlock Holmes had been leaning back in his chair with his eyes closed
and his head sunk in a cus hi on, but he half opened his li ds now and
glanced across at his visitor.

“Pray be preci se as to detail s,” said he.

“It is easy for me to be so, for every event of that dreadful time is
se ared into my memory. The man or- house is, as I have already said, very
old, and only one wing is now in habit ed. The bed rooms in this wing are
on the ground floor, the sitting- rooms being in the central block of
the build ings. Of these bed rooms the first is Dr. Roy lo tt ’s, the second
my sister ’s, and the third my own. There is no communic ation between
them, but they all open out into the same corrid or. Do I make myself
pla in?”

“P er fe ctly so.”

“The windows of the three rooms open out upon the law n. That fat al
night Dr. Roylott had gone to his room early, though we knew that he
had not retired to rest, for my sister was trou bled by the smell of the
strong Indian cig ars which it was his custom to smo ke. She left her
room, therefore, and came into mine, where she sat for some time,
cha tting about her approaching wedding. At eleven o’clock she rose to
leave me, but she pa used at the door and looked back.

“‘ Tell me, Hel en ,’ said she, ‘ have you ever heard anyone whistle in the
dead of the night ?’

“‘ N ever ,’ said I.

“‘I suppose that you could not possibly whist le, yourself, in your
sleep ?’

“‘C ertain ly not. But wh y?’

“‘ Because during the last few nights I have al ways, about three in the
morning, heard a low, clear whist le. I am a light sleep er, and it has
awa k ened me. I cannot tell where it came from — perhaps from the next
room, perhaps from the law n. I thought that I would just ask you
whether you had heard it.’

“‘No, I have not. It must be those wre t ched gipsies in the plant ation .’

“‘Very likely. And yet if it were on the lawn, I wonder that you did
not hear it al so.’

“‘ Ah, but I sleep more heavily than you.’

“‘Well, it is of no great consequ ence, at any rat e.’ She smiled back at
me, closed my door, and a few moments later I heard her key turn in the
lock .”

“Inde ed,” said Holmes. “Was it your custom always to lock yourselves in
at night?”

“A l way s.”

“And wh y?”

“I think that I mentioned to you that the Do ctor kept a cheetah and a
babo on. We had no feeling of security unless our doors were lock ed.”

“Quite so. Pray proce ed with your statem ent.”

“I could not sleep that night. A vague feeling of im pen ding misfortune
impressed me. My sister and I, you will recollec t, were tw ins, and you
know how subtle are the links which b ind two soul s which are so closely
all i ed. It was a wild night. The wind was howling outside, and the rain
was beating and spl ashing against the windows. Suddenly, amid all the
hu b bu b of the ga le, there burst forth the wild scream of a terri fied
woman. I knew that it was my sister’s voi ce. I sprang from my bed,
wrapped a shaw l round me, and rushed into the corrid or. As I opened my
door I seemed to hear a low whist le, such as my sister descri bed, and a
few moments later a cl anging sound, as if a m ass of metal had fall en.
As I ran down the passage, my sister’s door was un locked, and revol ved
slowly upon its hing es. I stared at it horr or- stri ck en, not knowing
what was about to is sue from it. By the light of the corrid or- lamp I
saw my sister appear at the open ing, her face blan ched with terr or, her
hands gro ping for help, her whole figure swa ying to and fr o like that
of a drun k ard. I ran to her and threw my arms round her, but at that
moment her knees seemed to give way and she fell to the ground. She
wri thed as one who is in terrible pain , and her limbs were dread fully
convul sed. At first I thought that she had not recognised me, but as I
bent over her she suddenly shrie ked out in a voice which I shall never
for ge t, ‘ Oh, my God! Hel en! It was the band ! The speckled band !’ There
was something else which she would fa in have said, and she stab bed with
her finger into the air in the direction of the Doctor ’s room, but a
fresh convul sion seized her and choked her words. I rushed out, calling
loudly for my stepfather, and I met him hast ening from his room in his
dressing- g own. When he reached my sister’s side she was un consci ous,
and though he poured brandy down her throat and sent for medical aid
from the village, all efforts were in v ain , for she slowly sank and
died without having recovered her conscious ness. Such was the dreadful
end of my be loved sister .”

“One moment ,” said Holmes, “ are you sure about this whistle and
metallic s ound ? Could you swear to it?”

“That was what the county coroner asked me at the inquir y. It is my
strong impression that I heard it, and yet, among the cr ash of the ga le
and the crea king of an old house, I may possibly have been de cei v ed.”

“Was your sister dres se d?”

“No, she was in her night- dress. In her right hand was found the
char red stump of a match, and in her left a mat ch- box .”

“S how ing that she had struck a light and looked about her when the
al arm took place. That is important. And what conclusions did the
coroner come to?”

“He investig ated the case with great care, for Dr. Roylott’s conduct
had long been no tor ious in the coun ty, but he was unable to find any
satisfactor y cause of death. My evidence showed that the door had been
fastened upon the inner side, and the windows were b locked by
old-fashioned shutters with broad iron bar s, which were secur ed every
night. The walls were carefully soun ded, and were shown to be quite
solid all round, and the floor ing was also thoroughly examin ed, with
the same result. The chim ney is wide, but is barred up by four large
sta ple s. It is certain, therefore, that my sister was quite alone when
she met her end. Besides, there were no marks of any violence upon
her.”

“How about pois on?”

“The doctor s examined her for it, but without succes s.”

“What do you think that this unfortunate lady died of, then?”

“It is my beli ef that she died of p ure fear and nervous sho ck, though
what it was that frightened her I cannot imagine.”

“W ere there gipsies in the plant ation at the time?”

“Yes, there are nearly always some there.”

“Ah, and what did you gather from this allusion to a band —a speckled
band ?”

“S ome times I have thought that it was merely the wild talk of deliri um,
sometimes that it may have referred to some band of people, perhaps to
these very gipsies in the plant ation. I do not know whether the spotted
handkerchi ef s which so many of them wear over their heads might have
suggested the strange ad jec tive which she use d.”

Holmes shook his head like a man who is far from being satisfied.

“Th ese are very deep water s,” said he; “ pray go on with your
narrati ve.”

“T w o years have passed since then, and my life has been until lat ely
lone lier than ever. A month ago, however, a dear friend, whom I have
known for many years, has done me the honour to ask my hand in
marriage. His name is Arm it ag e— P er cy Arm it ag e— the second son of Mr.
Arm it age, of C ran e Wat er, near Reading. My stepfather has offered no
op position to the match, and we are to be married in the course of the
spr ing. Two days ago some repair s were started in the west wing of the
building, and my bedroom wall has been pier ce d, so that I have had to
move into the chamber in which my sister died, and to sleep in the very
bed in which she slep t. I mag ine, then, my thri ll of terror when last
night, as I lay awa ke, thinking over her terrible f ate, I suddenly
heard in the silence of the night the low whistle which had been the
her a ld of her own death. I sprang up and lit the lamp, but nothing was
to be seen in the room. I was too shaken to go to bed again, however,
so I dressed, and as soon as it was daylight I slipped down, got a
dog-cart at the Cr own In n, which is oppos it e, and drove to Leather head,
from whence I have come on this morning with the one object of seeing
you and asking your advi ce.”

“You have done wi sel y,” said my friend. “But have you told me all?”

“Yes, all.”

“Miss Roylot t, you have not. You are scre ening your step father .”

“Why, what do you mean?”

For answer Holmes pushed back the fri ll of black l ace which fring ed the
hand that lay upon our visit or ’s kne e. F ive little liv id spo ts, the
marks of four fingers and a thumb, were printed upon the white wri st.

“You have been cru e lly use d,” said Holmes.

The lady coloured deeply and covered over her injured wri st. “He is a
hard man,” she said, “and perhaps he hardly knows his own streng th.”

There was a long silence, during which Holmes leaned his chin upon his
hands and stared into the cr ack ling fire.

“This is a very deep business ,” he said at last. “There are a thousand
details which I should desire to know before I deci de upon our course
of action. Yet we have not a moment to lo se. If we were to come to
Stoke Moran to-day, would it be possible for us to see over these rooms
without the knowledge of your step father?”

“As it happen s, he spoke of coming into town to-day upon some most
important business. It is probable that he will be away all day, and
that there would be nothing to disturb you. We have a house keeper now,
but she is old and foolish, and I could easily get her out of the way.”

“Excell ent. You are not averse to this tri p, Watson?”

“By no mean s.”

“Then we shall both come. What are you going to do yourself ?”

“I have one or two things which I would wish to do now that I am in
town. But I shall return by the twelve o’clock tra in, so as to be there
in time for your com ing.”

“And you may expect us early in the afterno on. I have myself some small
business matters to attend to. Will you not wait and breakfa st?”

“No, I must go. My heart is light ened already since I have confi ded my
trouble to you. I shall look forward to seeing you again this
afterno on.” She dropped her thick black veil over her face and glided
from the room.

“And what do you think of it all, Watson?” asked Sherlock Holmes,
leaning back in his chair.

“It seems to me to be a most dark and sinister business.”

“D ar k enough and sinister enough.”

“Y et if the lady is correct in saying that the floor ing and walls are
sound, and that the door, window, and chim ney are im passa ble, then her
sister must have been undoubtedly alone when she met her mysterious
en d.”

“What be comes, then, of these no c tur nal whist les, and what of the very
peculiar words of the dying woman ?”

“I cannot think.”

“When you comb ine the ide as of whist les at night, the presence of a
band of gipsies who are on intimate terms with this old doctor, the
fact that we have every reason to believe that the doctor has an
interest in pre vent ing his step daughter ’s marriage, the dying allusion
to a band, and, finally, the fact that Miss Hel en Stoner heard a
metallic cl ang , which might have been caused by one of those metal bars
that secur ed the shutters falling back into its place, I think that
there is good ground to think that the mystery may be cleared along
those lin es.”

“But what, then, did the gipsies do?”

“I cannot imagine.”

“I see many objections to any such theor y.”

“And so do I. It is preci sely for that reason that we are going to
Stoke Moran this day. I want to see whether the objections are fat al,
or if they may be explained away. But what in the name of the devil !”

The ejacul ation had been drawn from my companion by the fact that our
door had been suddenly dashed open, and that a huge man had fra med
himself in the a per t ure. His co stu me was a peculiar mix ture of the
professional and of the ag ri cul tur al, having a black top- hat, a long
frock-coat, and a pair of high ga it ers, with a hun ting- crop swinging in
his hand. So tall was he that his hat actually br ushed the cross bar of
the door way, and his brea d th seemed to sp an it across from side to
side. A large face, se ared with a thousand wrink les, burned yellow with
the sun, and marked with every evil passi on, was turned from one to the
other of us, while his deep - set, bi le- shot eyes, and his high, thin,
fle sh less nose, gave him somewhat the resem bl ance to a fierce old bird
of pre y.

“Which of you is Holmes?” asked this appar ition.

“My name, sir; but you have the advantage of me,” said my companion
quietly.

“I am Dr. Grimesby Roylot t, of Stoke Mor an .”

“Indeed, Doctor,” said Holmes bl and ly. “Pray take a se at.”

“I will do nothing of the kind. My step daughter has been here. I have
traced her. What has she been saying to you?”

“It is a little cold for the time of the year ,” said Holmes.

“What has she been saying to you?” screamed the old man fu ri ou sly.

“But I have heard that the cro cu ses promise well ,” continued my
companion imper tur bab ly.

“Ha! You put me off, do you?” said our new visitor, taking a step
forward and shaking his hun ting- cro p. “I know you, you scoundrel ! I
have heard of you before. You are Holmes, the medd l er.”

My friend smi led.

“ Holmes, the bus y bod y!”

His smile broad en ed.

“ Holmes, the Scotland Y ard Jack - in- offi ce !”

Holmes chuckled hearti ly. “Your conversation is most enter tain ing,”
said he. “When you go out close the door, for there is a deci ded
drau ght .”

“I will go when I have had my say. Don’t you dare to medd le with my
affair s. I know that Miss Stoner has been here. I traced her ! I am a
dangerous man to fall foul of ! See here.” He stepped swiftly forward,
seized the po ker, and bent it into a cur ve with his huge brown hands.

“S e e that you keep yourself out of my gri p ,” he snar led, and hur ling
the twisted po ker into the fire place he st rode out of the room.

“He seems a very amiable person ,” said Holmes, laughing. “I am not
quite so bul ky, but if he had remained I might have shown him that my
grip was not much more fe e ble than his own.” As he spoke he picked up
the ste el po ker and, with a sudden effor t, straightened it out again.

“F ancy his having the in sol ence to con found me with the official
detective force ! This incident gives z est to our investig ation,
however, and I only trust that our little friend will not suff er from
her imp ru dence in all owing this br ute to trace her. And now, Watson, we
shall order breakfast, and afterwards I shall walk down to Doctor s’
Com mon s, where I hope to get some dat a which may help us in this
matter.”

It was nearly one o’clock when Sherlock Holmes returned from his
ex cur si on. He held in his hand a sheet of blue paper, scrawled over
with notes and figure s.

“I have seen the will of the de ceased wife ,” said he. “To determine its
exact meaning I have been obliged to work out the present pri ces of the
invest ments with which it is concer ned. The to tal in come, which at the
time of the wife’s death was little short of £ 1 , 100 , is now, through
the fall in ag ri cul tur al pri ces, not more than £ 7 5 0 . E ach daughter can
claim an in come of £ 2 5 0, in case of marriage. It is evid ent,
therefore, that if both girls had married, this beauty would have had a
mere p itt ance, while even one of them would cripple him to a very
serious ex t ent. My morn ing ’s work has not been wa st ed, since it has
pro ved that he has the very strong est moti ves for standing in the way
of anything of the sor t. And now, Watson, this is too serious for
daw d ling, especially as the old man is aware that we are interesting
ourselves in his affair s; so if you are ready, we shall call a cab and
drive to Water loo . I should be very much obliged if you would slip your
revolver into your pocket. An Ele y’s No. 2 is an excellent ar gum ent
with gentlemen who can twist ste el po k ers into kno ts. That and a
too th- brush are, I think, all that we ne ed.”

At Waterloo we were fortunate in cat ching a train for Leather head,
where we hi red a trap at the station inn and drove for four or five
miles through the lovely Surre y lan es. It was a perfect day, with a
bright sun and a few fle ec y clouds in the heaven s. The trees and
way side he dg es were just throwing out their first green shoo ts, and the
air was full of the pleasant smell of the mo ist ear th. To me at least
there was a strange contrast between the sweet promise of the spring
and this sinister quest upon which we were engag ed. My companion sat in
the front of the tra p, his arms fol ded, his hat pulled down over his
eyes, and his chin sunk upon his breast, buried in the deepest thought.
Suddenly, however, he star ted, ta pped me on the shoulder, and pointed
over the me ad ows.

“Look there !” said he.

A heavily tim bered park stretched up in a gentle slo pe, thick ening into
a gro ve at the highest point. From amid the branches there j ut ted out
the grey g ables and high roof - tree of a very old man si on.

“S toke Mor an ?” said he.

“Yes, sir, that be the house of Dr. Grimesby Roy lo tt ,” remarked the
d river.

“There is some building going on ther e,” said Holmes; “that is where we
are go ing.”

“There’s the villag e,” said the d river, pointing to a clu ster of roof s
some distance to the lef t; “but if you want to get to the house, you’ll
find it shor ter to get over this sti le, and so by the foot path over the
fiel ds. There it is, where the lady is wal king.”

“And the lady, I fancy, is Miss Ston er,” observed Holmes, sha ding his
eyes. “Yes, I think we had better do as you suggest .”

We got off, paid our f are, and the trap rattled back on its way to
Leather head.

“I thought it as well ,” said Holmes as we clim bed the sti le, “that this
fellow should think we had come here as ar chi te ct s, or on some definite
business. It may stop his gossi p. Good- afternoon, Miss Ston er. You see
that we have been as good as our word.”

Our client of the morning had hurried forward to meet us with a face
which spoke her jo y. “I have been waiting so eager ly for you,” she
cried, shaking hands with us warm ly. “All has turned out splen di dly.
Dr. Roylott has gone to town, and it is un likely that he will be back
before evening.”

“We have had the pleasure of making the Doctor ’s acquaint ance ,” said
Holmes, and in a few words he s ketched out what had occurred. Miss
Stoner turned white to the lips as she listened.

“Good heavens!” she cried, “ he has followed me, then.”

“So it appear s.”

“He is so cunning that I never know when I am safe from him. What will
he say when he return s?”

“He must guard himself, for he may find that there is someone more
cunning than himself upon his track. You must lock yourself up from him
to-night. If he is viol ent, we shall take you away to your aun t’s at
H arr ow. Now, we must make the best use of our time, so kindly take us
at once to the rooms which we are to examin e.”

The building was of gre y, li ch en -b lot ched stone, with a high central
portion and two cur ving w ings, like the c laws of a cr ab , thrown out on
each side. In one of these w ings the windows were broken and b locked
with wooden boards, while the roof was par tly ca ved in, a picture of
ru in. The central portion was in little better re pa ir, but the
right - hand block was compar ati vely moder n, and the blinds in the
window s, with the blue smoke cur ling up from the chim ne ys, showed that
this was where the family re side d. Some sca ff ol ding had been erec ted
against the end wall, and the st one- work had been broken in to, but
there were no signs of any work men at the moment of our vis it. Holmes
walked slowly up and down the ill- tri mmed lawn and examined with deep
attention the out sides of the windows.

“T his, I take it, belongs to the room in which you used to sleep, the
centre one to your sister ’s, and the one next to the main building to
Dr. Roylott’s cham ber ?”

“Ex ac tly so. But I am now sleeping in the middle one.”

“P ending the alter ations, as I understand. By the way, there does not
seem to be any very pressing need for repair s at that end wall .”

“There were n one. I believe that it was an excuse to move me from my
room.”

“Ah! that is suggesti ve. Now, on the other side of this narrow wing
runs the corridor from which these three rooms open. There are windows
in it, of cour se?”

“Yes, but very small ones. Too narrow for anyone to pass through.”

“As you both locked your doors at night, your rooms were un appro ac ha ble
from that side. Now, would you have the kindness to go into your room
and bar your shut ter s?”

Miss Stoner did so, and Holmes, after a careful examination through the
open window, endeavoured in every way to force the shut ter open, but
without success. There was no sl it through which a knife could be
passed to raise the bar . Then with his lens he te sted the hing es, but
they were of solid ir on, built fir mly into the massive mas on ry. “H um !”
said he, scrat ching his chin in some perplex ity, “my theory certainly
pres ents some difficul ties. No one could pass these shutters if they
were bol ted. Well, we shall see if the inside throws any light upon the
matter.”

A small side door led into the whitewashed corridor from which the
three bed rooms open ed. Holmes refused to examine the third cham ber, so
we passed at once to the second, that in which Miss Stoner was now
sleep ing, and in which her sister had met with her f ate. It was a
homely little room, with a low ceiling and a gaping fire place, after
the fashion of old country- house s. A brown chest of draw ers stood in
one corner, a narrow white- counter pan ed bed in another, and a
dressing- table on the left-hand side of the window. These article s,
with two small wick er- work chairs, made up all the furniture in the
room save for a square of Wil ton car pet in the cent re. The bo ards round
and the pan e lling of the walls were of br own, wor m - eat en oa k, so old
and discol oured that it may have dated from the original building of
the house. Holmes drew one of the chairs into a corner and sat silent,
while his eyes travelled round and round and up and down, taking in
every detail of the apart ment.

“Where does that bell communicate with?” he asked at last pointing to a
thick bell- rope which hung down beside the bed, the t as sel actually
lying upon the pill ow.

“It goes to the house kee per ’s room.”

“It looks new er than the other thing s?”

“Yes, it was only put there a couple of years ago.”

“Your sister asked for it, I suppo se?”

“No, I never heard of her using it. We used always to get what we
wanted for oursel ves.”

“Indeed, it seemed un necessary to put so nice a bell- pull there. You
will excuse me for a few minutes while I satis fy myself as to this
floor .” He threw himself down upon his face with his lens in his hand
and crawled swiftly backward and forward, examining min utely the crac ks
between the board s. Then he did the same with the wood- work with which
the chamber was pan ell ed. Fin ally he walked over to the bed and spent
some time in staring at it and in running his eye up and down the wall.
Fin ally he took the bell- rope in his hand and gave it a bris k tu g.

“Why, it’s a dum my ,” said he.

“W on’t it r ing?”

“No, it is not even attached to a wi re. This is very interesting. You
can see now that it is fastened to a hook just above where the little
opening for the ventilator is.”

“How very absur d! I never noticed that befor e.”

“Very strang e!” muttered Holmes, pulling at the rope. “There are one or
two very singular points about this room. For example, what a fool a
buil der must be to open a ventilator into another room, when, with the
same trouble, he might have communic ated with the outside air !”

“That is also quite moder n ,” said the lady.

“D one about the same time as the bell- rope ?” remarked Holmes.

“Yes, there were several little chang es carried out about that time.”

“They seem to have been of a most interesting character — dum my
bell- rop es, and ventilat ors which do not ventilat e. With your
per mission, Miss Stoner, we shall now carry our resear ches into the
inner apart ment.”

Dr. Grimesby Roylott’s chamber was larger than that of his
step - daugh ter, but was as plainly furni shed. A camp- bed, a small wooden
shelf full of books, mostly of a te ch ni cal character, an armchair
beside the bed, a plain wooden chair against the wall, a round table,
and a large iron safe were the principal things which met the eye.
Holmes walked slowly round and examined each and all of them with the
keenest interest.

“What’s in here?” he asked, tapping the safe.

“My step father’s business papers.”

“O h! you have seen in side, then?”

“Only once, some years ago. I remember that it was full of papers.”

“There isn’t a cat in it, for exam ple ?”

“No. What a strange idea !”

“Well, look at this !” He took up a small sa u cer of milk which stood on
the top of it.

“No; we don’t keep a cat. But there is a cheetah and a babo on.”

“Ah, yes, of cour se! Well, a cheetah is just a big cat , and yet a
sa u cer of milk does not go very far in satis fying its wan ts, I dar e say.
There is one point which I should wish to determin e.” He squ at ted down
in front of the wooden chair and examined the seat of it with the
greatest attention.

“Thank you. That is quite sett le d,” said he, rising and putting his
lens in his pocket. “H u ll o! Here is something interest ing !”

The object which had caught his eye was a small dog l ash hung on one
corner of the bed. The las h, however, was curled upon itself and tied
so as to make a loo p of whi p cor d.

“What do you make of that, Watson?”

“It’s a common enough l ash . But I don’t know why it should be ti ed.”

“That is not quite so comm on, is it? Ah, me! it’s a wicked world, and
when a clever man turns his brains to crime it is the worst of all. I
think that I have seen enough now, Miss Stoner, and with your
permission we shall walk out upon the law n.”

I had never seen my friend’s face so gri m or his brow so dark as it was
when we turned from the scene of this investigation. We had walked
several times up and down the lawn, neither Miss Stoner nor myself
li king to break in upon his thoughts before he roused himself from his
re ver i e.

“It is very essen ti al, Miss Ston er,” said he, “that you should
absolutely follow my advice in every respect .”

“I shall most certainly do so.”

“The matter is too serious for any hesit ation. Your life may depend
upon your compli an ce.”

“I assure you that I am in your hands.”

“In the first place, both my friend and I must spend the night in your
room.”

Both Miss Stoner and I gazed at him in astonishment.

“Yes, it must be so. Let me expla in. I believe that that is the village
inn over there?”

“Yes, that is the Cr own.”

“Very good. Your windows would be visible from there?”

“Certainly.”

“You must conf ine yourself to your room, on pre t ence of a hea da ch e,
when your stepfather comes back. Then when you hear him re tire for the
night, you must open the shutters of your window, un do the ha sp , put
your lamp there as a signal to us, and then with draw quietly with
everything which you are likely to want into the room which you used to
occup y. I have no doubt that, in spite of the repair s, you could manage
there for one night.”

“Oh, yes, eas il y.”

“The rest you will leave in our hands.”

“But what will you do?”

“We shall spend the night in your room, and we shall investig ate the
cause of this noise which has disturbed you.”

“I believe, Mr. Holmes, that you have already made up your min d,” said
Miss Stoner, laying her hand upon my companion ’s sleev e.

“P erhaps I have.”

“Then, for pit y’s sake, tell me what was the cause of my sister’s
dea th.”

“I should prefer to have clear er proof s before I spea k.”

“You can at least tell me whether my own thought is correct, and if she
died from some sudden fright .”

“No, I do not think so. I think that there was probably some more
tang i ble cau se. And now, Miss Stoner, we must leave you for if Dr.
Roylott returned and saw us our journey would be in v ain . Good- by e, and
be bra ve, for if you will do what I have told you, you may rest assured
that we shall soon drive away the dang ers that threat en you.”

Sherlock Holmes and I had no difficulty in engag ing a bedroom and
sitting-room at the Cr own In n. They were on the upper floor, and from
our window we could command a view of the a ven ue g ate, and of the
in hab ited wing of Stoke Moran M an or H ou se. At d us k we saw Dr. Grimesby
Roylott drive pa st, his huge form lo om ing up beside the little figure
of the lad who drove him. The boy had some slight difficulty in un doing
the heavy iron g at es, and we heard the ho arse ro ar of the Doctor ’s
voice and saw the fur y with which he shook his cl in ched fists at him.
The trap drove on, and a few minutes later we saw a sudden light spring
up among the trees as the lamp was lit in one of the sitting- rooms.

“Do you know, Watson,” said Holmes as we sat together in the ga thering
darkn ess, “I have really some sc rup les as to taking you to-night. There
is a distinct ele ment of dang er.”

“C an I be of assistan ce?”

“Your presence might be inv al u able.”

“Then I shall certainly com e.”

“It is very kind of you.”

“You speak of danger. You have evidently seen more in these rooms than
was visible to me.”

“No, but I fancy that I may have deduced a little more. I imagine that
you saw all that I did.”

“I saw nothing remarkable save the bell- rope, and what purpose that
could answer I confess is more than I can imagine.”

“You saw the ventilat or, too?”

“Yes, but I do not think that it is such a very unusual thing to have a
small opening between two rooms. It was so small that a rat could
hardly pass through.”

“I knew that we should find a ventilator before ever we came to Stoke
Mor an .”

“My dear Holmes!”

“Oh, yes, I did. You remember in her statement she said that her sister
could smell Dr. Roylott’s cig ar. Now, of course that suggested at once
that there must be a communic ation between the two rooms. It could only
be a small one, or it would have been remarked upon at the coron er’s
inquir y. I deduced a ventilat or.”

“But what harm can there be in that?”

“Well, there is at least a curious co incid ence of dat es. A ventilator
is made, a cord is hun g, and a lady who sle e ps in the bed di es. Does
not that strike you?”

“I cannot as yet see any conne cti on.”

“Did you observe anything very peculiar about that bed ?”

“No.”

“It was cla mped to the floor. Did you ever see a bed fastened like that
befor e?”

“I cannot say that I have.”

“The lady could not move her bed. It must always be in the same
rel ative position to the ventilator and to the rope — or so we may call
it, since it was clearly never meant for a bell-pu ll .”

“Holmes,” I cried, “I seem to see dimly what you are hin ting at. We are
only just in time to prevent some subtle and horrible crime.”

“Su b tle enough and horrible enough. When a doctor does go wrong he is
the first of crimin als. He has ner ve and he has knowle dge. P al mer and
P r itch ard were among the heads of their profession. This man strikes
even deep er, but I think, Watson, that we shall be able to strike
deep er still. But we shall have horr ors enough before the night is
over; for goodn ess ’ sake let us have a quiet pipe and turn our minds
for a few hours to something more cheer ful.”

About nine o’clock the light among the trees was ex ting u ished, and all
was dark in the direction of the M an or H ou se. Two hours passed slowly
away, and then, sudd enly, just at the stro ke of ele ven, a single bright
light shone out right in front of us.

“That is our sign al ,” said Holmes, spr inging to his fe et ; “it comes
from the middle window .”

As we passed out he ex changed a few words with the landlor d, expla in ing
that we were going on a late visit to an acquaint ance, and that it was
possible that we might spend the night there. A moment later we were
out on the dark road, a chill wind blowing in our fac es, and one yellow
light twink ling in front of us through the glo om to guide us on our
sombre er ran d.

There was little difficulty in entering the ground s, for un repair ed
brea ches gap ed in the old park wall. Ma king our way among the trees, we
reached the lawn, crossed it, and were about to enter through the
window when out from a clump of la ure l bushes there dar ted what seemed
to be a hideous and di stor ted child, who threw itself upon the grass
with wri thing limbs and then ran swiftly across the lawn into the
darkness.

“My God !” I whisper ed; “ did you see it?”

Holmes was for the moment as startled as I. His hand closed like a vi ce
upon my wrist in his agit ation. Then he broke into a low laugh and put
his lips to my ear.

“It is a nice househol d,” he mur mu red. “That is the babo on.”

I had forgo tten the strange pe ts which the Do ctor affe cted. There was a
cheeta h, too; perhaps we might find it upon our shoulders at any
moment. I confess that I felt easier in my mind when, after following
Holmes’ example and slipping off my sho es, I found myself inside the
bed room. My companion noi se les sly closed the shut ters, moved the lamp
onto the table, and cast his eyes round the room. All was as we had
seen it in the day time. Then creeping up to me and making a tr um pet of
his hand, he whispered into my ear again so gently that it was all that
I could do to distinguish the word s:

“The least sound would be fat al to our plan s.”

I nodded to show that I had heard.

“We must sit without light. He would see it through the ventilat or.”

I nodded again.

“Do not go asleep ; your very life may depend upon it. Have your pistol
ready in case we should need it. I will sit on the side of the bed, and
you in that chair .”

I took out my revolver and laid it on the corner of the table.

Holmes had brought up a long thin can e, and this he placed upon the bed
beside him. By it he laid the box of matches and the stump of a cand le.
Then he turned down the lamp, and we were left in darkness.

How shall I ever forget that dreadful vi gi l ? I could not hear a sound,
not even the drawing of a breath, and yet I knew that my companion sat
open - eye d, within a few feet of me, in the same state of nervous
ten sion in which I was myself. The shutters cut off the least ray of
light, and we waited in absolute darkness.

From outside came the occasional cry of a night- bird, and once at our
very window a long drawn cat like wh ine, which told us that the cheetah
was indeed at liber ty. F ar away we could hear the deep t ones of the
par ish clo ck, which boom ed out every quarter of an hour. How long they
see med, those quar ter s! T wel ve stru ck, and one and two and thre e, and
still we sat waiting sil ently for whatever might be fa ll.

Sudd enly there was the moment ary gle am of a light up in the direction
of the ventilat or, which vanished immedi at ely, but was succeeded by a
strong smell of burning o il and he ated me tal . Some one in the next room
had lit a dark - lantern. I heard a gentle sound of mov ement, and then
all was silent once more, though the smell grew strong er. For half an
hour I sat with stra in ing ears. Then suddenly another sound became
audi ble —a very gent le, soothing sound, like that of a small j et of
ste am escap ing continually from a ke tt le. The instant that we heard it,
Holmes sprang from the bed, struck a match, and l ashed fu ri ously with
his cane at the bell-pu ll.

“You see it, Watson?” he yell ed. “You see it?”

But I saw nothing. At the moment when Holmes struck the light I heard a
low, clear whist le, but the sudden gl are fl ashing into my weary eyes
made it impossible for me to tell what it was at which my friend l ashed
so sa vag ely. I could, however, see that his face was deadly pale and
filled with horror and loa thing. He had ceased to strike and was gazing
up at the ventilator when suddenly there broke from the silence of the
night the most horrible cry to which I have ever listened. It swelled
up lou der and lou der, a ho arse ye ll of pain and fear and anger all
m ing led in the one dreadful shrie k. They say that away down in the
village, and even in the distan t par son age, that cry raised the
sle e per s from their bed s. It struck cold to our hear ts, and I stood
gazing at Holmes, and he at me, until the last e cho es of it had died
away into the silence from which it ro se.

“What can it mean?” I gasped.

“It means that it is all over ,” Holmes answered. “And perhaps, after
all, it is for the best. Take your pistol , and we will enter Dr.
Roylott’s room.”

With a grave face he lit the lamp and led the way down the corrid or.
Twice he struck at the chamber door without any re ply from wi thin . Then
he turned the handle and entered, I at his heel s, with the cocked
pistol in my hand.

It was a singular sight which met our eyes. On the table stood a
dark - lantern with the shut ter half open, throwing a brilliant be am of
light upon the iron safe, the door of which was a j ar. Bes ide this
table, on the wooden chair, sat Dr. Grimesby Roylott clad in a long
grey dressing-gown, his bare ank les protruding benea th, and his feet
thrust into red he ell ess Tur ki sh slipper s. A cross his lap lay the short
stock with the long l ash which we had noticed during the day. His chin
was cocked up ward and his eyes were fixed in a dread ful, ri g id st are at
the corner of the ceiling. R ound his brow he had a peculiar yellow
band, with br ow ni sh speck les, which seemed to be bound ti ghtly round
his head. As we entered he made neither sound nor mo tion.

“The band ! the speckled band !” whispered Holmes.

I took a step for ward. In an instant his strange head ge ar began to
mov e, and there re ared itself from among his hair the squ at
di am on d- sha ped head and puff ed neck of a loa th some ser p ent.

“It is a swamp ad der !” cried Holmes; “the dead liest snake in Indi a. He
has died within ten seconds of being b itt en. Vi ol ence do es, in truth,
reco il upon the viol ent, and the sch em er fa lls into the p it which he
di gs for another. Let us thrust this creature back into its den, and we
can then remove Miss Stoner to some place of shel ter and let the county
police know what has happen ed.”

As he spoke he drew the dog- whip swiftly from the dead man’s lap, and
throwing the n oo se round the re pti le’s neck he drew it from its hor rid
per ch and, carrying it at arm ’s leng th, threw it into the iron safe,
which he closed upon it.

Such are the true facts of the death of Dr. Grimesby Roylot t, of Stoke
Mor an. It is not necessary that I should pro long a narrative which has
already run to too great a length by telling how we broke the sad news
to the terri fied girl, how we conveyed her by the morning train to the
care of her good a unt at H arr ow, of how the slow proc ess of official
inquiry came to the conclusion that the doctor met his fate while
indi scre et ly playing with a dangerous pe t. The little which I had yet
to learn of the case was told me by Sherlock Holmes as we travelled
back next day.

“I ha d,” said he, “ come to an entirely err one ous conclusion which
sh ows, my dear Watson, how dangerous it always is to reason from
in sufficient data. The presence of the gipsi es, and the use of the word
‘ band ,’ which was used by the poor girl, no doubt, to explain the
appearance which she had caught a hurried glimpse of by the light of
her match, were sufficient to put me upon an entirely wrong sc ent. I
can only claim the mer it that I instantly re considered my position
when, however, it became clear to me that whatever danger threatened an
occup ant of the room could not come either from the window or the door.
My attention was spee dily draw n, as I have already remarked to you, to
this ventilat or, and to the bell- rope which hung down to the bed. The
disc o very that this was a dum m y, and that the bed was cla mped to the
floor, instantly gave rise to the suspicion that the rope was there as
a bri dge for something passing through the hole and coming to the bed.
The idea of a snake instantly occurred to me, and when I cou pled it
with my knowledge that the doctor was furnished with a supply of
creat ures from Indi a, I felt that I was probably on the right track.
The idea of using a form of poison which could not possibly be
discovered by any chemical test was just such a one as would occur to a
clever and ru th less man who had had an E a stern train ing. The rapi d ity
with which such a poison would take effect would also, from his point
of view, be an advant age. It would be a shar p- ey ed coron er, indeed, who
could distinguish the two little dark pun ct ures which would show where
the poison f ang s had done their work. Then I thought of the whist le. Of
course he must recall the snake before the morning light reve aled it to
the vi c tim . He had trained it, probably by the use of the milk which we
saw, to return to him when sum mone d. He would put it through this
ventilator at the hour that he thought be st, with the certain ty that it
would crawl down the rope and land on the bed. It might or might not
bite the occup ant, perhaps she might esca pe every night for a week, but
sooner or later she must fall a vi c tim .

“I had come to these conclusions before ever I had entered his room. An
inspe ction of his chair showed me that he had been in the habit of
standing on it, which of course would be necessary in order that he
should reach the ventilat or. The sight of the safe, the sa u cer of mil k,
and the loo p of whi p cord were enough to finally di spe l any doubts which
may have remain ed. The metallic cl ang heard by Miss Stoner was
obvi ously caused by her stepfather ha sti ly closing the door of his safe
upon its terrible occup ant. Having once made up my mind, you know the
steps which I took in order to put the matter to the proof . I heard the
creature hi ss as I have no doubt that you did also, and I instantly lit
the light and att ac ked it.”

“Wi th the result of driving it through the ventilat or.”

“And also with the result of ca using it to turn upon its master at the
other side. Some of the blows of my cane came home and roused its
sna ki sh temp er, so that it flew upon the first person it saw . In this
way I am no doubt indire ctly responsi ble for Dr. Grimesby Roylott’s
death, and I cannot say that it is likely to wei gh very heavily upon my
consci en ce.”




IX. THE ADVENTURE OF THE EN G IN E ER ’S TH U M B


Of all the problems which have been submitted to my friend, Mr.
Sherlock Holmes, for solution during the years of our in tim ac y, there
were only two which I was the means of introdu cing to his notice —that
of Mr. Hatherle y’s thumb, and that of Colonel War bur ton ’s ma dn ess. Of
these the latter may have af for ded a fin er field for an ac ute and
original obser ver, but the other was so strange in its in ce ption and so
dra m atic in its details that it may be the more wor thy of being placed
upon recor d, even if it gave my friend fe w er open ings for those
dedu ctive methods of reasoning by which he ac hi ev ed such remarkable
resul ts. The story has, I believe, been told more than once in the
news papers, but, like all such narrati ves, its effect is much less
striking when set forth en blo c in a single half- column of print than
when the facts slowly ev ol ve before your own eyes, and the mystery
cle ars gradu ally away as each new disc o very furni shes a step which
leads on to the complete truth. At the time the circumstances made a
deep impression upon me, and the la pse of two years has hardly served
to wea ken the effe ct.

It was in the summer of ’8 9 , not long after my marriage, that the
events occurred which I am now about to sum mar i se. I had returned to
ci vi l practice and had finally aband oned Holmes in his Baker Street
rooms, although I continually vis ited him and occasionally even
persu aded him to for go his Bohemian hab its so far as to come and visit
us. My practice had ste a dily in crea sed, and as I happened to live at no
very great distance from Paddington St ation, I got a few pati ents from
among the offi ci als. One of the se, whom I had cur ed of a painful and
l ing ering disea se, was never weary of adverti sing my vir tu es and of
endeavouring to send me on every suffer er over whom he might have any
influ ence.

One morning, at a little before seven o’clock, I was awa k ened by the
maid tapping at the door to announ ce that two men had come from
Paddington and were waiting in the consul ting- room. I dressed
hurried ly, for I knew by experience that rail way cases were seldom
trivi al, and hast ened down stair s. As I descen ded, my old ally, the
gu ard, came out of the room and closed the door ti ghtly behind him.

“I’ve got him here,” he whispered, jer king his thumb over his shoulder ;
“ he’s all right.”

“What is it, then?” I asked, for his manner suggested that it was some
strange creature which he had ca ged up in my room.

“It’s a new pati ent ,” he whisper ed. “I thought I’d bring him round
myself; then he couldn’t slip away. There he is, all safe and sound. I
must go now, Doctor ; I have my d oo ties, just the same as you.” And off
he went, this tru sty t out, without even giving me time to thank him.

I entered my consul t ing-room and found a gentleman seated by the table.
He was quietly dressed in a suit of hea ther t we ed with a soft cloth cap
which he had laid down upon my boo ks. R ound one of his hands he had a
handkerchief w rap ped, which was mo tt led all over with blood stain s. He
was young, not more than fi ve -and- twent y, I should say, with a str ong,
mas cul ine fac e; but he was exceedingly pale and gave me the impression
of a man who was suffer ing from some strong agit ation, which it took
all his strength of mind to contro l.

“I am sorry to knock you up so early, Doctor,” said he, “but I have had
a very serious accid ent during the night. I came in by train this
morning, and on inquir ing at Paddington as to where I might find a
doctor, a wor thy fellow very kindly escor ted me here. I gave the maid a
car d, but I see that she has left it upon the side- t able.”

I took it up and glanced at it. “Mr. Vi ctor Hatherley, hydraulic
engineer, 1 6 A , Victori a Street ( 3 r d floor ) .” That was the name, style,
and abo de of my morning visitor. “I regre t that I have kept you
wait ing,” said I, sitting down in my libr ar y- chair. “You are fresh from
a night journey, I understand, which is in itself a mono ton ous
occup ation.”

“Oh, my night could not be called mono ton ous ,” said he, and laughed. He
laughed very hearti ly, with a high, r inging note, leaning back in his
chair and shaking his sid es. All my medical instin cts rose up against
that laugh .

“St op it!” I cried; “ pull yourself together !” and I poured out some
water from a car af fe.

It was use less, however. He was off in one of those hy ster ical
out bur sts which come upon a strong nature when some great cris is is
over and gone. Pres ently he came to himself once more, very weary and
pa le- loo king.

“I have been making a fool of myself ,” he gasped.

“Not at all. Dr ink this .” I dashed some brandy into the water, and the
colour began to come back to his blood less chee ks.

“That’s better !” said he. “And now, Doctor, perhaps you would kindly
attend to my thumb, or rather to the place where my thumb used to be.”

He un wound the handkerchief and held out his hand. It gave even my
hardened nerves a sh ud der to look at it. There were four protruding
fingers and a hor rid red, spong y sur face where the thumb should have
be en. It had been hacked or torn right out from the roo ts.

“Good heavens!” I cried, “this is a terrible inj ur y. It must have bled
consider ab ly.”

“Yes, it did. I fainted when it was done, and I think that I must have
been sen seless for a long time. When I came to I found that it was
still ble ed ing, so I tied one end of my handkerchief very ti ghtly round
the wrist and br ac ed it up with a twi g .”

“Excell ent! You should have been a surge on.”

“It is a question of hydrau lic s, you see, and came within my own
provin ce.”

“This has been don e,” said I, examining the w ound, “by a very heavy and
sharp in str um ent.”

“A thing like a cle aver ,” said he.

“A n accid ent, I presume?”

“By no mean s.”

“What! a murder ous att ack ?”

“Very murder ous inde ed.”

“You horri fy me.”

I spong ed the w ound, cleaned it, dressed it, and finally covered it
over with cott on wa dding and car bo li sed band ag es. He lay back without
win cing, though he bit his lip from time to time.

“How is that?” I asked when I had finishe d.

“C ap it al ! Between your brandy and your band age, I feel a new man. I was
very wea k, but I have had a good deal to go through.”

“P erhaps you had better not speak of the matter. It is evidently trying
to your nerv es.”

“Oh, no, not now. I shall have to tell my ta le to the poli ce; but,
between ourselves, if it were not for the convin cing evidence of this
wound of mine, I should be surprised if they believed my statem ent, for
it is a very extraordinary one, and I have not much in the way of proof
with which to back it up; and, even if they believe me, the clu es which
I can give them are so vague that it is a question whether justice will
be done.”

“Ha !” cried I, “if it is anything in the nature of a problem which you
desire to see sol ved, I should strongly recomm end you to come to my
friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, before you go to the official poli ce.”

“Oh, I have heard of that fell ow,” answered my visitor, “and I should
be very glad if he would take the matter up, though of course I must
use the official police as well. Would you give me an introdu ction to
him?”

“I’ll do better. I’ll take you round to him myself.”

“I should be immen sely obliged to you.”

“W e ’ll call a cab and go together. We shall just be in time to have a
little breakfast with him. Do you feel equ al to it?”

“Yes; I shall not feel easy until I have told my stor y.”

“Then my servant will call a cab, and I shall be with you in an
instan t.” I rushed upstairs, explained the matter shortly to my wife,
and in five minutes was inside a hansom , driving with my new
acquaintance to Baker Street.

Sherlock Holmes was, as I expec ted, lounging about his sitting-room in
his dressing-gown, reading the ag ony column of The T im es and smoking
his befor e- breakfast pipe, which was com posed of all the plu gs and
do tt les left from his smo kes of the day before, all carefully dried and
collec ted on the corner of the mantel piece. He received us in his
quietly genial fashion, ordered fresh ras her s and egg s, and joined us
in a hearty me al. When it was concl uded he settled our new acquaintance
upon the sof a, placed a pi llow beneath his head, and laid a glass of
brandy and water within his reach.

“It is easy to see that your experience has been no common one, Mr.
Hatherle y,” said he. “P ra y, lie down there and make yourself absolutely
at home. Tell us what you can, but stop when you are tired and keep up
your strength with a little st im ul an t.”

“Thank you,” said my patient, “but I have felt another man since the
doctor band aged me, and I think that your breakfast has completed the
c ure. I shall take up as little of your valuable time as possible, so I
shall start at once upon my peculiar experi en c es.”

Holmes sat in his big armchair with the we ary, heav y- li dded expression
which ve iled his keen and eager nature, while I sat oppos ite to him,
and we listened in silence to the strange story which our visitor
detail ed to us.

“You must know ,” said he, “that I am an or ph an and a bachel or, resid ing
alone in lodgings in London. By profession I am a hydraulic engineer,
and I have had considerable experience of my work during the seven
years that I was app ren ti ced to V en ner & Ma th es on, the well-known firm,
of Gre en wi ch. Two years ago, having served my time, and having also
come into a fair sum of money through my poor father’s death, I
determined to start in business for myself and took professional
cham bers in Victori a Street.

“I suppose that everyone finds his first indepen dent start in business
a dre ary experi ence. To me it has been excepti on ally so. During two
years I have had three consul t ations and one small job, and that is
absolutely all that my profession has brought me. My g ross ta kings
amount to £ 2 7 1 0 s. Every day, from nine in the morning until four in
the afternoon, I waited in my little den, until at last my heart began
to sin k, and I came to believe that I should never have any practice at
all.

“Y ester day, however, just as I was thinking of leaving the office, my
cler k entered to say there was a gentleman waiting who wished to see me
upon business. He brought up a car d, too, with the name of ‘ Colonel
Lysander Star k ’ en gra ved upon it. C lose at his heels came the colonel
himself, a man rather over the middle si ze, but of an exceed ing
thin ness. I do not think that I have ever seen so thin a man. His whole
face shar p ened away into nose and chin, and the skin of his cheeks was
drawn quite ten se over his out standing bon es. Yet this em ac i ation
seemed to be his natural hab it, and due to no disea se, for his eye was
bright, his step bris k, and his bearing as sure d. He was plainly but
neat ly dressed, and his age, I should jud ge, would be nearer forty than
thir ty.

“‘ Mr. Hatherle y?’ said he, with something of a German acc ent. ‘You have
been recomm ended to me, Mr. Hatherley, as being a man who is not only
pro fi ci ent in his profession but is also discre et and capable of
preser ving a secret .’

“I bow ed, feeling as fl attered as any young man would at such an
address. ‘ May I ask who it was who gave me so good a character ?’

“‘Well, perhaps it is better that I should not tell you that just at
this moment. I have it from the same sour ce that you are both an or ph an
and a bachel or and are resid ing alone in London .’

“‘That is quite corre ct ,’ I answer ed; ‘but you will excuse me if I say
that I cannot see how all this bears upon my professional
qu ali fic ations. I understand that it was on a professional matter that
you wished to speak to me ?’

“‘ Un doubtedly so. But you will find that all I say is really to the
point. I have a professional commission for you, but absolute secrecy
is quite essen ti al — absolute secre c y, you understand, and of course we
may expect that more from a man who is alone than from one who lives in
the bo som of his family .’

“‘ If I promise to keep a secret ,’ said I, ‘you may absolutely depend
upon my doing so.’

“He looked very hard at me as I spoke, and it seemed to me that I had
never seen so suspici ous and questioning an eye.

“‘ Do you promi se, then?’ said he at last.

“‘Yes, I promi se.’

“‘ Ab solute and complete silence before, d ur ing, and after ? No reference
to the matter at all, either in word or writ ing ?’

“‘I have already given you my word .’

“‘Very goo d.’ He suddenly sprang up, and dar ting like lightning across
the room he flung open the door. The passage outside was emp ty.

“‘ That’s all right ,’ said he, coming back. ‘I know that cler ks are
sometimes curious as to their master ’s affair s. Now we can talk in
safet y.’ He drew up his chair very close to mine and began to st are at
me again with the same questioning and thought ful look.

“A feeling of re pul si on, and of something a kin to fear had begun to
rise within me at the strange an ti c s of this fle sh less man. Even my
d read of lo sing a client could not re strain me from showing my
impati ence.

“‘I beg that you will state your business, sir ,’ said I; ‘ my time is of
valu e.’ Hea ven forgive me for that last sentence, but the words came to
my lip s.

“‘ How would fifty guine as for a night ’s work suit you ?’ he asked.

“‘ Most admir ab ly .’

“‘I say a night ’s work, but an hour ’s would be nearer the mark. I
simply want your opinion about a hydraulic stam ping machine which has
got out of ge ar. If you show us what is wrong we shall soon set it
right ourselves. What do you think of such a commission as that ?’

“‘The work appears to be light and the pay m uni fi cent .’

“‘ Pre ci sely so. We shall want you to come to-night by the last train .’

“‘Where to ?’

“‘ To Ey ford, in Berk shi re. It is a little place near the bor ders of
Ox for d shi re, and within seven miles of Reading. There is a train from
Paddington which would bring you there at about 11 :15 .’

“‘Very goo d.’

“‘I shall come down in a carriage to meet you.’

“‘ There is a drive, then?’

“‘Yes, our little place is quite out in the country. It is a good seven
miles from Eyford St ation .’

“‘Then we can hardly get there before mid night. I suppose there would
be no chance of a train back. I should be compelled to stop the night .’

“‘Yes, we could easily give you a sha ke- down .’

“‘That is very awk ward. Could I not come at some more conveni ent hour ?’

“‘ We have judged it best that you should come late. It is to re comp ense
you for any inconveni ence that we are paying to you, a young and
unknown man, a fee which would buy an opinion from the very heads of
your profession. Still, of course, if you would like to draw out of the
business, there is plenty of time to do so.’

“I thought of the fifty gu in eas , and of how very useful they would be
to me. ‘ Not at all ,’ said I, ‘I shall be very happy to ac com mo date
myself to your wish es. I should like, however, to understand a little
more clearly what it is that you wish me to do .’

“‘ Quite so. It is very natural that the ple dge of secrecy which we have
exac ted from you should have ar ou sed your curiosit y. I have no wish to
comm it you to anything without your having it all laid before you. I
suppose that we are absolutely safe from ea ves dro pper s?’

“‘ En ti rel y.’

“‘Then the matter stands th us. You are probably aware that
fuller’s-earth is a valuable produ ct, and that it is only found in one
or two places in England ?’

“‘I have heard so.’

“‘ Some little time ago I bought a small plac e— a very small plac e— within
ten miles of Reading. I was fortunate enough to discover that there was
a deposit of fuller’s-earth in one of my fiel ds. On examining it,
however, I found that this deposit was a compar ati vely small one, and
that it formed a link between two very much larger ones upon the right
and lef t— both of them, however, in the grounds of my neighbour s. These
good people were absolutely ignorant that their land con tained that
which was quite as valuable as a gol d- mine. N atur ally, it was to my
interest to buy their land before they discovered its true valu e, but
un fortunately I had no capital by which I could do this. I took a few
of my friends into the secret, however, and they suggested that we
should quietly and secre tly work our own little deposit and that in
this way we should earn the money which would en able us to buy the
neighbour ing fiel ds. This we have now been doing for some time, and in
order to help us in our oper ations we erec ted a hydraulic pres s. This
press, as I have already expla in ed, has got out of or der, and we wish
your advice upon the subject. We guard our secret very je al ou sly,
however, and if it once became known that we had hydraulic engine ers
coming to our little house, it would soon rou se inquiry, and then, if
the facts came out, it would be good- by e to any chance of getting these
fields and carrying out our plans. That is why I have made you promise
me that you will not tell a human being that you are going to Eyford
to-night. I hope that I make it all pla in ?’

“‘I quite follow you ,’ said I. ‘ The only point which I could not quite
understand was what use you could make of a hydraulic press in
ex ca v ating fuller’s- ear th, which, as I understand, is dug out like
gra vel from a pit .’

“‘ A h !’ said he careles sly, ‘ we have our own proc ess. We com press the
earth into bri cks, so as to remove them without reve al ing what they
are. But that is a mere detail . I have taken you fully into my
confidence now, Mr. Hatherley, and I have shown you how I trust you.’
He rose as he spo ke. ‘I shall expect you, then, at Eyford at 11 :15 .’

“‘I shall certainly be there .’

“‘And not a word to a soul .’ He looked at me with a last long,
questioning ga ze, and then, pressing my hand in a cold, d ank gras p, he
hurried from the room.

“Well, when I came to think it all over in cool blood I was very much
astonished, as you may both think, at this sudden commission which had
been in trusted to me. On the one hand, of course, I was gla d, for the
fee was at least ten fold what I should have asked had I set a price
upon my own servi ces, and it was possible that this order might lead to
other ones. On the other hand, the face and manner of my pat ron had
made an unpleasant impression upon me, and I could not think that his
explanation of the fuller’s-earth was sufficient to explain the
necessity for my coming at midnight, and his extreme anxiety lest I
should tell anyone of my er ran d. However, I threw all fe ars to the
wind s, ate a hearty supper, drove to Padd ing ton, and started off,
having obe yed to the letter the inj unction as to holding my tong ue.

“At Read ing I had to change not only my carriage but my st ation.
However, I was in time for the last train to Ey ford, and I reached the
little di m - lit station after eleven o’clock. I was the only pas sen ger
who got out there, and there was no one upon the plat form save a single
sleepy por ter with a lantern. As I passed out through the wick et g ate,
however, I found my acquaintance of the morning waiting in the shadow
upon the other side. Wi thout a word he grasped my arm and hurried me
into a carriage, the door of which was standing open. He drew up the
windows on either side, ta pped on the wood- work, and away we went as
fast as the horse could go .”

“One horse ?” inter jec ted Holmes.

“Yes, only one.”

“Did you observe the col our ?”

“Yes, I saw it by the side- lights when I was stepping into the
carri age. It was a ch est nut .”

“T i red- looking or fresh ?”

“Oh, fresh and glo s s y.”

“Thank you. I am sorry to have interrup ted you. Pray continue your most
interesting statem ent.”

“A way we went then, and we drove for at least an hour. Colonel Lysander
Stark had said that it was only seven miles, but I should think, from
the rate that we seemed to go, and from the time that we too k, that it
must have been nearer twel ve. He sat at my side in silence all the
time, and I was a war e, more than once when I glanced in his directi on,
that he was looking at me with great inten sit y. The country road s seem
to be not very good in that part of the world, for we l ur ched and
jol ted terri bl y. I tried to look out of the windows to see something of
where we were, but they were made of fro sted glas s, and I could make
out nothing save the occasional bright bl ur of a passing light. Now and
then I ha z ard ed some remark to break the mono t ony of the journey, but
the colonel answered only in mono sy ll ab les, and the conversation soon
fla gg ed. At last, however, the b um ping of the road was ex changed for
the cris p smoo th ness of a gravel - drive, and the carriage came to a
stan d. Colonel Lysander Stark sprang out, and, as I followed after him,
pulled me swiftly into a por ch which gap ed in front of us. We step ped,
as it were, right out of the carriage and into the ha ll, so that I
failed to catch the most fle eting glance of the front of the house. The
instant that I had crossed the thresh old the door slammed heavily
behind us, and I heard fain tly the rattle of the wheels as the carriage
drove away.

“It was pitch dark inside the house, and the colonel fum bled about
looking for matches and m uttering under his brea th. Sudd enly a door
opened at the other end of the passage, and a long, golden bar of light
shot out in our directi on. It grew broad er, and a woman appeared with a
lamp in her hand, which she held above her head, pushing her face
forward and peering at us. I could see that she was prett y, and from
the glo ss with which the light shone upon her dark dress I knew that it
was a rich materi al. She spoke a few words in a for eign tongue in a
t one as though asking a question, and when my companion answered in a
g ru ff mono sy llable she gave such a start that the lamp nearly fell from
her hand. Colonel Stark went up to her, whispered something in her ear,
and then, pushing her back into the room from whence she had come, he
walked towards me again with the lamp in his hand.

“‘ Perhaps you will have the kindness to wait in this room for a few
minut es,’ said he, throwing open another door. It was a quiet, little,
plainly furnished room, with a round table in the cent re, on which
several German books were sc atter ed. Colonel Stark laid down the lamp
on the top of a harm oni um beside the door. ‘I shall not keep you
waiting an instan t ,’ said he, and vanished into the darkness.

“I glanced at the books upon the table, and in spite of my ignor ance of
German I could see that two of them were tre ati ses on sc i ence, the
others being vol um es of poe try. Then I walked across to the window,
hop ing that I might catch some glimpse of the country- side, but an oa k
shut ter, heavily bar red, was folded across it. It was a wonder fully
silent house. There was an old clock ti cking loudly somewhere in the
passage, but other wise everything was deadly still. A vague feeling of
uneas iness began to steal over me. Who were these German people, and
what were they doing living in this strange, out- of - the - way place? And
where was the place? I was ten miles or so from Ey ford, that was all I
knew, but whether north, south, ea st, or west I had no idea. For that
matter, Read ing, and possibly other large town s, were within that
radi us, so the place might not be so se clu ded, after all. Yet it was
quite certain, from the absolute still ness, that we were in the
country. I paced up and down the room, hum ming a tun e under my breath
to keep up my spirits and feeling that I was thoroughly ear ning my
fifty- guinea fe e.

“Su dd enly, without any pre li min ary sound in the mid st of the utter
still ness, the door of my room swung slowly open. The woman was
standing in the a per t ure, the darkness of the hall behind her, the
yellow light from my lamp beating upon her eager and beautiful face. I
could see at a glance that she was sick with fear, and the sight sent a
chill to my own heart. She held up one shaking finger to warn me to be
silent, and she shot a few whispered words of broken English at me, her
eyes glancing back, like those of a frightened hor se, into the glo om
behind her.

“‘I would go ,’ said she, trying hard, as it seemed to me, to speak
cal m ly; ‘I would go. I should not stay here. There is no good for you
to do .’

“‘ But, madam ,’ said I, ‘I have not yet done what I came for. I cannot
possibly leave until I have seen the mach ine .’

“‘It is not worth your while to wait ,’ she went on. ‘You can pass
through the door; no one hin der s.’ And then, seeing that I smiled and
shook my head, she suddenly threw aside her con stra int and made a step
forward, with her hands wr ung together. ‘ For the love of Hea ven !’ she
whispered, ‘ get away from here before it is too lat e!’

“But I am somewhat head strong by nature, and the more ready to eng age
in an affair when there is some ob stac le in the way. I thought of my
fifty- guinea fe e, of my we ari some journey, and of the unpleasant night
which seemed to be before me. Was it all to go for nothing ? Why should
I sl ink away without having carried out my commissi on, and without the
pay ment which was my du e? This woman might, for all I knew, be a
mon om an i ac . With a stout bear ing, therefore, though her manner had
shaken me more than I cared to conf ess, I still shook my head and
decl ared my intention of remaining where I was. She was about to ren e w
her ent re ati es when a door slammed over head, and the sound of several
foot steps was heard upon the stair s. She listened for an instant, threw
up her hands with a despair ing gest ure, and vanished as suddenly and as
noi se les sly as she had come.

“The newcom ers were Colonel Lysander Stark and a short thick man with a
ch in chill a be ard gr owing out of the crea ses of his double chin, who was
introdu ced to me as Mr. Fergus on.

“‘ This is my secret ary and manag er ,’ said the colone l. ‘ By the way, I
was under the impression that I left this door shut just now. I fear
that you have felt the drau ght .’

“‘ On the contr ar y ,’ said I, ‘I opened the door myself because I felt
the room to be a little clo se.’

“He shot one of his suspici ous looks at me. ‘ Perhaps we had better
proce ed to business, then ,’ said he. ‘ Mr. Fergus on and I will take you
up to see the mach ine .’

“‘I had better put my hat on, I suppo se.’

“‘Oh, no, it is in the house .’

“‘W hat, you dig fuller’s-earth in the house ?’

“‘No, no. This is only where we com press it. But never mind that. All
we wish you to do is to examine the machine and to let us know what is
wrong with it.’

“We went upstairs together, the colonel first with the lamp, the fat
manager and I behind him. It was a lab y rin th of an old house, with
corrid ors, passa g es, narrow winding stair cases, and little low door s,
the thresh ol ds of which were holl owed out by the gener ations who had
crossed them. There were no carpe ts and no signs of any furniture above
the ground floor, while the pla ster was pe eling off the wall s, and the
damp was breaking through in gre en, un heal thy blot ches. I tried to put
on as un concerned an air as possible, but I had not forgo tten the
warn ings of the lady, even though I dis regard ed them, and I kept a keen
eye upon my two companion s. Fergus on appeared to be a mor ose and silent
man, but I could see from the little that he said that he was at least
a fell ow- countr y man.

“C ol onel Lysander Stark stopped at last before a low door, which he
un locked. Wi thin was a small, square room, in which the three of us
could hardly get at one time. Fergus on remained outside, and the
colonel us her ed me in.

“‘ We are now ,’ said he, ‘ actually within the hydraulic press, and it
would be a particularly unpleasant thing for us if anyone were to turn
it on. The ceiling of this small chamber is really the end of the
descen ding pi st on, and it comes down with the force of many t ons upon
this metal floor. There are small lat er al colum ns of water outside
which receive the for ce, and which tran sm it and mu l ti ply it in the
manner which is familiar to you. The machine goes readily enough, but
there is some stiff ness in the working of it, and it has lost a little
of its for ce. Perhaps you will have the goodness to look it over and to
show us how we can set it right .’

“I took the lamp from him, and I examined the machine very thorough ly.
It was indeed a gigantic one, and capable of exer c ising enormous
pres sure. When I passed outside, however, and pressed down the le vers
which cont rolled it, I knew at once by the whi shing sound that there
was a slight lea k age, which allowed a reg ur g itation of water through
one of the side cylin der s. An examination showed that one of the
indi a- rub ber band s which was round the head of a dri v ing- ro d had sh run k
so as not quite to fill the so ck et along which it wor ked. This was
clearly the cause of the loss of pow er, and I pointed it out to my
companion s, who followed my remarks very carefully and asked several
practical questions as to how they should proce ed to set it right. When
I had made it clear to them, I returned to the main chamber of the
machine and took a good look at it to satis fy my own curiosit y. It was
obvious at a glance that the story of the fuller’s-earth was the mer est
f ab ric ation, for it would be absur d to suppose that so powerful an
eng ine could be des ig ned for so in a de qu ate a purpo se. The walls were of
woo d, but the floor consi sted of a large iron tr ough , and when I came
to examine it I could see a cr ust of metallic deposit all over it. I
had stooped and was scra ping at this to see exactly what it was when I
heard a muttered ex cla mation in German and saw the ca da ver ous face of
the colonel looking down at me.

“‘What are you doing there ?’ he asked.

“I felt angry at having been tri cked by so el ab or ate a story as that
which he had told me. ‘I was admir ing your fuller’s- earth ,’ said I; ‘I
think that I should be better able to advise you as to your machine if
I knew what the exact purpose was for which it was use d.’

“The instant that I uttered the words I regre tted the r ash ness of my
speech. His face set hard, and a ba le ful light sprang up in his grey
eyes.

“‘Very well ,’ said he, ‘you shall know all about the mach ine .’ He took
a step back ward, slammed the little door, and turned the key in the
lo ck. I rushed towards it and pulled at the hand le, but it was quite
sec ure, and did not give in the least to my ki cks and shov es. ‘ H u ll o !’
I yell ed. ‘ H u ll o! Col one l ! Let me out !’

“And then suddenly in the silence I heard a sound which sent my heart
into my mou th. It was the cl ank of the le vers and the s wish of the
lea king cylin der. He had set the eng ine at work. The lamp still stood
upon the floor where I had placed it when examining the tr ough . By its
light I saw that the black ceiling was coming down upon me, slow ly,
jer k il y, but, as none knew better than myself, with a force which must
within a minute gr ind me to a sha pe less pul p. I threw myself,
screa m ing, against the door, and dragged with my na ils at the lo ck. I
impl or ed the colonel to let me out, but the re mor seless cl an king of the
le vers drown ed my cri es. The ceiling was only a foot or two above my
head, and with my hand up raised I could feel its hard, rough sur face.
Then it fl ashed through my mind that the pain of my death would depend
very much upon the position in which I met it. If I lay on my face the
weight would come upon my sp ine, and I sh ud dered to think of that
dreadful sna p. E as ier the other way, perhap s; and yet, had I the ner ve
to lie and look up at that deadly black shadow wa ver ing down upon me?
Al ready I was unable to stand erec t, when my eye caught something which
brought a g ush of hope back to my heart.

“I have said that though the floor and ceiling were of ir on, the walls
were of woo d. As I gave a last hurried glance around, I saw a thin line
of yellow light between two of the boards, which broad ened and
broad ened as a small panel was pushed back ward. For an instant I could
hardly believe that here was indeed a door which led away from death.
The next instant I threw myself through, and lay half- fain ting upon the
other side. The panel had closed again behind me, but the cr ash of the
lamp, and a few moments afterwards the cl ang of the two slab s of me tal ,
told me how narrow had been my escap e.

“I was re called to myself by a fran tic pl uck ing at my wrist, and I
found myself lying upon the stone floor of a narrow corrid or, while a
woman bent over me and tugged at me with her left hand, while she held
a candle in her right. It was the same good friend whose warning I had
so foolish ly re jec ted.

“‘C ome ! com e!’ she cried brea th les sly. ‘ They will be here in a moment.
They will see that you are not there. Oh, do not waste the so - precious
time, but com e!’

“This time, at lea st, I did not scor n her advi ce. I staggered to my
feet and ran with her along the corridor and down a winding stair . The
latter led to another broad passage, and just as we reached it we heard
the sound of running feet and the shouting of two voic es, one answer ing
the other from the floor on which we were and from the one benea th. My
guide stopped and looked about her like one who is at her wit’s end.
Then she threw open a door which led into a bedroom, through the window
of which the moon was shining bright ly.

“‘It is your only chan ce ,’ said she. ‘ It is high, but it may be that
you can jump it.’

“As she spoke a light sprang into view at the further end of the
passage, and I saw the le an figure of Colonel Lysander Stark rushing
forward with a lantern in one hand and a weapon like a but ch er’s
cle a ver in the other. I rushed across the bedroom, flung open the
window, and looked out. How quiet and sweet and who le some the garden
looked in the moon light, and it could not be more than thirty feet
down. I cla m bered out upon the si ll, but I hesit ated to jump until I
should have heard what passed between my sa vi our and the ru ffi an who
pur sued me. If she were ill- u sed, then at any ris ks I was determined to
go back to her assistan ce. The thought had hardly fl ashed through my
mind before he was at the door, pushing his way past her; but she threw
her arms round him and tried to hold him back.

“‘ Fr it z ! Fr it z !’ she cried in English , ‘ remember your promise after the
last time. You said it should not be again. He will be sil ent! Oh, he
will be sil ent !’

“‘You are mad, Eli se !’ he shouted, strugg ling to break away from her.
‘You will be the ruin of us. He has seen too much. Let me pas s, I say !’
He dashed her to one side, and, rushing to the window, cut at me with
his heavy weap on. I had let myself go, and was hanging by the hands to
the si ll, when his blow fe ll. I was conscious of a dull pain , my grip
loo sen ed, and I fell into the garden below.

“I was shaken but not hurt by the fall ; so I picked myself up and
rushed off among the bushes as hard as I could run , for I understood
that I was far from being out of danger yet. Suddenly, however, as I
ran , a deadly di zz iness and sick ness came over me. I glanced down at my
hand, which was th rob bing pain fully, and then, for the first time, saw
that my thumb had been cut off and that the blood was p ouring from my
w ound. I endeavoured to tie my handkerchief round it, but there came a
sudden bu zz ing in my ear s, and next moment I fell in a dead faint among
the ro se- bush es.

“How long I remained un conscious I cannot tell. It must have been a
very long time, for the moon had sun k, and a bright morning was
breaking when I came to myself. My clothes were all so dden with de w,
and my coat- sle eve was dr enched with blood from my w ounded thum b . The
smar ting of it re called in an instant all the particul ars of my night ’s
advent ure, and I sprang to my feet with the feeling that I might hardly
yet be safe from my pur su ers. But to my astonishment, when I came to
look round me, neither house nor garden were to be seen. I had been
lying in an angle of the he dge close by the high road, and just a little
lower down was a long building, which pro ved, upon my approaching it,
to be the very station at which I had arrived upon the previous night.
W ere it not for the ug ly wound upon my hand, all that had passed during
those dreadful hours might have been an evil drea m.

“H al f da z ed, I went into the station and asked about the morning tra in.
There would be one to Read ing in less than an hour. The same por ter was
on dut y, I found, as had been there when I arri ved. I inquir ed of him
whether he had ever heard of Colonel Lysander Star k. The name was
strange to him. Had he observed a carriage the night before waiting for
me? No, he had not. Was there a police- station anywhere near ? There was
one about three miles off.

“It was too far for me to go, weak and ill as I was. I determined to
wait until I got back to town before telling my story to the police. It
was a little past six when I arri ved, so I went first to have my wound
dressed, and then the doctor was kind enough to bring me along here. I
put the case into your hands and shall do exactly what you advi se.”

We both sat in silence for some little time after listening to this
extraordinary narrative. Then Sherlock Holmes pulled down from the
shelf one of the pon der ous commonplace books in which he placed his
cut t ings.

“Here is an advertisement which will interest you,” said he. “It
appeared in all the papers about a year ago. L ist en to this: ‘ Lo st, on
the 9 th inst ., Mr. J ere mi ah Ha y ling, aged twenty- si x, a hydraulic
engine er. Le ft his lodgings at ten o’clock at night, and has not been
heard of since. Was dressed in ,’ et c ., et c. Ha! That re pres ents the
last time that the colonel needed to have his machine over hau led, I
fanc y.”

“Good heavens!” cried my pati ent. “Then that expla ins what the girl
said.”

“ Un doub te dly. It is quite clear that the colonel was a cool and
desper ate man, who was absolutely determined that nothing should stand
in the way of his little gam e, like those out -and- out pirates who will
leave no survi v or from a cap tured ship. Well, every moment now is
preci ous, so if you feel equ al to it we shall go down to Scotland Y ard
at once as a pre li min ary to starting for Ey for d.”

Some three hours or so afterwards we were all in the train together,
bound from Read ing to the little Berk shire village. There were Sherlock
Holmes, the hydraulic engineer, Inspector Bradstreet, of Scotland Y ard,
a pla in- clothes man, and myself. Bradstreet had spread an or dn ance ma p
of the county out upon the seat and was busy with his comp as ses drawing
a circle with Eyford for its cent re.

“There you ar e,” said he. “That circle is drawn at a radi us of ten
miles from the village. The place we want must be somewhere near that
line. You said ten miles, I think, sir.”

“It was an hour ’s good dri ve.”

“And you think that they brought you back all that way when you were
un conscious ?”

“They must have done so. I have a conf used memory, too, of having been
li fted and conveyed somewher e.”

“What I cannot understand ,” said I, “is why they should have sp ared you
when they found you lying fain ting in the garden. Perhaps the vill ain
was softened by the woman’s ent re ati es.”

“I hardly think that likely. I never saw a more inex or able face in my
life.”

“Oh, we shall soon clear up all that,” said Brad street. “Well, I have
drawn my circ le, and I only wish I knew at what point upon it the folk
that we are in search of are to be found .”

“I think I could lay my finger on it,” said Holmes quietly.

“Re ally, now!” cried the inspector, “you have formed your opinion !
Come, now, we shall see who agre es with you. I say it is south, for the
country is more deserted there.”

“And I say ea st,” said my pati ent.

“I am for we st,” remarked the pla in- clothes man. “There are several
quiet little vill ages up there.”

“And I am for nor th ,” said I, “because there are no hi lls there, and
our friend says that he did not notice the carriage go up any .”

“C om e,” cried the inspector, laughing; “it’s a very pretty di ver sity of
opin i on. We have box ed the comp ass among us. Who do you give your
cast ing vote to?”

“You are all wrong .”

“But we can’t all be.”

“Oh, yes, you can. This is my point.” He placed his finger in the
centre of the circle . “This is where we shall find them.”

“But the twel ve- mile dri ve?” gas ped Hatherle y.

“S i x out and six back. Nothing si m pl er. You say yourself that the horse
was fresh and glo s sy when you got in. How could it be that if it had
gone twelve miles over heavy road s?”

“Indeed, it is a likely r use enough ,” observed Bradstreet thought fully.
“Of course there can be no doubt as to the nature of this gang .”

“None at all ,” said Holmes. “They are co in ers on a large sca le, and
have used the machine to form the am al g am which has taken the place of
sil ver .”

“We have known for some time that a clever gang was at work ,” said the
inspector. “They have been turning out half- cr owns by the thous an d. We
even traced them as far as Read ing, but could get no far ther, for they
had covered their traces in a way that showed that they were very old
hands. But now, thanks to this luck y chance, I think that we have got
them right enough.”

But the inspector was mista ken, for those crimin als were not de st ined
to fall into the hands of justi ce. As we rolled into Eyford St ation we
saw a gigantic column of smoke which strea med up from behind a small
clump of trees in the neighbourhood and hung like an immense o stri ch
feather over the land s cap e.

“A house on fire ?” asked Bradstreet as the train steam ed off again on
its way.

“Yes, sir !” said the station - ma ster.

“When did it break out?”

“I hear that it was during the night, sir, but it has got wor se, and
the whole place is in a bla z e.”

“Who se house is it?”

“D r . Be cher ’s.”

“T ell me,” broke in the engineer, “is Dr. Be cher a Ger man, very thin,
with a long, sharp no se?”

The station - master laughed hearti ly. “No, sir, Dr. Be cher is an
English man, and there isn’t a man in the par ish who has a better - lined
waist coat. But he has a gentleman staying with him, a patient, as I
understand, who is a for eig ner, and he looks as if a little good
Berk shire be ef would do him no harm .”

The station - master had not finished his speech before we were all
hast ening in the direction of the fire. The road top ped a low hi ll, and
there was a great widespread whitewashed building in front of us,
sp ou ting fire at every ch ink and window, while in the garden in front
three fire - eng in es were v ain ly stri ving to keep the fla mes under .

“That’s it!” cried Hatherley, in inten se excit ement. “There is the
gravel - drive, and there are the ro se- bushes where I la y. That second
window is the one that I jumped from .”

“Well, at least ,” said Holmes, “you have had your re ven ge upon them.
There can be no question that it was your o il- lamp which, when it was
cr ushed in the press, set fire to the wooden wall s, though no doubt
they were too excited in the chase after you to observe it at the time.
Now keep your eyes open in this crowd for your friends of last night,
though I very much fear that they are a good hundred miles off by now.”

And Holmes’ fe ars came to be reali sed, for from that day to this no
word has ever been heard either of the beautiful woman, the sinister
Ger man, or the mor ose English man. E arly that morning a pe as ant had met
a cart con taining several people and some very bul ky boxes driving
rapidly in the direction of Read ing, but there all traces of the
fu g iti ves disappear ed, and even Holmes’ ingen u ity failed ever to
discover the least clue as to their where ab out s.

The fire men had been much per tur bed at the strange arrang em ents which
they had found wi thin, and still more so by discovering a newly sever ed
human thumb upon a window- sill of the second floor. About sun set,
however, their efforts were at last success ful, and they sub du ed the
fla m es, but not before the roof had fallen in, and the whole place been
re du ced to such absolute ruin that, save some twisted cylin ders and
iron pip ing, not a trace remained of the mach in ery which had cost our
unfortunate acquaintance so dear ly. L ar ge mas ses of ni ck el and of tin
were discovered stor ed in an out- house, but no co ins were to be found,
which may have explained the presence of those bul ky boxes which have
been already referred to.

How our hydraulic engine er had been conveyed from the garden to the
sp ot where he recovered his sen ses might have remained forever a
mystery were it not for the soft m oul d, which told us a very plain
ta le. He had evidently been carried down by two person s, one of whom
had remark ably small feet and the other un usually large ones. On the
who le, it was most probable that the silent English man, being less bo ld
or less murder ous than his companion, had assi sted the woman to bear
the un conscious man out of the way of danger.

“Well,” said our engine er ru e fully as we took our seats to return once
more to London, “it has been a pretty business for me! I have lost my
thumb and I have lost a fifty- guinea fe e, and what have I gain ed?”

“Ex peri ence ,” said Holmes, laughing. “In directly it may be of valu e,
you know; you have only to put it into words to gain the reput ation of
being excellent company for the remain der of your exist en ce.”




X . THE ADVENTURE OF THE NO B LE B A CH EL OR


The Lord St. Simon marriage, and its curious ter min ation, have long
ceased to be a subject of interest in those ex al ted circle s in which
the unfortunate bridegroom mov es. F re sh scand als have ec lip sed it, and
their more pi qu ant details have drawn the gossi ps away from this
four- year - old dra ma . As I have reason to believe, however, that the
full facts have never been reve aled to the general public, and as my
friend Sherlock Holmes had a considerable share in clearing the matter
up, I feel that no me mo ir of him would be complete without some little
s ketch of this remarkable ep is o de.

It was a few weeks before my own marriage, during the days when I was
still sharing rooms with Holmes in Baker Street, that he came home from
an afternoon stro ll to find a letter on the table waiting for him. I
had remained in doors all day, for the weather had taken a sudden turn
to rain, with high a ut um nal wind s, and the je z a il bullet which I had
brought back in one of my limbs as a re lic of my Af gh an campaig n
th robbed with dull per sist ence. With my body in one eas y- chair and my
legs upon another, I had sur rounded myself with a cloud of news papers
until at last, sat ur ated with the news of the day, I tossed them all
aside and lay list less, watching the huge cre st and monogra m upon the
envelope upon the table and wondering laz ily who my friend’s noble
correspon dent could be.

“Here is a very fashi onable epi st le ,” I remarked as he entered. “Your
morning letters, if I remember right, were from a fish- m ong er and a
ti de - wait er.”

“Yes, my correspon dence has certainly the char m of vari et y,” he
answered, smiling, “and the hum bl er are usually the more interesting.
This looks like one of those un wel come soci al sum mon ses which call upon
a man either to be bor ed or to li e.”

He broke the se al and glanced over the cont ents.

“Oh, come, it may prove to be something of interest, after all.”

“Not soci al, then?”

“No, distinctly professi on al.”

“And from a noble cli ent ?”

“One of the highest in England .”

“My dear fellow, I congratulate you.”

“I assure you, Watson, without affe ct ation, that the status of my
client is a matter of less moment to me than the interest of his case.
It is just possible, however, that that also may not be wanting in this
new investigation. You have been reading the papers di li gently of late,
have you not ?”

“It looks like it,” said I ru e fully, pointing to a huge bundle in the
corner. “I have had nothing else to do.”

“It is fortun ate, for you will perhaps be able to post me up. I read
nothing except the criminal news and the ag ony colum n. The latter is
always instru cti ve. But if you have followed recent events so closely
you must have read about Lord St. Simon and his wedd ing?”

“Oh, yes, with the deepest interest.”

“That is well. The letter which I hold in my hand is from Lord St.
Sim on. I will read it to you, and in return you must turn over these
papers and let me have whatever bears upon the matter. This is what he
says:

“‘ M Y DEAR MR . SHERLOCK HOLM ES , — Lord B ack water tells me that I may
place implic it reli ance upon your judgment and discre tion. I have
determin ed, therefore, to call upon you and to consult you in
reference to the very painful event which has occurred in
connection with my wedding. Mr. Lestrade, of Scotland Y ard, is
acting already in the matter, but he as sure s me that he sees no
objec tion to your co- oper ation, and that he even thinks that it
might be of some assistan ce. I will call at four o’clock in the
afternoon, and, should you have any other engag ement at that time,
I hope that you will post p one it, as this matter is of par amount
importance. You r s faith fully,


“‘ RO BER T ST . S IM ON .’


“It is dated from G ro s ven or M an si ons, written with a qui ll pen, and the
noble lor d has had the misfortune to get a sme ar of ink upon the ou ter
side of his right little fing er,” remarked Holmes as he folded up the
epi st le.

“He says four o’clock. It is three now. He will be here in an hour .”

“Then I have just time, with your assistan ce, to get clear upon the
subject. Tur n over those papers and arr ange the ex trac ts in their order
of time, while I take a glance as to who our client is.” He picked a
red- covered volume from a line of books of reference beside the
mantel piece. “Here he is,” said he, sitting down and fl atten ing it out
upon his kne e. “‘ Lord Robert W al sing ham de V ere St. Simon, second son
of the Duke of Bal mor al .’ H um! ‘ Arm s: A z ure, three cal tro ps in chi ef
over a f ess sa ble. B or n in 18 4 6 .’ He’s forty- one years of age, which is
mat ure for marriage. Was Un der- Sec re t ary for the col oni es in a late
ad min i str ation. The Du ke, his father, was at one time Sec re t ary for
For eign Af fair s. They in her it P lan tag en et blood by dire ct des c ent, and
T ud or on the dist af f side. Ha! Well, there is nothing very instru ctive
in all this. I think that I must turn to you Watson, for something more
so li d.”

“I have very little difficulty in finding what I wan t,” said I, “for
the facts are quite rec ent, and the matter struck me as remark able. I
feared to re fer them to you, however, as I knew that you had an inquiry
on hand and that you di sli ked the intr usion of other matter s.”

“Oh, you mean the little problem of the G ro s ven or Square furniture van .
That is quite cleared up now— though, indeed, it was obvious from the
first. Pray give me the results of your newspaper sele ction s.”

“Here is the first notice which I can fin d. It is in the personal
column of the Mor ning Po st, and dat es, as you see, some weeks back :
‘ A marriage has been arrang ed ,’ it says, ‘and will, if rum our is
correct, very shortly take place, between Lord Robert St. Simon, second
son of the Duke of Bal mor al, and Miss Hat ty Doran, the only daughter of
Aloysius Dor an. E sq ., of S an Franc is co, Cal ., U. S . A .’ That is all.”

“T er se and to the point ,” remarked Holmes, stretching his long, thin
legs towards the fire.

“There was a paragraph am pli fying this in one of the society papers of
the same week. Ah, here it is : ‘There will soon be a call for
prote ction in the marriage marke t, for the present fre e- trade
princi ple appears to tell heavily against our home produ ct. One by one
the manag ement of the noble houses of Great Br it ain is passing into the
hands of our fair cous ins from across the At lan ti c. An important
add ition has been made during the last week to the list of the pri z es
which have been borne away by these charming inv ad ers. Lord St. Simon,
who has shown himself for over twenty years proof against the little
go d’s arr ows, has now definit ely announced his approaching marriage
with Miss Hat ty Doran, the fascin ating daughter of a Californi a
mill ion ai re. Miss Doran, whose grac eful figure and striking face
attracted much attention at the West bur y House fe sti v iti es, is an only
child, and it is curr ently reported that her d ow ry will run to
considerably over the six figure s, with expe ct anci es for the fut ure. As
it is an open secret that the Duke of Bal moral has been compelled to
sell his pictures within the last few years, and as Lord St. Simon has
no property of his own save the small est ate of B ir ch mo or, it is
obvious that the Californi an he ire ss is not the only gain er by an
all i ance which will en able her to make the easy and common trans ition
from a R ep u bli can lady to a British pe er ess .’”

“ Any thing el se?” asked Holmes, yaw n ing.

“Oh, yes; pl ent y. Then there is another note in the Mor ning Po st to
say that the marriage would be an absolutely quiet one, that it would
be at St. George ’s, Han over Square, that only half a dozen intimate
friends would be inv it ed, and that the party would return to the
furnished house at Lan ca ster G ate which has been taken by Mr. Aloysius
Dor an. Two days lat er —that is, on Wednes day last —there is a cur t
announ ce ment that the wedding had taken place, and that the hone y moon
would be passed at Lord B ack water ’s place, near Peter s fiel d. Those are
all the noti ces which appeared before the disappearance of the bride .”

“Be fore the what?” asked Holmes with a start.

“The vani shing of the lad y.”

“When did she vani sh, then?”

“At the wedding breakfast.”

“Inde ed. This is more interesting than it promised to be; quite
dra m ati c, in fac t.”

“Yes; it struck me as being a little out of the comm on.”

“They often van ish before the ceremony, and occasionally during the
hone y mo on; but I cannot call to mind anything quite so prompt as this.
Pray let me have the detail s.”

“I warn you that they are very in complete .”

“P erhaps we may make them less so.”

“Su ch as they are, they are set forth in a single arti cle of a morning
paper of yesterday, which I will read to you. It is headed, ‘ S ing ular
O c curr ence at a F as hi onable Wed ding ’ :

“‘The family of Lord Robert St. Simon has been thrown into the greatest
con ster nation by the strange and painful ep is od es which have taken
place in connection with his wedding. The ceremony, as shortly
announced in the papers of yesterday, occurred on the previous morning;
but it is only now that it has been possible to con firm the strange
rum ours which have been so per sist ently floating about. In spite of the
attempts of the friends to hus h the matter up, so much public attention
has now been drawn to it that no good purpose can be served by
affe cting to dis regard what is a common subject for conver s ation.

“‘The ceremony, which was per formed at St. George ’s, Han over Square,
was a very quiet one, no one being present save the father of the
bri de, Mr. Aloysius Doran, the Du ch ess of Bal mor al, Lord B ack water,
Lord Eu st ace and Lady C lar a St. Simon ( the younger brother and sister
of the brideg room ), and Lady Ali ci a Whi tt ing t on. The whole party
proce eded afterwards to the house of Mr. Aloysius Doran, at Lan ca ster
G ate, where breakfast had been prepar ed. It appears that some little
trouble was caused by a woman, whose name has not been ascertain ed, who
endeavoured to force her way into the house after the brid al par ty,
alle ging that she had some claim upon Lord St. Sim on. It was only after
a painful and pro long ed scene that she was e jec ted by the but ler and
the foot man. The bri de, who had fortunately entered the house before
this unpleasant interrup tion, had sat down to breakfast with the rest,
when she compla ined of a sudden indi spos ition and retired to her room.
Her pro long ed ab sence having caused some comm ent, her father followed
her, but learned from her maid that she had only come up to her chamber
for an instant, caught up an ul ster and bon net, and hurried down to the
passa ge. One of the foot men decl ared that he had seen a lady leave the
house th us appar ell ed, but had refused to credit that it was his
mistre ss, believ ing her to be with the compan y. On ascertain ing that
his daughter had disappear ed, Mr. Aloysius Doran, in con j unction with
the brideg room, instantly put themselves in communic ation with the
police, and very energetic inquiries are being made, which will
probably result in a spee dy clearing up of this very singular business.
U p to a late hour last night, however, nothing had tran spir ed as to the
where ab ou ts of the missing lady. There are rum ours of foul play in the
matter, and it is said that the police have caused the ar rest of the
woman who had caused the original disturbance, in the beli ef that, from
je al ous y or some other moti ve, she may have been concerned in the
strange disappearance of the bride .’”

“And is that all?”

“Only one little it em in another of the morning papers, but it is a
suggestive one.”

“And it is —”

“That Miss Flora Mill ar, the lady who had caused the disturbance, has
actually been arre sted. It appears that she was former ly a d an se use
at the A lle gro , and that she has known the bridegroom for some years.
There are no further particul ars, and the whole case is in your hands
now —so far as it has been set forth in the public pres s.”

“And an exceedingly interesting case it appears to be. I would not have
missed it for worl ds. But there is a ring at the bell, Watson, and as
the clock makes it a few minutes after four , I have no doubt that this
will prove to be our noble client. Do not dream of going, Watson, for I
very much prefer having a wit ness, if only as a check to my own
memor y.”

“ Lord Robert St. Sim on,” announced our p ag e- boy, throwing open the
door. A gentleman entered, with a pleas ant, cul tured face, high- no sed
and pale, with something perhaps of pe t ul ance about the mouth, and with
the ste ad y, well- opened eye of a man whose pleasant lot it had ever
been to command and to be obe ye d. His manner was bris k, and yet his
general appearance gave an un due impression of age, for he had a slight
forward stoo p and a little bend of the knees as he wal ked. His hair,
too, as he swept off his very cur l y- brimmed hat, was grizzled round the
ed ges and thin upon the top . As to his dress, it was careful to the
ver ge of f op pi sh ness, with high coll ar, black frock-coat, white
waist coat, yellow glo ves, pat ent - leather sho es, and light - coloured
ga iter s. He advan ced slowly into the room, turning his head from left
to right, and swinging in his right hand the cord which held his golden
eye glas ses.

“Good- day, Lord St. Sim on,” said Holmes, rising and bow ing. “Pray take
the bas ke t- chair. This is my friend and colleag ue, Dr. Watson. D ra w up
a little to the fire, and we will talk this matter over.”

“A most painful matter to me, as you can most readily imagine, Mr.
Holmes. I have been cut to the qui ck. I understand that you have
already managed several delicate cases of this sort, sir, though I
presume that they were hardly from the same cl ass of societ y.”

“No, I am descen d ing.”

“I beg par don .”

“My last client of the sort was a king.”

“Oh, rea ll y! I had no idea. And which king ?”

“The King of Scand in a vi a.”

“What! Had he lost his wife ?”

“You can understand ,” said Holmes su a vel y, “that I ex tend to the
affairs of my other cli ents the same secrecy which I promise to you in
your s.”

“Of cour se! Very right ! very right ! I’m sure I beg par don . As to my own
case, I am ready to give you any information which may assi st you in
forming an opinion .”

“Thank you. I have already learned all that is in the public prin ts,
nothing more. I presume that I may take it as corre ct — this arti cle, for
example, as to the disappearance of the bride .”

Lord St. Simon glanced over it. “Yes, it is correct, as far as it
go es.”

“But it nee ds a great deal of sup ple ment ing before anyone could offer
an opin i on. I think that I may arri ve at my facts most directly by
questioning you.”

“Pray do so.”

“When did you first meet Miss Hat ty Dor an ?”

“In S an Franc is co, a year ago.”

“You were trave lling in the Stat es?”

“Yes.”

“Did you become engaged then?”

“No.”

“But you were on a friendly foot ing?”

“I was am used by her societ y, and she could see that I was am use d.”

“H er father is very ri ch?”

“He is said to be the ri chest man on the P ac i fi c slo pe .”

“And how did he make his mone y?”

“In min ing. He had nothing a few years ago. Then he struck gold,
invest ed it, and came up by lea ps and b ound s.”

“Now, what is your own impression as to the young lady ’s— your wife’s
character ?”

The noble man swung his glasses a little faster and stared down into the
fire. “You see, Mr. Holmes,” said he, “my wife was twenty before her
father became a rich man. During that time she ran free in a min ing
camp and wandered through woods or m oun tain s, so that her educ ation has
come from N at ure rather than from the school ma ster. She is what we call
in England a tom boy, with a strong nature, wild and free, un fet tered by
any sort of tra d iti ons. She is im pe tu ous — vol can ic, I was about to say.
She is swift in making up her mind and fe ar less in carrying out her
re solu tions. On the other hand, I would not have given her the name
which I have the honour to bear ” —he gave a little stat ely cough — “ had I
not thought her to be at bottom a noble woman. I believe that she is
capable of her o ic self- sacrifi ce and that anything dishon our able would
be re pu gn ant to her.”

“Have you her photograph?”

“I brought this with me.” He opened a lock et and showed us the full
face of a very lovely woman. It was not a photograph but an i vor y
min i at ure, and the arti st had brought out the full effect of the
lu strous black hair, the large dark eyes, and the ex qu is ite mou th.
Holmes gazed long and earne stly at it. Then he closed the lock et and
handed it back to Lord St. Sim on.

“The young lady came to London, then, and you ren e wed your
acquaint an ce?”

“Yes, her father brought her over for this last London seas on. I met
her several times, became engaged to her, and have now married her.”

“She br ough t, I understand, a considerable d ow ry ?”

“A fair d ow ry. Not more than is usual in my fami ly.”

“And this, of course, rema ins to you, since the marriage is a fa it
accompli ?”

“I really have made no inquiries on the subjec t.”

“Very naturally not. Did you see Miss Dor an on the day before the
wedd ing?”

“Yes.”

“Was she in good spirit s?”

“Never better. She kept talking of what we should do in our future
li ves.”

“Indeed! That is very interesting. And on the morning of the wedd ing?”

“She was as bright as possible — at least until after the cerem on y.”

“And did you observe any change in her then?”

“Well, to tell the truth, I saw then the first signs that I had ever
seen that her temp er was just a little shar p. The incident however, was
too trivial to re late and can have no possible bearing upon the case.”

“Pray let us have it, for all that.”

“Oh, it is chil dish . She dropped her bou qu et as we went towards the
v est ry. She was passing the front pe w at the time, and it fell over
into the pew . There was a moment ’s dela y, but the gentleman in the pe w
handed it up to her again, and it did not appear to be the worse for
the fa ll. Yet when I spoke to her of the matter, she answered me
ab rup t ly; and in the carriage, on our way home, she seemed absur dly
agit ated over this trifling cau se.”

“Indeed! You say that there was a gentleman in the pew . Some of the
general public were present, then?”

“Oh, yes. It is impossible to ex clu de them when the church is open .”

“This gentleman was not one of your wife’s friend s?”

“No, no; I call him a gentleman by cour t es y, but he was quite a
comm on- looking per son. I hardly noticed his appearance. But really I
think that we are wandering rather far from the point.”

“L ady St. Simon, then, returned from the wedding in a less cheer ful
fra me of mind than she had gone to it. What did she do on re- entering
her father’s house ?”

“I saw her in conversation with her maid .”

“And who is her maid ?”

“A li ce is her name. She is an American and came from Californi a with
her.”

“A confid ential servan t?”

“A little too much so. It seemed to me that her mistre ss allowed her to
take great liber ties. Still, of course, in America they look upon these
things in a different way.”

“How long did she speak to this Ali ce?”

“Oh, a few minutes. I had something else to think of.”

“You did not over hear what they said ?”

“L ady St. Simon said something about ‘ jum ping a claim .’ She was
accustomed to use slan g of the kind. I have no idea what she mean t.”

“A mer i can slan g is very expressi ve some times. And what did your wife do
when she finished speaking to her maid ?”

“She walked into the breakfast- room.”

“On your arm ?”

“No, alone. She was very indepen dent in little matters like that. Then,
after we had sat down for ten minutes or so, she rose hurried ly,
muttered some words of apolog y, and left the room. She never came
back.”

“But this maid, Ali ce, as I understand, de po ses that she went to her
room, covered her bride ’s dress with a long ul st er, put on a bon net,
and went out.”

“Quite so. And she was afterwards seen walking into H y de Par k in
company with Flora Mill ar, a woman who is now in cu sto dy, and who had
already made a disturban ce at Mr. Dor an ’s house that morning.”

“Ah, yes. I should like a few particul ars as to this young lady, and
your relations to her.”

Lord St. Simon shrugged his shoulders and raised his eyebr ows. “We have
been on a friendly foo ting for some year s—I may say on a very
friendly foot ing. She used to be at the A lle gro . I have not treated her
un gener ou sly, and she had no just cause of compla int against me, but
you know what women are, Mr. Holmes. Flora was a dear little thing, but
exceedingly ho t- headed and devo tedly attached to me. She wrote me
dreadful letters when she heard that I was about to be married, and, to
tell the truth, the reason why I had the marriage celebrated so quietly
was that I feared lest there might be a scandal in the church. She came
to Mr. Dor an ’s door just after we returned, and she endeavoured to p ush
her way in, uttering very ab usi ve expressi ons towards my wife, and even
threat ening her, but I had foreseen the possibility of something of the
sort, and I had two police fellows there in private clothes, who soon
pushed her out again. She was quiet when she saw that there was no good
in making a row .”

“Did your wife hear all this?”

“No, thank goodness, she did not.”

“And she was seen walking with this very woman afterwar d s?”

“Yes. That is what Mr. Lestrade, of Scotland Y ard, looks upon as so
seri ous. It is thought that Flora de co yed my wife out and laid some
terrible trap for her.”

“Well, it is a possible sup positi on.”

“You think so, too?”

“I did not say a probable one. But you do not yourself look upon this
as like ly?”

“I do not think Flora would hurt a fl y.”

“S till, je al ous y is a strange trans form er of character s. Pray what is
your own theory as to what took plac e?”

“Well, really, I came to seek a theor y, not to pro pound one. I have
given you all the facts. S in ce you ask me, however, I may say that it
has occurred to me as possible that the excit ement of this affa ir, the
conscious ness that she had made so immense a soci al stri de, had the
effect of ca using some little nervous disturban ce in my wife .”

“In short, that she had become suddenly der ang ed?”

“Well, really, when I consider that she has turned her back —I will not
say upon me, but upon so much that many have as pir ed to without
succes s—I can hardly explain it in any other fashi on.”

“Well, certainly that is also a con cei v able hypothes is,” said Holmes,
smiling. “And now, Lord St. Simon, I think that I have nearly all my
data. May I ask whether you were seated at the breakfast- table so that
you could see out of the window ?”

“We could see the other side of the road and the Par k.”

“Quite so. Then I do not think that I need to de tain you longer. I
shall communicate with you.”

“Sh ould you be fortunate enough to solve this problem ,” said our
client, ris ing.

“I have solved it.”

“E h ? What was that?”

“I say that I have solved it.”

“Where, then, is my wife ?”

“That is a detail which I shall spee dily sup pl y.”

Lord St. Simon shook his head. “I am afraid that it will take wi s er
heads than yours or min e,” he remarked, and b owing in a stat ely,
old-fashioned manner he de par ted.

“It is very good of Lord St. Simon to honour my head by putting it on a
level with his own ,” said Sherlock Holmes, laughing. “I think that I
shall have a whisky and so da and a cigar after all this
cross- questi on ing. I had formed my conclusions as to the case before
our client came into the room.”

“My dear Holmes!”

“I have notes of several similar cases, though none, as I remarked
before, which were quite as promp t. My whole examination served to turn
my conjecture into a certainty. C ir c umstan tial evidence is occasionally
very convin cing, as when you find a tr out in the mil k, to qu o te
Th or ea u ’s exam ple .”

“But I have heard all that you have he ard.”

“Wi th out, however, the knowledge of pre - exist ing cases which ser ves me
so well. There was a par all el instance in A ber de en some years back, and
something on very much the same lines at M uni ch the year after the
Fran co- P rus si an W ar. It is one of these case s— but, hu ll o, here is
Lestrade ! Good- afternoon, Lestrade ! You will find an ex tr a tum bl er upon
the sideboard, and there are cig ars in the box .”

The official detective was at tired in a pe a- jacket and crav at, which
gave him a deci de dly na u tical appear ance, and he carried a black can v as
bag in his hand. With a short gre eting he seated himself and lit the
cigar which had been offered to him.

“What’s up, then?” asked Holmes with a twink le in his eye. “You look
dis satisfi ed.”

“And I feel dis satisfied. It is this infer nal St. Simon marriage case.
I can make neither head nor tail of the business.”

“Re all y! You surprise me.”

“Who ever heard of such a mixed affair ? Every clue seems to slip
through my fing ers. I have been at work upon it all day.”

“And very wet it seems to have made you,” said Holmes laying his hand
upon the arm of the pe a- jac ket.

“Yes, I have been dragging the Serpent in e.”

“In Hea ven ’s name, what for?”

“In search of the body of Lady St. Sim on.”

Sherlock Holmes leaned back in his chair and laughed hearti ly.

“Have you dragged the bas in of T raf al gar Square f oun tain ?” he asked.

“Wh y? What do you mean?”

“Because you have just as good a chance of finding this lady in the one
as in the other .”

Lestrade shot an angry glance at my companion. “I suppose you know all
about it,” he snar led.

“Well, I have only just heard the facts, but my mind is made up.”

“Oh, inde ed! Then you think that the Serpentine pla ys no part in the
matter?”

“I think it very un like ly.”

“Then perhaps you will kindly explain how it is that we found this in
it?” He opened his bag as he spoke, and tum bled onto the floor a
wedding- dress of wa tered sil k, a pair of white sat in shoes and a
bride ’s w rea th and veil, all discol oured and soa ked in water. “Ther e,”
said he, putting a new wedding- ring upon the top of the pi le. “There is
a little n ut for you to crac k, Ma ster Holmes.”

“Oh, indeed !” said my friend, blowing blue r ings into the air. “You
dragged them from the Serpent in e?”

“No. They were found floating near the mar g in by a par k- kee per. They
have been identi fied as her clothes, and it seemed to me that if the
clothes were there the body would not be far off.”

“By the same brilliant reason ing, every man’s body is to be found in
the neighbourhood of his war dro be. And pray what did you hope to arri ve
at through this?”

“At some evidence imp li cat ing Flora Mill ar in the disappear an ce.”

“I am afraid that you will find it difficul t.”

“A re you, indeed, now?” cried Lestrade with some bit ter ness. “I am
afra id, Holmes, that you are not very practical with your dedu ctions
and your infer en ces. You have made two bl under s in as many minutes.
This dress does implic ate Miss Flora Mill ar.”

“And how ?”

“In the dress is a pocket. In the pocket is a car d- case. In the
car d- case is a note. And here is the very note .” He sla pped it down
upon the table in front of him. “L ist en to this: ‘You will see me when
all is ready. Come at once. F . H. M .’ Now my theory all along has been
that Lady St. Simon was de co yed away by Flora Mill ar, and that she,
with confeder at es, no doubt, was responsi ble for her disappear ance.
Here, signed with her initi als, is the very note which was no doubt
quietly slipped into her hand at the door and which l ured her within
their rea ch.”

“Very good, Lestrade ,” said Holmes, laughing. “You really are very fine
indeed. Let me see it.” He took up the paper in a list less way, but his
attention instantly became ri ve ted, and he gave a little cry of
satisfac tion. “This is indeed importan t,” said he.

“Ha! you find it so?”

“Ex tre mely so. I congratulate you warm ly.”

Lestrade rose in his tri um ph and bent his head to look. “Why,” he
shrie ked, “ you’re looking at the wrong side !”

“On the contrary, this is the right side.”

“The right side ? You’re ma d! Here is the note written in pencil over
here.”

“And over here is what appears to be the fra g ment of a hotel bi ll,
which interests me dee pl y.”

“There’s nothing in it. I looked at it befor e,” said Lestra de. “‘O ct.
4 th, rooms 8 s ., breakfast 2 s. 6 d ., cock tail 1 s ., lunch 2 s.
6 d ., glass sh er ry, 8 d.’ I see nothing in that.”

“Very likely not. It is most important, all the same. As to the note,
it is important also, or at least the initials are, so I congratulate
you again.”

“I’ve wa sted time enough ,” said Lestrade, ris ing. “I believe in hard
work and not in sitting by the fire spinning fine theor i es. Good- day,
Mr. Holmes, and we shall see which gets to the bottom of the matter
first.” He gathered up the garm ents, thrust them into the bag , and made
for the door.

“Just one h int to you, Lestrade ,” draw led Holmes before his ri val
van ishe d; “I will tell you the true solution of the matter. Lady St.
Simon is a my th. There is not, and there never has been, any such
person .”

Lestrade looked sa dly at my companion. Then he turned to me, ta pped his
forehead three times, shook his head solem n ly, and hurried away.

He had hardly shut the door behind him when Holmes rose to put on his
over coat. “There is something in what the fellow says about out door
work ,” he remarked, “ so I think, Watson, that I must leave you to your
papers for a litt le.”

It was after five o’clock when Sherlock Holmes left me, but I had no
time to be lone ly, for within an hour there arrived a con fe ction er’s
man with a very large flat box . This he un packed with the help of a
you th whom he had brought with him, and present ly, to my very great
astonishment, a quite e pic ure an little cold supper began to be laid out
upon our humble lodg ing- house ma ho gan y. There were a couple of brace of
cold wood co ck, a p he as ant, a p â t é de fo i e gr as pie with a group of
anci ent and co b web by bott les. Having laid out all these lu x u ri es, my
two visit ors vanished away, like the gen i i of the Ar ab i an N ight s, with
no explanation save that the things had been paid for and were ordered
to this address.

Just before nine o’clock Sherlock Holmes stepped brisk ly into the room.
His features were gra vely set, but there was a light in his eye which
made me think that he had not been disap pointed in his conclusion s.

“They have laid the supper, then,” he said, rubbing his hands.

“You seem to expect compan y. They have laid for fi ve.”

“Yes, I fancy we may have some company dropping in,” said he. “I am
surprised that Lord St. Simon has not already arri ved. Ha! I fancy that
I hear his step now upon the stair s.”

It was indeed our visitor of the afternoon who came bust ling in,
dang ling his glasses more vig or ously than ever, and with a very
per tur bed expression upon his aristo cr atic features.

“My mes sen ger reached you, then?” asked Holmes.

“Yes, and I confess that the cont ents startled me beyond meas ure. Have
you good author ity for what you say ?”

“The best possible.”

Lord St. Simon sank into a chair and passed his hand over his fore head.

“What will the Duke say ,” he mur mu red, “when he hears that one of the
family has been subjec ted to such hu mi li ation ?”

“It is the p ure st accid ent. I cannot allow that there is any
hu mi li ation.”

“Ah, you look on these things from another stand point.”

“I fa il to see that anyone is to bla me. I can hardly see how the lady
could have acted other wi se, though her ab rup t method of doing it was
undoubtedly to be regre t ted. Having no mother, she had no one to advise
her at such a cri si s.”

“It was a sli ght, sir, a public sli ght ,” said Lord St. Simon, tapping
his fingers upon the table.

“You must make allow ance for this poor girl, placed in so un prece d ented
a positi on.”

“I will make no allow ance. I am very angry indeed, and I have been
sha me fully use d.”

“I think that I heard a r ing,” said Holmes. “Yes, there are steps on
the land ing. If I cannot persuade you to take a len i ent view of the
matter, Lord St. Simon, I have brought an ad v oc ate here who may be more
success ful.” He opened the door and us her ed in a lady and gentle man.
“ Lord St. Sim on,” said he “ allow me to introduce you to Mr. and Mrs.
Franc is Ha y Moul t on. The lady, I think, you have already me t.”

At the sight of these newcom ers our client had sprung from his seat and
stood very erec t, with his eyes cast down and his hand thrust into the
breast of his frock-coat, a picture of off ended dign ity. The lady had
taken a quick step forward and had held out her hand to him, but he
still refused to raise his eyes. It was as well for his re solu tion,
perhaps, for her ple ad ing face was one which it was hard to resi st.

“You ’re angry, Ro ber t,” said she. “Well, I guess you have every cause
to be.”

“Pray make no apology to me,” said Lord St. Simon bit ter ly.

“Oh, yes, I know that I have treated you real bad and that I should
have spoken to you before I w ent; but I was kind of ratt led, and from
the time when I saw Frank here again I just didn’t know what I was
doing or say ing. I only wonder I didn’t fall down and do a faint right
there before the al t ar.”

“P erha ps, Mrs. Moul ton, you would like my friend and me to leave the
room while you explain this matter?”

“If I may give an opinion ,” remarked the strange gentleman, “ we’ve had
just a little too much secrecy over this business al ready. For my part,
I should like all Eu rope and America to hear the rights of it.” He was
a small, wi ry, sun bur nt man, clean-sha ven, with a sharp face and al er t
manner.

“Then I’ll tell our story right away ,” said the lady. “ Frank here and I
met in ’8 4 , in Mc Qu ire ’s camp , near the Ro ck i es, where Pa was working a
claim . We were engaged to each other, Frank and I; but then one day
father struck a rich pocket and made a pile, while poor Frank here had
a claim that pe tered out and came to nothing. The richer Pa grew the
po or er was Fran k; so at last Pa wouldn’t hear of our engag ement la sting
any longer, and he took me away to ’Frisc o . Frank wouldn’t throw up his
hand, though ; so he followed me there, and he saw me without Pa knowing
anything about it. It would only have made him mad to know, so we just
fixed it all up for ourselves. Frank said that he would go and make his
pile, too, and never come back to claim me until he had as much as P a.
So then I promised to wait for him to the end of time and ple dged
myself not to marry anyone else while he li ved. ‘ Why sh ouldn’t we be
married right away, then ,’ said he, ‘and then I will feel sure of you;
and I won’t claim to be your husband until I come back ?’ Well, we
talked it over, and he had fixed it all up so nice ly, with a clergyman
all ready in wait ing, that we just did it right there; and then Frank
went off to seek his fortun e, and I went back to P a.

“The next I heard of Frank was that he was in Mon tan a, and then he went
pro spec ting in A ri z on a, and then I heard of him from New M ex i co. After
that came a long newspaper story about how a min er s’ camp had been
att ac ked by A pac he Indi ans, and there was my Frank ’s name among the
killed. I fainted dead away, and I was very sick for months after. Pa
thought I had a decl ine and took me to half the doctor s in ’Frisc o . Not
a word of news came for a year and more, so that I never doub ted that
Frank was really dead. Then Lord St. Simon came to ’Frisc o, and we came
to London, and a marriage was arrang ed, and Pa was very plea sed, but I
felt all the time that no man on this earth would ever take the place
in my heart that had been given to my poor Fran k.

“S till, if I had married Lord St. Simon, of course I’d have done my
duty by him. We can’t command our lo ve, but we can our acti ons. I went
to the al tar with him with the intention to make him just as good a
wife as it was in me to be. But you may imagine what I felt when, just
as I came to the al tar rail s, I glanced back and saw Frank standing and
looking at me out of the first pew . I thought it was his gho st at
fir st; but when I looked again there he was still, with a kind of
question in his eyes, as if to ask me whether I were glad or sorry to
see him. I wonder I didn’t dro p. I know that everything was turning
round, and the words of the clergyman were just like the bu z z of a be e
in my ear. I didn’t know what to do. Sh ould I stop the service and make
a scene in the chur ch ? I glanced at him again, and he seemed to know
what I was thinking, for he raised his finger to his lips to tell me to
be still. Then I saw him scri b ble on a piece of paper, and I knew that
he was writing me a note. As I passed his pe w on the way out I dropped
my bou qu et over to him, and he slipped the note into my hand when he
returned me the flow ers. It was only a line asking me to join him when
he made the sign to me to do so. Of course I never doub ted for a moment
that my first duty was now to him, and I determined to do just whatever
he might dire ct.

“When I got back I told my maid, who had known him in Californi a, and
had always been his friend. I ordered her to say nothing, but to get a
few things packed and my ul ster ready. I know I ought to have spoken to
Lord St. Simon, but it was dreadful hard before his mother and all
those great people. I just made up my mind to run away and explain
afterwards. I hadn’t been at the table ten minutes before I saw Frank
out of the window at the other side of the road. He be ck oned to me and
then began walking into the Par k. I slipped out, put on my things, and
followed him. Some woman came talking something or other about Lord St.
Simon to me— seemed to me from the little I heard as if he had a little
secret of his own before marriage al so —but I managed to get away from
her and soon over took Fran k. We got into a cab together, and away we
drove to some lodgings he had taken in G or don Square, and that was my
true wedding after all those years of wait ing. Frank had been a
prisoner among the A pa ches, had esca ped, came on to ’Frisc o, found that
I had given him up for dead and had gone to England, followed me there,
and had come upon me at last on the very morning of my second wedd ing.”

“I saw it in a paper ,” explained the Ameri can. “It gave the name and
the church but not where the lady liv ed.”

“Then we had a talk as to what we should do, and Frank was all for
open ness, but I was so ashamed of it all that I felt as if I should
like to van ish away and never see any of them again —just sending a line
to P a, perhaps, to show him that I was ali ve. It was awful to me to
think of all those lor ds and ladies sitting round that breakfast- table
and waiting for me to come back. So Frank took my wedding- clothes and
things and made a bundle of them, so that I should not be trac ed, and
dropped them away somewhere where no one could find them. It is likely
that we should have gone on to Par is to-morrow, only that this good
gentleman, Mr. Holmes, came round to us this evening, though how he
found us is more than I can think, and he showed us very clearly and
kindly that I was wrong and that Frank was right, and that we should be
putting ourselves in the wrong if we were so secre t. Then he offered to
give us a chance of talking to Lord St. Simon alone, and so we came
right away round to his rooms at once. Now, Ro ber t, you have heard it
all, and I am very sorry if I have given you pain , and I hope that you
do not think very mean ly of me.”

Lord St. Simon had by no means re la x ed his ri g id att itud e, but had
listened with a fr own ing brow and a com pressed lip to this long
narrative.

“Ex c use me,” he said, “but it is not my custom to discuss my most
intimate personal affairs in this public manner .”

“Then you won’t forgive me? You won’t shake hands before I go ?”

“Oh, certain ly, if it would give you any pleas ure .” He put out his hand
and col dly grasped that which she extended to him.

“I had hop ed,” suggested Holmes, “that you would have joined us in a
friendly supper .”

“I think that there you ask a little too mu ch ,” respon ded his Lor d ship.
“I may be forced to ac qui es ce in these recent develo p ments, but I can
hardly be expected to make mer ry over them. I think that with your
permission I will now wish you all a very good- night.” He included us
all in a sweep ing bow and st al ked out of the room.

“Then I trust that you at least will honour me with your company ,” said
Sherlock Holmes. “It is always a joy to meet an Ameri can, Mr. Moul ton,
for I am one of those who believe that the fo lly of a mon ar ch and the
bl under ing of a min ister in far - gone years will not prevent our
children from being some day c iti z ens of the same worl d- wide country
under a fla g which shall be a quar tering of the U ni on Jack with the
St ars and St ri p es.”

“The case has been an interesting one,” remarked Holmes when our
visit ors had left us, “because it ser ves to show very clearly how
simple the explanation may be of an affair which at first sight seems
to be almost inex p lic able. Nothing could be more natural than the
sequ ence of events as narr ated by this lady, and nothing stranger than
the result when vie wed, for instan ce, by Mr. Lestrade of Scotland
Y ard.”

“You were not yourself at fault at all, then?”

“From the first, two facts were very obvious to me, the one that the
lady had been quite willing to under go the wedding ceremony, the other
that she had re pent ed of it within a few minutes of returning home.
Ob vi ously something had occurred during the morning, then, to cause her
to change her mind. What could that something be? She could not have
spoken to anyone when she was out, for she had been in the company of
the brideg room. Had she seen some one, then? If she had, it must be
someone from America because she had spent so short a time in this
country that she could hardly have allowed anyone to ac quir e so deep an
influence over her that the mere sight of him would in du ce her to
change her plans so completely. You see we have already arri ved, by a
proc ess of excl usi on, at the idea that she might have seen an Ameri can.
Then who could this American be, and why should he posse ss so much
influence over her ? It might be a lo ver ; it might be a husband. Her
young woman hood had, I knew, been spent in rough scen es and under
strange conditi ons. So far I had got before I ever heard Lord St.
Sim on ’s narrative. When he told us of a man in a pe w, of the change in
the bride ’s manner, of so tran spar ent a dev ice for obtaining a note as
the dropping of a bou qu et, of her re sort to her confid ential maid, and
of her very sig ni fi can t allusion to claim - jum p ing— which in min er s’
par lan ce means taking possession of that which another person has a
pri or claim to —the whole situation became absolutely clear. She had
gone off with a man, and the man was either a lover or was a previous
husband —the chanc es being in favour of the lat ter .”

“And how in the world did you find them?”

“It might have been difficul t, but friend Lestrade held information in
his hands the value of which he did not himself know. The initials
were, of course, of the highest importan ce, but more valuable still was
it to know that within a week he had settled his bill at one of the
most sele ct London hote l s.”

“How did you deduce the sele ct ?”

“By the sele ct pri ces. E ight shi ll ings for a bed and eight pence for a
glass of sh er ry pointed to one of the most expensive hote l s. There are
not many in London which charge at that rat e. In the second one which I
vis ited in Nor thum ber land Aven ue, I learned by an inspe ction of the
book that Franc is H. Moul ton, an American gentleman, had left only the
day before, and on looking over the ent ries against him, I came upon
the very it em s which I had seen in the d up lic ate bi ll. His letters were
to be forwar ded to 22 6 G or don S quar e; so thi ther I travell ed, and being
fortunate enough to find the lo ving couple at home, I vent ured to give
them some pat er nal advice and to point out to them that it would be
better in every way that they should make their position a little
clear er both to the general public and to Lord St. Simon in particul ar.
I inv ited them to meet him here, and, as you see, I made him keep the
ap point ment.”

“But with no very good resul t,” I remarked. “His conduct was certainly
not very grac i ous.”

“Ah, Watson,” said Holmes, smiling, “ perhaps you would not be very
gracious either, i f, after all the trouble of woo ing and wedd ing, you
found yourself de pri ved in an instant of wife and of fortun e. I think
that we may judge Lord St. Simon very mer ci fully and thank our stars
that we are never likely to find ourselves in the same position. D ra w
your chair up and hand me my viol in, for the only problem we have still
to solve is how to while away these b lea k a ut um nal even ing s.”




X I. THE ADVENTURE OF THE BER Y L C OR ON E T


“Holmes,” said I as I stood one morning in our b ow- window looking down
the street, “ here is a ma d man coming along. It seems rather sad that
his relati ves should allow him to come out al one.”

My friend rose laz ily from his armchair and stood with his hands in the
pockets of his dressing-gown, looking over my shoulder. It was a
bright, cris p F e bru ary morning, and the snow of the day before still
lay deep upon the ground, s him mer ing bright ly in the win try sun . D own
the centre of Baker Street it had been pl ough ed into a brown crum bly
band by the tra ffi c, but at either side and on the hea pe d- up ed ges of
the foot pa ths it still lay as white as when it fe ll. The grey pavement
had been cleaned and scra ped, but was still danger ously slipper y, so
that there were fe w er pas sen g ers than usual. In de ed, from the direction
of the M et rop olit an St ation no one was coming save the single gentleman
whose eccent ric conduct had drawn my attention.

He was a man of about fif ty, tall, port ly, and im pos ing, with a
massi ve, strongly marked face and a comm and ing figu re. He was dressed
in a sombre yet rich style, in black frock-coat, shining hat, neat
brown ga it ers, and well- cut pe ar l - grey trouser s. Yet his acti ons were
in absur d contrast to the dign ity of his dress and feature s, for he was
running hard, with occasional little spr ings, such as a weary man gives
who is little accustomed to set any tax upon his leg s. As he ran he
jerked his hands up and down, wa ggled his head, and wri thed his face
into the most extraordinary cont or tions.

“What on earth can be the matter with him?” I asked. “He is looking up
at the num bers of the house s.”

“I believe that he is coming here,” said Holmes, rubbing his hands.

“H er e?”

“Yes; I rather think he is coming to consult me professi on all y. I think
that I recognise the symp tom s. Ha! did I not tell you?” As he spoke,
the man, puff ing and blow ing, rushed at our door and pulled at our bell
until the whole house res ounded with the cl ang ing.

A few moments later he was in our room, still puff ing, still
g esti cul at ing, but with so fixed a look of grief and des pair in his
eyes that our smi les were turned in an instant to horror and p ity. For
a while he could not get his words out, but s way ed his body and pl ucked
at his hair like one who has been driven to the extreme lim its of his
reason. Then, suddenly spr inging to his feet, he beat his head against
the wall with such force that we both rushed upon him and tore him away
to the centre of the room. Sherlock Holmes pushed him down into the
eas y- chair and, sitting beside him, pat ted his hand and cha tted with
him in the eas y, soothing t ones which he knew so well how to emplo y.

“You have come to me to tell your story, have you not ?” said he. “You
are f ati gu ed with your hast e. Pray wait until you have recovered
yourself, and then I shall be most happy to look into any little
problem which you may sub mit to me.”

The man sat for a minute or more with a hea ving ch est, fi gh ting against
his e mo tion. Then he passed his handkerchief over his br ow, set his
lips ti ght, and turned his face towards us.

“No doubt you think me ma d?” said he.

“I see that you have had some great trouble ,” respon ded Holmes.

“God knows I ha ve !— a trouble which is enough to un seat my reason, so
sudden and so terrible is it. P u b lic disgrac e I might have faced,
although I am a man whose character has never yet borne a stain .
P ri v ate aff lic tion also is the lot of every man; but the two coming
together, and in so fright ful a form, have been enough to shake my very
soul. Besides, it is not I alone. The very noble st in the land may
suff er unless some way be found out of this horrible affair .”

“Pray com pose yourself, sir,” said Holmes, “and let me have a clear
account of who you are and what it is that has be fallen you.”

“My name,” answered our visitor, “is probably familiar to your ears. I
am A le xander Holder, of the ban king firm of Hol der & St even son, of
Th read needle Street.”

The name was indeed well known to us as belong ing to the sen i or partner
in the second largest private ban king concer n in the City of London.
What could have happened, then, to bring one of the fore most c iti z ens
of London to this most pitiable pas s? We wait ed, all curiosit y, until
with another effort he br ac ed himself to tell his story.

“I feel that time is of valu e,” said he; “that is why I hast ened here
when the police inspector suggested that I should secure your
co- oper ation. I came to Baker Street by the Un der ground and hurried
from there on foot, for the cab s go slowly through this s now. That is
why I was so out of breath, for I am a man who takes very little
exer ci se. I feel better now, and I will put the facts before you as
shortly and yet as clearly as I can.

“It is, of course, well known to you that in a success ful ban king
business as much depen ds upon our being able to find re mun er ative
invest ments for our fun ds as upon our incre as ing our connection and the
number of our depos itor s. One of our most lu cr ative means of laying out
money is in the shape of lo ans, where the security is un im peac hab le. We
have done a good deal in this direction during the last few years, and
there are many noble families to whom we have advan ced large su ms upon
the security of their picture s, libr ari es, or pl ate.

“Y ester day morning I was seated in my office at the bank when a card
was brought in to me by one of the cler ks. I started when I saw the
name, for it was that of none other than —well, perhaps even to you I
had better say no more than that it was a name which is a house hold
word all over the earth —one of the high est, noble st, most ex al ted names
in England. I was over w hel med by the honour and attemp ted, when he
entered, to say so, but he plun ged at once into business with the air
of a man who wi shes to hurry quickly through a disa gre e able t as k.

“‘ Mr. Holder ,’ said he, ‘I have been informed that you are in the habit
of advan cing mone y.’

“‘The firm does so when the security is goo d.’ I answered.

“‘It is absolutely essential to me,’ said he, ‘ that I should have £
5 0,000 at once. I could, of course, borrow so trifling a sum ten times
over from my friends, but I much prefer to make it a matter of business
and to carry out that business myself. In my position you can readily
understand that it is un wise to place one’s self under obli g ation s.’

“‘ For how long, may I as k, do you want this sum ?’ I asked.

“‘ Next Monday I have a large sum due to me, and I shall then most
certainly re pay what you advan ce, with whatever interest you think it
right to char ge. But it is very essential to me that the money should
be paid at on ce .’

“‘I should be happy to advance it without further par le y from my own
private pur se ,’ said I, ‘ were it not that the strain would be rather
more than it could be ar. I f, on the other hand, I am to do it in the
name of the firm, then in justice to my partner I must insi st that,
even in your case, every business like precaution should be ta ken .’

“‘I should much prefer to have it so ,’ said he, raising up a s quare,
black mor oc co case which he had laid beside his chair. ‘You have
doubt less heard of the Ber y l Cor one t ?’

“‘ One of the most precious public possessi ons of the em pi re ,’ said I.

“‘ Pre ci sel y.’ He opened the case, and there, imbe dded in soft,
fle sh- coloured vel ve t, lay the magni fi cent piece of je well ery which he
had na med. ‘There are thirty- nine enormous bery l s ,’ said he, ‘and the
price of the gold chasing is in calcul able. The low est est im ate would
put the worth of the coronet at double the sum which I have asked. I am
prepar ed to leave it with you as my secur it y.’

“I took the precious case into my hands and looked in some perplex ity
from it to my ill u stri ous client.

“‘You doubt its valu e ?’ he asked.

“‘ Not at all. I only doub t— ’

“‘The propri ety of my leaving it. You may set your mind at rest about
that. I should not dream of doing so were it not absolutely certain
that I should be able in four days to re claim it. It is a p ure matter
of form. Is the security suffici ent ?’

“‘ A mp le .’

“‘You understand, Mr. Holder, that I am giving you a strong proof of
the confidence which I have in you, founded upon all that I have heard
of you. I rely upon you not only to be discre et and to re fra in from all
gossi p upon the matter but, above all, to preserve this coronet with
every possible precaution because I need not say that a great public
scandal would be caused if any harm were to be fall it. Any inj ury to it
would be almost as serious as its complete lo ss, for there are no
bery ls in the world to mat ch the se, and it would be impossible to
replace them. I leave it with you, however, with every confid ence, and
I shall call for it in person on Monday morn ing .’

“S ee ing that my client was anxious to leave, I said no more but,
calling for my cas hi er, I ordered him to pay over fifty £ 1000 not es.
When I was alone once more, however, with the precious case lying upon
the table in front of me, I could not but think with some mis gi v ings of
the immense responsi bility which it ent a iled upon me. There could be no
doubt that, as it was a national possessi on, a horrible scandal would
en sue if any misfortune should occur to it. I already regre tted having
ever con sent ed to take charge of it. However, it was too late to alter
the matter now, so I locked it up in my private safe and turned once
more to my work.

“When evening came I felt that it would be an imp ru dence to leave so
precious a thing in the office behind me. B an ker s’ sa f es had been
forced before now, and why should not mine be? If so, how terrible
would be the position in which I should find myself ! I determin ed,
therefore, that for the next few days I would always carry the case
backward and forward with me, so that it might never be really out of
my reach. With this inten tion, I called a cab and drove out to my house
at Streath am , carrying the jewe l with me. I did not breathe freely
until I had taken it upstairs and locked it in the bureau of my
dressing- room.

“And now a word as to my househol d, Mr. Holmes, for I wish you to
thoroughly understand the situation. My g room and my page sleep out of
the house, and may be set aside al together. I have three ma i d- servants
who have been with me a number of years and whose absolute reli ability
is quite above suspici on. An other, L u cy P arr , the second wait ing- maid,
has only been in my service a few months. She came with an excellent
character, however, and has always given me satisfac tion. She is a very
pretty girl and has attracted admir ers who have occasionally hung about
the place. That is the only draw back which we have found to her, but we
believe her to be a thoroughly good girl in every way.

“So much for the servan ts. My family itself is so small that it will
not take me long to descri be it. I am a widow er and have an only son,
Arthur . He has been a disap pointment to me, Mr. Holmes —a griev ous
disappoint ment. I have no doubt that I am myself to bla me. People tell
me that I have spoiled him. Very likely I ha ve. When my dear wife died
I felt that he was all I had to lo ve. I could not bear to see the smile
fa de even for a moment from his face. I have never denied him a wish .
Perhaps it would have been better for both of us had I been ster ner,
but I meant it for the best.

“It was naturally my intention that he should succeed me in my
business, but he was not of a business turn. He was wild, way ward, and,
to speak the truth, I could not trust him in the handling of large su ms
of money. When he was young he became a member of an aristo cr atic clu b,
and there, having charming manner s, he was soon the intimate of a
number of men with long pur ses and expensive habits. He learned to play
heavily at cards and to squ ander money on the tur f, until he had again
and again to come to me and impl ore me to give him an advance upon his
allow ance, that he might settle his deb ts of hon our. He tried more than
once to break away from the dangerous company which he was keep ing, but
each time the influence of his friend, Sir George Burn well, was enough
to draw him back again.

“ And, indeed, I could not wonder that such a man as Sir George Burnwell
should gain an influence over him, for he has frequently brought him to
my house, and I have found myself that I could hardly resi st the
fascin ation of his manner. He is older than Arthur , a man of the world
to his finger- ti ps, one who had been everywher e, seen everything, a
brilliant talk er, and a man of great personal beaut y. Yet when I think
of him in cold bloo d, far away from the gla m our of his pres ence, I am
convinced from his cy ni cal speech and the look which I have caught in
his eyes that he is one who should be deeply di stru sted. So I think,
and so, too, thinks my little Mary, who has a woman’s quick in sight
into character.

“And now there is only she to be descri bed. She is my ni e ce; but when
my brother died five years ago and left her alone in the world I
ado p ted her, and have looked upon her ever since as my daugh ter. She is
a sun be am in my house — swe et, lo v ing, beautiful, a wonderful manager and
house keeper, yet as ten der and quiet and gentle as a woman could be.
She is my right hand. I do not know what I could do without her. In
only one matter has she ever gone against my wish es. Twice my boy has
asked her to marry him, for he lo ves her devo te d ly, but each time she
has refused him. I think that if anyone could have drawn him into the
right path it would have been she, and that his marriage might have
changed his whole life; but now, al as ! it is too lat e— forever too lat e!

“Now, Mr. Holmes, you know the people who live under my roof, and I
shall continue with my miserable story.

“When we were taking coffee in the draw ing-room that night after
dinner, I told Arthur and Mary my experience, and of the precious
treas ure which we had under our roof, sup pressing only the name of my
client. L u cy P arr , who had brought in the coffee, had, I am sure, left
the room ; but I cannot swear that the door was clo sed. Mary and Arthur
were much interested and wished to see the fa mous coronet, but I
thought it better not to disturb it.

“‘Where have you put it ?’ asked Arthur .

“‘ In my own bureau .’

“‘Well, I hope to goodness the house won’t be bur g led during the
night .’ said he.

“‘It is locked up ,’ I answered.

“‘Oh, any old key will fit that bureau . When I was a young ster I have
opened it myself with the key of the box - room cup board .’

“He often had a wild way of talking, so that I thought little of what
he said. He followed me to my room, however, that night with a very
grave face.

“‘ Look here, da d ,’ said he with his eyes cast down, ‘ can you let me
have £ 2 00 ?’

“‘No, I can not !’ I answered shar pl y. ‘I have been far too generous with
you in money matter s.’

“‘You have been very kind ,’ said he, ‘but I must have this money, or
else I can never show my face inside the club again .’

“‘And a very good thing, too !’ I cried.

“‘Yes, but you would not have me leave it a dishon oured man ,’ said he.
‘I could not bear the disgrac e. I must raise the money in some way, and
if you will not let me have it, then I must try other mean s.’

“I was very angry, for this was the third dem and during the mon th. ‘You
shall not have a far thing from me,’ I cried, on which he bowed and left
the room without another word.

“When he was gone I unlocked my bureau, made sure that my treas ure was
safe, and locked it again. Then I started to go round the house to see
that all was sec ure —a duty which I usually leave to Mary but which I
thought it well to per form myself that night. As I came down the stairs
I saw Mary herself at the side window of the ha ll, which she closed and
fastened as I approa ched.

“‘ Tell me, da d ,’ said she, looking, I thought, a little distur bed, ‘ did
you give L u c y, the maid, leave to go out to-night ?’

“‘C ertain ly not .’

“‘ She came in just now by the back door. I have no doubt that she has
only been to the side g ate to see some one, but I think that it is
hardly safe and should be stop pe d.’

“‘You must speak to her in the morning, or I will if you prefer it. Are
you sure that everything is fast en ed ?’

“‘ Quite sure, da d.’

“‘ Then, good- night .’ I kissed her and went up to my bedroom again,
where I was soon asleep.

“I am endeavouring to tell you everything, Mr. Holmes, which may have
any bearing upon the case, but I beg that you will question me upon any
point which I do not make clear .”

“On the contrary, your statement is sing ul arly lu ci d.”

“I come to a part of my story now in which I should wish to be
particularly so. I am not a very heavy sleep er, and the anxiety in my
mind ten ded, no doubt, to make me even less so than usual. About two in
the morning, then, I was awa k ened by some sound in the house. It had
ceased ere I was wide awa ke, but it had left an impression behind it as
though a window had gently closed somewher e. I lay listening with all
my ears. Suddenly, to my horr or, there was a distinct sound of
foot steps moving sof tly in the next room. I slipped out of bed, all
pal pit ating with fear, and peeped round the corner of my dress ing-room
door.

“‘ Arthur !’ I screa med, ‘you villain ! you thief ! How dare you touch that
corone t ?’

“The gas was half up, as I had left it, and my unhappy boy, dressed
only in his shirt and trousers, was standing beside the light, holding
the coronet in his hands. He appeared to be wr en ching at it, or bending
it with all his streng th. At my cry he dropped it from his grasp and
turned as pale as death. I snatched it up and examined it. One of the
gold corner s, with three of the bery ls in it, was missing.

“‘You black guard !’ I shouted, beside myself with ra ge. ‘You have
destro yed it! You have dishon oured me for ever ! Where are the jewe ls
which you have stol en ?’

“‘ St ol en !’ he cried.

“‘Yes, thief !’ I ro ar ed, shaking him by the shoulder.

“‘ There are none missing. There cannot be any mis sing ,’ said he.

“‘ There are three missing. And you know where they are. M ust I call you
a liar as well as a thief ? Did I not see you trying to tear off another
pie ce ?’

“‘You have called me names enough ,’ said he, ‘I will not stand it any
longer. I shall not say another word about this business, since you
have cho s en to in sult me. I will leave your house in the morning and
make my own way in the worl d.’

“‘You shall leave it in the hands of the police !’ I cried half- mad with
grief and ra ge. ‘I shall have this matter pro bed to the bott om .’

“‘You shall learn nothing from me,’ said he with a passion such as I
should not have thought was in his nature. ‘ If you choose to call the
police, let the police find what they can .’

“By this time the whole house was ast ir, for I had raised my voice in
my ang er. Mary was the first to rush into my room, and, at the sight of
the coronet and of Arthur ’s face, she read the whole story and, with a
screa m, fell down sen seless on the ground. I sent the house maid for the
police and put the investigation into their hands at once. When the
inspector and a con stable entered the house, Arthur , who had stood
su ll enly with his arms fol ded, asked me whether it was my intention to
charge him with the f t. I answered that it had ceased to be a private
matter, but had become a public one, since the ru ined coronet was
national proper ty. I was determined that the law should have its way in
everything.

“‘ At least ,’ said he, ‘you will not have me arrested at once. It would
be to your advantage as well as mine if I might leave the house for
five minut es.’

“‘That you may get away, or perhaps that you may conceal what you have
stol en ,’ said I. And then, reali sing the dreadful position in which I
was plac ed, I impl or ed him to remember that not only my honour but that
of one who was far greater than I was at sta ke ; and that he threatened
to raise a scandal which would convul se the n ation. He might aver t it
all if he would but tell me what he had done with the three missing
st ones.

“‘You may as well face the matter ,’ said I; ‘you have been caught in
the ac t, and no conf ession could make your guil t more he in ous. If you
but make such re par ation as is in your pow er, by telling us where the
bery ls are, all shall be for given and forgo tten .’

“‘ Keep your for gi ven ess for those who ask for it ,’ he answered, turning
away from me with a sne er. I saw that he was too hardened for any words
of mine to influence him. There was but one way for it. I called in the
inspector and gave him into cu sto d y. A search was made at once not only
of his person but of his room and of every portion of the house where
he could possibly have conce aled the gem s; but no trace of them could
be found, nor would the wre t ched boy open his mouth for all our
persu as i ons and our threat s. This morning he was removed to a ce ll, and
I, after going through all the police form al iti es, have hurried round
to you to impl ore you to use your skill in un ra ve lling the matter. The
police have op enly conf essed that they can at present make nothing of
it. You may go to any expense which you think necess ary. I have already
offered a reward of £ 100 0 . My God, what shall I do ! I have lost my
hon our, my gem s, and my son in one night. Oh, what shall I do !”

He put a hand on either side of his head and ro cked himself to and fro ,
dr oning to himself like a child whose grief has got beyond words.

Sherlock Holmes sat silent for some few minutes, with his br ows kn itted
and his eyes fixed upon the fire.

“Do you receive much company ?” he asked.

“None save my partner with his family and an occasional friend of
Arthur ’ s. Sir George Burnwell has been several times lately. No one
else, I think.”

“Do you go out much in societ y?”

“A r th ur do es. Mary and I stay at home. We neither of us care for it.”

“That is unusual in a young girl .”

“She is of a quiet nature. Besides, she is not so very youn g. She is
four -and- twent y.”

“This matter, from what you say, seems to have been a shock to her
al so.”

“T er ri ble ! She is even more affe cted than I.”

“You have neither of you any doubt as to your son’s guil t?”

“How can we have when I saw him with my own eyes with the coronet in
his hands.”

“I hardly consider that a concl usi ve proof . Was the remain der of the
coronet at all inj ure d?”

“Yes, it was twi st ed.”

“Do you not think, then, that he might have been trying to straight en
it?”

“God bless you! You are doing what you can for him and for me. But it
is too heavy a t as k. What was he doing there at all ? If his purpose
were innocent, why did he not say so?”

“Precisely. And if it were guil ty, why did he not invent a li e? His
silence appears to me to cut both ways. There are several singular
points about the case. What did the police think of the noise which
aw oke you from your sleep ?”

“They considered that it might be caused by Arthur ’s closing his
bedroom door.”

“A likely stor y! As if a man bent on fel ony would slam his door so as
to wake a househol d. What did they say, then, of the disappearance of
these gem s?”

“They are still soun ding the plan king and prob ing the furniture in the
hope of finding them.”

“Have they thought of looking outside the house ?”

“Yes, they have shown extraordinary energ y. The whole garden has
already been min utely examin ed.”

“Now, my dear sir,” said Holmes, “is it not obvious to you now that
this matter really strikes very much deep er than either you or the
police were at first inclined to think ? It appeared to you to be a
simple case ; to me it seems exceedingly complex . Con si der what is
inv ol ved by your theor y. You suppose that your son came down from his
bed, went, at great ris k, to your dressing- room, opened your bureau,
took out your coronet, broke off by main force a small portion of it,
went off to some other place, conce aled three gems out of the
thirty- n ine, with such skill that nobody can find them, and then
returned with the other thirty- six into the room in which he exposed
himself to the greatest danger of being discover ed. I ask you now, is
such a theory ten able ?”

“But what other is there?” cried the banker with a gest ure of des pa ir.
“If his moti ves were innocent, why does he not explain them?”

“It is our task to find that out ,” re plied Holmes; “ so now, if you
please, Mr. Holder, we will set off for Streath am together, and devo te
an hour to glancing a little more closely into detail s.”

My friend insi sted upon my ac company ing them in their exped ition, which
I was eager enough to do, for my curiosity and sympathy were deeply
stirred by the story to which we had listened. I confess that the guil t
of the ban ker’s son appeared to me to be as obvious as it did to his
unhappy father, but still I had such faith in Holmes’ judgment that I
felt that there must be some grounds for hope as long as he was
dis satisfied with the accepted explanation. He hardly spoke a word the
whole way out to the sou thern su bur b, but sat with his chin upon his
breast and his hat drawn over his eyes, sunk in the deepest thought.
Our client appeared to have taken fresh heart at the little glimpse of
hope which had been presented to him, and he even broke into a
des ul tor y c hat with me over his business affair s. A short rail way
journey and a shor ter walk brought us to F air bank, the mo dest resid ence
of the great fin anci er.

F air bank was a good- si zed square house of white stone, standing back a
little from the road. A double carri ag e- sweep , with a s now - clad lawn,
stretched down in front to two large iron g ates which closed the
entr ance. On the right side was a small wooden thick et, which led into
a narrow path between two neat he dg es stretching from the road to the
kitchen door, and forming the trades men’s entr ance. On the left ran a
lane which led to the stab les, and was not itself within the grounds at
all, being a public, though little u sed, thorough far e. Holmes left us
standing at the door and walked slowly all round the house, across the
front, down the trades men’s path, and so round by the garden behind
into the stable lane. So long was he that Mr. Hol der and I went into
the dining-room and waited by the fire until he should retur n. We were
sitting there in silence when the door opened and a young lady came in.
She was rather above the middle he ight, sli m, with dark hair and eyes,
which seemed the dar ker against the absolute pa ll or of her sk in. I do
not think that I have ever seen such deadly pal eness in a woman’s face.
Her lips, too, were blood less, but her eyes were flushed with crying.
As she swept sil ently into the room she impressed me with a greater
sense of grief than the banker had done in the morning, and it was the
more striking in her as she was evidently a woman of strong character,
with immense cap ac ity for self- re stra in t. D is regard ing my pres ence, she
went straight to her uncle and passed her hand over his head with a
sweet woman ly car ess.

“You have given orders that Arthur should be liber ated, have you not,
da d?” she asked.

“No, no, my girl, the matter must be pro bed to the bott om.”

“But I am so sure that he is innoc ent. You know what woman’s instin cts
are. I know that he has done no harm and that you will be sorry for
having acted so har sh ly.”

“Why is he silent, then, if he is innocent ?”

“Who know s? Perhaps because he was so angry that you should suspe ct
him.”

“How could I help suspe cting him, when I actually saw him with the
coronet in his hand ?”

“Oh, but he had only picked it up to look at it. Oh, do, do take my
word for it that he is innoc ent. Let the matter drop and say no more.
It is so dreadful to think of our dear Arthur in prison !”

“I shall never let it drop until the gems are found — n ever, Mar y! Your
affe ction for Arthur blinds you as to the awful consequ ences to me. F ar
from hus hing the thing up, I have brought a gentleman down from London
to inquire more deeply into it.”

“This gentle man ?” she asked, fac ing round to me.

“No, his friend. He wished us to leave him alone. He is round in the
stable lane now.”

“The stable lan e?” She raised her dark eyebr ows. “What can he hope to
find there? A h! this, I suppo se, is he. I trust, sir, that you will
succeed in pro v ing, what I feel sure is the truth, that my cousin
Arthur is innocent of this crime.”

“I fully share your opinion, and I trust, with you, that we may prove
it,” returned Holmes, going back to the m at to knock the snow from his
sho es. “I believe I have the honour of addres sing Miss Mary Holder.
Might I ask you a question or two ?”

“Pray do, sir, if it may help to clear this horrible affair up.”

“You heard nothing yourself last night?”

“Noth ing, until my uncle here began to speak lou dly. I heard that, and
I came down.”

“You shut up the windows and doors the night before. Did you fast en all
the window s?”

“Yes.”

“W ere they all fastened this morn ing?”

“Yes.”

“You have a maid who has a swee the ar t? I think that you remarked to
your uncle last night that she had been out to see him?”

“Yes, and she was the girl who waited in the draw ing-room, and who may
have heard uncle’s remarks about the corone t.”

“I see. You in fer that she may have gone out to tell her swee the art,
and that the two may have planned the robber y.”

“But what is the good of all these vague theor i es,” cried the banker
impati ent ly, “when I have told you that I saw Arthur with the coronet
in his hand s?”

“W a it a little, Mr. Holder. We must come back to that. About this girl,
Miss Holder. You saw her return by the kitchen door, I presume?”

“Yes; when I went to see if the door was fastened for the night I met
her slipping in. I saw the man, too, in the glo om.”

“Do you know him?”

“Oh, y es! he is the gre eng ro cer who br ings our ve get ables r ound. His
name is Franc is Pro sper .”

“He stoo d,” said Holmes, “to the left of the door —that is to say,
farther up the path than is necessary to reach the door ?”

“Yes, he did.”

“And he is a man with a wooden leg ?”

Some thing like fear sprang up in the young lady’s expressi ve black
eyes. “Why, you are like a magici an ,” said she. “How do you know that?”
She smi led, but there was no answer ing smile in Holmes’ thin, eager
face.

“I should be very glad now to go up stair s,” said he. “I shall probably
wish to go over the outside of the house again. Perhaps I had better
take a look at the lower windows before I go up.”

He walked swiftly round from one to the other, pa using only at the
large one which looked from the hall onto the stable lane. This he
opened and made a very careful examination of the sill with his
powerful magni fying len s. “Now we shall go up stair s,” said he at last.

The ban ker’s dress ing-room was a plainly furnished little cham ber, with
a grey carpe t, a large bureau, and a long mir r or. Holmes went to the
bureau first and looked hard at the lo ck.

“Which key was used to open it?” he asked.

“That which my son himself indicat ed —that of the cup board of the
lumber- room.”

“Have you it here?”

“That is it on the dressing- t able.”

Sherlock Holmes took it up and opened the bureau .

“It is a noi seless lock ,” said he. “It is no wonder that it did not
wake you. This case, I presu me, con tains the corone t. We must have a
look at it.” He opened the case, and taking out the dia dem he laid it
upon the table. It was a magni fi cent spec im en of the je well er’s art,
and the thirty- six stones were the fin est that I have ever seen. At one
side of the coronet was a crac ked ed ge, where a corner holding three
gems had been torn away.

“Now, Mr. Holder ,” said Holmes, “ here is the corner which correspon ds
to that which has been so un fortunately lost. Might I beg that you will
break it off.”

The banker reco iled in horr or. “I should not dream of tr y ing,” said he.

“Then I will .” Holmes suddenly bent his strength upon it, but without
result. “I feel it give a litt le ,” said he; “ but, though I am
excepti on ally strong in the fing ers, it would take me all my time to
break it. An ordinary man could not do it. Now, what do you think would
happen if I did break it, Mr. Holder ? There would be a noise like a
pistol shot. Do you tell me that all this happened within a few yards
of your bed and that you heard nothing of it?”

“I do not know what to think. It is all dark to me.”

“But perhaps it may grow ligh ter as we go. What do you think, Miss
Holder ?”

“I confess that I still share my uncle’s perplex it y.”

“Your son had no shoes or slipper s on when you saw him?”

“He had nothing on save only his trouser s and shir t.”

“Thank you. We have certainly been fav oured with extraordinary luck
during this inquiry, and it will be entirely our own fault if we do not
succeed in clearing the matter up. With your per mission, Mr. Holder, I
shall now continue my investig ations out side.”

He went alone, at his own request, for he explained that any
un necessary foot marks might make his task more difficul t. For an hour
or more he was at work, returning at last with his feet heavy with snow
and his features as in sc r ut able as ever.

“I think that I have seen now all that there is to see, Mr. Holder ,”
said he; “I can serve you best by returning to my room s.”

“But the gem s, Mr. Holmes. Where are they?”

“I cannot tell.”

The banker wr ung his hands. “I shall never see them again !” he cried.
“And my son ? You give me hop es?”

“My opinion is in no way alter ed.”

“Then, for Go d’s sake, what was this dark business which was acted in
my house last night?”

“If you can call upon me at my Baker Street rooms to-morrow morning
between nine and ten I shall be happy to do what I can to make it
clear er. I understand that you give me car te bl anc he to act for you,
provided only that I get back the gem s, and that you place no lim it on
the sum I may draw .”

“I would give my fortune to have them back.”

“Very good. I shall look into the matter between this and then.
Good- b ye ; it is just possible that I may have to come over here again
before evening.”

It was obvious to me that my companion ’s mind was now made up about the
case, although what his conclusions were was more than I could even
dimly imagine. S ever al times during our home ward journey I endeavoured
to sound him upon the point, but he always glided away to some other
top ic, until at last I gave it over in des pa ir. It was not yet three
when we found ourselves in our rooms once more. He hurried to his
chamber and was down again in a few minutes dressed as a common loaf er.
With his collar turned up, his shin y, see dy coat, his red crav at, and
his worn boots, he was a perfect sa mp le of the clas s.

“I think that this should do,” said he, glancing into the glass above
the fire place. “I only wish that you could come with me, Watson, but I
fear that it won’t do. I may be on the tra il in this matter, or I may
be following a will - o’ - the - wi sp , but I shall soon know which it is. I
hope that I may be back in a few hour s.” He cut a sli ce of be ef from
the jo int upon the sideboard, sand wi ched it between two r ounds of
brea d, and th ru sting this ru de meal into his pocket he started off upon
his exped ition.

I had just finished my te a when he returned, evidently in excellent
spirit s, swinging an old ela stic - sid ed boot in his hand. He chuck ed it
down into a corner and helped himself to a cup of te a.

“I only looked in as I pas se d,” said he. “I am going right on.”

“Where to?”

“Oh, to the other side of the W est En d. It may be some time before I
get back. Don’t wait up for me in case I should be lat e.”

“How are you getting on?”

“Oh, so so. Nothing to compla in of. I have been out to Streath am since
I saw you last, but I did not call at the house. It is a very sweet
little problem, and I would not have missed it for a good de al.
However, I must not sit gossi ping here, but must get these dis reput able
clothes off and return to my high ly respectable self.”

I could see by his manner that he had strong er reasons for satisfaction
than his words alone would impl y. His eyes twink led, and there was even
a touch of colour upon his sallow chee ks. He hast ened upstairs, and a
few minutes later I heard the slam of the hall door, which told me that
he was off once more upon his con genial hun t.

I waited until midnight, but there was no sign of his retur n, so I
retired to my room. It was no uncommon thing for him to be away for
days and nights on end when he was hot upon a sc ent, so that his
lat eness caused me no surprise. I do not know at what hour he came in,
but when I came down to breakfast in the morning there he was with a
cup of coffee in one hand and the paper in the other, as fresh and tri m
as possible.

“You will excuse my beginning without you, Watson,” said he, “but you
remember that our client has rather an early appointment this morning.”

“Why, it is after nine now,” I answered. “I should not be surprised if
that were he. I thought I heard a r ing.”

It was, indeed, our friend the fin anci er. I was sho cked by the change
which had come over him, for his face which was naturally of a broad
and massive m oul d, was now pin ched and fallen in, while his hair seemed
to me at least a shade whi ter. He entered with a we ar iness and le th ar g y
which was even more painful than his violence of the morning before,
and he dropped heavily into the armchair which I pushed forward for
him.

“I do not know what I have done to be so sever ely tri ed,” said he.
“Only two days ago I was a happy and pro sper ous man, without a care in
the world. Now I am left to a lonely and dishon oured age. One sor row
comes close upon the heels of another. My ni ec e, Mary, has deserted
me.”

“D es er ted you?”

“Yes. Her bed this morning had not been slept in, her room was emp ty,
and a note for me lay upon the hall table. I had said to her last
night, in sor row and not in ang er, that if she had married my boy all
might have been well with him. Perhaps it was thought less of me to say
so. It is to that remark that she ref ers in this note :

“‘ M Y DEAR ES T UN C LE , —I feel that I have brought trouble upon you,
and that if I had acted differ ently this terrible misfortune might
never have occurred. I cannot, with this thought in my mind, ever
again be happy under your roof, and I feel that I must leave you
forever. Do not worry about my fut ure, for that is provided for ;
and, above all, do not search for me, for it will be fr u it less
lab our and an ill- service to me. In life or in death, I am ever
your lo v ing,


“‘ MAR Y .’


“What could she mean by that note, Mr. Holmes ? Do you think it points
to suici de ?”

“No, no, nothing of the kind. It is perhaps the best possible solu tion.
I trust, Mr. Holder, that you are ne aring the end of your trouble s.”

“Ha! You say so! You have heard something, Mr. Holmes; you have learned
some thing ! Where are the gem s?”

“You would not think £ 1000 apiece an exc essive sum for them?”

“I would pay ten .”

“That would be un necess ary. Three thousand will cover the matter. And
there is a little reward, I fanc y. Have you your che qu e- book ? Here is a
pen . Bet ter make it out for £ 4 00 0.”

With a da zed face the banker made out the required che ck. Holmes walked
over to his des k, took out a little tri ang ular piece of gold with three
gems in it, and threw it down upon the table.

With a shrie k of joy our client clutched it up.

“You have it!” he gasped. “I am sav ed! I am sav ed !”

The re action of joy was as passi on ate as his grief had been, and he
hugged his recovered gems to his bo som .

“There is one other thing you ow e, Mr. Holder ,” said Sherlock Holmes
rather ster n ly.

“O we !” He caught up a pen . “N ame the su m, and I will pay it.”

“No, the deb t is not to me. You owe a very humble apology to that noble
la d, your son, who has carried himself in this matter as I should be
proud to see my own son do, should I ever chance to have one.”

“Then it was not Arthur who took them?”

“I told you yesterday, and I repe at to-day, that it was not.”

“You are sure of it! Then let us hurry to him at once to let him know
that the truth is kn own.”

“He knows it al ready. When I had cleared it all up I had an inter view
with him, and finding that he would not tell me the story, I told it to
him, on which he had to confess that I was right and to ad d the very
few details which were not yet quite clear to me. Your news of this
morning, however, may open his lip s.”

“For Hea ven ’s sake, tell me, then, what is this extraordinary myster y!”

“I will do so, and I will show you the steps by which I reached it. And
let me say to you, first, that which it is hard est for me to say and
for you to hear : there has been an under standing between Sir George
Burnwell and your niece Mar y. They have now fled toge ther.”

“My Mar y? Im possible !”

“It is un fortunately more than possible ; it is certain . N either you nor
your son knew the true character of this man when you ad mitted him into
your family circle . He is one of the most dangerous men in England —a
ru ined gam bl er, an absolutely desper ate villain , a man without heart or
consci ence. Your niece knew nothing of such men. When he brea thed his
v ows to her, as he had done to a hundred before her, she fl attered
herself that she alone had touched his heart. The devil knows best what
he said, but at least she became his too l and was in the habit of
seeing him nearly every evening.”

“I cannot, and I will not, believe it!” cried the banker with an ash en
face.

“I will tell you, then, what occurred in your house last night. Your
ni ec e, when you had, as she thought, gone to your room, slipped down
and talked to her lover through the window which leads into the stable
lane. His foot marks had pressed right through the s now, so long had he
stood there. She told him of the corone t. His wicked l ust for gold
kind led at the new s, and he bent her to his will. I have no doubt that
she loved you, but there are women in whom the love of a lover
ex ting u is hes all other lo ves, and I think that she must have been one.
She had hardly listened to his instru ctions when she saw you coming
down stairs, on which she closed the window rapidly and told you about
one of the servan t s’ esca pa de with her wood en- legged lo ver, which was
all perfectly true.

“Your boy, Arthur , went to bed after his inter view with you but he
slept bad ly on account of his uneas iness about his club deb ts. In the
middle of the night he heard a soft t read pass his door, so he rose
and, looking out, was surprised to see his cousin walking very
steal thi ly along the passage until she disappeared into your
dressing- room. P et ri fied with astonishment, the lad slipped on some
clothes and waited there in the dark to see what would come of this
strange affa ir. Pres ently she emerged from the room again, and in the
light of the passa ge - lamp your son saw that she carried the precious
coronet in her hands. She passed down the stairs, and he, thri lling
with horr or, ran along and slipped behind the curtain near your door,
whence he could see what passed in the hall benea th. He saw her
steal thi ly open the window, hand out the coronet to someone in the
gloom, and then closing it once more hurry back to her room, passing
quite close to where he stood hid behind the curtain .

“As long as she was on the scene he could not take any action without a
horrible ex pos ure of the woman whom he lo ved. But the instant that she
was gone he reali sed how cr ushing a misfortune this would be for you,
and how all- important it was to set it right. He rushed down, just as
he was, in his bare feet, opened the window, sprang out into the s now,
and ran down the lan e, where he could see a dark figure in the
moon light. Sir George Burnwell tried to get away, but Arthur caught
him, and there was a strugg le between them, your lad tu gging at one
side of the coronet, and his op pon ent at the other. In the sc uff le,
your son struck Sir George and cut him over the eye. Then something
suddenly sna p ped, and your son, finding that he had the coronet in his
hands, rushed back, closed the window, ascen ded to your room, and had
just observed that the coronet had been twisted in the strugg le and was
endeavouring to straight en it when you appeared upon the scen e.”

“Is it possible ?” gas ped the bank er.

“You then roused his anger by calling him names at a moment when he
felt that he had deser ved your warm est than ks. He could not explain the
true state of affairs without bet ra ying one who certainly deser ved
little enough consideration at his hands. He took the more chi val r ous
view, however, and pre served her secre t.”

“And that was why she shrie ked and fainted when she saw the corone t,”
cried Mr. Holder. “Oh, my God! what a blind fool I have be en! And his
asking to be allowed to go out for five minut es! The dear fellow wanted
to see if the missing piece were at the scene of the strugg le. How
cru e lly I have mis judged him!”

“When I arrived at the house ,” continued Holmes, “I at once went very
carefully round it to observe if there were any traces in the snow
which might help me. I knew that none had fallen since the evening
before, and also that there had been a strong fro st to preserve
impressi ons. I passed along the trades men’s path, but found it all
tra m pled down and indi st ingu is hab le. Just beyond it, however, at the
far side of the kitchen door, a woman had stood and talked with a man,
whose round impressi ons on one side showed that he had a wooden leg. I
could even tell that they had been distur bed, for the woman had run
back swiftly to the door, as was shown by the deep to e and light he el
mar ks, while W oo den - leg had waited a little, and then had gone away. I
thought at the time that this might be the maid and her swee the art, of
whom you had already spoken to me, and inquiry showed it was so. I
passed round the garden without seeing anything more than r and om
track s, which I took to be the poli ce; but when I got into the stable
lane a very long and comple x story was written in the snow in front of
me.

“There was a double line of tracks of a boo ted man, and a second double
line which I saw with de light belonged to a man with na ked fe et. I was
at once convinced from what you had told me that the latter was your
son. The first had walked both ways, but the other had run swif tly, and
as his t read was marked in places over the de pression of the boo t, it
was obvious that he had passed after the other. I followed them up and
found they led to the hall window, where Boots had worn all the snow
away while wait ing. Then I walked to the other end, which was a hundred
yards or more down the lane. I saw where Boots had faced round, where
the snow was cut up as though there had been a strugg le, and, finally,
where a few drops of blood had fall en, to show me that I was not
mista k en. Boots had then run down the lan e, and another little s mu dge
of blood showed that it was he who had been hurt. When he came to the
high road at the other end, I found that the pavement had been clear ed,
so there was an end to that clue.

“On entering the house, however, I examin ed, as you remember, the sill
and fra me work of the hall window with my len s, and I could at once see
that someone had passed out. I could distinguish the out line of an
in step where the wet foot had been placed in coming in. I was then
beginning to be able to form an opinion as to what had occurred. A man
had waited outside the window ; someone had brought the gem s; the deed
had been over seen by your son ; he had pur sued the thief ; had strugg led
with him; they had each tugged at the coronet, their un ited strength
ca using inju ries which neither alone could have effe cted. He had
returned with the pri ze, but had left a fra g ment in the grasp of his
op pon ent. So far I was clear. The question now was, who was the man, and
who was it brought him the corone t?

“It is an old ma x im of mine that when you have excl uded the im possible,
whatever remain s, how ever im prob able, must be the truth. Now, I knew
that it was not you who had brought it down, so there only remained
your niece and the maid s. But if it were the maid s, why should your son
allow himself to be acc used in their place? There could be no possible
reason. As he loved his cous in, however, there was an excellent
explanation why he should re tain her secret —the more so as the secret
was a disgrac eful one. When I remembered that you had seen her at that
window, and how she had fainted on seeing the coronet again, my
conjecture became a certainty.

“And who could it be who was her confeder at e? A lover evid ent ly, for
who else could out wei gh the love and grat itude which she must feel to
you? I knew that you went out little, and that your circle of friends
was a very limited one. But among them was Sir George Burn well. I had
heard of him before as being a man of evil reput ation among wom en. It
must have been he who wore those boots and retained the missing gem s.
Even though he knew that Arthur had discovered him, he might still
fl atter himself that he was safe, for the lad could not say a word
without comprom ising his own family.

“Well, your own good sense will suggest what meas ures I took nex t. I
went in the shape of a loaf er to Sir George ’s house, managed to pick up
an acquaintance with his va let, learned that his master had cut his
head the night before, and, finally, at the expense of six shi ll ings,
made all sure by bu ying a pair of his cast - off sho es. With these I
journe yed down to Streath am and saw that they exactly fitted the
track s.”

“I saw an ill- dressed vag ab ond in the lane yesterday even ing,” said Mr.
Holder.

“Precisely. It was I. I found that I had my man, so I came home and
changed my clothes. It was a delicate part which I had to play then,
for I saw that a pro secu tion must be avo ided to aver t scand al, and I
knew that so ast ute a vill ain would see that our hands were tied in the
matter. I went and saw him. At first, of course, he denied everything.
But when I gave him every particular that had occur red, he tried to
blu ster and took down a life - preser ver from the wall. I knew my man,
however, and I clapped a pistol to his head before he could stri ke.
Then he became a little more reason able. I told him that we would give
him a price for the stones he hel d— £ 1000 apiece. That brought out the
first signs of grief that he had sh own. ‘ Why, d ash it all !’ said he,
‘ I’ve let them go at six hundred for the thre e!’ I soon managed to get
the address of the recei ver who had them, on prom ising him that there
would be no pro secu tion. O ff I set to him, and after much cha ffer ing I
got our stones at £ 1000 apiece. Then I looked in upon your son, told
him that all was right, and eventually got to my bed about two o’clock,
after what I may call a really hard day ’s wor k.”

“A day which has saved England from a great public scand al ,” said the
bank er, ris ing. “S ir, I cannot find words to thank you, but you shall
not find me ungrateful for what you have done. Your skill has indeed
exceed ed all that I have heard of it. And now I must fly to my dear boy
to ap olo gi se to him for the wrong which I have done him. As to what you
tell me of poor Mary, it goes to my very heart. Not even your skill can
in form me where she is now.”

“I think that we may safely say ,” returned Holmes, “that she is
wherever Sir George Burnwell is. It is equally certain, too, that
whatever her sin s are, they will soon receive a more than sufficient
p uni sh ment.”




X II. THE ADVENTURE OF THE CO P PER BE E CH ES


“To the man who lo ves ar t for its own sa ke ,” remarked Sherlock Holmes,
tossing aside the advertisement sheet of The D ai ly T ele gra p h, “it is
frequently in its least important and low liest man i fe st ations that the
keenest pleasure is to be deri ved. It is pleasant to me to observe,
Watson, that you have so far grasped this truth that in these little
records of our cases which you have been good enough to draw up, and, I
am bound to say, occasionally to em be lli sh, you have given promin ence
not so much to the many cau ses c é l è bre s and sens ational tri als in
which I have fig ured but rather to those incidents which may have been
trivial in themsel ves, but which have given room for those fac ul ties of
deduction and of logi cal sy n th es is which I have made my special
provin ce.”

“And ye t,” said I, smiling, “I cannot quite hold myself absol ved from
the charge of sens ation ali s m which has been ur ged against my recor d s.”

“You have er red, perhap s,” he obser ved, taking up a gl owing cin der with
the tong s and ligh ting with it the long ch err y- wood pipe which was won t
to replace his clay when he was in a disp ut ati ous rather than a
me dit ative moo d— “you have er red perhaps in attempting to put colour and
life into each of your statements instead of con fin ing yourself to the
task of plac ing upon record that sev ere reasoning from cause to effect
which is really the only no table feat ure about the thing.”

“It seems to me that I have done you full justice in the matter ,” I
remarked with some col dn ess, for I was repe lled by the e go ti s m which I
had more than once observed to be a strong factor in my friend’s
singular character.

“No, it is not sel fish ness or conce it,” said he, answer ing, as was his
won t, my thoughts rather than my words. “If I claim full justice for my
art, it is because it is an im personal thing —a thing beyond myself.
C ri me is comm on. Lo gi c is r are. Th ere fore it is upon the logi c rather
than upon the crime that you should d well. You have de gra ded what
should have been a course of le ct ures into a series of ta le s.”

It was a cold morning of the early sp ring, and we sat after breakfast
on either side of a che ery fire in the old room at Baker Street. A
thick fog rolled down between the lines of dun - coloured houses, and the
op posing windows lo omed like dark, sha pe less bl ur s through the heavy
yellow w rea ths. Our gas was lit and shone on the white cloth and
gli m mer of ch in a and me tal , for the table had not been cleared yet.
Sherlock Holmes had been silent all the morning, di pping continu ously
into the advertisement colum ns of a succ ession of papers until at last,
having apparently given up his sear ch, he had emerged in no very sweet
temp er to lecture me upon my l iterary shor t com ings.

“At the same time ,” he remarked after a pa use, during which he had sat
puff ing at his long pipe and gazing down into the fire, “you can hardly
be open to a charge of sens ation ali s m, for out of these cases which you
have been so kind as to interest yourself in, a fair pro portion do not
treat of crime, in its legal sen se, at all. The small matter in which I
endeavoured to help the King of Bohemia, the singular experience of
Miss Mary Sutherland, the problem connected with the man with the
twisted lip, and the incident of the noble bachel or, were all matters
which are outside the pale of the law. But in avo id ing the sens ation al,
I fear that you may have bor dered on the trivi al.”

“The end may have been so,” I answered, “but the methods I hold to have
been nov el and of interest.”

“P sha w, my dear fellow, what do the public, the great un obser van t
public, who could hardly tell a wea ver by his too th or a com pos it or by
his left thumb, care about the fin er shad es of anal ys is and deducti on!
But, indeed, if you are trivi al, I cannot blame you, for the days of
the great cases are pa st. M an, or at least criminal man, has lost all
enter pri se and origin al ity. As to my own little practi ce, it seems to
be de gener ating into an agency for recover ing lost lead pen c ils and
giving advice to young ladies from board ing- school s. I think that I
have touched bottom at last, however. This note I had this morning
marks my z ero - point, I fanc y. Re ad it!” He tossed a crum pled letter
across to me.

It was dated from Mon tag ue P l ace upon the prece ding evening, and ran
th us :

“D E AR MR . HOLM ES , —I am very anxious to consult you as to whether I
should or should not accept a situation which has been offered to
me as gover ness. I shall call at half-past ten to-morrow if I do
not inconveni ence you. You r s faith fully,


“ VI O LE T H UN TER .”


“Do you know the young lad y?” I asked.

“Not I.”

“It is half-past ten now.”

“Yes, and I have no doubt that is her r ing.”

“It may turn out to be of more interest than you think. You remember
that the affair of the blue carbun cle, which appeared to be a mere whi m
at first, develo ped into a serious investigation. It may be so in this
case, al so.”

“Well, let us hope so. But our doubts will very soon be sol ved, for
here, unless I am much mista ken, is the person in questi on.”

As he spoke the door opened and a young lady entered the room. She was
plainly but neat ly dressed, with a bright, quick face, f reck led like a
p lo ver ’s egg , and with the bris k manner of a woman who has had her own
way to make in the world.

“You will excuse my trou bling you, I am sure ,” said she, as my
companion rose to gre et her, “but I have had a very strange experience,
and as I have no par ents or relations of any sort from whom I could ask
advice, I thought that perhaps you would be kind enough to tell me what
I should do.”

“Pray take a se at, Miss Hunter. I shall be happy to do anything that I
can to serve you.”

I could see that Holmes was fav our ably impressed by the manner and
speech of his new client. He looked her over in his sear ching fashion,
and then com posed himself, with his li ds drooping and his finger-tips
together, to listen to her story.

“I have been a gover ness for five year s,” said she, “ in the family of
Colonel S pence M un ro , but two months ago the colonel received an
appointment at Ha li fa x, in N ov a Sco ti a, and took his children over to
America with him, so that I found myself without a situation. I
adverti sed, and I answered advertise ments, but without success. At last
the little money which I had saved began to run short, and I was at my
wit’s end as to what I should do.

“There is a well-known agency for gover nes ses in the W est En d called
West away ’s, and there I used to call about once a week in order to see
whether anything had turned up which might suit me. West away was the
name of the f oun der of the business, but it is really managed by Miss
Stop er. She s its in her own little office, and the ladies who are
see king employ ment wait in an an ter o om, and are then shown in one by
one, when she consul ts her ledg ers and sees whether she has anything
which would suit them.

“Well, when I called last week I was shown into the little office as
usual, but I found that Miss Stop er was not alone. A pro di gi ously stout
man with a very smiling face and a great heavy chin which rolled down
in fold upon fold over his throat sat at her elb ow with a pair of
glasses on his nose, looking very earne stly at the ladies who entered.
As I came in he gave quite a jump in his chair and turned quickly to
Miss Stop er.

“‘That will do ,’ said he; ‘I could not ask for anything better.
Cap it al ! cap it al !’ He seemed quite enthusi a stic and rubbed his hands
together in the most genial fashi on. He was such a comfort ab le- looking
man that it was quite a pleasure to look at him.

“‘You are looking for a situ ation, mis s?’ he asked.

“‘Yes, sir .’

“‘ As gover ness ?’

“‘Yes, sir .’

“‘And what salary do you as k ?’

“‘I had £ 4 a month in my last place with Colonel S pence M un ro .’

“‘Oh, tu t, tut ! sweat ing— rank sweat ing !’ he cried, throwing his fat
hands out into the air like a man who is in a bo iling passi on. ‘ How
could anyone offer so piti ful a sum to a lady with such at trac tions and
accomplish ment s?’

“‘My accomplish ments, sir, may be less than you imag ine ,’ said I. ‘ A
little Fren ch, a little Ger man, mus ic, and draw ing— ’

“‘ T ut, tut !’ he cried. ‘ This is all quite beside the question. The
point is, have you or have you not the bearing and de port ment of a
lad y? There it is in a nut she ll. If you have not, you are not fitted
for the re aring of a child who may some day play a considerable part in
the hi story of the country. But if you have, why, then, how could any
gentleman ask you to con des cend to accept anything under the three
figure s? Your salary with me, madam, would commence at £ 100 a year .’

“You may imagine, Mr. Holmes, that to me, de st it ute as I was, such an
offer seemed almost too good to be true. The gentleman, however, seeing
perhaps the look of incre dul ity upon my face, opened a pocket -book and
took out a note.

“‘It is also my custom ,’ said he, smiling in the most pleasant fashion
until his eyes were just two little shining sl its amid the white
crea ses of his face, ‘ to advance to my young ladies half their salary
befor e hand, so that they may meet any little expen ses of their journey
and their war dro be .’

“It seemed to me that I had never met so fascin ating and so thought ful
a man. As I was already in deb t to my trades men, the advance was a
great conveni ence, and yet there was something unnatural about the
whole tran sa ction which made me wish to know a little more before I
quite committed myself.

“‘ May I ask where you li ve, sir ?’ said I.

“‘ Hamp shi re. Ch arming r ur al place. The Copper Beeches, five miles on
the far side of Winchest er. It is the most lovely country, my dear
young lady, and the dear est old country- house .’

“‘And my duties, sir ? I should be glad to know what they would be .’

“‘ One chil d— one dear little rom per just six years old. Oh, if you could
see him kill ing cock ro a ches with a slipper ! S m ack ! sm ack ! sm ack ! Three
gone before you could w ink !’ He leaned back in his chair and laughed
his eyes into his head again.

“I was a little startled at the nature of the chil d’s am use ment, but
the father’s laugh ter made me think that perhaps he was jo king.

“‘My so le duties, then ,’ I asked, ‘ are to take charge of a single
chil d ?’

“‘No, no, not the so le, not the so le, my dear young lady ,’ he cried.
‘ Your duty would be, as I am sure your good sense would sugg est, to
obe y any little comm ands my wife might gi ve, provided always that they
were such comm ands as a lady might with propri ety obe y. You see no
difficul ty, he h ?’

“‘I should be happy to make myself use ful .’

“‘ Quite so. In dress now, for exam ple. We are fad dy people, you
know — fad dy but kind - hear ted. If you were asked to wear any dress which
we might give you, you would not object to our little whi m. He h ?’

“‘ No ,’ said I, considerably astoni shed at his words.

“‘O r to sit here, or sit there, that would not be off en sive to you ?’

“‘Oh, no .’

“‘O r to cut your hair quite short before you come to us ?’

“I could hardly believe my ears. As you may observe, Mr. Holmes, my
hair is somewhat lu x u ri ant, and of a rather peculiar tin t of ch est nut .
It has been considered arti stic . I could not dream of sacrifi cing it in
this off hand fashi on.

“‘I am afraid that that is quite im possible ,’ said I. He had been
watching me eager ly out of his small eyes, and I could see a shadow
pass over his face as I spo ke.

“‘I am afraid that it is quite essen ti al ,’ said he. ‘ It is a little
fancy of my wife ’s, and ladi es’ fanci es, you know, madam, ladi es’
fanci es must be consul ted. And so you won’t cut your hair ?’

“‘No, sir, I really could not ,’ I answered fir m ly.

“‘ Ah, very well ; then that quite sett les the matter. It is a pit y,
because in other respe cts you would really have done very nice ly. In
that case, Miss Stop er, I had best inspe ct a few more of your young
ladi es.’

“The manag er ess had sat all this while busy with her papers without a
word to either of us, but she glanced at me now with so much anno y ance
upon her face that I could not help suspe cting that she had lost a
handsome commission through my refu sa l.

“‘ Do you desire your name to be kept upon the book s?’ she asked.

“‘ If you please, Miss St oper .’

“‘Well, really, it seems rather use less, since you ref use the most
excellent off ers in this fashi on ,’ said she shar pl y. ‘You can hardly
expect us to exer t ourselves to find another such opening for you.
Good- day to you, Miss Hunter .’ She struck a g ong upon the table, and I
was shown out by the p age.

“Well, Mr. Holmes, when I got back to my lodgings and found little
enough in the cup board, and two or three bills upon the table, I began
to ask myself whether I had not done a very foolish thing. After all,
if these people had strange fad s and expected obe di ence on the most
extraordinary matter s, they were at least ready to pay for their
eccent ric ity. Very few gover nes ses in England are getting £ 100 a year.
Besides, what use was my hair to me? M any people are impro ved by
we aring it short and perhaps I should be among the num ber. Next day I
was inclined to think that I had made a mista ke, and by the day after I
was sure of it. I had almost over come my pri de so far as to go back to
the agency and inquire whether the place was still open when I received
this letter from the gentleman himself. I have it here and I will read
it to you :

“‘The Copper Beeches, near Winchest er.

“‘ DEAR M I SS H UN TER , — Miss Stop er has very kindly given me your
addres s, and I write from here to ask you whether you have
re considered your deci si on. My wife is very anxious that you should
come, for she has been much attracted by my description of you. We
are willing to give £ 30 a quar ter, or £ 12 0 a year, so as to
re comp ense you for any little inconveni ence which our fad s may
cause you. They are not very exac ting, after all. My wife is fond
of a particular shade of ele ct ric blue and would like you to wear
such a dress in doors in the morning. You need not, however, go to
the expense of pur chasing one, as we have one belong ing to my dear
daughter Alice ( now in Phi la del phi a ), which would, I should think,
fit you very well. Then, as to sitting here or there, or am using
yourself in any manner indicat ed, that need cause you no
inconveni ence. As reg ards your hair, it is no doubt a pit y,
especially as I could not help remar king its beauty during our
short inter view, but I am afraid that I must remain firm upon this
point, and I only hope that the incre ased salary may re comp ense you
for the lo ss. Your duties, as far as the child is concer ned, are
very light. Now do try to come, and I shall meet you with the
dog-cart at Winchest er. Let me know your tra in. You r s faith fully,


“‘ J E PH RO R UC A ST LE .’


“That is the letter which I have just recei ved, Mr. Holmes, and my mind
is made up that I will accept it. I thought, however, that before
taking the fin al step I should like to sub mit the whole matter to your
consider ation.”

“Well, Miss Hunter, if your mind is made up, that sett les the
questi on,” said Holmes, smiling.

“But you would not advise me to refu se?”

“I confess that it is not the situation which I should like to see a
sister of mine apply for .”

“What is the meaning of it all, Mr. Holmes?”

“Ah, I have no data. I cannot tell. Perhaps you have yourself formed
some opinion ?”

“Well, there seems to me to be only one possible solu tion. Mr. Rucastle
seemed to be a very kind, good- natur ed man. Is it not possible that his
wife is a lun ati c, that he des ire s to keep the matter quiet for fear
she should be taken to an as y l um, and that he hum ours her fanci es in
every way in order to prevent an out break ?”

“That is a possible solu tion —in fact, as matters stan d, it is the most
probable one. But in any case it does not seem to be a nice house hold
for a young lad y.”

“But the money, Mr. Holmes, the mone y!”

“Well, yes, of course the pay is goo d— too good. That is what makes me
uneasy. Why should they give you £ 12 0 a year, when they could have
their pick for £ 4 0 ? There must be some strong reason beh ind .”

“I thought that if I told you the circumstances you would understand
afterwards if I wanted your hel p. I should feel so much strong er if I
felt that you were at the back of me.”

“Oh, you may carry that feeling away with you. I assure you that your
little problem promises to be the most interesting which has come my
way for some months. There is something distinctly nov el about some of
the features. If you should find yourself in doubt or in danger —”

“D anger ! What danger do you fore see ?”

Holmes shook his head gravely. “It would cease to be a danger if we
could de fine it,” said he. “But at any time, day or night, a telegram
would bring me down to your help .”

“That is enough.” She rose brisk ly from her chair with the anxiety all
swept from her face. “I shall go down to Hamp shire quite easy in my
mind now. I shall write to Mr. Rucastle at once, sacrifi ce my poor hair
to-night, and start for Winchester to-morrow .” With a few grateful
words to Holmes she ba de us both good- night and bust led off upon her
way.

“At least ,” said I as we heard her quick, firm steps descen ding the
stairs, “ she seems to be a young lady who is very well able to take
care of her self.”

“And she would need to be ,” said Holmes gravely. “I am much mistaken if
we do not hear from her before many days are pa st.”

It was not very long before my friend’s pre di ction was ful fi ll ed. A
fort night went by, during which I frequently found my thoughts turning
in her direction and wondering what strange side- alley of human
experience this lonely woman had stra yed in to. The unusual sa lar y, the
curious conditi ons, the light duties, all pointed to something
ab nor m al, though whether a fa d or a p lo t, or whether the man were a
phi lan thro pi st or a villain , it was quite beyond my powers to
determin e. As to Holmes, I observed that he sat frequently for half an
hour on end, with kn itted br ows and an abstracted air, but he swept the
matter away with a wave of his hand when I mentioned it. “D at a ! dat a !
dat a !” he cried impati ent ly. “I can’t make bri cks without cla y.” And
yet he would always wind up by m uttering that no sister of his should
ever have accepted such a situation.

The telegram which we eventually received came late one night just as I
was thinking of turning in and Holmes was sett ling down to one of those
all- night chemical resear ches which he frequently indul ged in, when I
would leave him stoo ping over a re tor t and a te st- tu be at night and
find him in the same position when I came down to breakfast in the
morning. He opened the yellow envelo pe, and then, glancing at the
messa ge, threw it across to me.

“Just look up the tra ins in Brad shaw ,” said he, and turned back to his
chemical stu di es.

The sum m ons was a bri ef and ur gent one.

“P lease be at the Bl ack S w an Ho tel at Winchester at mid day to-morrow ,”
it said. “Do com e! I am at my wit’s end.


“H UN TER .”


“Will you come with me?” asked Holmes, glancing up.

“I should wish to.”

“Just look it up, then.”

“There is a train at half-past nin e,” said I, glancing over my
Brad shaw . “It is due at Winchester at 11 : 3 0.”

“That will do very nice ly. Then perhaps I had better post p one my
anal ys is of the ac et ones, as we may need to be at our best in the
morning.”

By eleven o’clock the next day we were well upon our way to the old
English cap it al. Holmes had been buried in the morning papers all the
way down, but after we had passed the Hamp shire border he threw them
down and began to admir e the sc ener y. It was an ide al spring day, a
light blue sky, fle cked with little fle ec y white clouds drifting across
from west to ea st. The sun was shining very bright ly, and yet there was
an ex hi lar ating ni p in the air, which set an edge to a man’s energ y.
All over the countr y side, away to the ro lling hi lls around Al der shot,
the little red and grey roof s of the farm - ste ad ings peeped out from
amid the light green of the new fo li age.

“A re they not fresh and beauti ful ?” I cried with all the enthusi as m of
a man fresh from the fo gs of Baker Street.

But Holmes shook his head gravely.

“Do you know, Watson,” said he, “that it is one of the cur ses of a mind
with a turn like mine that I must look at everything with reference to
my own special subject. You look at these scattered houses, and you are
impressed by their beaut y. I look at them, and the only thought which
comes to me is a feeling of their is ol ation and of the imp un ity with
which crime may be committed there.”

“Good heavens!” I cried. “Who would associ ate crime with these dear old
hom est e ad s?”

“They always fill me with a certain horr or. It is my beli ef, Watson,
founded upon my experience, that the low est and vi lest alle ys in London
do not present a more dreadful record of sin than does the smiling and
beautiful countr y side.”

“You horri fy me!”

“But the reason is very obvious. The pres sure of public opinion can do
in the town what the law cannot accomplish . There is no lane so vi le
that the scream of a tor tured child, or the th ud of a drun k ard ’s blow,
does not be get sympathy and indi g nation among the neighbour s, and then
the whole mach in ery of justice is ever so close that a word of
compla int can set it going, and there is but a step between the crime
and the do ck. But look at these lonely houses, each in its own fiel ds,
filled for the most part with poor ignorant folk who know little of the
law. Think of the dee ds of he lli sh cruel ty, the hi dden wickedness which
may go on, year in, year out, in such places, and none the wi ser . Had
this lady who appe als to us for help gone to live in Winchest er, I
should never have had a fear for her. It is the five miles of country
which makes the danger. Still, it is clear that she is not personally
threat en ed.”

“No. If she can come to Winchester to meet us she can get away.”

“Quite so. She has her freed om.”

“What can be the matter, then? C an you suggest no explan ation ?”

“I have dev ised seven separate explan ations, each of which would cover
the facts as far as we know them. But which of these is correct can
only be determined by the fresh information which we shall no doubt
find waiting for us. Well, there is the tow er of the ca the dr al, and we
shall soon learn all that Miss Hunter has to tell.”

The Bl ack S w an is an inn of reput e in the Hi gh Street, at no distance
from the st ation, and there we found the young lady waiting for us. She
had engaged a sitting-room, and our lunch a waited us upon the table.

“I am so deli ghted that you have com e,” she said earne st ly. “It is so
very kind of you both ; but indeed I do not know what I should do. Your
advice will be altogether inv al u able to me.”

“Pray tell us what has happened to you.”

“I will do so, and I must be quick, for I have promised Mr. Rucastle to
be back before thre e. I got his leave to come into town this morning,
though he little knew for what purpo se.”

“Let us have everything in its due order .” Holmes thrust his long thin
legs out towards the fire and com posed himself to list en.

“In the first place, I may say that I have me t, on the who le, with no
actu al ill- treat ment from Mr. and Mrs. Rucast le. It is only fair to
them to say that. But I cannot understand them, and I am not easy in my
mind about them.”

“What can you not understand ?”

“ The ir reasons for their condu ct. But you shall have it all just as it
occurred. When I came down, Mr. Rucastle met me here and drove me in
his dog-cart to the Copper Bee ches. It is, as he said, beauti fully
situ ated, but it is not beautiful in it self, for it is a large square
block of a house, white wa she d, but all stained and strea ked with damp
and bad weather. There are grounds round it, woods on three sides, and
on the fourth a field which slo pes down to the South amp ton high road,
which cur ves past about a hundred yards from the front door. This
ground in front belongs to the house, but the woods all round are part
of Lord Sou ther ton ’s preser ves. A clump of cop per bee ches immediately
in front of the hall door has given its name to the place.

“I was driven over by my emplo yer, who was as amiable as ever, and was
introdu ced by him that evening to his wife and the chil d. There was no
truth, Mr. Holmes, in the conjecture which seemed to us to be probable
in your rooms at Baker Street. Mrs. Rucastle is not ma d. I found her to
be a silent, pa le- faced woman, much younger than her husband, not more
than thir ty, I should think, while he can hardly be less than
forty- fi ve. From their conversation I have gathered that they have been
married about seven years, that he was a widow er, and that his only
child by the first wife was the daughter who has gone to Phi la del phi a.
Mr. Rucastle told me in private that the reason why she had left them
was that she had an un reasoning aver sion to her step mother. As the
daughter could not have been less than twent y, I can quite imagine that
her position must have been un comfortable with her father’s young wife.

“Mrs. Rucastle seemed to me to be col our less in mind as well as in
feat ure. She impressed me neither fav our ably nor the re ver se. She was a
non ent ity. It was easy to see that she was passi on ately devoted both to
her husband and to her little son. Her light grey eyes wandered
continually from one to the other, no ting every little want and
for est all ing it if possible. He was kind to her also in his blu ff,
bo i sterous fashion, and on the whole they seemed to be a happy cou ple.
And yet she had some secret sor row, this woman. She would often be lost
in deep thought, with the sadd est look upon her face. More than once I
have surprised her in te ars. I have thought sometimes that it was the
disposition of her child which weigh ed upon her mind, for I have never
met so utterly spoiled and so ill- natur ed a little creat ure. He is
small for his age, with a head which is quite dis pro por tion ately lar ge.
His whole life appears to be spent in an alter nation between sav age
f its of passion and glo om y inter val s of sul king. G i ving pain to any
creature wea ker than himself seems to be his one idea of am use ment, and
he shows quite remarkable tal ent in plan ning the cap ture of mi ce,
little bir ds, and in se cts. But I would rather not talk about the
creat ure, Mr. Holmes, and, indeed, he has little to do with my stor y.”

“I am glad of all detail s,” remarked my friend, “ whether they seem to
you to be re le van t or not.”

“I shall try not to miss anything of importance. The one unpleasant
thing about the house, which struck me at once, was the appearance and
conduct of the servan ts. There are only two, a man and his wife.
Toll er, for that is his name, is a rough , un cou th man, with grizzled
hair and whisk ers, and a perpe tual smell of drin k. Twice since I have
been with them he has been quite drunk, and yet Mr. Rucastle seemed to
take no notice of it. His wife is a very tall and strong woman with a
s our face, as silent as Mrs. Rucastle and much less ami able. They are a
most unpleasant cou ple, but fortunately I spend most of my time in the
nur ser y and my own room, which are next to each other in one corner of
the build ing.

“For two days after my arri val at the Copper Bee ches my life was very
quiet ; on the thir d, Mrs. Rucastle came down just after breakfast and
whispered something to her husband.

“‘Oh, y es,’ said he, turning to me, ‘ we are very much obliged to you,
Miss Hunter, for falling in with our whi ms so far as to cut your hair.
I assure you that it has not de tracted in the tin i est i o t a from your
appearance. We shall now see how the ele ct ric - blue dress will become
you. You will find it laid out upon the bed in your room, and if you
would be so good as to put it on we should both be extremely obli ged .’

“The dress which I found waiting for me was of a peculiar shade of
blu e. It was of excellent materi al, a sort of be ig e, but it bore
un mista k able signs of having been worn before. It could not have been a
better fit if I had been meas ured for it. Both Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle
ex pressed a de light at the look of it, which seemed quite ex ag g er ated
in its ve he men ce. They were waiting for me in the draw ing-room, which
is a very large room, stretching along the enti re front of the house,
with three long windows reaching down to the floor. A chair had been
placed close to the central window, with its back turned towards it. In
this I was asked to s it, and then Mr. Rucastle, walking up and down on
the other side of the room, began to tell me a series of the fun ni est
stor ies that I have ever listened to. You cannot imagine how com ical he
was, and I laughed until I was quite we ary. Mrs. Rucastle, however, who
has evidently no sense of hum our, never so much as smi led, but sat with
her hands in her lap, and a sa d, anxious look upon her face. After an
hour or so, Mr. Rucastle suddenly remarked that it was time to commence
the du ties of the day, and that I might change my dress and go to
little Ed ward in the nur ser y.

“T w o days later this same performan ce was gone through under exactly
similar circumstan ces. A gain I changed my dress, again I sat in the
window, and again I laughed very hearti ly at the funny stor ies of which
my emplo yer had an immense r é per to i re, and which he told in im it ab ly.
Then he handed me a yell ow- backed nov el , and moving my chair a little
side ways, that my own shadow might not fall upon the p age, he begged me
to read al ou d to him. I read for about ten minutes, beginning in the
heart of a cha p ter, and then sudd enly, in the middle of a sentence, he
ordered me to cease and to change my dress.

“You can easily imagine, Mr. Holmes, how curious I became as to what
the meaning of this extraordinary performan ce could possibly be. They
were always very care ful, I obser ved, to turn my face away from the
window, so that I became con su med with the desire to see what was going
on behind my back. At first it seemed to be im possible, but I soon
dev ised a mean s. My hand - mir ror had been bro ken, so a happy thought
seized me, and I conce aled a piece of the glass in my handkerchi ef . On
the next occas ion, in the mid st of my laugh ter, I put my handkerchief
up to my eyes, and was able with a little manag ement to see all that
there was behind me. I confess that I was disappoin ted. There was
nothing. At least that was my first impressi on. At the second glan ce,
however, I per cei ved that there was a man standing in the South amp ton
Road, a small be ard ed man in a grey su it, who seemed to be looking in
my directi on. The road is an important high way, and there are usually
people there. This man, however, was leaning against the rail ings which
bor dered our field and was looking earne stly up. I low ered my
handkerchief and glanced at Mrs. Rucastle to find her eyes fixed upon
me with a most sear ching ga ze. She said nothing, but I am convinced
that she had di v ined that I had a mir ror in my hand and had seen what
was behind me. She rose at once.

“‘ J ep h ro ,’ said she, ‘ there is an imper tin ent fellow upon the road
there who star es up at Miss Hunter .’

“‘ No friend of yours, Miss Hunter ?’ he asked.

“‘No, I know no one in these part s.’

“‘ De ar me! How very imper tin ent! Kindly turn round and motion to him to
go away .’

“‘ S urely it would be better to take no notice .’

“‘No, no, we should have him lo iter ing here al ways. Kindly turn round
and wave him away like that .’

“I did as I was t old, and at the same instant Mrs. Rucastle drew down
the blin d. That was a week ago, and from that time I have not sat again
in the window, nor have I worn the blue dress, nor seen the man in the
road .”

“Pray continu e,” said Holmes. “Your narrative promises to be a most
interesting one.”

“You will find it rather dis conne c ted, I fear, and there may prove to
be little rel ation between the different incidents of which I spea k. On
the very first day that I was at the Copper Beeches, Mr. Rucastle took
me to a small ou th ouse which stands near the kitchen door. As we
approached it I heard the sharp rattling of a chain, and the sound as
of a large animal moving about.

“‘ Look in here !’ said Mr. Rucastle, showing me a sl it between two
plan ks. ‘ Is he not a beaut y?’

“I looked through and was conscious of two gl owing eyes, and of a vague
figure hu ddled up in the darkness.

“‘ Don’t be frighten ed ,’ said my emplo yer, laughing at the start which I
had gi ven. ‘ It’s only Car lo , my ma stiff . I call him mine, but really
old Toll er, my g room, is the only man who can do anything with him. We
fe ed him once a day, and not too much then, so that he is always as
keen as mu star d. Toller lets him loose every night, and God help the
tre sp as s er whom he lays his f ang s upon. For goodn ess ’ sake don’t you
ever on any pre text set your foot over the thresh old at night, for it’s
as much as your life is wor th .’

“The warning was no id le one, for two nights later I happened to look
out of my bedroom window about two o’clock in the morning. It was a
beautiful moon light night, and the lawn in front of the house was
sil vered over and almost as bright as day. I was stand ing, ra pt in the
peac eful beauty of the scen e, when I was aware that something was
moving under the shadow of the cop per bee ches. As it emerged into the
moon sh ine I saw what it was. It was a gi ant dog, as large as a cal f,
ta wn y tin ted, with hanging j ow l, black mu zz le, and huge pro jec ting
bon es. It walked slowly across the lawn and vanished into the shadow
upon the other side. That dreadful sent in el sent a chill to my heart
which I do not think that any burgl ar could have done.

“And now I have a very strange experience to tell you. I had, as you
know, cut off my hair in London, and I had placed it in a great co il at
the bottom of my trun k. One evening, after the child was in bed, I
began to am use myself by examining the furniture of my room and by
re arr anging my own little things. There was an old chest of draw ers in
the room, the two upper ones empty and open, the lower one locked. I
had filled the first two with my lin en, and as I had still much to pack
away I was naturally anno yed at not having the use of the third draw er.
It struck me that it might have been fastened by a mere over sight, so I
took out my bunch of ke ys and tried to open it. The very first key
fitted to perfe cti on, and I drew the draw er open. There was only one
thing in it, but I am sure that you would never guess what it was. It
was my co il of hair.

“I took it up and examined it. It was of the same peculiar tin t, and
the same thick ness. But then the im possibility of the thing ob tr uded
itself upon me. How could my hair have been locked in the draw er ? With
trembling hands I un did my trun k, turned out the cont ents, and drew
from the bottom my own hair. I laid the two tre s ses together, and I
assure you that they were identi cal . Was it not extra ordin ar y? P u zz le
as I would, I could make nothing at all of what it mean t. I returned
the strange hair to the draw er, and I said nothing of the matter to the
Rucastles as I felt that I had put myself in the wrong by opening a
draw er which they had locked.

“I am naturally obser van t, as you may have remarked, Mr. Holmes, and I
soon had a pretty good plan of the whole house in my head. There was
one w ing, however, which appeared not to be in hab ited at all. A door
which faced that which led into the quarters of the Toll ers opened into
this suit e, but it was invari ably locked. One day, however, as I
ascen ded the stair, I met Mr. Rucastle coming out through this door,
his ke ys in his hand, and a look on his face which made him a very
different person to the round, j ov ial man to whom I was accustom ed. His
cheeks were red, his brow was all cr ink led with ang er, and the ve ins
stood out at his temp les with passi on. He locked the door and hurried
past me without a word or a look.

“This ar ou sed my curiosit y, so when I went out for a walk in the
grounds with my char ge, I st rolled round to the side from which I could
see the windows of this part of the house. There were four of them in a
row, three of which were simply dirty, while the fourth was shut tered
up. They were evidently all deser ted. As I st rolled up and down,
glancing at them occasion ally, Mr. Rucastle came out to me, looking as
mer ry and j ov ial as ever.

“‘ A h !’ said he, ‘you must not think me ru de if I passed you without a
word, my dear young lady. I was pre occup ied with business matter s.’

“I assured him that I was not off en ded. ‘ By the way ,’ said I, ‘you seem
to have quite a su ite of spare rooms up there, and one of them has the
shutters up .’

“He looked surprised and, as it seemed to me, a little startled at my
remar k.

“‘ P ho togra phy is one of my h ob bi es,’ said he. ‘I have made my dark room
up there. But, dear me! what an obser van t young lady we have come upon.
Who would have believed it? Who would have ever believed it ?’ He spoke
in a jest ing t one, but there was no jest in his eyes as he looked at
me. I read suspicion there and anno y ance, but no jest .

“Well, Mr. Holmes, from the moment that I understood that there was
something about that su ite of rooms which I was not to know, I was all
on fire to go over them. It was not mere curiosit y, though I have my
share of that. It was more a feeling of dut y— a feeling that some good
might come from my pen e tr ating to this place. They talk of woman’s
instin ct; perhaps it was woman’s instin ct which gave me that feel ing.
At any rate, it was there, and I was keenly on the look out for any
chance to pass the for bi dden door.

“It was only yesterday that the chance ca me. I may tell you that,
besides Mr. Rucastle, both Toller and his wife find something to do in
these deserted rooms, and I once saw him carrying a large black linen
bag with him through the door. R ec ently he has been drin king hard, and
yesterday evening he was very drun k; and when I came upstairs there was
the key in the door. I have no doubt at all that he had left it there.
Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle were both down stairs, and the child was with
them, so that I had an admir able opportun ity. I turned the key gently
in the lock, opened the door, and slipped through.

“There was a little passage in front of me, un paper ed and un carpe ted,
which turned at a right angle at the farther end. R ound this corner
were three doors in a line, the first and third of which were open.
They each led into an empty room, du sty and cheer less, with two windows
in the one and one in the other, so thick with dirt that the evening
light gli mmered dimly through them. The centre door was clo sed, and
across the outside of it had been fastened one of the broad bars of an
iron bed, pad locked at one end to a ring in the wall, and fastened at
the other with stout cor d. The door itself was locked as well, and the
key was not there. This bar ri ca ded door correspon ded clearly with the
shut tered window outside, and yet I could see by the gli m mer from
beneath it that the room was not in darkness. E vi d ently there was a
sky light which let in light from abov e. As I stood in the passage
gazing at the sinister door and wondering what secret it might veil, I
suddenly heard the sound of steps within the room and saw a shadow pass
backward and forward against the little sl it of dim light which shone
out from under the door. A mad, un reasoning terror rose up in me at the
sight, Mr. Holmes. My over strung nerves failed me sudd enly, and I
turned and ran — ran as though some dreadful hand were behind me
clut ching at the skir t of my dress. I rushed down the passage, through
the door, and straight into the arms of Mr. Rucastle, who was waiting
outside.

“‘ So ,’ said he, smiling, ‘ it was you, then. I thought that it must be
when I saw the door open .’

“‘Oh, I am so frighten ed !’ I pan ted.

“‘My dear young lad y! my dear young lady ! ’ —you cannot think how
car es sing and soothing his manner wa s— ‘and what has frightened you, my
dear young lady ?’

“But his voice was just a little too coa x ing. He over did it. I was
keenly on my guard against him.

“‘I was foolish enough to go into the empty w ing ,’ I answered. ‘ But it
is so lonely and e eri e in this dim light that I was frightened and ran
out again. Oh, it is so dread fully still in there !’

“‘ On ly that ?’ said he, looking at me keen ly.

“‘Why, what did you think ?’ I asked.

“‘ Why do you think that I lock this door ?’

“‘I am sure that I do not know .’

“‘It is to keep people out who have no business there. Do you see ?’ He
was still smiling in the most amiable manner.

“‘I am sure if I had kn own — ’

“‘Well, then, you know now. And if you ever put your foot over that
thresh old again ’— here in an instant the smile hardened into a gr in of
ra ge, and he gl ared down at me with the face of a de mon — ‘ I’ll throw you
to the ma stiff .’

“I was so terri fied that I do not know what I did. I suppose that I
must have rushed past him into my room. I remember nothing until I
found myself lying on my bed trembling all over. Then I thought of you,
Mr. Holmes. I could not live there longer without some advi ce. I was
frightened of the house, of the man, of the woman, of the servan ts,
even of the chil d. They were all horrible to me. If I could only bring
you down all would be well. Of course I might have fled from the house,
but my curiosity was almost as strong as my fe ars. My mind was soon
made up. I would send you a wi re. I put on my hat and cloa k, went down
to the office, which is about half a mile from the house, and then
returned, feeling very much easi er. A horrible doubt came into my mind
as I approached the door lest the dog might be loose, but I remembered
that Toller had drunk himself into a state of in sensi bility that
evening, and I knew that he was the only one in the house hold who had
any influence with the sav age creat ure, or who would vent ure to set him
fre e. I slipped in in safe ty and lay a wake half the night in my joy at
the thought of seeing you. I had no difficulty in getting leave to come
into Winchester this morning, but I must be back before three o’clock,
for Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle are going on a vis it, and will be away all
the evening, so that I must look after the chil d. Now I have told you
all my adventure s, Mr. Holmes, and I should be very glad if you could
tell me what it all mean s, and, above all, what I should do.”

Holmes and I had listened spell bound to this extraordinary story. My
friend rose now and paced up and down the room, his hands in his
pockets, and an expression of the most pro found grav ity upon his face.

“Is Toller still drun k ?” he asked.

“Yes. I heard his wife tell Mrs. Rucastle that she could do nothing
with him.”

“That is well. And the Rucastles go out to-night?”

“Yes.”

“Is there a cellar with a good strong lock ?”

“Yes, the win e- cell ar.”

“You seem to me to have acted all through this matter like a very brave
and sensi ble girl, Miss Hunter. Do you think that you could per form one
more feat ? I should not ask it of you if I did not think you a quite
exceptional woman .”

“I will try. What is it?”

“We shall be at the Copper Bee ches by seven o’clock, my friend and I.
The Rucastles will be gone by that time, and Toller will, we hop e, be
in cap able. There only rema ins Mrs. Toll er, who might give the alarm. If
you could send her into the cellar on some err and, and then turn the
key upon her, you would fac il itate matters immen sel y.”

“I will do it.”

“Excell ent! We shall then look thoroughly into the affa ir. Of course
there is only one fe as i ble explanation. You have been brought there to
person ate some one, and the real person is imprison ed in this cham ber.
That is obvious. As to who this prisoner is, I have no doubt that it is
the daugh ter, Miss Alice Rucastle, if I remember right, who was said to
have gone to America. You were cho s en, doubt less, as resem bling her in
he ight, figu re, and the colour of your hair. H ers had been cut off,
very possibly in some ill ness through which she has pas sed, and so, of
course, yours had to be sacrifi ced al so. By a curious chance you came
upon her tre s ses. The man in the road was undoubtedly some friend of
her s— possibly her fi anc é —and no doubt, as you wore the girl’s dress
and were so like her, he was convinced from your laugh ter, whenever he
saw you, and afterwards from your gest ure, that Miss Rucastle was
perfectly happ y, and that she no longer desir ed his atten tions. The dog
is let loose at night to prevent him from endeavouring to communicate
with her. So much is fairly clear. The most serious point in the case
is the disposition of the chil d.”

“What on earth has that to do with it?” I ejacul ated.

“My dear Watson, you as a medical man are continually gain ing light as
to the ten den ci es of a child by the study of the par ents. Don’t you see
that the conver se is equally v ali d. I have frequently gained my first
real in sight into the character of par ents by studying their childr en.
This chil d’s disposition is ab nor ma lly cruel , merely for cruel t y’s
sake, and whether he deri ves this from his smiling father, as I should
suspe ct, or from his mother, it bod es evil for the poor girl who is in
their power .”

“I am sure that you are right, Mr. Holmes,” cried our client. “A
thousand things come back to me which make me certain that you have hit
it. Oh, let us lose not an instant in bringing help to this poor
creat ure .”

“We must be circ um spe ct, for we are deal ing with a very cunning man. We
can do nothing until seven o’clock. At that hour we shall be with you,
and it will not be long before we solve the myster y.”

We were as good as our word, for it was just seven when we reached the
Copper Beeches, having put up our trap at a way side public - house. The
group of trees, with their dark leaves shining like bur ni shed metal in
the light of the setting sun, were sufficient to mark the house even
had Miss Hunter not been standing smiling on the door - step .

“Have you managed it?” asked Holmes.

A loud th u dding noise came from somewhere down stair s. “That is Mrs.
Toller in the cellar ,” said she. “H er husband lies snor ing on the
kitchen ru g. Here are his ke ys, which are the d up li cat es of Mr.
Rucast le ’s.”

“You have done well indeed !” cried Holmes with enthusi as m. “Now lead
the way, and we shall soon see the end of this black business.”

We passed up the stair, unlocked the door, followed on down a passage,
and found ourselves in front of the bar ri ca de which Miss Hunter had
descri bed. Holmes cut the cord and removed the trans ver se bar . Then he
tried the v ar ious ke ys in the lock, but without success. No sound came
from wi thin, and at the silence Holmes’ face clouded over.

“I trust that we are not too lat e,” said he. “I think, Miss Hunter,
that we had better go in without you. Now, Watson, put your shoulder to
it, and we shall see whether we cannot make our way in.”

It was an old ri ck ety door and gave at once before our un ited streng th.
To ge ther we rushed into the room. It was emp ty. There was no furniture
save a little pallet bed, a small table, and a bas ket ful of lin en. The
sky light above was open, and the prisoner gone.

“There has been some villain y here,” said Holmes; “this beauty has
guessed Miss Hunter ’s inten tions and has carried his vi cti m off.”

“But how ?”

“Th rough the sky light. We shall soon see how he managed it.” He swung
himself up onto the roof . “Ah, y es,” he cried, “ here’s the end of a
long light ladder against the ea ves. That is how he did it.”

“But it is im possible ,” said Miss Hunter ; “the ladder was not there
when the Rucastles went away.”

“He has come back and done it. I tell you that he is a clever and
dangerous man. I should not be very much surprised if this were he
whose step I hear now upon the stair . I think, Watson, that it would be
as well for you to have your pistol read y.”

The words were hardly out of his mouth before a man appeared at the
door of the room, a very fat and bur ly man, with a heavy stick in his
hand. Miss Hunter screamed and sh run k against the wall at the sight of
him, but Sherlock Holmes sprang forward and con fron ted him.

“You villain !” said he, “ wher e’s your daughter ?”

The fat man cast his eyes round, and then up at the open sky light.

“It is for me to ask you that,” he shrie ked, “you thiev es! S pi es and
thiev es! I have caught you, have I? You are in my pow er. I’ll serve
you!” He turned and cl attered down the stairs as hard as he could go.

“He’s gone for the dog !” cried Miss Hunter.

“I have my revol ver ,” said I.

“B et ter close the front door ,” cried Holmes, and we all rushed down the
stairs together. We had hardly reached the hall when we heard the
ba ying of a h ound, and then a scream of ag ony, with a horrible wor rying
sound which it was dreadful to listen to. An elderly man with a red
face and shaking limbs came stagg ering out at a side door.

“My God !” he cried. “S ome one has loo sed the dog . It’s not been f ed for
two days. Qu i ck, quick, or it ’ll be too lat e!”

Holmes and I rushed out and round the angle of the house, with Toller
hurrying behind us. There was the huge fami shed br ut e, its black mu zz le
buried in Rucast le’s thro at, while he wri thed and screamed upon the
ground. R unning up, I ble w its brains out, and it fell over with its
keen white teeth still meeting in the great crea ses of his ne ck. With
much lab our we separ ated them and carried him, living but horri bly
m ang led, into the house. We laid him upon the draw ing-room sof a, and
having disp at ched the so bered Toller to bear the news to his wife, I
did what I could to reli eve his pain . We were all as sem bled round him
when the door opened, and a tall, ga unt woman entered the room.

“Mrs. Toll er !” cried Miss Hunter.

“Yes, mis s. Mr. Rucastle let me out when he came back before he went up
to you. Ah, mis s, it is a pity you didn’t let me know what you were
plan ning, for I would have told you that your pain s were wa st ed.”

“Ha !” said Holmes, looking keenly at her. “It is clear that Mrs. Toller
knows more about this matter than anyone else.”

“Yes, sir, I do, and I am ready enough to tell what I know.”

“Then, pra y, sit down, and let us hear it for there are several points
on which I must confess that I am still in the dark.”

“I will soon make it clear to you,” said she ; “and I’d have done so
before now if I could ha ’ got out from the cellar. If there’s
police- court business over this, you’ll remember that I was the one
that stood your friend, and that I was Miss Ali ce ’s friend too.

“She was never happy at home, Miss Alice was n ’t, from the time that her
father married again. She was sli ghted like and had no say in anything,
but it never really became bad for her until after she met Mr. Fowler
at a friend’s house. As well as I could lear n, Miss Alice had rights of
her own by will, but she was so quiet and patient, she was, that she
never said a word about them but just left everything in Mr. Rucast le’s
hands. He knew he was safe with her; but when there was a chance of a
husband coming forward, who would ask for all that the law would give
him, then her father thought it time to put a stop on it. He wanted her
to sign a paper, so that whether she married or not, he could use her
money. When she wouldn’t do it, he kept on wor rying her until she got
brain- fever, and for six weeks was at death ’s door. Then she got better
at last, all worn to a shad ow, and with her beautiful hair cut off; but
that didn’t make no change in her young man, and he stuck to her as
true as man could be.”

“A h,” said Holmes, “I think that what you have been good enough to tell
us makes the matter fairly cle ar, and that I can deduce all that
remain s. Mr. Rucastle then, I presu me, took to this system of
imprison ment ?”

“Yes, sir.”

“And brought Miss Hunter down from London in order to get rid of the
disa gre e able per sist ence of Mr. Fow l er.”

“That was it, sir.”

“But Mr. Fowler being a per sever ing man, as a good sea man should be,
b lock aded the house, and having met you succeeded by certain ar gum ents,
metallic or other wi se, in convin cing you that your interests were the
same as hi s.”

“Mr. Fowler was a very kind - spo ken, fre e- handed gentle man,” said Mrs.
Toller ser en ely.

“And in this way he managed that your good man should have no want of
drink, and that a ladder should be ready at the moment when your master
had gone out.”

“You have it, sir, just as it happen ed.”

“I am sure we owe you an apolog y, Mrs. Toll er,” said Holmes, “for you
have certainly cleared up everything which puzzled us. And here comes
the country surge on and Mrs. Rucastle, so I think, Watson, that we had
best escor t Miss Hunter back to Winchest er, as it seems to me that our
lo cus stan di now is rather a questi onable one.”

And th us was solved the mystery of the sinister house with the cop per
bee ches in front of the door. Mr. Rucastle survi ved, but was always a
broken man, kept alive so le ly through the care of his devoted wife.
They still live with their old servan ts, who probably know so much of
Rucast le’s past life that he finds it difficult to part from them. Mr.
Fowler and Miss Rucastle were married, by special license, in
South amp ton the day after their flight, and he is now the holder of a
gover n ment appointment in the island of Ma ur iti us. As to Miss Vi o let
Hunter, my friend Holmes, rather to my disappoint ment, man i fe sted no
further interest in her when once she had ceased to be the centre of
one of his problem s, and she is now the head of a private school at
W al sa ll, where I believe that she has met with considerable success.






*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLM ES ***




Up dated editions will replace the previous one —the old editions will
be ren a med.

Cre ating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation ( and you !) can copy and distribute it in the United
States without permission and without paying copyright
royal ties. Spe cial ru les, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg™ electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBER G ™
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as cre ation
of derivative works, re port s, performan ces and resear ch. Project
Gutenberg eBooks may be modi fied and printed and given away —you may
do practically AN Y TH ING in the United States with eBooks not protected
by U.S. copyright law. Re distribution is subject to the trademark
license, especially comm er cial re distribu tion.


STAR T : FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE

P LE A SE REA D THIS BE F OR E YOU DISTRIBUT E OR U SE THIS W ORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase “Project
Gutenberg ” ), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg™ License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/ licen se.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Re distributing Project Gutenberg™
electronic works

1. A . By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg™
electronic work, you indic ate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
( trademar k / copy right ) agreement. If you do not agree to ab ide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in your
possessi on. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg™ electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person
or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1. B . “Project Gutenberg” is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg™ electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1. C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg™ electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg™
electronic works. See paragraph 1. E below.

1. C . The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ( “the
Foundation ” or P G LA F ), owns a com pi l ation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works. N early all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is un protected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distribut ing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are re moved. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg™ mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg™
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg™ name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg™ License when
you share it without charge with others.

1. D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also gover n
what you can do with this work. Copy right laws in most coun tries are
in a constant state of chang e. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in add ition to the terms of this
agreement before down load ing, copying, displa ying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg™ work. The Foundation makes no
represent ations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country other than the United States.

1.E . Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg :

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg™ License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg™ work ( any work
on which the phrase “Project Gutenberg” appear s, or with which the
phrase “Project Gutenberg” is associ at ed ) is acc essed, displa yed,
perfor med, vie wed, copied or distribu te d:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and most
other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online
at www.gutenberg.org. If you
are not located in the United States, you will have to check the laws
of the country where you are located before using this eBook.

1.E. 2. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is
deri ved from tex ts not protected by U.S. copyright law ( does not
contain a notice indicat ing that it is posted with permission of the
copyright hol der ), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or char g es. If you are
re distributing or providing access to a work with the phrase “Project
Gutenberg” associated with or appe aring on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg™
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E. 3. If an individual Project Gutenberg™ electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright hol der, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms im posed by the copyright hol der. A dd iti onal terms
will be lin ked to the Project Gutenberg™ License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E. 4. Do not un link or de ta ch or remove the full Project Gutenberg™
License terms from this work, or any fi les con taining a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg™ .

1.E. 5. Do not copy, displa y, perform , distribute or re distribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sent ence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg™ License.

1.E. 6. You may conver t to and distribute this work in any b in ary,
com pres sed, marked up, non proprietary or proprietary form, including
any word proc es sing or hy per text form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg™ work in a format
other than “Plain Vanilla ASCII ” or other format used in the official
ver sion posted on the official Project Gutenberg™ website
( www.gutenberg.org ), you mu st, at no additional co st, fee or expense
to the us er, provide a copy, a means of ex por ting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original “Plain
Vanilla ASCII ” or other form. Any alter n ate format must inclu de the
full Project Gutenberg™ License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E. 7. Do not charge a fee for access to, view ing, displa ying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg™ works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reason able fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg™ electronic works
provided that :

• You pay a royal ty fee of 20 % of the g ross prof its you der ive from
the use of Project Gutenberg™ works calcul ated using the method
you already use to calcul ate your applicable ta x es. The fee is owed
to the owner of the Project Gutenberg™ trademark, but he has
agreed to don ate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Found ation. Royalty payments must be paid
within 6 0 days following each date on which you pre pare (or are
leg ally required to prepar e ) your peri o di c tax return s. Royalty
payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
Section 4 , “In formation about donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Found ation.”

• You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who noti fi es
you in writing (or by e- ma il ) within 30 days of receipt that s / he
does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg™
License. You must requir e such a user to return or destroy all
copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and dis continue
all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg™
works.

• You provi de, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
receipt of the work.

• You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
distribution of Project Gutenberg™ works.


1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg™ electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
the Project Gutenberg™ trademark. Con t act the Foundation as set
forth in Section 3 below.

1.F .

1.F. 1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and emplo ye es ex pend considerable
effort to identi f y, do copyright re search on, tran scribe and proof read
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg™ collec tion. Des p ite these ef fort s, Project Gutenberg™
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stor ed, may
contain “D e fe ct s,” such as, but not limited to, in comp lete, in accur ate
or cor rup t dat a, tran scri ption err ors, a copyright or other
intellectual property in fring ement, a defective or da maged dis k or
other medium, a computer vir us, or computer co des that da ma ge or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F. 2. LIMITED WARRAN TY, DI SC LA IM ER OF DAMAGES - Except for the “R ight
of Re placement or R ef un d ” described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg™ trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg™ electronic work under this agreement, discla im all
li ability to you for damag es, costs and expenses, including legal
fe es. YOU AGREE THAT YOU H A VE NO RE M EDI ES FOR NE G LI G EN CE , STRI CT
LIAB ILI TY, BREACH OF WARRAN TY OR BREACH OF CON TRA CT EX CE P T TH O SE
PRO VI D ED IN P AR AG RA PH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE F OU N DA TION , THE
T R ADE MARK O WN ER , AND ANY DISTRIBUT OR UN D ER THIS AGRE E MENT WI LL NOT B E
LIAB LE TO YOU FOR A CT U AL, DIRECT, IN DIRECT, CON SE QU EN TI AL, P UN I TI VE OR
INC I D ENT AL DAMAGES E V EN I F YOU G IV E NO TIC E OF THE PO SSI B ILITY OF S U CH
DAMAG E .

1.F.3. LIMITED RI GH T OF RE P LA CE MENT OR RE F UN D - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of recei ving it, you can
receive a refund of the money ( if any ) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from . If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may ele ct to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electr onica lly, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportun ity to receive the work electr oni cally in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defe cti ve, you may dem and a refund in writing
without further opportun ities to fix the problem.

1.F. 4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you ‘ A S - I S ’, WI TH NO
O TH ER WARRANTIES OF ANY K IN D, EX P RE SS OR IM P LI E D, INC L U D ING B UT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF M ER CHA N T AB ILITY OR F IT NE SS FOR ANY P UR PO SE .

1.F. 5. Some states do not allow disclaim ers of certain imp lied
war ran ties or the excl usion or limitation of certain ty pes of
damag es. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
viol ates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be inter pre ted to make the ma x im um disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The inv ali d ity or
un en force ability of any provi sion of this agreement shall not vo id the
remaining provi si ons.

1.F. 6. IN DE M N IT Y - You agree to inde m ni fy and hold the Foundation, the
trademark own er, any agent or emplo ye e of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg™ electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
produ cti on, promo tion and distribution of Project Gutenberg™
electronic works, harm less from all li abil ity, costs and expenses,
including legal fe es, that ar ise directly or indire ctly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur : ( a ) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg™ work, ( b ) alter ation, modi fic ation, or
additi ons or de le tions to any Project Gutenberg™ work, and (c ) any
De fect you cau se.

Section 2. Information about the Mis sion of Project Gutenberg™

Project Gutenberg™ is sy non y mous with the free distribution of
electronic works in for mat s readable by the widest vari ety of
compu ters including ob so lete, old, middle- aged and new compu ter s. It
exist s because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

V ol unte ers and fin an cial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are cr iti cal to reaching Project Gutenberg™ ’s
go als and en sur ing that the Project Gutenberg™ collection will
remain freely available for gener ations to come. In 2 00 1 , the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and per man ent future for Project Gutenberg™ and future
gener ations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sec tions 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org.

Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non - prof it
5 0 1 (c ) ( 3 ) educ ational cor por ation organ ized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and gran ted tax exempt status by the Inter nal
R even ue Ser vi ce. The Foundation’s E IN or federal tax identi fication
number is 6 4 - 6 22 15 4 1. Con tributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deducti ble to the full ex tent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your stat e’s law s.

The Foundation’s business office is located at 80 9 Nor th 15 00 W est,
S al t L ake City, UT 8 4 11 6 , ( 80 1 ) 5 9 6 - 188 7. E mail contact links and up
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation’s website
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/ contact

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg™ depen ds upon and cannot survi ve without widespread
public support and donations to carry out its mission of
incre as ing the number of public domain and licen sed works that can be
freely distributed in mach ine- readable form acc essi ble by the widest
ar ray of equip ment including out dated equipment. M any small donations
( $ 1 to $ 5 ,00 0 ) are particularly important to main taining tax exempt
status with the I R S.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regul ating
char ities and char itable donations in all 5 0 states of the United
States. Com pli ance requirements are not uni form and it takes a
considerable effor t, much paper work and many fees to meet and keep up
with these require ment s. We do not solicit donations in lo c ations
where we have not received written confir mation of compli ance. To S END
D ON A TIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular state
visit www.gutenberg.org/donate.

While we cannot and do not solicit con tributions from states where we
have not met the solic itation require ments, we know of no pro hi b ition
against accep ting un solic ited donations from don ors in such states who
approach us with off ers to donate.

Inter national donations are grate fully accep ted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treat ment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff .

P lease check the Project Gutenberg web p ages for current don ation
methods and addres ses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including che cks, online payments and credit card don ations. To
don ate, please visit : www.gutenberg.org/donate.

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg™ electronic works

Pro fess or Mi cha el S. Har t was the origin at or of the Project
Gutenberg™ concept of a libr ary of electronic works that could be
freely sh ared with any one. For forty years, he produ ced and
distributed Project Gutenberg™ eBooks with only a loose ne t work of
volunte er suppor t.

Project Gutenberg™ eBooks are often created from several printed
editi ons, all of which are confir med as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is inclu ded. Th us, we do not
necess ari ly keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
editi on.

Most people start at our website which has the main P G search
fac il it y : www.gutenberg.org.

This website includ es information about Project Gutenberg™ ,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBoo ks, and how to
sub scribe to our e mail news letter to hear about new eBoo ks.

